The Girl Seeks the Male The Primal Deity Guards the Way The story tells how Pig leapt down the mountainside and found a narrow path.
After following it for nearly two miles he came across two she−monsters drawing water from a well.
How did he know that they both were monsters? Each of them had on her head an extremely unfashionable hair−style held up by bamboo slivers that stood one foot two or three inches high.
"Evil monsters," Pig called, going up to them.
The two of them looked at each other and said. "What an outrageous monk. We don't know him and we've never had words with him. So why did he call us evil monsters?" In their fury the monsters raised the pole with which they were going to carry the water and struck at Pig's head.
After a few blows that he could not ward off as he was unarmed, the idiot rushed back up the mountain with his head covered by both hands shouting, "Brother! Go back! The monsters are vicious." "What's so vicious about them?" Monkey asked.
"There were two evil spirits drawing water from the well in the hollow," said Pig, "and they hit me three or four times with their carrying−pole just because I spoke to them." "What did you call them?" Monkey asked.
"Evil monsters," Pig replied.
"You got off lightly then," laughed Monkey.
Journey to the West "I'm most obliged for your concern," replied Pig.
"My head has swollen up where they hit it, and you tell me I've got off lightly." "Soft words will get you anywhere on earth; act rough and you won't move a single step," replied Monkey.
"As they're local fiends from round here and we're monks from far away you'd have had to be a bit polite even if you'd had fists growing all over your body.
Do you think they should have hit me instead of you? You were the one who called them evil monsters.
Courtesy first!" "I never realized," said Pig.
"Living on human flesh in the mountains since childhood as you have," said Monkey, "can you recognize two kinds of tree?" "I don't know," Pig said.
"Which two trees?" "The willow and the sandalwood," Monkey replied.
"The willow has a very soft nature, so that craftsmen can carve it into holy images or make statues of the Tathagata out of it. It's gilded, painted, set with jewels, decorated with flowers, and many worshippers burn incense to it. It receives unbounded blessings.
But the sandalwood is so hard that it's used as the pressing−beam in the oil−press with iron hoops round its head, and it's hit with iron hammers too.
The only reason it suffers like this is because it's to hard." "You should have told me all this before," said Pig, "then I wouldn't have been beaten." "Now go back and find out the truth," said Brother Monkey.
"But if I go there again they'll recognize me," Pig replied. "Then turn into something else," said Monkey.
"But even if I do turn into something else, brother, how am I to question them?" asked Pig.
"When you look different go up to them and bow to them," Monkey replied. "See how old they are.
If they're about the same age as us call them 'Miss,' and if they're a lot older call them 'Lady.'" "What a terrible climb−down:
why should we be treating them as our relations when they're strangers from this far away?" said Pig.
"That's not treating them as relations," replied Monkey. "Its just a way of getting the truth out of them.
If they're the ones who've got our master we'll be able to act; and if it isn't them we won't lose any time before going to fight elsewhere." "You're right," said Pig.
"I'm going back." The splendid idiot tucked his rake in his belt, went down into the hollow, shook himself and turned into a far, dark−skinned monk.
He swaggered as he went up to the monsters, chanted a loud "na−a−aw" of respect and said, "Respectful greetings, ladies." "This monk's much better," the two monsters said with delight.
"He expresses his respects and knows how to address us properly." Then they asked him, "Where are you from, venerable elder?" "From somewhere," Pig replied.
Journey to the West "And where are you going?" they asked.
"Somewhere," Pig replied.
"What's your name?" they asked. "What it is," Pig replied again.
"Better he may be," the monsters said with a laugh, "but he won't tell us about himself.
He just echoes our questions." "Ladies," Pig asked, "why are you fetching water?" "You wouldn't know, monk," the demons replied with smiles.
"Our lady brought a Tang Priest back to the cave last night and she wants to look after him well. As the water in our cave is none too clean she's sent us two to fetch some of this good water produced by the mating of the Yin and the Yang. She's laid on a vegetarian banquet as well for the Tang Priest; she's going to marry him this evening." As soon as he heard this the idiot rushed straight back up the mountain shouting.
"Friar Sand, bring the luggage here at once.
We're dividing it up." "Why, brother?" Friar Sand asked.
"When we've divided it up you can go back to man−eating in the Flowing Sands River," Pig replied, "I'll return to Gao Village to see my wife, Big Brother can play the sage on the Mountain of Flowers and Fruit, and the white dragon can be a dragon in the ocean again.
The master's getting married in this evil spirits cave.
Let's all go and settle down." "You're talking nonsense again, you idiot," replied Brother Monkey.
"I bloody well am not," Pig retorted.
"Those two evil spirits who were carrying water said a moment ago that a vegetarian wedding feast is being laid on for the master." "How can you say things like that when the evil spirits are holding the master prisoner in the cave and he's longing for us to go in and rescue him?" said Monkey.
"How can we rescue him?" Pig asked.
"You two bring the horse and the luggage, while we go with the two she−monsters as our guides," Monkey replied.
"When we reach the entrance we can act together." The idiot could only go with Monkey as he followed the two monsters for five or six miles deep into the mountains before suddenly disappearing.
"So the master was captured by a devil in broad daylight," exclaimed Pig with surprise.
"You've got good eyesight," said Monkey.
"How can you possibly tell what they really were?" "Those two monsters were carrying the water along when suddenly they disappeared.
They must be daytime devils." "I think they went into a cave," said Monkey.
"Wait while I go to have a look." Journey to the West The splendid Great Sage opened his fiery eyes with their golden pupils and scanned the whole mountain.
He saw no movement, but did spot a ceremonial archway most intricately made with many flowers and colours, triple eaves and fourfold decorations in front of the cliff.
Going closer with Pig and Friar Sand he saw four large words written on it: PITFALL MOUNTAIN:
BOTTOMLESS CAVE "Brothers," said Monkey, "here's the evil spirits' archway, but I still don't know where the entrance is." "Can't be far," said Friar Sand, "can't be far.
Let's have a good look for it." When they turned round to look they saw a great rock over three miles around at the foot of the mountain beneath the archway. In the middle of it was a hole the size of a water−vat, which had become very slippery by repeated climbing.
"Brother," said Pig, "that's where the evil spirits go in and out of their cave." "That's very strange," said Monkey.
"To be frank with the two of you, I've captured quite a few evil spirits since I started escorting the Tang Priest, but I've never seen a cave palace like this one before.
Pig, you go down first and find out how deep it is.
Then I'll be able to go in and rescue the master." "It'll be hard," said Pig with a shake of his head, "very hard. I'm very clumsy.
If I tripped and fell in it might take me two or three years to reach the bottom." "How deep is it then?" Monkey asked.
"Look," Pig replied, and as the Great Sage leant over the edge of the hole to take a careful look he saw to his astonishment that it was very deep indeed and must have measured over a hundred miles around.
"It's very, very deep, brother," he turned round to say. "Go back then," Pig replied.
"The master's beyond saving." "What a thing to say!" Monkey retorted.
"'Have no thoughts of being lazy; put idleness out of your mind.' Put the luggage down, and tether the horse to one of the legs of the archway.
You and Friar Sand must block the entrance with your rake and staff while I go inside to explore.
If the master really is inside I'll drive the evil spirits out with my iron cudgel, and when they reach the entrance you mustn't let them out.
We'll only be able to kill the evil spirits and rescue the master if we work together." The other two accepted their orders.
Monkey sprang into the hole, and under his feet tea thousand coloured clouds appeared, while a thousand layers of auspicious mist shielded him.
He was soon at the bottom, which was a very long way down. Inside all was bright; there was the same sunshine, winds, flowers, fruit and trees as in the world above. "What a splendid place," Monkey thought.
"It reminds me of the Water Curtain Cave that Heaven gave me in the place where I was born.
This is another cave paradise." As he looked around he saw a gate−tower with double eaves around which grew many clumps of pine and bamboo. Inside were many buildings.
"This must be where the evil spirit lives," he thought.
"I'll go in and find out what's up.
No, wait.
If I go in like this she'll recognize me.
I'd better transform myself." With a shake and a hand−spell he turned himself into a Journey to the West fly and flew lightly up to land on the gate−tower and listen in.
From here he saw the monster sitting at her ease in a thatched pavilion. She was dressed far more beautifully than she had been when they rescued her in the pine forest or when she had tried to catch Monkey in the monastery: Her hair was piled in a crow−black coiffure; She wore a green velvet waistcoat.
Her feet were a pair of curving golden lotuses; Her fingers were as delicate as bamboo shoots in spring.
Her powdered face was like a silver dish, And her red lips were as glossy as a cherry.
She was a regular beauty, Even more lovely than the lady on the moon.
After capturing the pilgrim monk that morning She was going to know the pleasure of sharing his bed.
Monkey said nothing as he listened out for what she might say.
Before long the cherry of her lips parted as she said with great pleasure, "Lay on a vegetarian feast, my little ones, and quick. My darling Tang Priest and I are going to be man and wife afterwards." "So it's true," thought Brother Monkey, grinning to himself.
"I thought Pig was just joking.
I'd better fly in and find the master.
I wonder what state of mind he's in.
If he's been led astray I'm leaving him here." When he spread his wings and flew inside to look he saw the Tang Priest sitting in a corridor behind a trellis covered with opaque red paper below and left clear above.
Butting a hole through the trellis paper Monkey landed on the Tang Priest's bald head and called, "Master." "Save me, disciple," replied Sanzang, who recognized Monkey's voice.
"You're useless, Master," said Monkey. "The evil spirit is laying on a feast, and when you've eaten it you two are getting married.
I expect you'll have a son or a daughter to start another generation of monks and nuns.
What have you got to be so upset about?" When the venerable elder heard this he gnashed his teeth and said, "Disciple, in all the time since I left Chang'an, accepted you as my follower at the Double Boundary Mountain and started my journey West, when have I ever eaten meat or had any wicked ideas?
Now the evil spirit has captured me she is insisting that I mate with her. If I lose my true masculine essence may I fall from the wheel of reincarnation and be fixed for ever behind the Dark Mountains, never to rise again." Journey to the West "No need to swear any oaths," said Monkey with a grin.
"If you really want to fetch the scriptures from the Western Heaven I'll take you there." "I can't remember the way I came in," Sanzang replied.
"Never mind about forgetting," said Monkey.
"You won't get out of here as easily as you came in, which was from the top downwards.
If I save you now you'll have to go from the bottom upwards.
If you're very lucky you'll squeeze out through the entrance and get away.
But if your luck's out you won't be able to squeeze through and sooner or later you'll die of suffocation." "This is terrible," said Sanzang, the tears pouring from his eyes.
"What are we to do?" "No problem," said Monkey, "no problem.
The evil spirit's getting some wine prepared for you. You'll have to drink a goblet of it whether you want to or not.
But you must pour it out quickly so that it makes a lot of froth. Then I can turn myself into a tiny insect and fly under the bubbles.
When she gulps me down into her belly I'll tear her heart and liver to shreds and rip her guts apart. Once I've killed her you'll be able to escape." "But that would be an inhuman thing to do, disciple," said Sanzang.
"If all you're interested in is being kind you're done for," Monkey replied.
"The evil spirit's a murderess. What do you care so much about her for?" "Oh well," said Sanzang, "never mind.
But you will have to stay with me." Indeed:
The Great Sage Sun guarded Tang Sanzang well; The pilgrim priest depended on the Handsome Monkey King.
Master and disciple had not even finished their discussion when the evil spirit, who had arranged everything, came in along the corridor, unlocked the doors and called, "Reverend sir." The Tang Priest dared not reply.
She addressed him again, and again he dared not reply. Why was that?
He was thinking that Divine energy is dispersed by an open mouth; Trouble starts when the tongue begins to move.
He was thinking with all his heart that if he obstinately refused to open his mouth she might turn vicious and murder him in an instant.
Just when he was feeling confused, wondering which difficult alternative to choose and asking himself what to do, the evil spirit addressed him as "Reverend sir" for the third time.
The Tang Priest had no choice but to answer, "Here I am, madam." For him to give this reply was to make all the flesh fall off him.
Now everybody says that the Tang Priest is a sincere monk, so how could he reply to the she−devil when he was on his way to worship the Buddha and fetch the scriptures from the Western Heaven?
Journey to the West What you would not realize is that this was a crisis in which his very survival was at stake, that he had absolutely no alternative; and although he went through the form of replying he was free of desire inside.
But when the evil spirit heard his reply she pushed the door open, helped the Tang Priest to his feet, held his hand, stood with her side pressed against his and whispered in his ear.
Just look at her as she lays on the charm and makes herself alluring in every possible way.
She did not realize that Sanzang was full of revulsion.
"From the way she's making herself so seductive," Monkey thought with a wry grin to himself, "I'm worried that she might get the master interested." Indeed:
The monk in demon trouble met a pretty girl; The she−devil's beauty was truly superb.
Her slender jade eyebrows were like two willow leaves; Her round face was set off with peach blossom.
Embroidered shoes gave a sight of a pair of phoenixes; Her crow−black hair was piled high at the temples.
As smiling she led the master by his hand His cassock was tinged with orchid and musk.
Her arms around him, the she−devil took the master to a thatched pavilion and said, "Reverend sir, I've had a drink brought here to have with you." "Lady," said the Tang Priest, "as a monk I can take no impure food." "I know," the evil spirit replied.
"As the water in the cave isn't clean I've sent for some of the pure water from the mating of the Yin and the Yang up on the mountain, and had a banquet of fruit and vegetables prepared.
After that you and I are going to have some fun." When the Tang Priest went into the pavilion with her this is what could be seen:
All within the gates Was decked in silks and embroideries; Throughout the hall Incense rose from golden lion censers.
Black−painted inlaid tables were set in rows, Journey to the West On which stood dark−lacquered bamboo dishes.
On the inlaid tables Were all kinds of delicacies; In the bamboo dishes Were vegetarian delights:
Crab apples, olives, lotus seeds, grapes, torreya−nuts, hazelnuts, pine−nuts, lichees, longans, chestnuts, water caltrops, jujubes, persimmons, walnuts, gingko nuts, kumquats and oranges.
There was the fruit that grows on every hill, The fresh vegetables of each season; Beancurd, wheat gluten, tree−ear fungus, fresh bamboo shoots, button mushrooms, gill fungus, yams, sealwort, agar, day lily fried in vegetable oil, Hyacinth beans, cowpeas prepared with mature sauces.
Cucumbers, gourds, gingko, turnip greens.
Peeled aubergines were cooked like quails; Seeded wax gourds Taro stewed tender and sprinkled with sugar, Turnips boiled in vinegar.
Pungent chili and ginger made it all delicious; All the dishes were a balance of bland and salty.
Revealing the tips of her jade fingers she raised a dazzling golden goblet that she filled with fine wine. "Dearest reverend gentleman," she said, handing it to him, "my darling, have a drink to celebrate our happy union." Sanzang was covered with embarrassment as he took the wine.
He poured a libation into the air as he prayed silently, "Devas who guard the Dharma, Guardians of the Four Quarters and the Centre, Four Duty Gods: your disciple Chen Xuanzang has benefited from the secret protection of all you deities sent by the Bodhisattva Guanyin on my journey to pay my respects at the Thunder Monastery, see the Buddha and seek the scriptures. I have now been captured by an evil spirit on my way. She is forcing me to marry her and has now handed me this cup of wine to drink.
If this really is pure wine I can force myself to drink it and still be able to succeed and see the Buddha.
But if it is impure wine I will be breaking my vows and fall for ever into the bitterness of the wheel of rebirth." Journey to the West The Great Sage Sun made himself tiny and was like a secret informant behind his master's ear.
When he spoke Sanzang was the only one who could hear him.
Knowing that his master was normally fond of the pure wine of grapes he told him to drain the goblet.
Sanzang had no choice but to do so, quickly refill the goblet and hand it back to the evil spirit.
As he filled it bubbles of happiness formed on the surface of the wine.
Brother Monkey turned himself into the tiniest of insects and flew lightly under the bubbles.
But when the spirit took the goblet she put it down instead of drinking from it, bowed twice to the Tang Priest and spoke loving words to him with charming bashfulness.
By the time she lifted the cup the bubbles had burst and the insect was revealed.
Not realizing that it was Monkey transformed the evil spirit took it for a real insect, lifted it out with her little finger and flicked it away.
Seeing that as things were not going as he intended he would be unable to get into her belly Monkey turned himself into a hungry eagle.
Indeed: Jade claws, gold eyes and iron wings; In terrible might he rose above the clouds.
Cunning hares and foxes felt faint at just the sight, And hid among mountains and rivers for hundred of miles around.
When hungry it chased small birds into the wind, And rose to the gate of heaven when replete.
Murderous were its talons of steel; In times of triumph it stayed aloof in the clouds.
Monkey flew up, swung his jade claws, and noisily overturned the tables, smashing all the fruit, vegetables and crockery, and leaving the Tang Priest alone there as he flew off.
This was so terrifying that the she−devil's heart and gall were split open, and the Tang Priest's flesh and bones were turned crisp.
Shivering and shaking, the evil spirit threw her arms round the Tang Priest and said, "Dearest reverend gentleman, wherever did that come from?" "I don't know," Sanzang replied. "I went to a great deal of trouble to arrange this vegetarian feast for you," the she−devil said.
"Goodness only knows where that feathered brute flew in from and smashed our crockery." "Smashing the crockery doesn't really matter," the junior demons said, "but all the food has been spilt on the floor.
It's too dirty to eat now." Sanzang by now realized that this was all the result of Monkey's magic, but he dared not say so.
Journey to the West "Little ones," said the she−devil, "I realize now. It must be heaven and earth that sent that thing down here because they can't tolerate my holding the Tang Priest prisoner.
Clear all the broken dishes up and lay on another banquet. Never mind whether it's vegetarian or not. Heaven can be our matchmaker and the earth our guarantor. After that the Tang Priest and I will become man and wife." We will say no more of her as she took the Tang Priest to sit in the East corridor.
Instead the story tells of how Monkey flew out, turned back into himself, reached the entrance to the cave and shouted, "Open up!" "Friar Sand," Pig shouted, "our big brother's here." As the two of them drew their weapons away Monkey sprang out.
"Is there an evil spirit in there?" Pig asked, grabbing hold of him.
"Is the master in there?" "Yes, yes," said Monkey.
"The master must be having a hard time in there," said Pig. "Are his arms tied behind his back? Or is he all roped up?
Is she going to steam him or boil him?" "None of them," Monkey replied.
"She'd just had a vegetarian feast served and was going to do it with him." "So you've been lucky then," said Pig.
"You must have drunk a wedding toast." "Idiot!" retorted Monkey, "Never mind about having a wedding drink.
I can hardly keep him alive." "Then why are you here?" Pig asked.
Monkey told how he had seen the master and done his transformations, ending, "Don't let your fears run away with you, brothers.
The master's here, and when I go back in this time I'll definitely rescue him." Going back inside, Monkey turned into a fly and landed on the gate−tower to listen.
He could hear the she−devil snorting with fury as she gave instructions within the pavilion. "Little ones, bring whatever there is, vegetarian or not, and burn paper as offerings to the deities.
I'll ask heaven and earth to be the matchmakers.
I'm definitely going to marry him." When Monkey heard this he smiled to himself and thought, "That she−devil's completely shameless. She's locked a monk up in her home and now she's going to mess around with him in broad daylight.
But don't be in too much of a hurry.
Give me time to go in and have a look round." With a buzz he flew along the corridor to see the master sitting inside, tears streaming down his face.
Monkey squeezed in, landed on Sanzang's head and called, "Master." Recognizing the voice, Sanzang sprang to his feet and said with tooth−gnashing fury, "Macaque! Other people get their courage from a big gall, but they have to wrap their bodies around it.
Your gall is so big that you wrap it round your body.
You used your magical powers of transformation to smash the crockery, but what use is that?
By fighting that she−devil you've only made her more sex−crazed than ever. She is arranging a banquet with vegetarian and impure food all mixed up and is determined to mate with me.
Where will this all end?" Smiling to himself again, Monkey replied, "Don't be angry with me, Master.
I've got a way to save you." Journey to the West "How will you save me?" the Tang Priest asked.
"When I flew up just now," said Monkey, "I saw that she has a garden behind here.
You must lure her into the garden to fool around and I'll rescue you from there." "How will you rescue me from the garden?" the Tang Priest asked.
"Go to the peach trees in the garden with her and stay there.
Wait till I've flown to a branch of the peach tree and turned into a red peach.
When you want to eat a peach pick the red one first−−that will be me.
She'll be bound to pick one too. You must insist on giving her the red one.
Once she's swallowed it I'll be in her stomach. When I tear her stomach to pieces and rip her guts to shreds she'll be dead and you'll be freed." "With your powers you ought to fight her," said Sanzang.
"Why do you want to get into her stomach?" "You don't understand, Master," Monkey replied.
"If it were easy to get in and out of this cave of hers I would be able to fight her. But this place is very hard to get into or out of: the way out is complicated and difficult.
If I started a fight with her all the fiends in her den, young and old, would overpower me.
Then how would it end?
We must act carefully if we're all to make a clean getaway." Sanzang nodded, believing all that Monkey said, adding only, "You must stay with me." "I know," said monkey, "I know.
I'll be on your head." When master and disciple had settled their plan Sanzang leaned forward, took hold of the bars in the corridor's gates and called out, "Lady, lady." As soon as she heard this the evil spirit came rushing over, a simpering smile on her face, to ask, "What do you have to say to me, my wonderful darling?" "Lady," replied Sanzang, "ever since leaving Chang'an and starting on my journey to the West I have had to cross mountains and rivers every single day.
When I was staying in the Zhenhai Monastery last night I caught a bad chill and I have been in a sweat today.
I was just beginning to feel a little better today when in your kindness, good lady, you brought me into your immortals' palace.
As I have been sitting here all day I am now feeling in rather low spirits again.
Could you take me somewhere to cheer myself up and have a little fun?" The evil spirit was utterly delighted.
"So you're feeling a bit interested, are you, my wonderful darling?" she said. "You and I will go into the garden for some fun.
Little ones," she called, "fetch the key, open the garden gates, and sweep the paths in the garden." The demons all hurried off to open the gates and tidy the place up.
Meanwhile the evil spirit was opening the screen and helping the Tang Priest out.
Just watch the many young demons−−all willowy beauties with oiled hair and powdered faces−−crowding around the Tang Priest as they head for the garden.
What a splendid monk he was, walking amid these beauties in their gauze and brocade for no other purpose than to be deaf and dumb.
If instead of having an iron heart set on the Buddha he had been any ordinary man susceptible to wine and women he would never have succeeded in fetching the scriptures.
When they reached the entrance to the garden the evil spirit whispered seductively, "My wonderful darling, let's have some fun here−−it'll cheer you up." They went into the garden hand in hand, and when he looked up he saw that it was indeed a splendid place. This is what could be seen: Journey to the West All over the winding paths Bluish lichens grow.
Secluded gauze windows Kept dark by embroidered curtains.
When the breeze arises Silks and brocades float in the air.
When the gentle rain stops falling The smooth white skin and jade−like flesh are revealed.
The sun−scorched apricot Is red as an immortal's rainbow clothes spread out to dry; The plantain in the moonlight Is bluer than Lady Taizhen waving her feather fan.
Whitewashed walls enclose The golden orioles that sing in ten thousand willows.
Within the empty halls Butterflies flit among begonias in the courtyard.
Look at the Hall of Crystallized Perfumes, The Green Moth Hall, The Hall to Recover from Drunkenness, The Hall of Longing, Rolling up the brilliance, one behind the other. On the red curtains Hooks hold tassels like prawn whiskers. Now look at the Pavilion to Ease Pain The Pavilion of Simplicity, The Pavilion of Thrushes, Journey to the West The Four Rains Pavilion, All towering and lofty, And bearing on decorated tablets Their names in archaic script.
Look too at the Pool Where Cranes Bathe, The Goblet−washing Pool, The Pool of Delight in the Moon, The Pool for Cleansing Tassels, Where amid duckweed and algae the gold scales shine.
Then there is the Kiosk of Ink Flowers, The Kiosk of Strange Boxes, The Interesting Kiosk, The Kiosk for Admiring the Clouds Where bubbles like green ants float on the wine in jade ladles and goblets.
Around the pools and pavilions Stand rocks from Lake Taihu, Rocks of purple crystal, Yingluo rocks, Jin River rocks, Greenish and overgrown with tiger−whisker rushes.
East and West of the kiosks and balls are found A Wooden Mountain, A Turquoise Screen Mountain, A Howling Wind Mountain, A Jade Mushroom Mountain, All covered in phoenix−tail bamboo.
Journey to the West Trellises of briar roses, And garden roses, Growing by a swing, As a curtain of silk and brocade.
A Pine Pavilion, A Magnolia Pavilion, Opposite a Saussurea Pavilion, Forming a wall of jade with embroidered hangings.
Herbaceous and tree peonies are rivals in luxuriance; The night−closing magnolias and the jasmine Are charming every year.
Moist with dewdrops are the purple buds: They ought to be painted or drawn.
The red hibiscus fills the sky with flaming splendor, A marvellous subject for poetry.
When it comes to fine scenery This makes Lang Garden or Penglai not worth a mention; And as for the flowers, The finest peonies of Luoyang count for nothing beside them.
In the battle of the blossoms late in the spring The garden lacks only the flowers of jade.
The venerable elder led the she−devil by the hand as they strolled in the garden, admiring the endless displays of rare and exotic blooms.
As they went through many a hall and pavilion he really did seem to be going into an exquisite place.
Looking up, he realized that he was by the peach grove.
Monkey pinched his master's head to remind him.
Flying to a branch of a peach tree Brother Monkey shook himself and turned into a red peach, and a most fetchingly red one at that.
"Lady," the venerable elder said to the evil spirit, "what beautifully scented flowers Journey to the West and ripe fruit you have in this garden.
The blooms are so fragrant bees vie for their nectar; The birds all compete for the fruit on the branches.
Why are some of the peaches on the trees red and some green?" "If there were no Yin and Yang in the heavens the sun and moon would not be bright," the evil spirit replied with a smile.
"If there were no Yin and Yang in the earth the plants and trees would not grow.
And if there were no Yin and Yang among people there would be no sexual difference.
The peaches on the Southern Yang side of these trees are red because they ripen first in the sun's heat. The peaches on the Northern Yin side are green because they get no sun and are still unripe.
It's all because of the Yin and the Yang." "Thank you, lady, for your explanation," Sanzang replied.
"I did not know that." He then reached out and picked a red peach, while the evil spirit also picked a green one.
Sanzang bowed as he handed the red one respectfully to the evil spirit with the words, "Lady, you love what is attractive, so won't you take this red peach and give me the green one?" The she−devil made the exchange, thinking with concealed delight, "What a nice monk. He really is a good man.
He is being so loving to me even before we're man and wife." With great pleasure she paid him her affectionate respects.
As the Tang Priest started to eat the green peach at once the evil spirit was delighted to do likewise, opening her mouth to bite into the red one.
When she parted her red lips and revealed her silver teeth the impatient Monkey did not give her time to bite him but rolled straight down her throat into her stomach.
"Reverend gentleman," the terrified evil spirit said, "that peach is a terror.
Why did it roll straight down and not let me bite it?" "Lady," Sanzang replied, "the first ripe fruits of a garden are very delicious.
That is why it went down so fast." "But it shot straight down before I'd had time to spit the stone out," the evil spirit replied.
"Because you are such a lover of what is fine and beautiful and enjoyed it so much," said Sanzang, "you swallowed it before you could bring the stone out." Once inside her stomach Monkey turned back into himself.
"Master," he called, "no need to argue with her now.
I've succeeded." "Don't be too hard on her, disciple," Sanzang replied.
"Who are you talking to?" the evil spirit asked when she heard this.
"I am talking to my disciple Sun Wukong," Sanzang replied.
"Where is he?" the evil spirit asked. Journey to the West "In your stomach," Sanzang replied.
"He was the red peach you have just eaten." "That's the end of me," exclaimed the evil spirit in horror.
"If that ape's got into my stomach I'm dead.
Sun the Novice, why did you go to such lengths to get into my stomach?" "No particular reason," replied Monkey from inside her.
"I just wanted to eat the six leaves of your liver and your lungs, and your heart with its three hairs and seven apertures.
I'm going to clean your insides right out and leave you a skeleton spirit." This sent the evil spirit's souls scattering in terror and shivering and shaking she clung tightly to the Tang Priest and said, "Reverend gentleman, I had thought that Our destinies were from former lives joined by a red thread; Our love was as close as the water and the fish.
I never imagined that we lovebirds would be parted Or that the phoenixes would fly to East and West.
When the waters rose under Lan Bridge the rendezvous failed; The meeting came to nothing in the misty temple.
After brief joy we are parted once more; In whatever year will I meet you again?" When Monkey heard all this from inside her stomach he was afraid that the venerable elder would have another attack of benevolence and let her talk her way out of the problem. Thereupon he started to wield fist and foot, striking out in martial postures and leveling everything around him. He punched her stomach almost to ribbons.
Unable to bear the pain, the evil spirit collapsed in the dust, not daring to utter a single word for some time.
As she was not speaking Monkey imagined that she must be dead and eased off.
She then recovered her breath to some extent and called out, "Where are you, little ones?" Now once in the garden, the creatures had all had the understanding to go off picking flowers, playing in the grass and amusing themselves, leaving the she−devil alone with the Tang Priest for a romantic conversation.
As soon as they heard her calling they rushed over to see the evil spirit lying on the ground, her face a terrible color as she groaned, unable to move. They hurriedly helped her up, crowding round and asking, "What's wrong, madam?
Have you had a heart attack?" "No, no," the evil spirit replied.
"Don't ask any questions. I've got someone inside me.
Take the monk outside if you want to save my life." Journey to the West The junior devils actually did start to carry the Tang Priest, at which Monkey yelled from inside her belly, "Don't any of you dare carry him.
You must take my master out yourself.
I'll only spare your life when you've carried him outside." This left the evil spirit with no choice as all she cared about was saving her skin.
At once she struggled to her feet, lifted the Tang Priest on her back and headed outside, followed by the junior devils asking, "Where are you going, Madam?" To this the evil spirit replied, "'As long as the lakes and the bright moon remain I'll surely find somewhere to put my golden hook.' Once I've taken this wretch outside I'll find myself another man." The splendid evil spirit went straight by cloud to the mouth of the cave, where the clang of weapons and wild shouts could be heard.
"Disciple," said Sanzang, "why can I hear weapons outside?" "It's Pig rubbing his rake," replied Monkey.
"Give him a shout." "Bajie," Sanzang shouted.
"Friar Sand," said Pig when he heard this, "the master's out." The two of them drew back their rake and staff, letting the evil spirit carry the Tang Priest out.
Indeed: The Mind Ape had subdued a monster from the inside; The Earth and Wood door guards welcomed the holy monk.
If you don't know whether the evil spirit's life was spared listen to the explanation in the next installment.
The Mind−Ape Recognizes the Refiner of Cinnabar The Girl Reverts to Her True Nature The story tells how after Sanzang had been carried out of the cave by the evil spirit Friar Sand went up to him and asked, "Where is my oldest brother now that you have come out, Master?" Journey to the West "He must know what he's doing," said Pig.
"I expect he's exchanged himself for the master to get him out." "Your brother is in her stomach," Sanzang replied, pointing at the evil spirit. "It is terribly filthy," Pig said.
"Whatever are you doing in there?
Come out." "Open your mouth," said Monkey from inside, "I'm coming out." The she−devil did indeed open her mouth wide.
Monkey made himself very small, sprang up into her throat, and was just about to emerge when he became worried that she might cheat and bite him. He then pulled out his iron cudgel, blew on it with magic breath, called "Change!" and turned it into a jujube stone with which he wedged her jaw open.
With one bound he then leapt outside, taking the iron cudgel with him, bowed to resume his own form and raised his cudgel to strike her.
At once she drew a pair of fine swords, parrying his blow with a loud clang. They fought a splendid battle on the mountain top.
A pair of dancing, flying swords defended her face; The gold−banded cudgel struck at her head.
One was a heaven−born monkey, the Mind−ape; The other had the bones of an earth−born girl turned spirit; The two of them both had been smitten by anger: Hatred arose at the celebration; the party was ended.
One longed to mate with the primal masculinity, The other wanted to defeat the incarnation of the female.
When the cudgel was raised to the sky cold mists spread out; The swords shook up the earth's black dirt like a sieve.
Because the elder would visit the Buddha They were locked in fierce combat, each showing great prowess.
When water conflicts with fire motherhood is out; When Yin and Yang cannot combine each goes its own way.
After the two had been fighting for a very long time The earth moved, the mountains shook and the trees were destroyed. Journey to the West The sight of their struggle made Pig grumble resentfully about Monkey.
"Brother," he said, turning to Friar Sand, "our elder brother is messing around.
When he was in her stomach just now he could have used his fists to make her belly red with blood, rip it open and come out. That would have settled her score.
Why did he have to come out through her mouth and fight her?
Why did he let her run wild?" "You're right," Friar Sand replied, "but it was thanks to him that the master was rescued from the depths of the cave, even if he is in a fight with her now.
Let's ask the master to sit here by himself while we two use our weapons to help our brother beat the evil spirit." "No, no," said Pig with a wave of his hand.
"He's got his magic powers. We'd be useless." "What a thing to say," retorted Friar Sand.
"This is in all of our interests.
We may not be much use, but even a fart can strengthen a breeze." Now that the idiot's dander was up he brandished his rake and shouted, "Come on!" Ignoring the master, they rode the wind and went for the evil spirit, striking wildly at her with their rake and staff.
The evil spirit, who was already finding Brother Monkey too much to handle, realized that she would be unable to hold out against two more of them. At once she turned and fled.
"After her, brothers," Monkey shouted.
Seeing that they were so hot on her heels the evil spirit took the embroidered shoe off her right foot, blew on it with a magic breath, said a spell, called "Change!" and turned it into her own double swinging a pair of sword.
Then she shook herself, turned into a puff of wind and went straight back. There she was, fleeing for her life because she was no match for them.
What happened next was quite unexpected: Sanzang's evil star had still not gone away. As the evil spirit reached the archway in front of the entrance to the cave she saw the Tang Priest sitting there by himself, so she went up to him, threw her arm round him, grabbed the luggage, bit through the bridle, and carried him back inside, horse and all.
The story tells not of her but of Pig, who exploited an opening to fell the evil spirit with one blow of his rake, only to find that she was really an embroidered shoe.
"You pair of idiots," said Monkey when he saw it. "You should have been looking after the master.
Nobody asked you to help." "What about that, then, Friar Sand?" said Pig.
"I said we shouldn't come here.
That ape has had a brainstorm. We beat the monster for him and he gets angry with us." "Beaten the monster indeed!" Monkey said.
"The monster fooled me yesterday by leaving a shoe behind when I was fighting her.
Goodness knows how the master is now that you've left him.
Let's go straight back and see." The three of them hurried back to find that the master had disappeared: there was no sign at all of him, the luggage or the white horse.
Pig started rushing all over the place in a panic with Friar Sand searching alongside him. The Great Sage Sun was also most anxious.
As he searched he noticed half of the bridle rope lying askew beside the path.
Picking it up, he could not hold back his tears as he called in a loud voice, "Master!
When I went I took my leave of you three and the horse, and all I find on my return is this rope." It was indeed a case of Being reminded of the steed by seeing the saddle, Journey to the West Missing the beloved amid one's tears.
The sight of Monkey's tears gave Pig an uncontrollable urge to throw back his head and laugh out loud. "Blockhead," said Monkey abusively.
"Do you want us to break up again?" "That's not what I mean," said Pig, still laughing. "The master's been carried back into the cave.
As the saying goes, 'third time lucky'.
You've already been into the cave twice, so if you go in again you're sure to rescue the master." "Very well then," said Monkey, wiping away his tears, "as this is the way things are I have no choice. I'll have to go back in.
You two don't have to worry about the luggage or the horse any more, so guard the cave−mouth properly." The splendid Great Sage turned round and sprang into the cave. This time he did no transformations but appeared in his own dharma form.
This is what he was like: His cheeks looked strange but his heart was strong; As a monster since childhood his magic was mighty.
A misshapen face that looked like a saddle; Eyes fiery bright with golden light.
His hairs were harder than needles of steel, And striking was the pattern of his tigerskin kilt.
In the sky he could scatter a myriad clouds; In the sea he could stir up thousandfold waves.
Once with his strength he fought heavenly kings, Putting a hundred and eight thousand warriors to flight.
His title was Great Sage Equaling Heaven; He was an expert with the gold−banded cudgel.
Today in the West he was using his powers To return to the cave and rescue Sanzang.
Journey to the West Watch Monkey as he stops his cloud and heads straight for the evil spirit's residence, where he found the gates under the gate towers shut.
Not caring whether or not it was the right thing to do, he smashed them open with one swing of his cudgel and charged inside.
It was completely quiet and deserted, and the Tang Priest was nowhere to be seen in the corridor.
The tables and chairs in the pavilion and all the utensils had completely disappeared.
As the cave measured over a hundred miles around, the evil spirit had very many hiding places in it.
This was where she had brought the Tang Priest the previous time, only to be found by Monkey, so after catching him this time she had moved him elsewhere in case Monkey came looking for him again.
Not knowing where they had gone, Monkey stamped his foot and beat his chest with fury, letting himself call out at the top of his voice, "Master!
You are a Tang Sanzang formed in misfortune, a pilgrim monk molded from disaster. I know the way well enough. Why isn't he here?
Where should I look for him?" Just when he was howling with impatience and anxiety his nose was struck by a whiff of incense, which brought him back to himself. "This incense smoke is coming from the back," he thought, "so I suppose they must be there." He strode in at the back, his cudgel in his hand, but still saw no sign of life.
What he did see were three side rooms. Near the back wall was a lacquered offertory table carved with dragons on which stood a gilt incense−burner. From this came heavily scented incense smoke.
On the table was a tablet inscribed with letters of gold to which the offerings were being made. The letters read, "Honoured Father, Heavenly King Li." In a slightly inferior position was written, "Honoured Elder Brother, Third Prince Nezha." The sight filled Monkey with delight.
He stopped searching for the monster and the Tang Priest, rubbed his cudgel between his fingers to make it as small as an embroidery needle, tucked it inside his ear, gathered up the tablet and the incense−burner with a sweep of his arms and went straight back out through the gates on his clouds.
He was still chortling with glee when he reached the mouth of the cave.
When Pig and Friar Sand heard him they unblocked the entrance to the cave and greeted him with, "You look so happy you must have saved the master, elder brother." "No need for us to save him," Monkey replied with a smile.
"We can ask this tablet for him." "But that tablet isn't an evil spirit and it can't talk," said Pig, "so how can you ask it for him?" "Look at it," said Monkey, putting the tablet on the ground.
When Friar Sand went up to look he saw "Honoured Father, Heavenly King Li" and "Honoured Elder Brother, Third Prince Nezha" written on it.
"What does this mean?" Friar Sand asked.
"The evil spirit makes offerings to it," Monkey replied.
"When I charged into her place there was nobody about, only this tablet.
I think she must be a daughter of Heavenly King Li and the younger sister of Prince Nezha who so longed for the lower world that she pretended to be an evil spirit and carried our master off.
So who better to demand the master from?
You two keep guard here while I take this tablet up to Heaven to lodge a complaint with the Jade Emperor and force those heavenly kings to give our master back." "Brother," said Pig, "there's a saying that goes, 'Bring a capital charge and pay for it with your own head.' You can only do a thing like that if you're in the right.
Besides, a case in the celestial court isn't something to be started lightly. You'd better tell me what sort of case you're going to bring." "I know what I'm going to do," Monkey replied.
"I'm going to produce this tablet and incense−burner as evidence and submit a written deposition too." "What will you write in your deposition?" Pig asked him.
"Will you tell me?" Journey to the West To this Brother Monkey replied, "The complainant Sun Wukong, whose age is stated in this document, is the disciple of the monk Tang Sanzang who is going from the Tang court in the East to fetch the scriptures from the Western Heaven.
He submits a complaint that an imitation evil spirit has committed a kidnap. Li Jing, the Pagoda−carrying Heavenly King, and his son Prince Nezha have been slack in controlling their women's quarters. He has allowed his daughter to run away and turn into an evil spirit in the Bottomless Cave in Mount Pitfall, where she has lured countless deluded people to their deaths.
She has now carried my master into a remote corner where he cannot be found.
If I had not submitted this complaint I would have been deeply worried that the heavenly king and his son in their wickedness had deliberately incited his daughter to become a spirit and cause general disaster.
I beg Your Majesty in your mercy to summon the heavenly king to attend a hearing, bring the demon under control and deliver my master. I would be deeply grateful if Your Majesty would determine the correct penalty for this offence.
This is my respectful submission." When Pig and Friar Sand heard this they said with delight, "Brother, you're bound to win if you submit so reasonable a complaint.
Be as quick as you can.
If you lose any time you may be too late to stop the evil spirit killing our master." "I'll hurry," said Brother Monkey, "I'll hurry.
I'll be back in the time it takes to cook rice at the longest or to make a cup of tea if I'm quick." With one bound the splendid Great Sage carried the tablet and the incense−burner straight up by auspicious cloud to the outside of the Southern Gate of Heaven, where the Heavenly Kings Powerful and Protector of the Nation greeted him with bows, letting him in and not daring to block his way.
He went straight to the Hall of Universal Radiance, where the four heavenly teachers Zhang, Ge, Xu, and Qiu showed him great courtesy and asked, "Why are you here, Great Sage?" "I've got a complaint here," Monkey replied.
"There are a couple of people I want to lodge a complaint against." "The scoundrel," thought the appalled heavenly teachers, "who can he be wanting to sue?" They had no choice but to lead him to the Hall of Miraculous Mist and submit their report to the Jade Emperor, who ordered that Monkey be summoned hi.
Monkey then put down the tablet and the incense−burner, bowed to the emperor, and presented his complaint.
This was taken by the Ancient Immortal Ge, who spread it out on the emperor's table.
When the emperor had read it through from the beginning and learned what had happened he approved the deposition, wrote an imperial rescript on it, and sent the Great White Planet, the Metal Planet Changgeng, to the Cloud Tower Palace to summon the Pagoda−carrying Heavenly King Li to the imperial presence. Monkey then stepped forward and submitted this memorial:
"I beg that the Heavenly Sovereign will punish him effectively as otherwise there will be further trouble." "Let the complainant go too," the Jade Emperor ordered.
"What, me?" said Monkey.
"His Majesty has issued his decree," said the Four Heavenly Teachers, "so you go with the Metal Planet." Monkey then went with the planet by cloud.
They were soon at the Cloud Tower Palace, the residence of the heavenly king.
The Metal Star saw a page standing at the palace gates.
Journey to the West Recognizing the planet, the boy went inside to report, "The Great White Planet is here." The heavenly king then came out to welcome the planet.
Seeing that the planet was carrying a decree from the Jade Emperor, the heavenly king ordered incense to be burned before turning round and seeing to his fury that Monkey had come too.
Why do you think he was furious?
When Monkey had made great havoc in heaven all those years earlier the Jade Emperor had appointed the heavenly king as Demon−quelling High Marshal and Prince Nezha as Great God of the Three Altars of the Seas to lead the heavenly troops and subdue Monkey. They had been repeatedly worsted in battle.
It was resentment at this defeat five hundred years earlier that goaded him to fury.
"Old Changgeng," he said to the planet, showing his irritation, "what kind of decree have you brought here?" "It is a case that the Great Sage Sun has brought against you," the planet replied.
The heavenly king had been in a bad enough temper before this, but the word "case" provoked a thunderous outburst of fury:
"What case has he got against me?" "He accuses you of masquerading as an evil spirit and kidnapping," the planet said.
"Will you please burn incense and read it for yourself." Seething with anger, the heavenly king had an incense table set up, looked into the sky as he thanked the emperor for his grace, made his obeisances, opened out the decree and read it through.
When he saw what it contained he thumped the incense table and exclaimed, "That ape has trumped up a pack of lies." "Please keep your temper," the planet replied.
"A tablet and an incense−burner have been submitted to His Majesty as evidence.
He says it was your daughter who did it." "All I have are my three sons and a single daughter," said the heavenly king.
"My elder son Jinzha serves the Tathagata Buddha as a Vanguard Guardian of the Law Dharma.
My second son Moksa is a disciple of Guanyin in the Southern Ocean.
My third son Nezha stays with me as my escort at all times.
My daughter Zhenying is only six and an innocent child. She could not possibly have become an evil spirit.
If you don't believe me I'll carry her out to show you.
This ape is really a disgrace.
Never mind that I'm one of the most distinguished elder statesmen in heaven and been given the authority to cut heads off before reporting to the throne: not even an ordinary commoner in the lower world should be falsely accused.
As the Legal Code says, 'the penalty for false accusation is three grades higher than the crime alleged.'" He then ordered his underlings to fetch demon−binding rope and tie Monkey up.
The Mighty Miracle God, General Fishbelly and General Yaksha who were drawn up outside the court rushed on Monkey and tied him up.
"Heavenly King Li," the Metal Planet pleaded, "please don't invite disaster.
I have come here with him from the imperial presence under orders from His Majesty to summon you.
That rope of yours is heavy, and it could very quickly hurt him badly or strangle him." "Metal Star," the heavenly king replies, "there's no way I'm going to stand for his false, trumped−up charge.
Won't you take a seat while I fetch my demon−hacking sword to kill this ape with?
I'll report to His Majesty with you after I've done that." At the sight of the heavenly king fetching the sword the planet trembled with terror. Journey to the West "You've made a terrible mistake," he said to Monkey. "A case before the emperor isn't to be lightly started.
You've brought this disaster on yourself by not finding the facts out properly and you'll die for it. This is terrible." Monkey was completely unafraid.
"Don't worry, old man," he said with a chuckle, "this is nothing. This has always been my way of doing business:
I lose out at first and win in the end." Before the words were all out of his mouth the heavenly king's sword swung down towards Monkey's head.
But Prince Nezha was already in front of Monkey, parrying the blow with his great sword used for cutting men in half at the waist and calling, "Please calm your temper, father." This greatly shocked the heavenly king.
Very strange!
If a son used his broadsword to block his father's cutlass he ought to be bawled out, so why did Nezha's father turn pale with shock?
Now when this son had been born to the heavenly king the word Ne was written on the palm of his left hand and Zha on his right one, which was why he was called Nezha.
When only three days old the young prince had caused great trouble by plunging into the sea to clean himself. He had kicked the water crystal palace down, captured a dragon and insisted on pulling its sinews out to make a belt.
On learning about this, the heavenly king had been so worried about the disastrous consequences that he had decided to kill the boy.
This had made Nezha so indignant that he had seized a sword, cut off his flesh and returned it to his mother, then picked his bones clean and given them back to his father.
Having returned his father's seed and his mother's blood he had taken his soul straight off to the Western Paradise to appeal to the Buddha.
When the Buddha, who was expounding the sutras to all the Bodhisattvas, heard a call of "Help!" from within his curtained and jeweled canopy he had looked with his wise eyes and seen that it was Nezha's soul.
He had made Nezha bones out of green lotus root and clothes from lotus leaves, then recited the spell to revive the dead. Thus it was that Nezha had come back to life.
He had used his divine ability and great magical powers to subdue ninety−six caves of demons through dharma.
After this Nezha had wanted to kill his father in revenge for having had to pick the flesh off his own bones, leaving the heavenly king with no choice but to beg the help of the Tathagata Buddha.
For the sake of harmony the Buddha had given the heavenly king an intricately−made golden As−You−Will reliquary pagoda, in each story of which were Buddhas radiant with splendor.
The Buddha called on Nezha to regard these Buddhas as his father, thereby ending the hatred between them.
This is why Heavenly King Li is called the Pagoda−bearer.
As the heavenly king was at home off duty that day and not carrying the pagoda he was afraid that Nezha was set on revenge. This was why he turned pale with terror.
So he turned his hand back to take the golden pagoda from its stand and hold it as he asked Nezha, "What do you want to say to me, son?
Why have you parried my sword with your broadsword?" Throwing his broadsword down, Nezha kowtowed to his father as he replied, "Father, Your Majesty, there is a daughter of our family in the lower world." "My boy," the heavenly king replied, "I have only had you four children. Where could I have got another daughter from?" "You have forgotten, Your Majesty," Nezha replied.
"The girl was once an evil spirit.
Three hundred years ago she became a monster. She stole and ate some of the Tathagata's incense, flowers and candles on Vulture Peak, and the Tathagata sent us to capture her with heavenly soldiers.
When she was caught she should have been beaten to death, but the Tathagata said, Journey to the West 'Raise fish in deep water but never catch them; Feed deer in the depths of the mountains in the hope of eternal life.' So we spared her life.
In her gratitude she bowed to you as her adoptive father, Your Majesty, and to me as her elder brother. She set up a tablet to us in the lower world to burn incense.
I never imagined she'd become an evil spirit again and try to ruin the Tang Priest. Now Sun the Novice has trailed her to her den and brought the tablet up here to use in a case against us before the Jade Emperor.
She is your adopted daughter, not my real sister." This came as a terrible shock to the heavenly king. "Son," he said, "I really had forgotten.
What's she called?" "She has three names," the prince replied. Where she originally came from she was called Gold−nosed White−haired Mouse Spirit.
Then she was called Half−Bodhisattva−Guanyin because she had stolen the incense, flowers and candles.
When she was forgiven and sent down to the lower world she changed her name again and became Lady Earth−gusher." Only then did the heavenly king come to his senses.
He put his pagoda down and started to untie Monkey himself. At this Monkey started playing it up.
"Don't you dare try to untie me!" he said.
"If you want to do something you can carry me roped up as I am to see the emperor.
Then I'll win my case." The heavenly king felt weak from terror and the prince could say nothing. Everybody fell back.
The Great Sage meanwhile was rolling about and playing it up, insisting that the heavenly king take him to the emperor.
The heavenly king could do nothing except beg the Metal Planet to put in a good word for him.
"There is an old saying," the planet replied, "that one should always be lenient.
You went too far: you tied him up and were going to kill him.
The monkey is a notorious trouble−maker. How do you expect me to deal with him?
From what your worthy son has said, she is your daughter, even though adopted rather than your own, and a child by adoption is especially dear.
However one argues it you are guilty." "Surely you can find some way of putting in a good word for me and helping me off the hook, venerable planet," said the heavenly king.
"I would like to end the quarrel between you," the planet replied, "but I have never done him a good turn that I can remind him of." "Tell him how it was you who proposed that he should be amnestied and given an official post," said the heavenly king.
The Metal Planet did then step forward, stroke Brother Monkey and say, "Great Sage, won't you let us take the rope off before going to see the emperor, just for my sake?" "No need to bother, old man," Monkey replied.
"I'm a good roller and I can roll all the way there." "You've got no decent feelings, you monkey," said the planet with a smile.
"I did you some good turns in the old days, but you won't do this little thing for me." Journey to the West "What good turn did you ever do me?" Monkey asked.
"When you were a monster on the Mountain of Flowers and Fruit you subdued tigers and dragons, forcibly removed yourself from the register of death and assembled hordes of fiends to run wild and wreak havoc. Heaven wanted to have you arrested. It was only because I made strong representations that an edict of amnesty and recruitment was issued and you were summoned to Heaven to be appointed Protector of the Horses.
You drank some of the Jade Emperor's wine of immortality, and it was only because I made strong representations again that you were given the title of Great Sage Equaling Heaven.
But you refused to know your place. You stole the peaches and the wine and robbed Lord Lao Zi of his elixir, and so it went on till you ended up in a state of no death and no birth.
If it hadn't been for me you'd never have got where you are today." "As the ancients put it," Monkey replied, "'Don't even share a grave with an old man when you're dead:
all he'll do is complain.' I was just a Protector of the Horses who made havoc in the heavenly palace: there was nothing much apart from that.
Oh well, never mind. I'll show you a bit of consideration as you're such an old man.
He can untie me himself." Only then did the heavenly king dare step forward, untie the rope, and ask Brother Monkey to dress and take the seat of honour while they all took it in turn to pay their respects to him.
"Old man," Monkey said to the Metal Planet, "what about it then?
I told you I lose first and win later. That's my way of doing business.
Make him hurry and see the emperor:
delay could be disastrous for my master." "Don't be impatient," the Metal Planet said.
"After everything that's happened we should take a cup of tea." "If you drink his tea, accept favours from him, take a bribe to let a criminal escape, and treat imperial edicts with disrespect I wonder what you'll be charged with," Monkey replied.
"I won't stop for tea," the Metal Planet replied, "I won't stop for tea.
You're even trying to frame me.
Hurry up, Heavenly King Li, we must be on our way." The heavenly king dared not go for fear that Monkey would concoct some unfounded story and start playing it up: if Monkey started talking wildly he would be unable to argue against him. So once again the heavenly king pleaded with the Metal Planet to put in a good word for him.
"I have a suggestion to make," the planet said to Monkey.
"Will you follow it?" "I've already agreed about being tied up and hacked at," Monkey replied. "What else have you to say?
Tell me! Tell me!
If it's a good idea I'll follow it; and if it isn't, don't blame me." "'Fight a lawsuit for one day and it'll go on for ten,'" said the Metal Planet.
"You brought a case before the emperor saying that the evil spirit is the heavenly king's daughter and the heavenly king says she isn't.
You two will argue endlessly in front of His Majesty, but I tell you that a day in heaven is a year in the lower world.
In that year the evil spirit will have your master under her control in the cave, and she won't just have married him. By then there may have been a happy event and she may have had a little baby monk.
Then your great enterprise will be ruined." "Yes," thought Monkey, his head bowed, "when I left Pig and Friar Sand I said I'd be back in the time it takes to cook a meal at longest and at quickest before they could make a cup of tea. I've been ages already and it might be too late.
Old man," he said aloud, "I'll take your advice.
How do we obey this imperial decree?" "Have Heavenly King Li muster his troops and go down with you to subdue the demon," the Metal Planet replied, "while I report back to the emperor." Journey to the West "What will you say?" Monkey asked.
"I'll report that the plaintiff has absconded and that the defendant is therefore excused," the planet replied.
"That's very fine," said Monkey with a grin. "I show you consideration and you accuse me of absconding.
Tell him to muster his troops and wait for me outside the Southern Gate of Heaven while you and I report back on our mission." "If he says anything when he's there I'll be accused of treason," exclaimed the heavenly king with terror.
"What do you take me for?" asked Monkey.
"I'm a real man. Once I've given my word a team of horses couldn't take it back.
I'd never slander you." The heavenly king thanked Monkey, who went with the Metal Planet to report back on their mission, while the heavenly king mustered his heavenly troops and went straight to the outside of the Southern Gate of Heaven.
When the Metal Planet and Monkey had their audience with the Jade Emperor they said, "The person who has trapped the Tang Priest is the Golden−nosed White−haired Mouse turned spirit. She has fraudulently set up a tablet to the heavenly king and his son.
As soon as he found out, the heavenly king mustered his troops to go and subdue the demon.
We beg your Celestial Majesty to forgive him." Once the Jade Emperor knew what had happened he dropped the prosecution in his heavenly mercy.
Monkey then went back on his cloud to the outside of the Southern Gate of Heaven, where he found the heavenly king and the prince waiting for him with their heavenly soldiers draw up on parade.
The heavenly commanders met the Great Sage amid blustering winds and seething mists, then they all took their clouds straight down to Mount Pitfall.
Pig and Friar Sand were wide−eyed at the sight of the heavenly hosts coming down with Brother Monkey.
Greeting the heavenly king with due courtesy, the idiot said, "We have put you to great trouble in coming here." "You don't realize, Marshal Tian Peng," the heavenly king replied, "that it was because my son and I accepted a joss−stick from her that the evil spirit in her wickedness captured your master.
Please don't be angry with us for being so long.
Is this Mount Pitfall?
Where is the entrance to the cave?" "I know the way very well by now," said Monkey.
"This cave is called the Bottomless Cave and it measures over a hundred miles around. The evil spirit has a great many holes in it.
Last time my master was held in the gate tower with double eaves, but it's deadly quiet now. There's not even the shadow of a demon.
I don't know where she's taken him to now." To this the heavenly king replied, "'No matter how many the tricks she may try She'll never escape from the nets of the sky.' We'll think of something else when we get to the cave entrance." Journey to the West They all then started out, and after they had gone three or four miles they reached the great rock.
"This is it," Monkey said pointing at the entrance that was no larger than the mouth of a large jar.
"You'll never capture the tiger's cub unless you go into the tiger's lair," observed the heavenly king.
"Who dares go in first?" "I'll go," said Monkey.
"No, I'll go first," objected Prince Nezha.
"I was the one the emperor ordered to capture the demon." The idiot then started acting tough, shouting, "It ought to be me first." "Stop that din," said the heavenly king.
"I'll decide. The Great Sage Sun and the prince will go down with the soldiers while we three hold the entrance. Then we'll have a coordinated action inside and outside, which will make it impossible for her to find her way up to heaven or go further underground. That will show her a bit of our powers." "Yes, sir," they all said in assent.
Watch as Monkey and Prince Nezha slip into the cave at the head of their troops.
As they rode their clouds they looked around and saw that it really was a fine cave: The pair of sun and moon as before; A vista of rivers and hills like the other world.
Warm mists spread over pools and wells of pearl; Much more there is to admire down here.
Crimson houses, painted halls, Red cliffs, green fields, Willows in the spring and lotos in the autumn; A rare and splendid cave heaven.
An instant later they brought their clouds to a halt and went straight to the mansion where the evil spirit had lived before.
They went from gateway to gateway in their search, yelling and shouting as they went deeper and deeper inside, trying one place after the next. All the grass for a hundred miles was trampled away. But where was the evil spirit? Where was Sanzang?
"The wicked beast," everyone was saying, "she must have got out of this cave ages ago.
She'll be far away by now." What they did not know was that down underneath a dark corner in the Southeast of the cave there was another, smaller cave, where behind a pair of tiny gates there was a tiny cottage with flowers growing in pots and a few canes of bamboo beside the eaves. The atmosphere was dark and heavy with fragrance.
This was Journey to the West where the evil spirit had carried Sanzang and was going to force him to marry her.
She was sure that Monkey would never find them; none of them realized that her union was fated to be thwarted.
The junior devils were jabbering away in a great crush when a bolder one among them stretched outside the cave for a look around only for her head to butt into a heavenly soldier, who shouted, "They're here!" At this Monkey flew into a rage, grasped the gold−banded cudgel and charged straight down in.
The cave was tiny and all the demons from the big cave were in there, so that when Prince Nezha sent his heavenly soldiers crowding into the attack, not a single one of the demons could hide.
Monkey found the Tang Priest, the dragon horse and the baggage.
The senior demon was at her wit's end. All she could do was to kowtow to Prince Nezha, begging him to spare her life.
"We are here to arrest you at the Jade Emperor's command," Prince Nezha replied, "which is not something to be treated lightly.
My father and I were nearly in terrible trouble because of you." He then shouted at the top of his voice, "Heavenly soldiers, fetch demon−binding rope.
Tie all those evil spirits up." The senior demon too had to suffer for a while.
They all went back out of the cave together by cloud.
Monkey was chuckling with delight when the heavenly king withdrew his guard from the mouth of the cave and greeted Monkey with the words, "Now I can meet your master." "Many thanks," said Monkey, "many thanks," and he led Sanzang to bow in gratitude to the heavenly king and the prince.
Friar Sand and Pig were all for chopping the senior devil into tiny pieces, but the heavenly king said, "She was arrested at the Jade Emperor's command, and must not be mistreated.
We must go to report back on our mission." The heavenly king and Prince Nezha at the head of their heavenly troops and divine officers escorted the evil spirit as a prisoner to report to the heavenly court and receive the emperor's verdict on her.
Meanwhile Brother Monkey guarded the Tang Priest while Friar Sand collected the luggage and Pig went over to the horse and invited the master to ride. Then they all set out along their way again.
Indeed: The silken net had been cut, the golden sea dried up, The precious lock undone, and troubles left behind.
If you do not know what lay in store for them on their way ahead listen to the explanation in the next installment.
The Indestructible Proteges of the Buddha Complete Enlightenment The Dharma King Comes to the Truth Through His Own Nature Journey to the West The story tells how Tang Sanzang kept his masculine essence intact and escaped from the terrible snare of mist and flowers.
As he headed Westwards with Brother Monkey he did not notice that it was already summer:
warm breezes were beginning to blow, and the early summer rain was falling. It was a beautiful sight: Dark is the shade under tender green; In the gentle breeze the swallows lead their young.
New lotus leaves are opening on the ponds; Elegant bamboo is gradually reviving.
The fragrant plants join their blue to the sky; Mountain flowers carpet all the ground.
Beside the stream the rushes are like swords; The fiery pomegranate blossom makes the picture even more magnificent.
As the master and his three disciples traveled along enduring the heat they suddenly noticed two rows of tall willows, from under the shade of which an old woman emerged, leaning on a small boy. "Don't go any further, monk," she called out. "Stop your horse and go back East as soon as you can.
The road West leads nowhere." This gave Sanzang so bad a fright that he sprang off the horse, made a gesture of greeting and said, "Venerable Bodhisattva, in the words of the ancients, 'The sea's breadth allows the fish to leap; The sky's emptiness lets birds fly.' How could there possibly be no way to the West?" To this the old woman replied, pointing Westwards, "If you go that way you will come to the capital of Dharmadestructia in a couple of miles.
The king formed a hatred of Buddhism in an earlier existence, and in his present life he is punishing it without just cause.
Two years ago he made a monstrous vow to kill ten thousand Buddhist monks. In that time he's killed 9,996 unknown monks in succession.
He's just waiting for four famous monks to make up his ten thousand so that he will fulfil the vow.
If you go into the city you will be throwing away your lives for nothing." At the sound of this Sanzang was so terrified that he shivered and shook as he replied, "Venerable Bodhisattva, I am deeply moved by your great kindness and infinitely grateful too.
But, tell me, is there a suitable way I could take that does not go into the city?" Journey to the West "There's no way round," the old woman replied with a laugh, "no way round.
The only way you'll get past it is if you can fly." At this Pig started shooting his mouth off from where he stood beside them:
"Don't try to put us off. We can all fly." Monkey's fiery eyes with their golden pupils really could distinguish good from evil, and he saw that the old woman and the little boy on whom she was leaning were in fact the Bodhisattva Guanyin and the page Sudhana.
He hastily flung himself to the ground and began to kowtow, calling out, "Bodhisattva, your disciple failed to welcome you.
I'm sorry." The Bodhisattva then rose slowly on her multicolored cloud, so startling the venerable elder that his legs gave way under him and he kowtowed as he knelt there for all he was worth.
Pig and Friar Sand also fell to their knees in alarm and kowtowed to heaven.
A moment later she was heading straight back to the Southern Sea amid auspicious clouds.
Monkey then got up and supported his master as he said, "Get up please.
The Bodhisattva's already gone back to her island." "Wukong," Sanzang said, "if you knew she was the Bodhisattva why did you not say so before?" "You ask too many questions," Monkey replied with a grin.
"When I started kowtowing wasn't that early enough?" "It was lucky the Bodhisattva told us that Dharmadestructia, where they kill monks, is ahead of us," Pig and Friar Sand said to Monkey.
"Whatever are we to do?" "Don't be afraid, idiot," Monkey replied.
"We've come to no harm from any of the vicious demons and evil monsters we've met already or in the tigers' dens and dragons' pools we've been in.
This is just a country of ordinary people. What's there to be so scared of?
The only thing is that we can't stay here. It's getting late in the day and some of the villagers are coming back from market in the town. It will be no good if they see we're monks and raise a hue and cry.
We'd better take the master away from the main road to some quiet and secluded spot where we can discuss things." Sanzang accepted Monkey's suggestion and they slipped away from the main road to a hollow in the ground where they sat down.
"Brother," said Monkey, "you two look after the master while I turn myself into something and go into town to take a look around. I'll find a side road that we can get away along tonight." "Disciple," said Sanzang, "don't take this lightly. The royal law is implacable.
You must be careful." "Don't worry," said Monkey with a smile, "don't worry.
I can cope." This said, the Great Sage leapt whistling up into the air.
It was very strange: No rope to hold on to above, No pole to support him below.
Others are all like their parents, Journey to the West But the weight of his bones was low.
As he stood in the clouds looking down he saw that the city was full of the most happy and auspicious atmosphere.
"What a splendid place," Monkey said.
"Why are they trying to destroy the Dharma here?" He looked around for a while, and in the gathering dusk he saw: Bright lights at the crossroads, Incense and bells in the ninefold hall.
The seven brightest stars shone in the blue heavens, And the travelers stopped moving in all eight directions.
From the army barracks The painted bugle could just be heard; In the drum tower The copper water−clock began to drip.
All around the evening mists were dense; Cold fog was thick in the markets.
Two by two the couples went to their beds As the bright moon's disk was rising in the East.
"If I went down into the streets to look for our way with a face like this," he thought, "anyone I saw would be sure I was a monk.
I'd better change." He made a spell with his hands, said the magic words, shook himself and turned into a moth, the sort that flies into the lantern: A tiny body, a pair of delicate wings, Who puts out the lamp and flies into the candle when seeking the light.
Formed by changing its own original body, It makes its magic response in grass that's decaying.
Loving the burning light of the candle's flame, Journey to the West Endlessly flying around it with never a pause, The purple−clad moth with its scented wings drives off the fireflies; What it likes best is the windless calm of the night.
Watch him as he flutters and flies straight to the main streets and the markets, keeping close to the eaves and the corners of the buildings he passes.
As he was flying along he noticed an angled row of houses on a corner with a lantern hanging above each doorway.
"They must be celebrating the Lantern Festival here," he thought.
"Why else is that line of lighted lanterns there?" Stiffening his wings and flying up for a closer look, he saw that on a square lantern outside the middle house was written, "Accommodation for Commercial Travelers," with "Wang the Second's Inn" beneath it. Only then did Monkey realize that this was an inn.
Stretching his head forward for a closer look he saw eight or nine men inside who had all eaten their supper, taken off their clothes and hats, washed their hands and feet and gone to bed.
"The master will get through," Monkey thought with secret delight.
How did he know that?
Because he was having a wicked idea: he would wait till they were all asleep, then steal their clothes and hats so that he and his companions could go into the city dressed as laymen.
Oh dear! This was one of those things that don't turn out as you want them to.
While Monkey was still thinking about his plan Wang the Second went up to the merchants and said, "Please be vigilant, gentlemen. We have villains here as well as decent people.
You must all be careful about your clothes and luggage." As you can imagine, the travelling merchants were all very vigilant, and the innkeeper's advice made them more cautious than ever.
So they all got out of bed and said, "You're quite right, host. We travelers have a hard time. We're always worried that if there's some emergency when we're asleep we may not wake up; and if things go wrong we're in a mess.
You'd better take all our clothes, hats and bags and look after them for us inside.
Tomorrow morning you can give them back to us when we get up." Wang the Second then took all the clothes he could find into his own room.
Monkey anxiously spread his wings, flew in there and landed on the hat stand, from where he saw Wang the Second take the lantern down from the door, lower the blinds, and shut the door and window. Only then did he go into his bedroom, undress and lie down.
Now Wang the Second had a wife and two children who were crying and making a noise, in no hurry to sleep.
Wang's wife then started mending a torn piece of clothing, so that she too was still awake.
"If I have to wait till that woman stops working and goes to sleep," thought Monkey, "I'll be keeping the master waiting too." He then started worrying that if he left it till much later the city gates would be shut, so he lost patience and flew down into the flame of the lamp.
It was indeed a case of He was ready to die when he dived at the blaze, And with brows scarred by fire to live out his days.
Journey to the West Having extinguished the lamp he shook himself and turned into a rat who gave a couple of squeaks, jumped down, grabbed hats and clothes and went outside.
"Old man," the woman said with alarm, "this is terrible.
A rat's turned into a spirit." When Monkey heard this he used another trick, blocking the doorway and yelling at the top of his voice, "That woman's talking nonsense, Wang the Second. Ignore her.
I'm not a rat turned spirit.
As a decent man I don't do underhanded things. I'm the Great Sage Equaling Heaven come down to earth to protect the Tang Priest while he goes to fetch the scriptures from the Western Heaven.
I've come to borrow these clothes as a disguise for my master because your king is so wicked.
I'll bring them back soon when we're out of the city." Once Wang the Second heard this he scrambled out of bed and started groping around the floor in the dark. He was in such a rush that when he got hold of his trousers he thought they were his shirt: there was no way he could put them on no matter how he tried.
By now the Great Sage had used lifting magic to escape on his cloud, which he turned round to go straight back to the hollow by the road.
Sanzang was looking out for him fixedly by the bright light of the moon and the stars, and as soon as he saw Monkey approaching he called out, "Can we get through the capital of Dharmadestructia, disciple?" Coming up and laying the clothes down in front of him, Monkey replied, "Master, you won't get through Dharmadestructia as a monk." "Brother," said Pig, "who do you think you're making things hard for? It's easy to stop being a monk.
All you have to do is stop shaving your head for six months and let your hair grow." "We can't wait six months," Monkey replied.
"We're going to turn into laymen right now." "But that's a completely ridiculous thing to say," said a shocked Pig.
"We're all monks now, and if we turned into laymen straight away we wouldn't be able to wear hats.
Even if we could pull them tight enough at the edges we've got no hair to tie the string at the top to." "Stop fooling about," Sanzang shouted, "and be serious.
What do you really have in mind?" "I've had a good look at this city, Master," Monkey replied, "and although the king is a wicked one who kills monks he is a true son of heaven. There is an auspicious glow and a happy atmosphere above the city.
I know my way round the streets now, and I can understand and talk the local language.
I've just borrowed these hats and clothes from an inn for us to dress ourselves up as laymen in. We'll go into the city, put up for the night, get up at the fourth watch and ask the innkeeper to fix us some vegetarian food.
At the fifth watch we'll go out through the gate and head West along the main road.
If we meet anyone who tries to stop us we can talk our way out of it. I'll tell him we were sent by the ruler of their suzerain state. The king of Dharmadestructia won't dare hold us up.
He'll let us go on our way." "Our big brother has arranged things very well," said Friar Sand.
"Let's do as he suggests." The venerable elder did indeed have no option but to take off his monastic tunic and hat and put on a layman's clothing and headwear.
Friar Sand changed too, but Pig's head was too big for him to be able to wear a hat.
Monkey fetched needle and thread, tore two hats open and sewed them into a single one. Then he put the hat on Pig's head and found a garment big enough for him to wear.
Finally he dressed himself and said, "Gentlemen, we must ban the words 'master' and 'disciples' on this journey." Journey to the West "What else can we call each other?" Pig asked. "We must talk like people who address each other as brothers," Monkey replied.
"The master can call himself Tang the Eldest. You can be Hogg the Third, and Friar Sand can be Sand the Fourth. I'll be Sun the Second.
But when we are in the inn none of you must say anything. Leave all the talking to me.
When they ask what line of business we're in I'll say we're horse dealers.
I'll pretend that the white horse is a sample and that there are ten of us altogether, of whom we four have come ahead to book rooms at an inn and sell this horse.
The innkeeper will be bound to treat us well then. We'll be properly looked after, and before we leave I'll find a piece of broken tile and turn it into silver to pay him with.
Then we'll be able to go on our way." Although he was not happy about it the Tang Priest had to go along with this.
The four of them hurried to the city, leading the horse and carrying the luggage.
As this was a very peaceful place the city gates were still open although it was already night.
They went straight into the city, and as they passed the gateway of Wang the Second's inn they could hear shouting inside.
People were yelling, "My hat's disappeared!" and "My clothes have gone!" Pretending he did not know what this was all about, Monkey took them to an inn further along on the other side of the road.
This inn was still showing its lantern, so Monkey went up to the gateway and called, "Do you have a vacant room for us, innkeeper?" "Yes, yes," a woman answered from inside.
"Please come upstairs, gentlemen." Before she had finished speaking a man came out to take the horse. Monkey handed him the horse to take inside.
He then led the master into the building in the shadow of the lamp.
Upstairs there were tables and chairs conveniently arranged, and when the window was opened they all sat down in the clear moonlight.
When someone came with a lighted lamp Monkey blocked the doorway, blew it out and said, "No need for a lamp on a bright night like this." No sooner had the man with the lamp gone down than a maid came up with four bowls of tea.
Monkey took the bowls from her, only for her to be followed by a woman who looked to be about fifty−six or fifty−seven coming up the stairs.
Standing beside Monkey she asked, "Where are you gentlemen from?
What fine goods do you have?" "We're from the North," Monkey replied, "and we've got a few poor horses to sell." "You're very young to be a horse dealer," the woman said.
"This gentleman is Tang the Eldest," Monkey explained, "this is Hogg the Third, and this is Sand the fourth.
I'm Sun the Second, an apprentice." "But your surnames are all different," said the woman with a smile.
"Yes," Monkey replied, "our surnames are different but we all live together. There are ten of us brothers altogether, and we four have come ahead to fix our board and lodging.
The other six have found a place outside the city to stay tonight. It would have been awkward for them to come into the city as they've got a herd of horses.
They'll come in tomorrow morning when we've fixed some accommodation.
We won't go home till we've sold the horses." "How many horses are there in your herd?" the woman asked.
"Over a hundred of all ages," Monkey replied. "They're all like that one of ours, except that they come in different colours." Journey to the West "Mr.
Sun," the woman said with a laugh, "you really know how to travel. You should have come straight here:
no other inn would be able to put you up.
We have a big courtyard well supplied with troughs and tethering posts and plenty of fodder too. We could feed several hundred horses here. There's just one thing I should mention.
I've been keeping this inn for many years and it's quite well known.
My late husband was called Zhao, but I'm afraid he died long ago, so this is now called Widow Zhao's Inn.
We have three classes of entertainment for our guests.
Let's get sordid money matters out of the way, then we can be more civilized later. The first thing is to discuss the tariffs and agree on one so that we know where we stand when it's time to settle the accounts." "Quite right," Monkey replied.
"What are your three classes of entertainment?
As the saying goes, Your tariffs may be low, your tariffs may be dear, But treat us all the same, who come from far or near. What do your tariffs involve?
Could you explain them to me?" "We have first, second and third−class tariffs," the old woman replied.
"The first class is a banquet with five kinds of fruit and five different dishes. The tables are set with confectionery lions and immortals fighting. Two gentlemen share a table, and there are young ladies to sing to them and sleep with them. It costs half an ounce of silver per head, the price of the room included." "I'd agree to that," Monkey replied.
"Where we come from half an ounce wouldn't even pay for a girl." "For the second−class tariff," the woman continued, "you all eat from the same dishes of food and we provide fruit and warm wine that you help yourselves to in your drinking games. No young ladies are provided and it costs one fifth of an ounce of silver each." "I'd agree to that too," Monkey replied.
"What about the third class?" "I wouldn't like to discuss it with such distinguished gentlemen as yourselves," she replied.
"No harm in telling us about it," Monkey replied, "so that we can choose what suits us best." "Nobody waits on you in the third class," she said, "and we provide a big pot of rice for you to eat from as you will.
When you're full there's straw for you to spread out on the ground and sleep on where it suits you.
At dawn you give us a few coppers for the rice and I can assure you we won't argue about how much." "We're in luck," said Pig, "we're in luck. That's the sort of deal I like.
I'll eat my fill from the cauldron then have a bloody good sleep in front of the stove." "What nonsense, brother," said Monkey.
"We've earned an ounce or two of silver on our travels.
Give us the first−class treatment." "Make some good tea," the woman said with great delight, "and tell the kitchen to get the food ready quickly." She then went downstairs calling out, "Kill chickens and geese and boil up some pickled meat for them to have with their rice." Journey to the West Then she shouted, "Kill a pig and a sheep.
What can't be eaten today can be served tomorrow.
Get some good wine. Use the best white rice, and make some pancakes with white flour." When Sanzang heard all this from upstairs he said, "Whatever shall we do, Sun the Second?
They're going to slaughter chickens, geese, a pig and a sheep. If they bring us all these we won't be able to eat them as we're all vegetarians." "I've got an idea," said Monkey, and he stamped in the doorway and called out, "Mrs.
Zhao, come up here." "What instructions do you have for me, sir," she asked.
"Don't kill any living creatures today. We're eating vegetarian food today," Monkey replied.
"Are you gentlemen permanent vegetarians, or just vegetarians for this month?" asked the woman in surprise.
"Neither," replied Monkey.
"We're vegetarians on gengshen days. Today's one, so we have to eat meatless food.
But after the third watch tonight it'll be a xinyou day and the restrictions won't apply.
Kill them tomorrow.
Lay on some vegetarian food today, and make it first−class." This made the woman happier than ever. "Don't slaughter anything," she said, hurrying downstairs, "don't slaughter anything.
Fetch some tree−ear fungus, Fujian bamboo shoots, beancurd and wheat gluten. Pick some green vegetables in the garden, make vermicelli soup, steam some brad rolls, boil more white rice and make some scented tea." Now the cooks were experts because they cooked every day, so that everything was ready in an instant to be set out upstairs.
They also had some confectioneries of lions and immortals that were already made for the four travelers to eat their fill of.
When the question was asked, "Would you like some mild wine?" Brother Monkey replied, "Eldest Brother Tang won't have any, but the rest of us will have a few cups." The widow then fetched a jug of warm wine.
When drinks had been poured out for the three of them they heard the sound of banging against wooden boards.
"Has some furniture fallen over downstairs, missus?" Monkey asked.
"No," the woman replied, "It's some retainers from my farm who arrived late this evening with rent rice. We let them sleep downstairs.
As we were short−staffed when you gentlemen arrived I told them to take the sedan−chairs to the brothel to fetch some young ladies to keep you company. They must have hit the underneath of the floorboards with the chair−poles." "You mentioned that before," Monkey said. "But don't send for them now.
Today's a fast day, and besides, our brothers aren't here yet.
They'll be here tomorrow for sure. Then we can all send for some call−girls and have a good time in your excellent establishment before we sell our horses and go." "What good men," the woman said, "what good men.
That way you'll all stay friends and you won't waste your energy." Then she ordered that the sedan−chairs be brought back in as the whores were not to be fetched.
The four of them finished their wine and food, the utensils were cleared away, and the meal was over.
"Where are we going to sleep?" Sanzang whispered in Monkey's ear.
"Upstairs," Monkey replied. Journey to the West "Too dangerous," Sanzang replied.
"We have all had so hard a journey that we may well fall fast asleep. If any of the inn people come in to tidy up and our hats have rolled off they will see our bald heads, realize that we are monks, and raise a hue and cry. That would be a disaster." "You're right," said Monkey, going out to stamp his foot again. "What instructions do you have this time, Mr.
Sun?" the woman asked, coming upstairs once more.
"Where are we to sleep?" Monkey asked.
"Upstairs is best," she replied. "There are no mosquitoes and there's a South wind. Open the windows wide and you'll sleep beautifully." "We won't be able to," said Monkey. "Our Mr.
Hogg the Third has a touch of gout, Mr. Sand the Fourth has some rheumatism in his shoulder, Brother Tang can only sleep in the dark, and I don't like the light myself.
So this is no place for us to sleep." As the woman went downstairs, leaning on the banisters and sighing, her daughter, who was carrying a child in her arms, came up to her and said, "Mother, as the saying goes, 'Be stuck on a sandbank for ten days, then said past nine sandbanks in one.' It's too hot now to be doing much business, but once autumn begins we'll have more than we can handle.
What are you sighing like that for?" "It's not because business is slack, daughter," the older woman replied.
"I was just going to close the inn up this evening when four horse dealers came and took a room. They wanted the first−class tariff.
I was hoping to make a little silver out of them, and I'm sighing because we won't earn much:
they're fasting." "As they've already eaten they can't very well go to another inn," the daughter replied. "And we'll be able to make money out of them when we serve them meat and wine tomorrow." "They're all poorly," the older woman replied, "and want somewhere dark to sleep because they don't like drafts or light.
All the rooms in the inn have got missing tiles, so where am I going to find somewhere dark for them?
It'd be best to write off the cost of the meal and tell them to stay somewhere else." "But we do have somewhere dark in the house, mother," her daughter replied, "where there's no draft and no light.
It'll do splendidly." "Where?" the older woman asked.
"The big trunk that father had made when he was still alive," the daughter replied. "It's four feet wide, seven feet long and three feet high, and big enough for seven people to sleep in.
Tell them to sleep in the trunk." "I don't know whether it'll do," said the older woman.
"I'll ask them.
Sun, if you won't have our poky little room there's nowhere darker here than our big trunk. It'll keep out light and drafts. So why don't you sleep in the trunk?" "Splendid," Monkey replied.
She then told several of the retainers to carry the trunk out and open the lid, while inviting her guests to come downstairs.
Monkey led the master and Friar Sand carried the luggage as they went to the trunk, following in the lantern's shadow.
The reckless Pig was the first to climb inside.
Friar Sand lifted the luggage in then helped the Tang Priest in before getting in himself.
"Where's our horse?" Monkey asked.
Journey to the West "Tied up eating hay in the stables at the back," replied the servant who was attending them.
"Bring it here," said Monkey, "and bring the trough too.
Tether the animal next to the trunk." Only then did he get inside himself and call out, "Shut the lid, Mrs. Zhao, fasten the hasp and padlock it.
And look it over for us. Glue paper wherever it lets in the light.
Open it again early tomorrow morning." "You're very particular," the widow said.
After that the doors were fastened and everyone went to bed.
The story switches to the four of them in the chest. Poor things!
They were wearing hats, the weather was very hot and it was airless and stuffy.
They took off their hats and clothes, and fanned themselves with their monastic hats for lack of fans.
They were all crowded in next to each other and did not fall asleep till the second watch.
Monkey, however, wanted to make trouble, so he stayed awake. He put his hand out and gave Pig a pinch on the leg.
The idiot pulled his leg in and mumbled, "Go to sleep. We've had a hard day.
What do you want to fool around pinching people's hands and feet for?" "We started by laying out five thousand ounces of silver," said Monkey aloud, deliberately making mischief, "and we sold those horses the other day for three thousand. We've got four thousand in the two bags, and we'll sell this herd of horses for another three thousand. That means we'll have doubled our capital.
That's not bad." Pig, who was sleepy, did not bother to reply. Now the floor staff, the water−carriers and the kitchen porters were in league with bandits.
After hearing Brother Monkey talking about all the money they had, several of them slipped off to fetch twenty or more armed bandits to come with torches to rob the four horse traders.
As they charger in through the gates they gave Widow Zhao and her daughter such a fright that shivering and shaking they fastened the doors of their room and let the robbers take whatever they wanted outside.
Now the bandits were not after the inn's property but were looking for the guests.
When they went upstairs and found no sign of them there, they lit their torches and held them out while they looked all around. All they could see was a large trunk in the courtyard, to the bottom of which was tethered a white horse. The lid was tightly locked and could not be prized open.
"Travelling merchants all know what they're about," the bandits said.
"This trunk looks so strong that it's bound to be full of purses, valuables and silk.
Let's steal the horse, take the trunk out of town, open it up and share out what's inside.
That would be the best thing, wouldn't it?" The bandits then found some rope with which they lifted the box and carried it off, swinging and swaying.
"Brother," said Pig, woken up by this, "go to sleep. Why are you rocking us?" "Shut up," Monkey replied.
"Nobody's rocking us." Sanzang and Friar Sand had been abruptly awoken too, and they asked, "Who's carrying us?" "Keep quiet," said Monkey, "keep quiet.
Let them carry us. If they carry us to the Western Heaven we'll be saved the trouble of walking." But the successful bandits were not heading West.
Instead they headed towards the East of the city, killing the soldiers on the city gate, opening it and letting themselves out.
This caused a sensation in the streets and the markets, where the watchmen of all the shops reported it to the commander−in−chief of the city garrison and the East city commissioner.
As this was their responsibility the commander−in−chief and the East city Journey to the West commissioner mustered a force of infantry, cavalry and bowmen that left the city in pursuit of the bandits.
Seeing that resistance to so powerful a government force would have been pointless, the bandits abandoned the trunk and the white horse, scattered into the undergrowth and disappeared.
The government troops did not catch even half a robber: all they captured was the trunk and the white horse, with which they returned in triumph.
The commander−in−chief examined the horse in the light of the lamps and saw that it was a fine one: Threads of silver grew in his mane; In his tail hung strands of jade.
Forget about Eight Chargers and dragon steeds; This was steadier than the great Sushuang; Its bones alone would have sold for a thousand ounces of silver; It could gallop after the wind for three thousand miles.
When it climbed a mountain it merged into the clouds; As it neighed at the moon it was as white as snow.
It was truly a dragon from an ocean island, A unicorn of Jade in the human world.
The commander−in−chief rode the white horse instead of his own steed as he led his men back into the city. The trunk was carried to his headquarters, where he and the East city commissioner sealed it with strips of paper on which they wrote and set a guard over it till morning, when they would submit a memorial to the king and request a decision on what to do with it.
After that the other troops were dismissed.
The story now tells how the venerable Tang Priest was grumbling at Monkey inside the chest. "Ape," he said, "you've killed me this time.
If I had been arrested outside and taken to the king of Dharmadestructia I might well have been able to put up a good argument in my defense.
But now I am here, locked in this trunk. I have been carried off by bandits and recaptured by the army. When we are shown to the king tomorrow we will be all ready for him to put to the sword and make up his ten thousand." "There are people outside!" exclaimed Monkey.
"If they open the trunk and take you out you'll either be tied up or hung up.
If you don't want to be tied or strung up you'd better show a little patience.
When we're taken to see this deluded king tomorrow I'll definitely be able to talk my way out of things. I guarantee that not one hair of yours will be harmed.
So stop worrying and go back to sleep." In the third watch Monkey used one of his magic powers.
Slipping his cudgel out he blew on it with a magic breath, called "Change!" and turned it into a triple auger with which he drilled two or three holes near the bottom of the chest, forming a single larger hole.
He put the auger away, shook himself, turned into an ant and Journey to the West crawled out.
Then he turned back into himself and rode his cloud straight to the palace gates.
The king was fast asleep at the time, so Monkey used his Great All powerful Body−dividing Magic.
Plucking all the hairs out of his left arm he blew on them with a magic breath, called "Change!" and turned them into little Monkeys.
Then he pulled all the hairs out from his right arm, blew on them with a magic breath, called "Change!" and turned them into sleep−insects.
Next he recited the magic word Om and told the local deity of the place to take the little Monkeys to distribute them throughout the palace to all the officials in every office and department of government. Each holder of official rank was given a sleep−insect to ensure that he or she would sleep soundly and not get up.
Monkey then took his gold−banded cudgel in his hands, squeezed it, waved it, called, "Change, treasure!" and turned it into over a thousand razors of the sort used for shaving the head.
Taking one himself, he told all the little monkeys to take one each and shave the heads of everyone in the inner quarters of the palace and in all the government departments and offices.
This was indeed a case of: When the Dharma king would destroy it the Dharma is infinite; The Dharma runs through heaven and earth, opening the Great Way.
The origins of ten thousand Dharmas all come down to one; The features of the Three Vehicles are basically the same.
He bored through the trunk to find out the news, Distributed his golden hairs to smash delusion, Determined to bring the Dharma king to the true achievement, To the eternal emptiness of what is not born and dies not.
That night the head−shaving was completed, so Monkey said another spell to dismiss the local deity, shook himself to bring all the hairs back to his arms, then touched all the razors to turn them back into their true form as the gold−banded cudgel, which he made much smaller and hid in his ear again.
Finally he reverted to being an ant, crawled back into the trunk, and went on guarding the Tang Priest in his time of danger.
When the palace ladies in the inner quarters got up to wash and do their hair before dawn the next morning they all found that their hair had gone.
The same had happened to all the eunuchs, senior and junior, who moved around the palace.
They all crowded to the outside of the royal bedchamber, where they played music to wake the king up, all holding back their tears but not daring to speak.
Before long the queen in the palace woke up to find her hair gone too.
When she hurried with lanterns to the dragon bed she found a monk sleeping in the brocade quilt, at which she could restrain her tongue no longer, thus awakening the king.
When the king suddenly opened his eyes wide and saw the queen's bald head he got straight out of bed and said, "Why are you like that, my queen?" "You're the same, Your Majesty," she replied.
The king then rubbed his head, which gave him such a fright that the three souls in his body groaned, and his seven spirits flew off into the air. Journey to the West "What has happened to me?" he exclaimed.
Just when he was in this panicky state the royal consorts, the palace ladies and the eunuchs young and old all fell to their knees, their heads shaved bald, and said, "Lord, we have all been turned into monks." At the sight of them the king wept. "We think this must be because of all the monks we have killed," he said. He then gave these orders:
"None of you are to say anything about the loss of our hair as, if you do, the civil and military officials may slander our country and say that it has been badly governed.
Let us now hold court in the throne hall." Now all the officials high and low in all the departments and offices of government went to court to pay their respects before dawn.
As it turned out, all these men had lost their hair in the night too, and they all submitted memorials reporting the fact.
All that could be heard was: The whip of silence sounding three times at the royal audience; As all report that their heads have now been shaved.
If you do not know what happened to the booty in the trunk that the commander−in−chief had recaptured and whether the Tang Priest and his three disciples were to live or die, listen to the explanation in the next installment.
The Mind−ape is jealous of the Mother of Wood The Demon Chief Plots to Devour the Master of Dhyana The story tells how when the king held his dawn audience the civil and military officials all carried memorials. "Sovereign Lord," they reported, "we beg you to forgive your servants for their lack of decorum." "Gentlemen," the king replied, "you are all as courteous as ever.
What lack of decorum are you showing?" "Sovereign Lord," they said, "we do not know why, but all of your servants lost their hair last night." Holding in his hand these memorials about the lost hair, the king descended from his dragon throne to say to the officials, "Indeed, we do not know why either, but everyone in the palace, young and old, lost their hair last night." King and ministers alike all wept as they said, "From now on we will not dare kill any more monks." The king then returned to his throne and the officials took their places in their proper ranks.
The king then said, "Let those with business here come forward from their ranks to report.
If there is no other business the curtain may be rolled up and the audience ended." The commander−in−chief of the capital's garrison then moved forward from the ranks of military officials and the East city commissioner moved forward from the ranks of the civil officials to kowtow at the steps of the throne and report, "We were patrolling the city on Your Majesty's orders last night when we recaptured a Journey to the West trunk of bandits' booty and a white horse.
As we do not dare take unauthorized action over these we beg Your Majesty to issue an edict." The king was delighted. "Bring it here, trunk and all," he ordered.
The two officials then returned to their own offices, mustered a full complement of soldiers and had the trunk carried out. Sanzang, who was inside, felt his soul leaving his body.
"Disciples," he said, "what shall we say in our defense when we reach the king?" "Shut up," said Monkey with a grin. "I've fixed everything.
When the trunk's opened the king will bow to us as his teachers.
The only thing is that Pig mustn't quarrel about precedence." "If they don't kill me that'll be heaven," Pig replied.
"What would I want to quarrel about?" Before these words were all out of his mouth they had been carried to the palace entrance and in through the Tower of Five Phoenixes to be set at the foot of the steps to the throne.
On being invited by the two officials to have the trunk opened and look inside the king ordered that this be done.
No sooner was the lid lifted than Pig, who could restrain himself no longer, sprang outside, giving all the officials such a fright that they shivered, unable to speak.
Next Brother Monkey could be seen helping the Tang Priest out, while Friar Sand lifted the luggage out.
Seeing that the commander−in−chief was holding the white horse, Pig went up to him, made an angry noise and said, "That's my horse.
Hand it over!" This so terrified the official that he collapsed head over heels.
The four pilgrims all stood upright in the middle of the steps, and when the king saw that they were monks he came down at once from his dragon throne, sent for his queen and consorts from the inner quarters, descended the steps of the throne hall, bowed to them along with all his officials and asked, "What brings you venerable gentlemen here?" "I have been sent by His Majesty the Great Tang Emperor to go to the Great Thunder Monastery in India in the West to worship the living Buddha and fetch the true scriptures," Sanzang replied.
"Venerable Master," the king said, "you have come from far away.
But why did you sleep in this trunk last night?" "I knew that Your Majesty had sworn a vow to kill Buddhist monks," Sanzang replied, "which is why I did not dare to visit your illustrious country openly, but disguised myself as a layman to arrive late at night to find lodging in one of your inns.
We slept in the trunk because we were afraid that our real identity would be discovered.
Unfortunately the trunk was stolen by bandits, then brought back here by the commander−in−chief.
Now that I have been able to see Your Majesty's dragon countenance, the clouds have cleared away and the sun has come out.
I hope that Your Majesty will pardon and release me, ascetic monk that I am:
my gratitude will be as deep as the ocean." "Venerable Master," the king replied, "you are a distinguished monk from our suzerain heavenly dynasty. It was wrong of us not to go out to welcome you.
For years we have been fulfilling a vow to kill monks because a monk once maligned us. The vow we made to heaven was to kill ten thousand monks to make up a round number.
We never imagined that today we would return to the truth and that we would all be turned into monks.
Now all of us, king, officials, queen and consorts, have had our hair shaved off. I beg, Venerable Master, that you will not be grudging with your lofty virtue and will take us as your disciples." Journey to the West When Pig heard this he started roaring with laughter:
"If you're going to be our disciples what introductory presents have you got for us?" "If you will accept us as your follower, Master," the king replied, "we will present you with all the wealth in our kingdom." "Don't talk about wealth to us," said Brother Monkey, "as we're proper monks.
As long as you inspect and return our passport and escort us out of the city I can guarantee that your monarchy will last for ever and that you will enjoy a long and happy life." On hearing this the king ordered his office of foreign relations to arrange a great feast at which monarch and officials together returned to the one truth.
The passport was immediately inspected and returned, after which Sanzang was asked to change the name of the country.
"'Dharma' in the name of Your Majesty's country is excellent," Monkey said, "but the 'destructia' part is nonsense.
Now that we've come here you should change the name to 'Dharmarespectia'.
This would guarantee Clear waters and victory for a thousand generations; Timely winds and rain with universal peace." The king thanked them for their gracious kindness, had the royal carriage prepared and escorted the Tang Priest and his three disciples Westwards out of the city.
We will say no more of how monarch and subjects now held to the true faith, but tell how after leaving the king of Dharmarespectia the venerable elder said happily from on his horse, "What excellent magic you used, Wukong.
It worked very well." "Elder brother," said Friar Sand, "where did you find so many barbers to shave all those heads in one night?" Monkey then told them all about how he had used his miraculous powers, at which they all laughed so much they could not stop.
Just as they were feeling so cheerful a great mountain came into view, blocking their way.
Reining in the horse, the Tang Priest said, "Disciples, see how high that mountain is.
You must be very careful." "Don't worry," said Monkey with a grin, "don't worry.
I promise you nothing will go wrong." "Don't say that," Sanzang replied.
"I can see those jutting peaks, and even from a distance it looks rather sinister. Storm clouds are streaming from it, and I am beginning to feel frightened.
My whole body is turning numb and my spirits are disturbed." "You have already forgotten the Heart Sutra that the Rook's Nest Hermit taught you," said Brother Monkey.
"I can still remember it," Sanzang said.
"Even if you can still remember that," said Monkey, "there is a quatrain that you've forgotten." "What quatrain?" Sanzang asked, to which Monkey replied, Journey to the West "Do not go far to seek the Buddha on Vulture Peak; Vulture Peak is in your heart.
Everybody has a Vulture Peak stupa Under which to cultivate conduct." "Of course I know it, disciple," said Sanzang.
"According to that quatrain the thousands of scriptures all come down to cultivating the heart." "Goes without saying," Monkey replied.
"When the heart is purified it can shine alone; When the heart is preserved all perceptions are pure.
If there is any mistake then laziness follows, And success will not come in a myriad years.
As long as your will is sincere Thunder Peak is before your eyes.
But if you're as scared, frightened and disturbed as this the Great Way is distant, and Thunder Peak is far, far away.
Forget those wild fears and come with me." When the venerable elder heard this his spirits were revived and his worries disappeared.
The four of them had only gone a few more steps when they reached the mountain.
When they raised their eyes this was what they saw: A fine mountain, Dappled with many colours.
White clouds drifted around the peak, And cool were the shadows of the trees in front of the cliff.
The birds rustled in the leaves, The beasts were ferocious.
Journey to the West Among the woods were a thousand pines, On the ridge a few bamboos.
Howls came from gray wolves seizing their prey, And roars from hungry tigers fighting over food.
Long screamed the wild apes searching for fruit; The David's−deer climbed through blossoms into mists of green.
The wind was blowing, The waters babbled, And hidden birds sang in the deserted pass.
Here and there wisteria was climbing While rare flowers bloomed by the stream amid orchids.
Intricately shaped and strange were the rocks, And sheer rose the crags.
Foxes and raccoon−dogs ran in packs; Badgers and apes were playing in groups.
The travelers were worried by so high and steep a mountain: Why was the ancient track so twisted?
While master and disciples were moving timidly ahead they heard the howling of a wind.
"There's a wind," said Sanzang in fear.
"In the spring there are mild winds," Monkey replied, "in the summer hot ones, in the autumn golden ones and in the winter North winds.
There are winds in all four seasons. What's so frightening about a wind?" "This wind is blowing very hard," Sanzang replied.
"It is definitely not a wind from heaven." "But winds always come from the earth and clouds from mountains," Monkey replied, "so how could there be a wind from heaven?" Before he had finished speaking a mist arose.
That mist really was Darkness joining up with the sky, Journey to the West Obscurity making the whole earth dim.
The sun had completely vanished from sight And no bird sang.
All was as indistinct as primal chaos, And the air seemed filled with flying dust.
The trees on the mountain could not be seen Where had the herb−gatherers gone?
"Wukong," said Sanzang in fright, "why is there this mist when the wind is still blowing?" "Don't get upset," Monkey replied.
"Get off your horse, Master. I'll go and see whether or not it's sinister while you two keep guard, brothers." The splendid Great Sage needed only to bow in order to be in mid−air.
Holding his hand to his brow for shade, he opened his fiery eyes wide and looked down to see an evil spirit sitting at the foot of a beetling scar.
Just look and see what he was like: A mighty body full of charm, A heroic manner of great vigor.
The fangs protruding from his mouth were drills of steel; His nose hung like a jade hook in the middle.
His golden eyes with pupils round gave animals a fright; Demons and gods were scared of his bristling silver whiskers.
He sat upright by the cliff in terrible might, Making the mist and wind as he hatched his plot.
On either side of him some thirty or forty junior demons could be seen, all drawn up in line and blowing out mist and wind for all they were worth.
Monkey grinned at this and thought, "So my master is clairvoyant. He said it wasn't a heavenly wind, and it was in fact caused by this evil spirit trying to fool us.
Now if I went straight down and hit him with what they call a 'garlicsmasher' that'd kill him sure enough, but it would ruin my reputation." Monkey had been a true hero all his life and was quite incapable of playing a dirty trick like that. Journey to the West "I'd better go back and give Pig some attention. I'll ask him to hit the evil spirit first.
If Pig's good enough to kill the evil spirit we'll be in luck.
If he isn't and the evil spirit captures him I can come back to rescue him and win myself a bit of fame.
He's always putting on such an act and being so lazy−−he won't make an effort. Still, he is very greedy and partial to a good feed.
I think I'll try a trick on him and see how that works." At once he brought his cloud down to land in front of Sanzang, who asked, "Are the wind and the mist sinister or not?" "It's clear now," Monkey replied.
"They've gone." "Yes," said Sanzang, "they have eased off a little." "Master," said Monkey with a smile, "my eyesight is very good usually, but this time I was wrong.
I thought there'd probably be a monster behind that wind and mist but there wasn't." "What caused them then?" Sanzang asked.
"There's a village not far ahead," Monkey replied, "where the people are so pious that they're steaming white rice and white breadrolls to feed monks with.
I think that the mist must have been steam escaping from their steamers.
It was the result of their goodness." When Pig heard this he thought Monkey was telling the truth, so he grabbed hold of him and whispered, "Did you eat their food before you came back?" "Only a bit," Monkey replied.
"The vegetable dishes were too salty−−I didn't want to eat too much." "Screw that," said Pig.
"I'd eat my fill of it however salty it was.
If it made me really thirsty I'd come back for a drink of water." "Would you like some?" Monkey asked. "Sure thing," Pig replied.
"I'm hungry and I'd like some now.
What do you think?" "You mustn't even talk about it," said Monkey.
"As the ancient book says, 'When the father is present the son must do nothing on his own account.' Our master, who's as good as a father to you, is here, so none of us should dare go ahead." "If you'll say nothing about it, I'm going," replied Pig with a grin.
"Let's see how you do it," Monkey replied.
"I'll say nothing." When it came to eating the idiot knew a thing or two. He went up to his master, made a loud "na−a−aw" of respect, and said, "Master, elder brother has just told me that there are people in a village ahead of us who feed monks.
Just look at that horse. It looks as though it's going to start playing it up. We'll be causing a lot of trouble if we have to ask for grass and other fodder for it.
Luckily the wind and the clouds have gone now, so why don't you all sit here for a while while I fetch some tender grass? We can go and beg for food from that house when we've fed the horse." "Splendid," said the Tang Priest with delight.
"I wondered why you've become so hardworking today.
Be as quick as you can." Journey to the West Smiling secretly to himself the idiot started out.
"Brother," said Monkey, catching up and grabbing hold of him, "they feed monks all right, but only good−looking ones." "In that case I'll have to change again," said Pig.
"Yes," said Brother Monkey, "you change." The splendid idiot, who could perform thirty−six transformations, went into a hollow on the mountainside, made a spell with his hands, said the magic words, shook himself and turned himself into a short, skinny monk, beating a wooden fish−shaped dram with his hand and mumbling, "Oh great one, oh great one," because he knew no scriptures to recite.
After putting away the wind and the mist the evil spirit ordered all his devils to form a circle round the main road, ready for any travelers.
The idiot's luck was out, and he was soon inside the trap and surrounded by the devils, who grabbed at his clothes and his silken sash as they all crowded in on him together. "Don't pull," Pig said.
"You can let me eat in all your houses in turn." "What do you want to eat, monk?" the devils asked.
"You feed monks here," Pig replied, "and I've come to be fed." "So you're hoping to be fed, are you, monk?" said the demons.
"You don't seem to realize that what we like doing best here is eating monks.
We're all evil immortals who've found the Way here in the mountains, and the only thing we want to do is to catch you monks, take you home with us, pop you in the steamer till you're tender and eat you.
And you're still hoping for a vegetarian meal!" At this Pig's heart was filled with terror, and he started complaining about Monkey. "That Protector of the Horses is a crook.
He lied to me about them feeding monks in this village. There aren't any villagers here and there's nobody who feeds monks.
They're all evil spirits." The idiot was being tugged at so hard that he turned back into himself, pulled the rake out from his belt and struck out wildly, driving all the junior devils back.
They rushed back to report to the senior demon, "Disaster, Your Majesty." "What disaster?" the senior demon asked.
"A neat−looking monk came along in front of the mountain," they replied, "so we decided to catch him and steam him.
We were going to keep what we couldn't eat now for a bad day.
Then to our astonishment he transformed himself." "What did he turn himself into?" the senior demon asked.
"Not into anything human," they replied.
"He's got a long snout, big ears, and a bristly mane on his back. He lashed out furiously at us with a rake that he used two−handed.
He gave us such a terrible fright that we've run straight back to report to Your Majesty." "Don't be afraid," the senior demon said.
"Let me go and have a look." Swinging his iron mace he went up for a closer look and saw that the idiot really was hideous.
This is what he looked like: Journey to the West A snout like a husking hammer over three feet long; Tusks like silver nails protruding from his mouth.
Two round eyes that flashed like lightning; A pair of ears that made a howling wind when they flapped.
The bristles behind his head were rows of iron arrows; All of his hide was rough and green and scabby.
In his hands he held an amazing object: A nine−toothed rake of which everyone was afraid.
Summoning up his courage, the evil spirit shouted, "Where are you from?
What's your name?
Tell me at once and I'll spare your life." To this Pig replied with a laugh, "So you can't recognize your own ancestor Pig either, my boy.
Come closer and I'll tell you: For my huge mouth and tusks and mighty powers I was made Marshal Tian Peng by the Jade Emperor, Commanding eighty thousand marines on the River of Heaven, And happy amid all the joys of the heavenly palace.
Because when drunk I fluted with a palace lady I decided to play the hero for a while.
One butt from my snout destroyed the Dipper and Bull Palace; I ate the magic mushrooms of the Queen Mother of the West.
The Jade Emperor himself gave me two thousand hammer−blows, Made me an exile from the world of Heaven.
This made me determined to nourish my spirit, And become an evil monster in the lower world.
Just when I had made a good marriage in Gao Village Journey to the West Fate brought me up against my brother Monkey.
He subdued me with his gold−banded cudgel; I was forced to bow my head and enter the Buddhist faith.
I do the heavy work, saddle the horse and carry luggage: I must have been the Tang Priest's debtor in an earlier life.
As the iron−footed Marshal Tian Peng my surname was Zhu; My name as a Buddhist is Zhu Bajie." When the evil spirit heard this he shouted, "So you're the Tang Priest's disciple.
I've long heard that his flesh is very tasty. You're one of the people I most want to catch. I'm not going to spare you now you've fallen into my clutches.
Stay where you are, and take this from my mace." "Evil beast," Pig replied.
"You must have been a dyer before." "What do you mean, I must have been a dyer?" the evil spirit asked.
"If you weren't a dyer, how come you know how to use a pestle?" Pig retorted, and with no further argument the monster was upon him, striking furiously.
They fought a fine battle in the mountain hollow: A nine−toothed rake, An iron mace.
As the rake went through its movements they were like a howling gale; The mace's skilful blows came as thick and fast as rain.
One was an unknown ogre blocking the mountain road; The other was the offending Tian Peng now guarding his true nature's master.
When one's nature is right monsters cause no fear; When the mountain is high earth cannot come from metal.
One fought with his mace like a python from a pool; The other's rake was like a dragon from the waters.
Their angry shouts shook mountains and rivers; Journey to the West Their mighty roars caused terror down in hell.
Each of the heroes displayed his prowess, Staking his life on his magical powers.
We will say no more of how Pig set a mighty wind blowing as he fought the evil spirit, who ordered his junior devils to keep Pig surrounded.
Instead the story tells how Brother Monkey suddenly gave a bitter laugh behind the Tang Priest's back.
"Why are you laughing like that, elder brother?" Friar Sand asked.
"Pig really is an idiot," Monkey replied. "As soon as he heard that they feed monks there he fell for my trick. He's been away a long time now.
If he'd beaten the evil spirit with a single blow of his rake you'd have seen him coming back in triumph by now, loudly insisting on his great victory.
But if the demon's been too much for him and captured him my luck's out. Goodness only knows how often he'll have cursed the Protector of the Horses behind my back.
Say nothing while I go to take a look around, Wujing." With that the splendid Great Sage, who did not want the venerable elder to know what was happening, quietly pulled a hair out of the back of his head, blew on it with magic breath, said "Change!" and turned it into his own double to stay with the master together with Friar Sand.
Then his real self disappeared as he leapt up into the air to look around. He saw the idiot lashing out wildly with his rake at the devils who were surrounding him and gradually getting the better of him. This was more than Monkey could bear.
Bringing his cloud down to land, he shouted at the top of his voice, "Take it easy, Pig.
Monkey's here." Recognizing that it was Monkey's voice gave the idiot a chance to be more ferocious than ever as he hit wildly forward with his rake.
The evil spirit was no match for him. "You weren't up to much before, monk," he said, "so how come you're so fierce now?" "You'd better stop bullying me now, my lad," Pig replied. "I've got one of my people here now." A moment later he was swinging wildly again with the rake.
The evil spirit, unable to stave off the blows, led his devils away in defeat.
As soon as Monkey saw that the devils had been beaten he drew no closer but went straight back on his cloud, shook the hair and put it back on his body.
With his mortal, fleshly eyes the Tang Priest noticed nothing of this.
Before long a triumphant Pig returned too, so exhausted that his nose was dripping with snot as he foamed at the mouth and was panting loudly.
"Master!" he called. When the Tang Priest saw him he exclaimed in astonishment, "Pig, you went to fetch some grass for the horse. Why have you come back in so terrible a state?
Were there watchmen on the mountain who wouldn't let you cut any?" The idiot flung his rake down, beat his chest and stamped his feet as he replied, "Don't ask me about it, Master. If I had to tell you I'd die of shame." "What would you be so ashamed of?" Sanzang asked.
Journey to the West "Elder brother tricked me," Pig replied.
"He told me that it wasn't an evil spirit behind that wind and mist. He said there was nothing sinister about it, but that it was from a village where the people were so pious that they were steaming white rice and breadrolls made with white flour to feed monks with.
I believed him. As I was so hungry I thought I'd go ahead to beg for some. Fetching grass for the horse was only an excuse. I never expected to be surrounded by a crowd of evil spirits.
They gave me a hard fight, and if Monkey hadn't helped me out with his mourner's staff I'd have had no hope of escaping and getting back here." 'The idiot's talking nonsense," said Monkey, who was standing beside them, with a smile.
"If you've taken to robbery you're trying to get a whole gaolful of people into trouble.
I've been looking after the master here.
I've never left his side." "It is true," Sanzang said, "Wukong has never left my side." The idiot then sprang up shouting, "You don't understand, Master.
He's got a double." "Is there really a monster there, Wukong?" Sanzang asked.
Monkey could keep his deception up no longer. "There are a few little devils," Monkey replied with a bow and a smile, "but they won't dare give us any trouble.
Come here, Pig. I'm going to look after you.
We're going to escort the master along this steep mountain path as if we were an army on the march." "How?" Pig asked.
"You'll be the commander of the vanguard," Monkey replied, "going in front and clearing the way.
If the evil spirit doesn't show up again that will be that; but if he does, you fight him. When you beat the evil spirit that'll be something to your credit." Reckoning that the evil spirit's powers were much the same as his own, Pig said, "Very well then.
I'm ready to die at his hands.
I'll take the lead." "Idiot," said Monkey, "if you start by saying such unlucky things you'll never get anywhere." "As you know, brother," Pig replied, "When a gentleman goes to a banquet He gets either drunk or well filled; When a hero goes into a battle He gets either wounded or killed.
By saying something unlucky first I'll make myself stronger later." This delighted Monkey, who saddled the horse and invited the master to ride while Friar Sand carried the luggage as they all followed Pig into the mountains.
Journey to the West The evil spirit meanwhile led a few of his underlings who had survived the rout straight back to his cave, where he sat brooding in silence high up above a rocky precipice.
Many of the junior devils who looked after things in his household came up to him and asked, "Why are you so miserable today, Your Majesty?
You're usually in−such high spirits when you come back." "Little ones," said the demon king, "usually when I go out to patrol the mountains I can be sure of bringing home a few people or animals I've caught to feed you with.
Today my luck was out:
I've met my match." "Who?" the junior devils asked.
"A monk," the demon king replied, "a disciple of the Tang Priest from the East who's going to fetch the scriptures. He's called Zhu Bajie.
He went for me so hard with his rake that he beat me. I had to run away.
I'm thoroughly fed up. For ages now I've heard it said that the Tang Priest is an arhat who has cultivated his conduct for ten successive lifetimes. Anyone who eats a piece of his flesh will live for ever.
To my surprise he's come to my mountain today, and it would have been an ideal time to catch him, cook him and eat him. I never realized he'd have a disciple like that one." Before he had finished saying this a junior devil slipped forward from the ranks.
First he gave three sobs in front of the demon king, then three laughs.
"Why sob then laugh?" shouted the demon king.
The junior devil fell to his knees as he replied, "Because Your Majesty just said that you wanted to eat the Tang Priest.
His flesh isn't worth eating." "But everyone says that a piece of his flesh will make you live as long as the heavens," said the demon king.
"How can you say that it's not worth eating?" "If he were so good to eat," the junior devil replied, "he'd never have got this far. Other demons would have eaten him up.
And he's got three disciples with him." "Do you know who?" the demon king asked.
"The senior disciple is Sun the Novice," said the junior devil, "and the third disciple is Friar Sand.
The one you met must have been his second disciple Zhu Bajie." "How does Friar Sand compare with Zhu Bajie?" asked the demon king.
"He's much the same," the junior devil said, "What about Sun the Novice?" the demon king asked, at which the junior devil thrust out his tongue in horror and replied, "I daren't tell you.
That Monkey has tremendous magic powers and can do all sorts of transformations.
Five hundred years ago he made terrible havoc in heaven. None of the heavenly warriors dared give him any trouble, from the Twenty−eight Constellations, the Star Lords of the Nine Bright Shiners, the Gods of the Twelve Branches, the Five Officers and the Four Ministers, the East and West Dippers and the Gods of the North and the South, to the Five Peaks and the Four Rivers. How can you have the nerve to want to eat the Tang Priest?" "How do you know so much about him?" the demon king asked.
Journey to the West "I used to live in the Lion Cave of the demon king on Lion Ridge," the junior devil replied. "He was reckless enough to want to eat the Tang Priest, and that Sun the Novice smashed his way in through the gates with his gold−banded cudgel. It was terrible. They were wiped out.
Luckily I had enough sense to escape by the back door and come here, where Your Majesty allowed me to stay.
That's how I know about his powers." The senior demon turned pale with shock when he heard this: it was a case of the commander−in−chief being afraid of the soothsayer's words.
How could he help being alarmed when he heard all this from one of his own people?
Just when they were all feeling terrified another junior devil stepped forward and said, "Don't be so upset and afraid, Your Majesty. As the saying goes, easy does it.
If you want to catch the Tang Priest let me make you a plan to capture him." "What plan?" the senior demon asked.
"I have a plan to 'divide the petals of the plum blossom.'" "What do you mean by 'dividing the petals of the plum blossom?'" the demon king asked.
"Call the roll of all the devils in the cave," the junior devil replied. "Choose the best hundred from all thousand of them, then the best ten out of that hundred, and finally the best three out of the ten.
They must be capable and good at transformations. Have them all turn into Your Majesty's doubles, wear Your Majesty's helmet and armor, carry Your Majesty's mace, and lie in wait in three different places.
First send one out to fight Zhu Bajie, then one to fight Sun the Novice and finally one to fight Friar Sand. This way you'll only have to spare three junior devils to draw the three disciples away.
Then Your Majesty will be able to stretch down from mid−air with your cloud−grabbing hand to catch the Tang Priest. He'll be in the bag. It'll be as easy as catching flies in a dish of fish juice.
Nothing to it." This suggestion delighted the demon king, who said, "What a brilliant plan, brilliant!
If I don't catch the Tang Priest this way, that'll be that.
But if I do I can assure you you'll be richly rewarded.
I'll make you commander of the vanguard." The junior devil kowtowed to thank him for his grace and went off to call the roll of the devils.
After all the monsters in the cave had been carefully checked through, three capable junior devils were selected. They turned into the senior devil's doubles and went to lie in wait for the Tang Priest with their iron maces.
The venerable Tang elder meanwhile was following Pig along the way without a care in the world.
When they had been going for some time there was a crashing sound from beside the track and out leapt a junior devil who rushed straight at them, evidently to grab Sanzang.
"The evil spirit's here, Pig," Monkey shouted.
"Get him!" The idiot, who was taken in by the imposture, hacked wildly at the devil with his rake.
The evil spirit parried Pig's blows with his mace as he met the onslaught.
While the battle between the pair of them ebbed and flowed on the mountainside there was a noise in the undergrowth as another monster sprang out and charged at the Tang Priest.
"This is bad, Master," said Monkey. "Pig can't see straight. He's let the monster escape to catch you.
I'm going to fight him." Pulling his cudgel out in a flash, he went up to the monster, shouting, "Where d'you think you're going?
Take this!" Without saying a word the evil spirit raised his mace to meet the attack.
But while the two of them were locked in combat, swinging at each other, there was a howling wind from the other side of the mountain and a Journey to the West third evil spirit sprang out who also rushed straight at the Tang Priest.
When Friar Sand saw it he exclaimed in alarm, "Master, big brother and second brother both can't see straight. They've let the evil spirit get away to catch you.
Stay on the horse while I get him." Friar Sand was taken in too.
Brandishing his staff he blocked the evil spirit's iron mace and started a bitter combat. It was a wild fight with shouts and awful yells, and they drew further and further away.
When the demon king saw from up in the sky that the Tang Priest was alone on the horse he reached down with his five−clawed steel hook and seized him.
The master lost horse and stirrups as the evil spirit carried him off in a gust of wind.
This was a case of When the dhyana−nature encountered a monster the true achievement was hard; The monk of the river current met once more with a star of disaster.
Bringing his wind down to land, the demon king took the Tang Priest into the cave and called, "Commander of the vanguard!" The junior devil who had made the plan came forward, knelt and said, "I am not worthy." "How can you say that?" the demon king replied.
"Once the commander−in−chief has spoken, white becomes black.
What I said before was that if I failed to catch the Tang Priest, that would be that; but that if I succeeded I'd make you my commander of the vanguard.
Your brilliant plan has succeeded today, so there is no reason why I should break faith with you.
Bring the Tang Priest here and tell the underlings to fetch water, scrub the cooking pot, fetch some firewood and light the fire.
When he's been steamed you and I will each have a piece of his flesh and live for ever." "Your Majesty," the commander of the vanguard replied, "he mustn't be eaten yet." "Why ever not?" the demon king asked.
"We've captured him." "It wouldn't matter if you ate him, Your Majesty," said the commander of the vanguard, "as far as Zhu Bajie and Friar Sand are concerned. They would be reasonable. But I'm worried about that Sun the Novice: he'd be really vicious. If he found out we'd eaten the Tang Priest he wouldn't come to give us a straight fight.
He'd just thrust that gold−banded cudgel of his into the mountainside and make a hole so big that the whole mountain would collapse.
We'd be homeless." "What do you suggest, commander of the vanguard?" the demon king asked.
"In my opinion," the commander replied, "we should send the Tang Priest out to the back garden, tie him to a tree, and starve him for two or three days.
That will clean him up inside and let us make sure that the three disciples don't come here looking for him. Once we've found out that they've gone home we can bring the Tang Priest out and enjoy him at our leisure.
That'd be better, wouldn't it?" "Yes, yes," the senior demon said with a laugh.
"You're right, commander of the vanguard." An order was issued and the Tang Priest taken into the back garden to be roped to a tree, while all the junior devils went out to the front to keep watch.
Look at the venerable elder as he suffers in his bonds, tied up Journey to the West tightly and unable to stop the tears rolling down his cheeks. "Disciples," he called, "where did you chase those demons to when you went to capture them in the mountains?
I have been captured by a wicked ogre and have met with disaster. When will I ever see you again?
The pain is killing me." Just when the tears from both eyes were joining in a single stream he heard someone calling from a tree opposite, "Venerable elder, you're here too." Taking control of himself, the Tang Priest asked, "Who are you?" "I'm a woodcutter who lives on this mountain," the other replied. "I've been tied up here for three days.
I reckon they're going to eat me." "Woodcutter," said the Tang Priest with tears in his eyes, "If you die it will only be you. You have nothing else to worry about. But if I die it won't be a clean end." "What do you mean, it won't be a clean end, venerable elder?" the woodcutter asked.
"You have no parents, wife or children, so if you die that'll be that." "I am from the East," the Tang Priest replied, "and was going to fetch the scriptures from the Western Heaven. I was going on the orders of Emperor Taizong of the Tang to worship the living Buddha and fetch the true scriptures. This was to save all the lonely souls in the underworld who have nobody to care for them.
If I lose my life today the vain waiting will kill my sovereign and I will let down his ministers.
Countless wronged souls in the City of the Unjustly Slain will suffer a terrible disappointment and never ever be able to escape from the wheel of life. The true achievement will all be turned to dust in the wind.
How can that possibly be considered a clean end?" When the woodcutter heard this the tears fell from his eyes as he said, "If you die that is all there to it. But my death will be even more painful for me to bear.
I lost my father when I was a boy, and live alone with my mother. Because we had no property I have had to make our living as a woodcutter.
My aged mother is eighty−two this year and I am her only support.
If I die who will there be to bury her?
It's very hard to bear:
the pain of it is killing me." When the venerable elder heard this he began to wail aloud, "Oh dear, oh dear, Even the mountain man thinks of his mother; I am reciting the sutras in vain.
Serving one's monarch and serving one's parents are both the same in principle.
You are moved by your mother's goodness to you and I by my sovereign lord's goodness to me." This was indeed a case of Weeping eyes looking at eyes that weep, Journey to the West A heartbroken one who sees off one with a broken heart.
But we will say no more of Sanzang's sufferings as we return to Monkey, who after driving the junior devil back down the grassy slope rushed back to the track to find that his master had disappeared. All that was left were the white horse and the luggage.
In his alarm he led the horse and shouldered the carrying−pole as he headed for the top of the mountain in his search for the master.
Oh dear!
Indeed: The long−suffering monk of the river current had met with new suffering; The Great Sage, subduer of demons, had run into a demon.
If you do not know how his search for his master ended, listen to the explanation in the next installment.
The Mother of Wood Lends His Might in Defeating the Ogre The Metal Lord Uses His Magic to Wipe Out the Monster The story tells how the Great Sage Monkey was leading the horse and carrying the baggage while he searched the whole mountain top, calling out for his master. Suddenly Pig came running up to him, puffing and panting, to ask, "Why are you shouting like that, brother?" "The master's disappeared," Brother Monkey replied. "Have you seen him?" "Why did you have to play that trick on me when I was being a good monk with the Tang Priest?" Pig asked. "What was all that about me being commander of the vanguard?
I had to fight for my life before I could beat that evil spirit and come back in one piece.
You and Friar Sand were looking after the master, so why ask me about it?" "I don't blame you, brother," said Monkey.
"Somehow or other your eyes must have gone blurred−−you let the evil spirit get away and come back to catch the master again.
When I went off to fight it I told Friar Sand to look after the master, and he's disappeared too." "I expect he's taken the master somewhere for a crap," said Pig with a grin, but before he had finished speaking Friar Sand turned up.
"Where's the master, Friar Sand?" Monkey asked.
"You two must both be blind," retorted Friar Sand, "letting the evil spirit escape to come back for the master.
When I went to fight the evil spirit the master was left in the horse by himself." At this Monkey leapt with rage, shouting, "He's fooled me!
He's fooled me!" Journey to the West "How's he fooled you?" Friar Sand asked.
"It was a 'dividing the petals of the plum blossom' trick," Monkey replied, "to draw us three off so that he could make a blow for the heart and carry off the master.
Whatever in the name of Heaven are we to do?" He could not stop the tears from streaming down his cheeks, at which Pig said, "Don't cry. If you cry you're a pustule.
He can't be far away. He must be on this mountain.
Let's look for him." The three of them had no better plan than to look for him on the mountain.
When they had covered some six or seven miles they saw a cave palace at the foot of a beetling precipice: Clean−cut pinnacles blocking the light, Towering and grotesque−shaped rocks.
The fragrance of rate and wonderful flowers, The beauty of red apricots and green peaches.
The ancient trees in front of the precipice, Forty spans round, and with bark scarred by frost and rain; The azure pines standing outside the gates, Two thousand feet of green blue reaching up to the sky.
Pairs of wild cranes That dance in the breeze at the mouth of the cave; Mountain birds in couples Chirping by day at the ends of the branches.
Clumps of yellow creepers like ropes, Rows of misty willows with leaves like hanging gold.
Water fills the pools that are square; All over the mountain are caves that are deep.
In the pools that are square Dragons lie hidden with scales unchanged.
In the mountain's deep caves Dwell ogres that long have been eaters of humans.
Journey to the West This can be matched with the lands of immortals, A den where the winds and the vapors are stored.
When Monkey saw this he took two or three paces forward, sprang towards the gates and saw that they were shut tight. Above them was a horizontal stone tablet on which was written in large letters LINKED RING CAVE: BROKEN RIDGE: HIDDEN MISTS MOUNTAIN. "Strike, Pig," said Monkey. "This is where the evil spirit lives.
The master must be here." At this the idiot turned vicious, raised his rake, and brought it down on the gates with all his strength, smashing a big hole in them and shouting, "Ogre, send my master out at once if you don't want me to smash your gates down and finish the lot of you off." At this the junior devils on the gates rushed back inside to report, "Disaster, Your Majesty." "What disaster?" the senior demon asked.
"Someone's smashed a hole in the front gates and is yelling that he wants his master," the junior devils replied.
"I wonder which one's come looking for him," said the demon king in a state of great alarm.
"Don't be frightened," said the commander of the vanguard.
"Let me go out and take a look." He hurried straight to the front gates, twisted his head to one side and craned to look through the hole that had been smashed in them. He saw someone with a long snout and big ears. "Don't worry, Your Majesty," he turned round and shouted at the top of his voice, "it's Zhu Bajie. He's not up to much and he won't dare try any nonsense on us.
If he does we can open the gates and drag him inside to put in the steamer too.
The only one to worry about is that hairy−cheeked monk with a face like a thunder god." "Brother," said Pig when he heard this from outside, "he's not scared of me but he is of you. The master's definitely inside. Come here quick." "Evil damned beast," said Monkey abusively.
"Your grandfather Monkey is here.
Send my master out and I'll spare your life." "This is terrible, Your Majesty," the commander of the vanguard reported.
"Sun the Novice is here looking for him too." At this the demon king started complaining, "It's all because of your 'petal−dividing' or whatever you called it. You've brought disaster on us.
How is this going to end?" Journey to the West "Don't worry, Your Majesty," the commander of the vanguard replied, "and don't start grumbling yet.
That Sun the Novice is a monkey of great breadth of spirit. Although he has such tremendous magical power he's partial to flattery.
We'll take an imitation human head out to fool him with, say a few flattering things to him and tell him we've eaten his master already.
If we can take him in, the Tang Priest will be ours to enjoy.
If we can't we'll have to think again." "But where are we to get an imitation human head?" the demon king asked.
"I'll see if I can make one," the commander of the vanguard replied.
The splendid ogre then cut a piece of willow root with an axe of pure steel into the shape of a human head, spurted some human blood on it from his mouth to make it all sticky, and told a junior devil to take it to the gates on a lacquer tray, calling, "My Lord Great Sage, please overcome your anger and allow me to address you." Brother Monkey really was partial to being flattered, and when he heard himself being addressed as "My Lord Great Sage" he grabbed hold of Pig and said, "Don't hit him.
Let's hear what he has to say." To this the junior devil with the tray replied, "When my king took your master into the cave the junior devils were naughty and behaved very badly.
They gobbled and gnawed and grabbed and bit, and ate the whole of your master up except his head, which I have here." "If you've eaten him up, that's that," Monkey replied.
"Bring the head out and let me see whether it's real or false." The junior devil threw the head out through the hole in the gates, a sight that started Pig howling and saying, "This is terrible.
The master went in looking one way and he's come out looking like this." "Idiot," said Monkey, "have a look and find out if it's real before you start crying." "You're shameless," said Pig, "how could there ever be such a thing as a fake human head?" 'This one's a fake," Brother Monkey replied.
"How can you tell?" Pig asked.
"When you throw a real human head it lands quietly," Monkey explained, "but when you throw a fake it makes a loud noise like a pair of wooden clappers.
If you don't believe me, I'll throw it for you.
Listen!" He picked the head up and threw it against a rock, where it gave a hollow ring.
"It was loud, brother," said Friar Sand.
"That means it's a fake," said Monkey.
"I'll make it turn back into its real self to show you." Producing his gold−banded cudgel in a flash he hit the head open.
When Pig looked he saw that it was a piece of willow root.
This was too much for the idiot, who started talking abusively.
"I'll get you, you hairy lot," he said, "you may have hidden my master in your cave and fooled your ancestor Pig with a piece of willow root, but don't imagine that my master is just a willow−tree spirit in disguise." The junior devil who was holding the tray was thrown into such a panic by this that he ran shaking with fear back to report, "It's terrible, terrible, terrible." "What's so terribly terrible then?' the senior demon asked.
Journey to the West "Zhu Bajie and Friar Sand were taken in, but Monkey's like an antique dealer−−he really knows his stuff," the junior demon replied.
"He could tell it was an imitation head.
If only we could give him a real human head he might go away." "But how are we to get one?" the senior demon wondered, then continued, "Fetch a human head we haven't eaten yet from the flaying shed." The devils then went to the shed and choose a fresh head, after which they gnawed all the skin off it till it was quite smooth and carried it out on a tray. "My lord Great Sage," the messenger said, "I am afraid it was a fake head last time.
But this really is Lord Tang's head.
Our king had kept it so as to bring good fortune to our cave, but now he's making a special offering of it." He then threw the head out through the hole in the gates, it landed with a thud and rolled on the ground, gory with blood.
Seeing that this human head was a real one Monkey could not help starting to wail, in which he was joined by Pig and Friar Sand.
"Stop crying, brother," said Pig, holding back his tears.
"This is very hot weather, and the head will soon become putrid. I'm going to fetch and bury it while it's still fresh.
We can cry for him afterwards." "You're right," said Monkey, and the idiot cradled the head against his chest, not caring about the filth, as he hurried up the cliff till he found a South−facing spot where the winds and the natural forces were gathered. Here he hacked out a hole with his rake, buried the head, and piled a grave−mound over it.
Only then did he say to Friar Sand, "You and big brother weep over him while I look for some offerings." Going down to the side of a gill, he broke off some willow branches and gathered a few pebbles.
Taking them back up to the tomb, he planted the willow branches on either side and piled the pebbles in front of it.
"What's all that about?" Monkey asked.
"The willow branches are used instead of cypresses to shade the master's tomb for the time being," Pig answered, "and the pebbles are offerings to him instead of cakes." "Cretin!" Monkey shouted. "He's already dead.
What do you want to go offering him stones for?" "Just to show what the living feel," Pig replied, "and out of mourning and respect." "You'd better cut that nonsense out," Monkey replied. "Tell Friar Sand to come here.
He can guard the tomb and keep an eye on the horse and the luggage while we two go and smash the cave palace up, capture the monster and break his body into ten thousand bits.
Then we'll have avenged the master." "You're absolutely right, big brother," said Friar Sand through his tears.
"You two be careful. I'll keep watch here." The splendid Pig then took off his black brocade tunic, tied his undershirt tightly, picked up his rake and followed Monkey.
The two of them rushed straight for the stone gates, and with no more ado they smashed them down and shouted with a yell that made the heavens shake, "Give us our Tang Priest back alive!" This sent the souls flying from all the devils old and young in the cave, who complained that the commander of the vanguard had wronged them.
"How are we going to deal with these monks now they've fought their way in through the gates?" the demon king asked.
"The ancients used to say," the commander of the vanguard replied, "'Put your hand in a basket of fish and it's bound to stink.' Now we're in this we've got to see it through.
We'll just have to take our troops into battle Journey to the West with these monks." When the demon heard this he had no alternative but to issue the order, "Stand together, my little ones.
Bring your best weapons with you and come with me." They then charged out through the entrance of the cave with a great war cry.
The Great Sage and Pig quickly fell back a few paces before they held the devilish onslaught on a piece of flat ground on the mountainside, shouting, "Who's your best−known boss?
Who's the ogre who captured our master?" The devils had now palisaded their position, over which a multicolored embroidered flag flew, and the demon king shouted straight back as he held the iron mace, "Damned monks! Don't you know who I am?
I'm the Great King of the Southern Mountains, and I've been running wild here for hundreds of years.
I've eaten your Tang Priest up.
What are you going to do about it?" "You've got a nerve, you hairy beast," retorted Monkey abusively.
"How old are you, daring to call yourself after the Southern Mountains?
Lord Lao Zi was the ancestor who opened up heaven and earth, but even he sits on the right of the Supreme Pure One.
The Tathagata Buddha is the Honoured One who rules the world, and he sits below the Great Roc.
Confucius the Sage is the Honoured One of the Confucian School, and all he's called is Master.
So how dare you call yourself Great King of the Southern Mountains and talk about running wild for several hundred years? Don't move, and take this from your grandfather's cudgel!" The evil spirit twisted aside to avoid the cudgel, which he parried with his iron mace.
"How dare you try to put me down like that, monkey−face," said the monster, glaring furiously.
"What kind of powers have you got, acting like a maniac at my gates." "I'll get you, you nameless beast," replied Brother Monkey with a grin.
"You evidently don't know who I am, so just stand there and make yourself brave while I tell you: My ancestral home is in the Eastern Continent, Where heaven and earth nourished me for thousands of years.
On the Mountain of Flowers and Fruit was a magic stone egg; When the egg broke open my roots were inside.
My birth was not like that of an ordinary being: My body was formed when sun and moon mated.
1 cultivated myself with formidable effect; Heaven gave me a perceptive and cinnabar head.
As the Great Sage I dwelt in the palace in the clouds, Using my strength in a fight against the Dipper and Bull Palace.
A hundred thousand heavenly troops could get nowhere near me; Journey to the West All the stars in the sky were easily subdued.
My fame resounds throughout the cosmos; I know all about everything between earth and sky.
Since my conversion to Sakyamuni's teachings 1 have been helping my master on his journey to the West.
When I clear a path through mountains no one can stop me; My skill at bridging rivers causes demons distress.
In forests I use my power to seize tigers and leopards; I capture wild beasts bare−handed before sheer cliffs.
For the sake of the East's true achievement I have come to the Western Regions; What evil monster will dare to show itself?
I hate the wicked beasts who have murdered my master; Their lives will all be ended at this moment." These remarks both shocked and infuriated the ogre, who ground his teeth, sprang forward and struck at Brother Monkey with his iron mace.
Monkey blocked it effortlessly with his cudgel and would have said some more to him when Pig, unable to restrain himself any longer, started swinging wildly at the demon king's commander of the vanguard.
The commander of the vanguard led his whole force into action, and a hectic and splendid battle was fought on that piece of level ground on the mountainside: The monk from the great and superior country in the East Was going to fetch true scriptures from the Western Paradise.
The great leopard of the Southern mountains breathed out wind and clouds To block their way through the mountains and show off his prowess.
With tricks And deception He had foolishly captured the priest from Great Tang.
Then he met Monkey with his tremendous powers Journey to the West As well as the famous Zhu Bajie.
While the demons fought on level ground in the mountains Dust clouds arose and darkened the sky.
Above the fray rose the junior devils' roars As they thrust out wildly with spear and with sword.
On the other side the monks shouted back, Fighting with rake and with cudgel together.
The Great Sage was a matchless hero, And Pig in his perfection reveled in his strength.
The ancient ogre of the South, And his vanguard commander For the sake of a piece of the Tang Priest's flesh Were prepared to throw their own lives away. These two hated them for killing their master:
The other two were set on murder because of the Tang Priest.
The struggle long swayed to and fro, The clashes and charges yielding no victor.
When Monkey realized that the junior devils were fighting so hard that repeated attacks were failing to drive them back he used body−dividing magic, plucked out a bunch of hairs, chewed them up in his mouth, spat the pieces out, called "Change!" and turned them all into his own doubles, each wielding a gold−banded cudgel and fighting his way into the cave from the outside.
The one or two hundred junior devils, unable to cope with their attacks from all sides, all fled for their lives back into the cave. Monkey and Pig then fought their way back out through the enemy ranks from the inside.
The evil spirits who had no sense tried to stand up to the rake and found themselves bleeding from nine wounds, or resisted the cudgel and had their flesh and bones beaten to paste.
The Great King of the Southern Mountains was so alarmed that he fled for his life on his clouds and wind.
The commander of the vanguard, who did not know how to do transformations, had already fallen to Monkey's club and been revealed as what he really was: an iron−backed gray wolf ogre.
Pig went up to him, turned him over by his leg, and said, "Goodness only knows how many piglets and lambs this so−and−so has eaten." Journey to the West Monkey meanwhile shook himself, put the hair back on his body and said, "No time to lose, idiot. After the demon king! Make him pay for the master's life." Pig turned back, but all the little Monkeys had disappeared.
"Your magic bodies have all gone, brother," he exclaimed.
"I've taken them back," Monkey replied.
"Splendid," said Pig, "splendid." The two of them went back in triumph, feeling very pleased.
When the senior demon escaped back to the cave he told his underlings to move rocks and earth to barricade the front gates.
The surviving junior demons were all trembling with terror as they barricaded the entrance: they would not have dared to stick their heads out again now.
Monkey led Pig to the gates and shouted without getting any response.
Pig's rake made no impression when he struck them with it.
Realizing what had happened, Monkey said, "Don't waste your effort, Pig.
They've barricaded the gates." "Then how are we going to avenge the master?" Pig asked.
"Let's go back to his grave and see Friar Sand," Brother Monkey replied.
When they got back there they found Friar Sand still weeping, at which Pig became more miserable than ever, throwing down his rake, prostrating himself on the tomb mound and beating the ground with his hand as he howled, "Poor, poor Master.
Master from so far away!
I'll never see you again!" "Don't distress yourself so, brother," said Monkey.
"The evil spirit may have barricaded his front gates, but he's bound to have a back entrance to go in and out through.
You two wait here while I go and look for it.
"Do be careful, brother," said Pig through his tears. "Don't get caught yourself too. We could never cope if we had to wail for the master then for you by turns.
We'd make an awful mess of it." "No problem," said Monkey.
"I've got my ways of doing things." Putting his cudgel away the splendid Great Sage tightened his kilt, stepped out and went back over the mountain. On his way he heard the sound of flowing water.
When he turned round to look he saw that there was a brook flowing down from above him, and beside the gill was a gate, to the left of which was a drainpipe from which red water was coming out.
"Goes without saying," he thought.
"That must be the back entrance.
If I go as myself the junior demons may well recognize me when I open the door and see them. I'd better turn into a water snake to go in. No, hold on.
If the master's spirit knows that I've turned into a water snake he'll be angry with me as a monk for turning into something so long drawn−out.
I'd better turn into a little crab. No, that's no good either.
The master would be cross with me for having too many legs for a monk." So he turned into a water rat who slipped into the water with a soughing sound and went straight to the inner courtyard along the drainpipe.
Here he thrust his head out for a look around and saw some junior devils setting out gobbets of human flesh to dry in a sunny spot. "Heavens!" said Monkey.
"That must be what they can't finish from the master's flesh. No doubt they're drying it to save for a rainy day.
If I turned back into myself now, went up to them and wiped them out with one swing of my cudgel I'd be making myself look brave but stupid.
I'll do another change, go in to look for Journey to the West the senior devil, and find out what's what." With that he jumped out of the drain, shook himself, and turned himself into a winged ant.
Indeed: Weak and tiny and known as black colts, They hide away for many a day till they have wings and can fly.
Casually crossing beside the bridge they draw up their ranks; They enjoy battles of high strategy under the bed.
Because they know when rain is coming they block their holes And build their mounds of dust that turn to ashes.
Light they are, and delicate and quick, Rarely observed as they pass the wicker gate.
He spread his wings and flew straight into the inner hall, unseen and unheard.
Here the senior demon could be seen sitting very angrily in the seat of honour, while a junior devil ran up from behind to report, "Many congratulations, Your Majesty." "What on?" the senior demon asked.
"I was on lookout by the gill outside the back door just now," the junior devil replied, "when suddenly I heard some loud wails.
I rushed up to the top of the mountain to take a look and saw Zhu Bajie, Sun the Novice and Friar Sand all bowing to a grave and weeping bitterly.
I think they must have taken that head for the Tang Priest's and buried it, piled up a grave mound and mourned for it." When Monkey overheard this he said to himself with delight, "From what he's said they've still got the master here and haven't eaten him yet.
I'll take a look around and find out if he's still alive, then have a word with him." The splendid Great Sage then flew into the main hall and looked all around until he saw a very tiny doorway on one side of it.
It was very firmly shut, and when he squeezed through the narrow gap between the doors he found himself in a big garden in which he could vaguely make out the sound of sobbing.
Flying further inside he saw a clump of tall trees at the foot of which were tied two men. One of these was the Tang Priest.
As soon as Monkey saw him he felt an itch in his heart that he could not scratch.
He could not help turning back into himself, going up to Sanzang and calling, "Master." When the Tang Priest saw who it was he started crying and saying, "Is that you, Wukong?
Save me as quickly as you can, Wukong." "Don't keep saying my name, Master," Monkey replied. "There are people at the front and the secret may get out.
As you're still alive I can rescue you.
The ogres said they'd already eaten you and tricked me with an Journey to the West imitation human head. Now we're in a bitter struggle with them.
There's no need to worry, Master. Just stick it out for a little longer till I've beaten the evil spirit, then I'll be able to rescue you." The Great Sage said the words of a spell, shook himself, turned into an ant again and flew back into the hall, where he landed on the main beam.
From here he saw the surviving junior devils jostling and shouting.
One of them sprang out from the crowd and said, "Your Majesty, now they know we've blocked the main gate and they won't be able to fight their way in they've given up hope. They've even made a tomb for the wrong head.
They spent today mourning for him, and they'll do the same again tomorrow and the day after. I'm sure they'll go away after that.
Once we find out that they've split up we can bring the Tang Priest out, chop him up into little bits, and fry him with aniseed.
Then everyone will be able to eat a piece when he's steaming hot, and we'll all live forever." At this another junior devil clapped his hands together and said, "No, no, he'd taste much better steamed." "Boiling him would save some firewood," another put in.
"He's such a rare and wonderful thing," said someone else, "that we ought to salt him down and take our time over eating him." When Monkey heard all this from up among the beams he thought with fury, "What harm did my master ever do you?
Why are you making these plans to eat him?" He pulled out a handful of hairs, chewed them up into little pieces, blew them lightly out of his mouth and silently recited the words of the spell that turned all the pieces into sleep insects. These he threw into the faces of all the devils, and the insects crawled up their noses, gradually making the devils feel sleepy.
Before long the junior devils were all lying stretched out fast asleep.
The demon king was the only one left fitfully awake as he kept rubbing his face and head, sneezing and pinching his nose. "Perhaps he knows about how to cope with sleep insects," Monkey thought.
"I'd better give him a double dose." He pulled out a hair, made two more sleep insects as before, and threw them into the demon's face to crawl up his nose, one up the left nostril and one up the right.
The demon king jumped to his feet, stretched, yawned twice and fell fast asleep, breathing heavily.
Quietly delighted, Monkey then sprang down from the roof and turned back into himself.
He produced his cudgel from his ear and waved it till it was the thickness of a duck egg, then with a loud bang broke down the side door, ran into the garden at the back and called out, "Master!" "Untie me quick, disciple," the venerable elder said.
"Being roped up like this has been agony." "Be patient, Master," said Monkey.
"When I've killed the evil spirit I'll come and untie you." He then hurried back into the hall, lifted his cudgel and was about to strike when he stopped and thought, "No, this is wrong.
I ought to release the master before I kill the evil spirit." He went back into the garden, where he changed his mind again:
"No, I'll kill the monster first." This happened two or three times till finally he came dancing back into the garden, where his master's grief turned to joy at the sight of him.
"You monkey," he said, "I suppose it's because you're beside yourself with pleasure at seeing me still alive that you're dancing about like that." Only then did Monkey go up to him, untie him, and help him walk away.
The man tied to the other tree then called out, "Please save me too in your great mercy, my lord." The venerable elder stopped and said, "Untie him too, Wukong." "Who's he?" Monkey asked. Journey to the West "He was captured and brought here a day before me," Sanzang replied.
"He's a woodcutter. He tells me his mother is very old and he is most worried about her. He is a very dutiful son.
You must save him too." Doing as he was bid, Monkey untied the other man and took them both out through the back gate, up the scar and across the ravine.
"Thank you for rescuing this man and me, worthy disciple," said Sanzang.
"Where are Wuneng and Wujing?" "Mourning for you over there," Monkey replied, "Give them a shout." Sanzang then shouted at the top of his voice, "Bajie!
Bajie!" The idiot, who had been weeping so much that his head was spinning, wiped away the snot and tears to call, "Friar Sand, the master's come back as a ghost.
That him calling, isn't it?" "Idiot," shouted Monkey, going up to him, "that's no ghost.
It's the master himself." When Friar Sand looked up and saw who it was he fell to his knees in front of Sanzang and said "Master, you've suffered terribly.
How did big brother rescue you?" Monkey then told them everything that had happened.
When Pig heard all this he gnashed his teeth, unable to restrain himself from knocking the tomb mound over with one blow of his rake, digging out the head and smashing it to pulp "Why are you hitting it?" the Tang Priest asked.
"Master," said Pig, "goodness only knows what kind of wretch he was, but we all mourned for him." "It was thanks to him that I'm still alive," Sanzang replied.
"When you disciples attacked their gates and demanded me they took him out to fob you off with.
Otherwise they would have killed me.
I think we should bury him properly as a mark of our monastic respect." When the idiot heard his master saying this he buried that bag of flesh and bone that had been beaten to a pulp and piled up a tomb mound over it.
"Master," said Brother Monkey with a smile, "won't you sit here for a while while I go to wipe them out?" With that he leapt down the cliff, crossed the ravine, went into the cave and took the ropes with which the Tang Priest and the woodcutter had been hound into the hall, where he used them to truss together the arms and legs of the demon king, who was still asleep. He then lifted the demon up with his cudgel onto his shoulder and took him out by the back door.
"You like making things difficult for yourself, brother," said Pig when he saw him coming from a distance.
"Why don't you find another to balance him?" Monkey then set the demon king down in front of Pig, who raised his rake and was just about to hit him when Monkey said, "Wait a moment.
We haven't captured the junior devils in the cave yet." "If there are any left," Pig said, "take me in with you to smash them." "Smashing them would be too much trouble," Monkey replied.
"The best thing would be to find some firewood and wipe them out that way." When the woodcutter heard this he led Pig to a hollow to the East to find some broken ends of bamboo, pines that had lost their needles, hollow stumps of willows, creepers broken off from their roots, withered artemisia, old reeds, rushes and dead mulberry.
They carried a lot of this into the back entrance, where Monkey set it alight and Pig fanned the flames with both ears.
Then the Great Sage sprang up, shook himself and put the Journey to the West sleep−insect hairs back on his body.
When the junior devils woke up they were all already on fire.
Poor things!
None of them had the faintest chance of surviving.
When the whole cave was burnt right out the disciples went back to see the master.
When Sanzang saw that the senior demon had woken up and was shouting he called, "Disciples, the evil spirit has come round." Pig went up and killed him with one blow of his rake, whereupon the ogre turned back into his real form as a leopard spirit with a coat patterned like mugwort flowers.
"Leopards with flower−patterned coats can eat tigers," Monkey observed, "and this one could turn into a human too.
Killing him has prevented a lot of serious trouble in future." The venerable elder could not express his gratitude strongly enough, and he then mounted the saddle.
"My home isn't far from here to the Southwest, sirs," said the woodcutter.
"I invite you to come there to meet my mother and accept my kowtows of thanks for saving my life.
Then I'll see you gentlemen along your way." Sanzang was happy to accept, and instead of riding he walked there with his three disciples and the woodcutter. After they had followed a winding path to the Southwest for a short distance this is what they saw.
Lichen growing across a stone−flagged path, Wisteria joining across the wicker gate, Chains of mountains on every side, And a wood full of singing birds.
A dense thicket of pine and bamboo, Rare and wonderful flowers in profusion.
The place is remote and deep amid the clouds, A thatched cottage with a bamboo fence.
While they were still some distance away they could make out an old woman leaning on the wicker gate with tears streaming from her eyes, weeping and calling to heaven and earth for her son.
As soon as the woodcutter saw his mother he left the Tang Priest behind as he rushed straight to the gate, knelt down and said, "Mother, I'm back." Throwing her arms around him the woman said, "My boy, when you didn't come home for days on end I thought the mountain lord must have caught you and killed you. I've suffered terrible heartache.
If you weren't killed why didn't you come back before?
Where are your carrying−pole, ropes and axe?" The woodcutter kowtowed as he replied, "Mother, the mountain lord did capture me and tie me to a tree.
I was lucky to escape with my life, thanks to these gentlemen. They are arhats sent by the Tang court in the East to fetch the scriptures from the Western Heaven.
This gentleman was captured by the mountain lord and tied to a tree as well.
His three disciples have enormous magic powers. They killed the mountain lord with a single blow:
he was a leopard with mugwort flower spots who had become a spirit.
They burnt all the junior devils to Journey to the West death, untied the senior gentleman and then untied me too.
I owe them a tremendous debt of gratitude:
but for them your son would certainly be dead.
Now that the mountain is completely safe I'll be able to walk around at night without any danger." After hearing this the old woman came forward to greet Sanzang and his disciples, kowtowing at every step. Then she led them in through the wicker gate to sit down in the thatched cottage.
Mother and son next performed endless kowtows as expressions of their gratitude before hastily and in a fluster preparing them some vegetarian food as a mark of their thanks.
"Brother," said Pig to the woodcutter, "I know you're hard up here.
Just put something simple together for us. Don't go to a lot of trouble and effort." "Quite frankly, sir," the woodcutter replied, "we're very poor here. We don't have any gill fungus, button mushrooms, peppers or aniseed. All we can offer you gentlemen are some wild vegetables." "We're putting you to a lot of trouble," said Pig.
"Be as quick as you can.
We're starving." "It'll soon be ready," the woodcutter replied, and before long a table and stools were set out and wiped clean, and several dishes of wild vegetables served:
Tender−scalded day lilies, White lumps of pickled scallion, Knotweed and purslane, Shepherds purse and "goosegut blossom." The "swallows stay away" was delicious and tender; The tiny fists of beansprouts were crisp and green.
Indigo heads boiled soft, White−stewed "dog footprints," "Cat's ears," Wild turnips, All with tender and tasty gray noodles.
"Scissor shafts," "Oxpool aid," Tipped in the pot with broom purslane.
Broken grain purslane, Journey to the West And lettuce purslane, All green, delicious and smooth.
"Birdflower" fried in oil, Superb water−chestnuts, Roots of reeds and wild−rice stems, Four kinds of excellent water plants.
"Wheat−mother," Delicate and finely flavored; "Raggedy patches" You could never wear.
Under the bitter sesame bed runs a fence.
Sparrows wander around, Macaques leave their footprints, Eager to eat it all when fried and piping hot.
Sloping wormwood and green artemisia surround crown daisy chrysanthemums; The moths fly around the buckwheat.
Bald "goat's ear," Wolfberry fruits, That don't need oil when combined with dark indigo.
A meal of every kind of wild vegetable As a mark of the woodcutter's reverent thanks.
When master and disciples had eaten their fill they packed up ready to start out again.
Not daring to press them to stay, the woodcutter asked his mother to come out and bow to them in thanks again.
He then kowtowed, fetched a club of jujube wood, fastened his clothes tight, and came out to see them on their way.
Friar Sand led the horse, Pig carried the shoulder−pole, and Monkey followed close behind them while the master put his hands together on the back of the horse and said, "Brother woodcutter, could you kindly lead us to the main track?
We will take out leave of you there." Together they then climbed high, went down slopes, Journey to the West skirted ravines and negotiated inclines.
"Disciples," said the venerable elder thoughtfully as he rode, "Since leaving my monarch to come to the West I have made a long journey across a great distance.
At each river and mountain I have met with disaster, Barely escaping from monsters and fiends.
My heart has been set on the Three Stores of scriptures, And my every thought is of Heaven above.
When will my toil and my labor be ended?
When will I go home, my journey completed?" When the woodcutter heard Sanzang saying this he said, "Don't be so downhearted, sir.
It's only some three hundred miles West along this road to India, the land of paradise." As soon as Sanzang heard this he dismounted and replied, "Thank you for bringing us so far.
Now that we are on the main track, please go home now, brother woodcutter, and give our respects to your venerable mother. We poor monks have no way to reward you for the sumptuous meal you gave us just now except by reciting surras morning and evening to protect you and your mother and enable both of you to live to be a hundred." The woodcutter took his leave of them and went back by the way he had came.
Master and disciples then headed West together.
Indeed: The ogre subdued and wrongs set to right, he escaped from his peril; Having been shown this kindness he set out on his way with the greatest of care.
If you don't know how long it was till they reached the Western Heaven, listen to the explanation in the next installment.
When Heaven Is Offended in Fengxian It Stops the Rain The Great Sage Urges Goodness and Brings a Downpour Journey to the West Deep and mysterious is the Great Way; What news is there of it?
When revealed it will alarm ghosts and divine beings. It controls the universe, Divides darkness and light; In the world of true happiness there is no competition.
Before the Vulture Peak Pearls and jewels emerge, Shining with every color.
It illuminates all beings that live between heaven and earth; Those who understand it live as long as mountains and seas.
The story tells how Sanzang and his three disciples took their leave of the woodcutter on the Hidden Clouds Mountain and hurried along the main road.
After they had been going for several days they suddenly saw a walled and moated city not far before them.
"Wukong," said Sanzang, "is that city ahead of us India, do you think?" "No, no," said Monkey shaking his head.
"Although the Tathagata lives in a paradise there are no cities there. It's a great mountain, Vulture Peak, on which are the high buildings and halls of Thunder Monastery. Even if we've now reached the land of India this isn't where the Buddha lives.
I don't know how far India is from Vulture Peak.
Presumably this city is one of the frontier prefectures of India.
We'll know when we get there." Soon they were outside the city, where Sanzang dismounted to go in through the triple gates. Here they found the people destitute and the streets deserted.
When they reached the market there were many black−clad government servants lined up on either side of a number of officials wearing their hats and sashes of office and standing under the eaves of a building.
As the four travelers came along the road these men did not give way at all, so Pig in his rough way raised his snout and shouted, "Out of the way!
Out of the way!" When the men looked up with a start and saw what he looked like their bones went soft, their sinews turned numb and they fell over, shouting, "Evil spirits!
Evil spirits!" This gave the officials standing under the eaves such a fright that they were shivering as they bowed and asked, "Where are you from?" Sanzang, who was worried that his disciples would cause trouble, pushed himself forward and said to the men, "I am a monk sent by His Majesty the Great Tang emperor to worship the Lord Buddha and fetch the scriptures in the Great Thunder Monastery in the land of India.
Our journey brings us to this distinguished place, but as we do not know its name and have not yet found a place to stay we hope that you gentlemen will Journey to the West forgive us if we have caused any offence to your customs on entering your city." Only then did the officials return his courtesy and say, "This is the prefecture of Fengxian, one of the frontier prefectures of India.
Because we have been suffering from drought for years on end the marquis has sent us to put up a notice here calling for masters of the Dharma to pray for rain and save the people." "Where's the notice?" asked Monkey when he heard this.
"Here," the officials said. "The arcade has only just been swept clean: we haven't posted it yet." "Bring it here and show me," said Brother Monkey.
The officials then opened the notice out and hung it up under the eaves. Monkey and the others went up to read it, and this was what was written on it:
Shangguan, Marquis of Fengxian Prefecture in Great India, issues this notice to invite enlightened teachers and great masters of the Dharma. This country with its prosperous soldiers and people has been afflicted with drought for years. Military and civil land alike has been devastated; the rivers have dried up and the ditches are empty.
There is no water in the wells, and the springs have stopped flowing.
While the rich are barely managing to stay alive, the poor cannot survive.
A bushel of wheat costs a hundred pieces of silver; a bundle of firewood costs five ounces.
Girls of ten are being sold for three pints of rice; boys of five are being given to whoever will take them.
Because the city dwellers fear the law they pawn their clothes to buy the necessities for survival; but in the countryside thugs rob and eat people in order to live.
I have therefore issued this notice in the hope that wise and worthy men from all around will pray for rain to save the people.
The will be richly rewarded for their kindness with a thousand pieces of silver. This is no empty promise.
Let those who would take it up come to this notice.
When he had read it Monkey asked the officials, "What's Shangguan?" "Shangguan is our marquis' surname," they replied.
"It's a very rare surname," said Monkey with a laugh.
"You've never been to school, brother," said Pig.
"There's a bit at the end of the book The Hundred Surnames that goes 'Ouyang and Shangguan.'" "Stop this idle chatter, disciples," said Sanzang.
"If any of you know how to pray for rain, bring them a fall of timely rain and save the people from this affliction: that would be a very good thing indeed to do.
If you cannot, we must be on our way and waste no more time." "What's so difficult about praying for rain?" Monkey asked.
"I can turn rivers upside down, stir up the sea, move the stars and constellations about, kick the sky, churn up water in wells, breathe out mist and clouds, carry mountains, drive the moon along and summon wind and rain. They're all child's play.
Nothing to them!" When the officials heard this they sent two of their number straight to the prefectural offices to report, "Your Excellency, something very splendid indeed has happened." The marquis, who was burning incense and praying silently at the time, asked what it was when he heard that something splendid had happened.
"We were taking the notice to post at the entrance to the market," the officials replied, "when four monks came along who said that they have been sent by the Great Tang in the East to the Great Thunder Monastery in India to worship the Buddha and fetch the scriptures.
As soon as they Journey to the West read the notice they said they could bring timely rain, which is why we have come here to report." Refusing to take a sedan−chair, horse or large retinue, the marquis went on foot in his robes of office straight to the entrance to the market in order to invite the strangers with the utmost courtesy to pray for rain.
"His Excellency the marquis is here," it was suddenly announced, and everybody moved out of the way.
As soon as he saw the Tang Priest the marquis, who showed no fear of his hideous disciples, prostrated himself in the middle of the street and said, "I am Marquis Shangguan of Fengxian Prefecture, and I have bathed and perfumed myself in order to beg you teachers to pray for the rain that will save the people.
I implore you in your great mercy to give play to your divine powers and bring us deliverance." Returning his courtesies, Sanzang said, "This is no place to talk.
We will be able to act when we have gone to a monastery." "Please come with me to my humble palace," the marquis replied.
"We have a pure place there." Master and disciples then led the horse and carried the luggage straight to the palace, where they all exchanged greetings and the marquis ordered tea and a vegetarian meal.
When the food arrived a little later Pig ate for all he was worth like a hungry tiger, terrifying the waiters, who trembled as they kept coming and going with more and more soup and rice. They looked like the figures on one of those revolving lanterns, and they could just keep him supplied until he had eaten his fill. Only then did he stop.
When the meal was over the Tang Priest expressed his thanks then asked, "How long has the drought lasted here, Your Excellency?" To this the marquis replied, "This is a part of the great land of India, Fengxian Prefecture of which I am governor.
For three years on end we have suffered from drought: Grass does not grow, and the grain has all died.
Business is hard for rich and for poor; Nearly all of the families are weeping with grief.
Two thirds of the people have now died of starvation; The rest barely survive, like a candle flame in the wind.
I have issued a notice for worthies And am lucky you monks have come to our land.
If you bring the people a whole inch of rain A thousand in silver will be your reward." Journey to the West When Monkey heard this his face showed his pleasure as he chuckled, "Don't say that, don't say that.
If you promise us a reward of a thousand pieces of silver you won't get a single drop of rain.
But if you put it in terms of accumulating merit I'll provide you with plenty of rain." The marquis, a thoroughly upright and good man who cared deeply for his people, invited Monkey to take the seat of honour, then bowed to him and said, "Teacher, if you really can show us this great compassion this humble official will do nothing to offend against morality." "Please get up," said Monkey, "only look after my master well while I do the job." "How are you going to do it, brother?" asked Friar Sand.
" "You and Pig are to must come here and be my assistants outside while I summon a dragon to make rain," Monkey replied.
Pig and Friar Sand did as he bade them, and while the three of them went outside the marquis burned incense and prayed.
Sanzang sat there reciting sutras.
While Monkey recited the spell and said the magic words a dark cloud appeared to the East and slowly moved till it was in front of the hall: it was Ao Guang, the ancient dragon of the Eastern Sea.
Ao Guang then put away his cloud feet and turned himself into human form to go up to Monkey, bow low to him with full courtesy and ask, "What have you sent for this humble dragon to do, Great Sage?" "Please rise," Monkey replied.
"The only reason why I have troubled you to make this long journey is because there has been a drought in this prefecture of Fengxian for years on end.
I'd like to ask you if you couldn't send some rain." "I must inform you, Great Sage," the dragon replied, "that although I can make rain I can only act on the orders of Heaven.
I would never dare come here to make rain on my own authority without Heaven's instructions." "As our journey brought us this way I asked you specially to come here to make rain and save the people," said Monkey, "so why are you trying to get out of it?" "I'd never dare," the dragon king replied.
"I came because you summoned me with the magic words, Great Sage, and I'd never dare try to get out of it.
In the first place I haven't had an edict from Heaven, and secondly I haven't brought the magic rain−making generals with me. How could I, Great Sage?
If you wish to be a savior, you must let me go back to the sea to muster my forces while you go to the heavenly palace to obtain an imperial edict for a fall of rain and ask the officials in charge of water to release us dragons, so that I can make rain in the quantities ordered." Accepting the force of his argument, Brother Monkey had to let the old dragon go back to the sea.
He then told the Tang Priest what the dragon king had said.
"In that case you had better go and do that," the Tang Priest said.
"But don't be telling lies." Monkey then told Pig and Friar Sand to look after the master while he went up to the heavenly palace.
No sooner had the splendid Great Sage said he was going than he was out of sight.
"Where has Lord Sun gone?" the marquis asked, trembling with shock.
Journey to the West "He's gone up to Heaven on a cloud," replied Pig with a grin.
With great reverence the marquis then issued an urgent order that all the people in the big and little streets of the city, whether nobility, high officials, gentry, commoners, soldiers or civilians, were to worship dragon−king tablets and set out water urns with sprigs of willow in them in front of their gates. They were also to burn incense and pray to Heaven.
Once on his somersault cloud Monkey went straight to the Western Gate of Heaven, where the Heavenly King Lokapala soon appeared at the head of his heavenly soldiers and warriors to greet him and say, "Great Sage, have you fetched the scriptures yet?" "Quite soon now," Monkey replied.
"We've reached a frontier prefecture called Fengxian on the borders of India now.
It hasn't rained for three whole years there, and the people are suffering terribly. I want to pray for rain to save them.
I sent for the dragon king, but he told me that he couldn't do it on his own authority without a heavenly order, which is why I've come to see the Jade Emperor to request an edict." "I don't think it's supposed to rain there," the heavenly king said.
"I heard just now that the marquis of Fengxian had behaved disgracefully and offended both Heaven and Earth. His Majesty took it badly and immediately had a rice mountain, a flour mountain and a huge gold lock set up. It won't rain till all three have been knocked over or snapped." Not understanding what all this was about, Monkey demanded to see the Jade Emperor, and, not daring to stop him, the heavenly king let him in.
Going straight to the Hall of Universal Brightness, Brother Monkey was met by the four heavenly teachers, who asked, "What are you here for, Great Sage?" "On my journey escorting the Tang Priest I've reached Fengxian Prefecture on the frontiers of India, where there is a drought," Monkey replied.
"The marquis there has been asking for magicians to pray for rain. I sent for the dragon king to order him to make rain, but he said that he could not do so on his own authority without an edict from the Jade Emperor.
I have now come to request an edict in order to relieve the people's suffering." "But it's not supposed to rain there," said the four heavenly teachers.
"As to whether it's supposed to rain or not," said Monkey with a smile, "could I trouble you to take me in to submit a memorial so that I can find out whether I can still get a favour done?" To this the heavenly teacher Ge Xianweng replied, "As the saying goes, 'a fly that needs a net for a veil−−what a nerve!'" "Don't talk nonsense," said Xu of Jingyang.
"Just take him in." Qiu Hongji, Zhang Daoling, Ge and Xu took Monkey to the outside of the Hall of Miraculous Mist, where they reported, "Your Majesty, Sun Wukong has reached Fengxian Prefecture in India and wants to obtain rain.
He has come to ask for an edict." "Three years ago," the Jade Emperor replied, "on the twenty−fifth day of the twelfth month, when we were inspecting the myriad heavens and travelling through the three worlds, we arrived at his city.
We saw that Shangguan was most wicked; he knocked over the vegetarian offerings to heaven to feed to dogs, spoke foully, and was guilty of lese−majeste. That is why we set up those three things in the Hall of Fragrance. Take Sun Wukong to see them.
When those three things have been accomplished we will issue our edict; but if they are not, then do not meddle in what does not concern you." Journey to the West When the four heavenly teachers led Brother Monkey to the Hall of Fragrance he saw a mountain of rice about a hundred feet high and a mountain of flour about two hundred feet high.
Beside the rice mountain was a chicken the size of a fist eating the rice, sometimes with quick pecks, sometimes with slow ones.
Beside the flour mountain was a golden−haired Pekinese licking the flour, sometimes with long licks and sometimes with short ones.
To the left of it a golden padlock about one foot three or four inches long hung from an iron frame. The crossbar of the lock was about the thickness of a finger, and under it was a lamp, the flame of which was heating the bar.
Not understanding what all this was about, Monkey turned back to ask the heavenly teachers, "What does it mean?" "When that wretch offended Heaven the Jade Emperor had these three things set up," the heavenly teachers replied.
"That place will only be due for rain when the chicken has eaten all the rice, the dog has licked up all the flour, and the lamp has melted the bar of the lock." When Monkey heard this he went pale with shock, and he dared make no more memorials to the throne.
He left the palace hall overcome with embarrassment.
"Don't take it so badly, Great Sage," said the four heavenly teachers with smiles. "This is something that can be resolved through goodness.
Once a single kind thought moves Heaven the rice and flour mountains will collapse and the bar of the padlock will be broken.
If you can persuade the marquis to return to goodness then blessings will come of themselves." Monkey accepted their advice, and instead of going back to the Hall of Miraculous Mist to take his leave of the Jade Emperor he headed straight down to the lower world and its ordinary mortals.
Within an instant he was at the Western Gate of Heaven, where he saw Heavenly King Lokapala again, who asked, "Did you get the decree you wanted?" Monkey told him about the rice and flour mountains and the metal lock. "What you said to me was quire right," he continued. "The Jade Emperor refuses to issue a decree.
Just now the heavenly teachers told me as they saw me off that the secret of blessings lay in persuading that so−and−so to return to goodness." With that Monkey took his leave and went down to the lower world on his cloud.
When the marquis, Sanzang, Pig, Friar Sand and the officials high and low all welcomed him back they crowded round him asking questions.
Monkey then shouted at the marquis, "It's all because on the twenty−fifth day of the twelfth month three years ago you offended Heaven and Earth that the people are suffering, you wretch.
That's why rain won't be sent now." At this the marquis was so alarmed that he fell to his knees, prostrated himself on the ground and asked, "How do you know about what happened three years ago, teacher?" "Why did you knock the vegetarian offerings to Heaven over to feed to dogs?" said Monkey, "You'd better tell me the truth." Not daring to conceal anything, the marquis said, "On the twenty−fifth of the twelfth month three years ago I was making offerings to Heaven within the palace. As my wife was wicked we quarreled and said bad things to each other. In an unthinking outburst of fury I knocked over the table with the offerings and scattered the vegetarian food. It's true that I called the dogs to eat it up. I never realized that Heaven would take offence at this and harm the common people.
For the last couple of years it has been preying on my mind. My thoughts have been disturbed, and I haven't been able to understand why.
I never realized that it was because Heaven had taken offence that it was inflicting this disaster on the common people.
Now that you have come down to visit us, teacher, I beg you to enlighten me on what the upper world intends to do." Journey to the West "That happened to be a day on which the Jade Emperor was visiting the lower world," Monkey replied.
"When he saw you feed the vegetarian food to the dogs and heard your foul language the Jade Emperor set three things up to remember you by." "What three things, brother?" Pig asked.
"In the Hall of Fragrance he had set up a rice mountain about a hundred feet high and a flour mountain about two hundred feet high.
Beside the rice mountain is a chicken the size of a fist who's eating it with quick pecks and slow pecks.
Beside the flour mountain is a golden−haired Pekinese licking the flour up with long licks and short licks.
And to the left is an iron frame from which hangs a golden padlock with a crossbar the thickness of a finger under which a lamp is burning and warming the bar.
You will only be due for rain here when−the chicken's eaten all the rice, the dog's licked up all the flour and the lamp has melted the bar of the lock." "No problem," said Pig, "no problem.
If you take me with you, brother, I can do a transformation, eat all the rice and flour up in one sitting and snap the bar of the lock.
I can guarantee rain." "Don't talk nonsense, you idiot," said Monkey.
"This is a plan that's been made by Heaven. You'll never be able to get there." "From what you say I don't know what to do," said Sanzang.
"It's easy," said Monkey, "easy.
As I was leaving the four heavenly teachers said to me that this could only be solved through goodness." The marquis then prostrated himself on the ground again and said imploringly, "I will do just as you tell me, teacher." "If your heart can turn back to goodness," Monkey replied, "I hope that you'll at once start invoking the Buddha and reciting scriptures. Then I'll be able to help you.
If you persist in refusing to reform there'll be nothing I can do to get you off. It won't be long before Heaven executes you, and your life will be beyond saving." The marquis kowtowed in worship, swearing to return to the faith.
At once he summoned all the Buddhist and Taoist clergy in the city and ordered that a site be prepared for religious ceremonies. They were all to write out documents and memorials for three days.
The marquis led his followers in burning incense and worshipping, thanking Heaven and Earth and repenting of his sins.
Sanzang recited surras on his behalf.
At the same time urgent notices were sent out ordering all the men and women, young and old, in all the households inside and outside the city to burn incense sticks and invoke the Buddha.
From that moment on all ears were filled with virtuous sounds. Only then did Brother Monkey feel happy.
"You two look after the master," he said to Pig and Friar Sand, "while I go off for him again." "Where are you going this time, brother?" Pig asked.
"The marquis really believed what I told him and is being reverent, good and kind," Monkey replied, "and he's sincerely invoking the Buddha's name.
So I'm going back to submit another request for rain to the Jade Emperor." "If you're going, don't lose any time, brother," said Friar Sand.
"This is holding us up on our journey. But do get a fall of rain:
it'll be another true achievement for us." Journey to the West The splendid Great Sage set his cloud off once more and went straight to the gate of Heaven, where he met Heavenly King Lokapala again.
"What have you come for now?" Lokapala asked.
"The marquis has mended his ways," Monkey replied, which pleased the Heavenly King.
As they were talking the Straight Spell Messenger arrived at the gate of Heaven to deliver letters and documents written by Taoist and Buddhist clergy.
When he saw Monkey the messenger bowed and said, "This is all the result of your successful conversion, Great Sage." "Where are you taking those letters?" Monkey asked.
"Straight to the Hall of Universal Brightness," the messenger replied, "to give to the heavenly teachers to pass on to the Great Heavenly Honoured One, the Jade Emperor." "In that case you'd better go first and I'll follow," Monkey said.
The messenger then went in through the heavenly gate.
"Great Sage," said Heavenly King Lokapala, "there's no need for you to go to see the Jade Emperor.
You should go to borrow some thunder gods from the Office of Response to the Primary in the Ninth Heaven, then set off thunder and lightning. After that there'll certainly be rain." Monkey accepted this suggestion and went in through the gate of Heaven.
Instead of going to the Hall of Miraculous Mist to ask for an edict he at once turned his cloud−treading steps towards the Office of Response to the Primary in the Ninth Heaven, where the Envoy of the Thunder Gate, the Corrector of Records and the Inspector of Probity appeared to bow and say, "Why are you here, Great Sage?" "There's something I'd like to see the Heavenly Honoured One about," Monkey replied, and the three envoys passed this on in a memorial to the Heavenly Honoured One, who then came down from behind his screen of red clouds and nine phoenixes in full court dress.
When they had exchanged greetings Monkey said, "There is something I would like to request of you." "What might that be?" the Heavenly Honoured One asked.
"While escorting the Tang Monk I have reached the prefecture of Fengxian," said Brother Monkey, "and as they have long been suffering from drought there I promised to make it rain for them.
The reason I have come here is to ask for the loan of some of your subordinate officials and generals in order to ask for rain." "I am aware that three things have been set up because the marquis there offended Heaven," the Heavenly Honoured One replied, "but I have not yet heard that rain is due to fall there." "When I went to ask the Jade Emperor for an edict yesterday," Monkey replied with a smile, "he told the heavenly teachers to take me to see the three things in the Hall of Fragrance:
the mountain of rice, the mountain of flour and the golden lock. Rain isn't due to fall till these three things have been knocked down or broken.
When I was feeling very upset because it was so difficult the heavenly teachers advised me to persuade the marquis and his people to do good deeds because Heaven is bound to help anyone who has a good thought.
So there's a good chance of persuading Heaven to change its mind and delivering them from this disaster.
Now good thoughts are happening everywhere, and all ears are filled with good sounds.
Not long ago the Straight Spell Messenger took letters showing that they had mended their ways and turned towards goodness to the Jade Emperor, which is why I've come to your illustrious palace to ask for the help of your Journey to the West thunder officials and thunder generals." "In that case," the Heavenly Honoured One replied, "I'll send Deng, Xin, Zhang and Tao to take Mother Lightning and go with you to Fengxian Prefecture to make thunder, Great Sage." Before long the four generals and the Great Sage had reached the boundaries of Fengxian and started performing their magic in mid air.
A great ramble of thunder could be heard, and there were sizzling flashes of lightning.
Indeed: The lightning was like snakes of purple gold; The thunder was like the noise of sleeping insects awakened.
Flashes of light like flying fire, Thunderclaps like landslides in the mountains.
The jagged lines lit up the whole of the sky; The great noise caused the earth itself to move.
When the red silk flashed like sprouts of plants Rivers and mountains shook for three thousand miles.
Inside and outside the city of Fengxian nobody, whether an official high or how, a soldier or a civilian had heard thunder or seen lightning for three whole years; and now that the thunder was booming and the lightning flashing they all fell to their knees, put incense burners on their heads, held sprigs of willow in their hands and said, "We submit to Amitabha Buddha. We submit to Amitabha Buddha." These good thoughts had indeed moved Heaven, as is proved by an old−style poem:
When thoughts have been born in human minds Heaven and earth will both be aware.
If evil and good do not get their due Sides have been taken by powers up there.
We will for the moment leave the Great Sage Monkey directing the thunder generals as they unleashed thunder and lightning over Fengxian Prefecture, where everyone had turned back to goodness, and tell how the Straight Spell Messenger took the Taoist and Buddhist documents straight to the Hall of Universal Brightness, where the four heavenly teachers submitted them to the Jade Emperor in the Hall of Miraculous Journey to the West Mist.
When the Jade Emperor had seen them he said, "As that wretch has had some virtuous thoughts, see what has happened to the three things." Just as he was speaking the official in charge of the Hall of Fragrance came in to report, "The rice and flour mountains have collapsed:
the rice and flour all disappeared in an instant.
The bar of the lock has also been broken." Before he could finish submitting this memorial the heavenly official in attendance led in the local deity, the city god and the gods of the altars from Fengxian, who all bowed and reported, "The lord of our prefecture and every member of every household, high and low, of the people have been converted to the true achievement and are worshipping the Buddha and Heaven.
We now beg you in your compassion to send a widespread fall of timely rain to deliver the common people." When the Jade Emperor heard this he was very pleased, so he issued an edict:
"Let the departments of wind, cloud and rain go to the lower world in accordance with orders. At this hour on this day the clouds are to be spread, the thunder shall roar, and three feet and forty−two drops of rain shall fall." At once the four heavenly teachers transmitted the edict to the weather departments, who were all to go to the lower world, show their powers and act together.
Monkey was enjoying himself up in the sky with Deng, Xin, Zhang and Tao, who were ordering Mother Lightning about, when the arrival of all other gods filled the sky with their assembly.
As the wind and the clouds met, the timely rain began to pour down.
Thick, heavy clouds, Lowering black mists, The rumbling of the thunder cart, The searing flash of lightning, A roaring gale, A torrential downpour.
Indeed, when one thought goes up to Heaven Ten thousand hopes are all fulfilled.
Because the Great Sage has used his powers The landscape is darkened for thousands of miles.
The wonderful rain falls like rivers and seas, Hiding the country and heavens from sight.
Water comes pouring down the eaves, Journey to the West Noisily pounding outside the windows.
While every household invokes the Buddha All of the streets and markets are flooded.
To East and West every channel is filled; Winding streams meander to North and to South.
Dried−up shoots receive moisture, Withered trees revive.
The hemp and wheat now flourish in the fields; Beans and other grains grow in the countryside.
Traders happily travel to sell their wares; Cheerful peasants get ready to work.
After this the millet will do well, And the crops are bound to yield a bumper harvest.
When wind and rain are timely the people know content; When rivers and seas are calm the world is at peace.
That day three feet and forty−two drops of rain fell, after which all the gods began to tidy up and go away.
"Gods of the four departments," yelled the Great Sage at the top of his voice, "stay there for a moment with your cloud followers while I tell the marquis to bow to you all and express his thanks.
You may part the clouds and appear in your true forms to let this mortal see you with his own eyes.
That's the only way he'll believe and make offerings." When the gods heard this they all stayed where they were up in the clouds.
Monkey then brought his cloud down to land and went straight into the prefectural palace, where Sanzang, Pig and Friar Sand all greeted him.
The marquis kowtowed to him in thanks at every pace he took.
"Stop thanking me," said Monkey.
"I've asked the gods of the four departments to stay. Could you tell everyone to come here to kowtow and thank them so that they'll make it rain properly in future?" The marquis issued urgent orders summoning everyone to give thanks, and they all kowtowed with incense−sticks in their hands.
The gods of the four departments−−rain, thunder, cloud and wind−−then parted the clouds and revealed themselves in their true form.
The dragon king appeared, Journey to the West The thunder generals were revealed, The clouds boys were seen, The lords of the wind came down.
The dragon king appeared: With silver whiskers and an azure face he was really peerless.
The thunder generals were revealed With their countenances of matchless might and crooked mouths.
The cloud boys were seen Wearing gold crowns over faces like jade.
The lords of the wind came down With flustered brows and bulging eyes.
All were displayed on the azure clouds Drawn up in ranks with their holy countenances.
Only then were the people of Fengxian convinced As they kowtowed, burned incense and rejected evil.
Today they gazed up at the heavenly generals, Washing their hearts as they all turned to goodness.
The gods stood there for two hours as the people kowtowed to them endlessly.
Monkey rose up into the clouds again to bow to all the gods and say, "I've put you to great trouble. All you gentlemen may now return.
I'll make everyone in this prefecture give pure and lofty offerings to thank you at the due season.
From now on you gentlemen must send wind every five days and rain every ten days to help them out." The gods all consented as he told them and returned to their own departments.
Bringing his cloud down to land, Monkey said to Sanzang, "Now that the job's been done and the people given peace we can pack our things and be on our way again." When the marquis heard this he hastened to bow and say, "How can you say such a thing, Lord Sun?
What has happened today has been an infinitely great act of kindness.
I have sent people to prepare a humble banquet to thank you for your great kindness.
Then I will buy some land from the people to build a monastery for you, my lords, with a shrine to you with inscribed tablets where offerings can be made in all four seasons.
Even if I were to carve my own bones and heart it would be hard to repay a ten thousandth part of what I owe you.
You can't possibly leave." Journey to the West "What Your Excellency says is very fine," Sanzang replied, "but we are pilgrim monks who can only put up for the night on our journey West. We cannot stay here long.
We definitely must leave in a day or two." The marquis refused to let them go, and he ordered many people to prepare a banquet and start building a monastery that very night.
The next day there was a magnificent banquet at which the Tang Priest took the place of honour while the Great Sage Monkey sat beside him with Pig and Friar Sand.
The marquis and his officials high and low passed them cups of wine and dishes of food while fine music was played, and so they were entertained all day.
It was a most happy occasion, and there is a poem to prove it: After long drought the fields received sweet rain; Merchants were travelling along all watercourses.
They were deeply moved by the monks who had come to the city, And by the Great Sage who had gone up to Heaven.
The three things had now been accomplished; One thought had brought all back to the good.
From now on all longed for a new golden age With ideal weather and good harvests for ever.
The banquets went on for days, as did the giving of thanks, until they had been kept there for almost half a month. All that remained to do was complete the monastery and the shrine.
One day the marquis invited the four monks to go to inspect them.
"How did you complete so enormous a project so quickly?" asked the Tang Priest in astonishment.
"I pressed the laborers to work night and day without stopping and insisted most urgently that they finish quickly," the marquis replied.
"Now I would like you gentlemen to come and inspect it." "You certainly are a most good and able marquis," said Monkey with a smile.
By now they had all reached the new monastery, where they were full of admiration for the towering halls and the majestic entrance.
Monkey asked Sanzang to name the monastery.
"Very well," Sanzang said, "I name it the Monastery of Salvation by Timely Rain." "Splendid," said the marquis, "splendid." He then issued a golden invitation to monks from far and wide to come to burn incense there.
To the left of the Buddha hall was a shrine to the four pilgrims at which offerings were to be made in each of the four seasons every year.
Temples had also been built for the thunder gods and dragon gods to thank them for their divine efforts.
When the visit was over Sanzang ordered an early departure.
Journey to the West When the local people realized that the monks could be persuaded to stay no longer they all prepared parting gifts, none of which the travelers would accept.
Then all the officials in the prefecture escorted them on their way for ten miles with a band playing and a great display of flags and canopies. Still loath to let the travelers go, the officials watched with tears in their eyes till they had disappeared from sight. Only then did the officials return to the city. Indeed:
The virtuous and holy monk left behind the Salvation Monastery; The Great Sage Equaling Heaven dispensed great kindness.
If you don't know how many more days after this departure it was that they finally saw the Tathagata Buddha, listen to the explanation in the next installment.
When the Dhyana Reaches Yuhua a Display of Magic Is Given The Mind−Ape and the Mother of Wood Take Their Own Disciples The story tells how after happily taking their leave of the marquis the Tang Priest turned to Monkey as he rode and said, "Worthy disciple, this good result was even better than rescuing the babies in Bhiksuland, and it was all your achievement." "In Bhiksuland you only saved 1,111 little boys," said Friar Sand.
"That's no comparison with this heavy, soaking rain that's saved tens of thousands of lives.
I've been quietly admiring my big brother's magical powers that extend right up to the heavens, as well as his mercy that covers the whole earth." "Merciful and good our big brother may be," said Pig with a laugh, "but it's just a show of being kind. Inside he's a troublemaker.
When he's with me he treats me like dirt." "When have I ever treated you like dirt?" Monkey protested.
"Often enough," replied Pig.
"You're always seeing to it that I get tied up, hung up, boiled and steamed.
After being so kind to all those tens of thousands of people in Fengxian you should have stayed there for half a year and let me have a few more good filling meals.
Why did you have to be sending us on our way?" When the venerable elder heard this he shouted, "You idiot! Can you think of nothing but your greed?
Stop quarrelling and be on your way." Daring say no more, Pig thrust out his snout, shouldered the luggage, and followed the master and his fellow disciples along the road, laughing loudly.
Time moved as fast as a shuttle, and soon it was late autumn. What could be seen was, The end of ripples on the waters, The mountains' bones looking lean.
Journey to the West Red leaves fly around, In the time of yellowing flowers.
Under the clear and frosty sky the nights seem longer; The moon shines white through the windows.
Many the household fires in the evening light; The water gleams cold all over the lake.
The clover fern is now white, While knotweed blooms red.
Mandarins are green and oranges yellow; Willows are withering and the millet is ripe.
Beside the desolate village wild geese land among the reeds; Cocks call by the country inn while the beans are harvested.
When the four of them had been travelling for a long time they saw the towering shape of a city wall.
"Wukong," said Sanzang, waving his riding−crop, "you can see there's another city there.
I wonder where it is." "Neither of us have ever been here before," Monkey replied, "so how could I know?
Let's go ahead and ask." Before the words were out of his mouth an old man appeared from among some trees. He was leaning on a stick, lightly dressed with coconut sandals on his feet and had a sash round his waist.
The Tang Priest hastily dismounted and went over to greet the old man.
Returning his greeting as he leaned on his stick, the old man asked, "Where are you from, reverend sir?" "I am a poor monk sent by the Tang court in the East to worship the Buddha in the Thunder Monastery and fetch the scriptures," the Tang Priest replied, putting his hands together in front of his chest.
"Now that I have come to this distinguished place I wonder which city it is that I can see in the distance, and I would ask you, venerable benefactor, to inform me." When the old man heard this he replied, "Enlightened master of the dhyana, this humble place of ours is Yuhua County in one of the prefectures of India.
The lord of our city is a member of the king of India's royal family who has been made prince of Yuhua.
He is a very worthy prince who respects both Buddhist and Taoist clergy and cares deeply for the common people.
If you go to see him he will certainly treat you with great respect." Sanzang thanked the old man, who went off through the woods.
Sanzang then turned back to tell his disciples what had happened.
The three of them were happily going to help the master back on his horse when Sanzang said, "It's not far.
There is no need to ride." The four of them Journey to the West then walked to a street beside the city wall to take a look.
This was an area where traders lived; it was crowded with people and business was good.
The people looked and sounded no different from those of China.
"Be careful, disciples," said Sanzang.
"On no account must you act wild." At that Pig bowed his head and Friar Sand covered his face, leaving only Monkey to support the master.
On both sides of the road people were crowding in to look at them, shouting, "We only have eminent monks who subdue dragons and tigers here. We've never seen monks who subdue pigs and monkeys before." This was more than Pig could stand.
Thrusting his snout at them he said, "Have you ever seen a monk in all your life who subdued the king of the pigs?" This gave all the people in the street so bad a fright that they fell back on both sides of them stumbling and tripping over, trying to get away.
"Put that snout away at once, you idiot," said Monkey with a grin, "and don't try to make yourself look pretty.
Just pay attention while you're crossing the bridge." The idiot lowered his head and kept grinning.
Once over the drawbridge they entered the city, where the main roads were bustling and prosperous with bars and houses of entertainment.
It was indeed a city in a divine region, and there is a poem to prove it that goes, An eternally iron−strong city like splendid brocade, Full of fresh color, lying next to a river near mountains, Connected by boat with lakes for the movement of goods. A thousand wine−shops await behind curtains.
Everywhere smoke rises from towering buildings; Each morning the lanes are filled with the hubbub of traders.
The look of the city was much like Chang'an: Cock−crows and the barking of dogs were all just the same.
"I have heard tell of the foreigners in the West," Sanzang thought with secret delight, "but I have never come here before.
On close examination it is no different from our Great Tang.
This must be what is meant by paradise." When he learned that a bushel of hulled rice cost only four tenths of an ounce of silver and a pound of sesame oil only eight thousandths of an ounce of silver he realized that this truly was a place where crops grew in abundance.
After walking for quite a long time they reached the prince of Yuhua's palace.
On either side of the palace gates were the office of the remembrancer, the law courts, the prince's kitchens and the government hostel.
"Disciples," said Sanzang, "here is the palace.
Wait while I go inside for the prince to inspect our passport and let us on our way." "We can't very well stand at the gates while you go in, Master," said Pig.
Journey to the West "Can you not see 'Government Hostel' written over that gateway?" Sanzang asked.
"Go and sit there and see if you can buy some fodder for the horse.
If the prince offers me a meal when I have my audience with him I will send for you to share it." "Go on in, Master, and don't worry," said Brother Monkey.
"I can cope." Friar Sand carried the luggage into the hostel, where the staff were so alarmed by their hideous faces that they did not dare ask them any questions or send them away but could only invite them to sit down.
Meanwhile the master changed his habit and hat and went straight into the prince's palace with the passport in his hands.
Soon he was met by a protocol officer who asked, "Where are you from, reverend sir?" "I am a monk sent by the Great Tang in the East to worship the Lord Buddha and fetch the scriptures in the Great Thunder Monastery," Sanzang replied.
"Now that I have reached this distinguished place I would like to have my passport inspected and returned, which is why I have come to seek an audience with His Royal Highness." The protocol officer passed this on, and as the prince was indeed an enlightened one he sent for Sanzang at once.
Sanzang bowed in greeting before the prince's hall, and the prince invited him into the hall to sit down.
When the prince read the passport that Sanzang handed him and saw the seals and signatures from so many countries on it he signed it himself, folded it up and put it on his table.
"Venerable Teacher of the Nation," he said, "you have passed through many countries on your way here from Great Tang.
How long has your journey taken?" "I have kept no record of the distance," Sanzang said, "but some years ago the Boddhisattva Guanyin appeared to me and left an address in verse in which it was said that the road would be sixty thousand miles long.
I have already seen fourteen winters and summers on my journey." "That means fourteen years," the prince replied.
"I should imagine that there were many delays along the way." "It would be hard to tell of them all," said Sanzang.
"There were thousands of monsters and I don't know how much suffering to be endured before I could reach here." The prince was so pleased with his visitor that he ordered his kitchens to prepare a vegetarian meal for him.
"I wish to inform Your Royal Highness that I have three disciples," Sanzang said. "As they are waiting outside I will not be able to delay our journey by accepting the meal." The prince then ordered his aides to go straight out to invite the venerable elder's three disciples into the palace to share the meal.
When the aides went out with this invitation they said, "We can't see them, we can't see them." "There are three hideous monks sitting in the hostel," one of their staff said.
"Must be them." The aides and their staff then went to the hostel, where they asked the people in charge, "Which are the disciples of the monk from Great Tang who's going to fetch the scriptures?
His Royal Highness has invited them to a meal." As soon as Pig, who was sitting there snoozing, heard the word "meal" he could not help jumping up and saying, "We are, we are," at the sight of which the palace aides' souls flew from their bodies as they shivered and said, "A pig demon!
A pig demon!" When Monkey heard this he seized hold of Pig and said, "Act a bit more civilized, brother, and don't be so wild." When the officials saw Monkey they all said, "A monkey spirit!
A monkey spirit!" Journey to the West "There's no need to be frightened," said Friar Sand, raising his hands together in polite greeting.
"We're all disciples of the Tang Priest." "A stove god, a stove god," was the officials' reaction to the sight of him.
Monkey then told Pig to lead the horse and Friar Sand to shoulder the carrying−pole as they followed the officials' staff into the prince of Yuhua's palace.
The aides went ahead to announce them.
When the prince looked up and saw how ugly they were he too was frightened. "Do not be alarmed, Your Royal Highness," said Sanzang, putting his hands together in front of his chest.
"Although my rough disciples are ugly they have good hearts." Pig intoned a noise of respect and said, "How do you do?" This made the prince feel even more alarmed.
"All my rough disciples are from the wilds and the mountains and they do not know how to behave," Sanzang explained, "so please forgive them." Overcoming his fear, the prince told the superintendent of his kitchens to take the monks to eat in the Gauze Pavilion.
Sanzang thanked the prince, came down from the hall to proceed to the pavilion with his disciples, then grumbled at Pig, "You idiot," he said, "you've not a shred of manners.
If you had kept your mouth shut that would have been fine, but why did you have to be so coarse?
That one remark from you was enough to knock a mountain over." "I did better by not making a respectful chant," said Monkey, "and I saved a bit of my breath too." "You didn't even intone the chant properly," said Friar Sand to Pig.
"First of all, you stuck your snout out and roared." "It makes me hopping mad," said Pig.
"The other day the master told me that the polite thing when I met someone was to say, 'How do you do?' I do it today and you tell me it's wrong.
How do you want me to behave?" "I told you to say, 'How do you do?' when you meet people," Sanzang replied, "but not to make such a fool of yourself when you meet a prince.
As the saying goes, things, like people, come in grades.
Why can't you see the differences of social rank?" While he was still making these remarks the superintendent of the kitchens led servants in to set out tables and chairs and serve the vegetarian feast.
Then the monks stopped talking and started eating their meal.
When the prince withdrew from the palace hall to his living quarters his three sons noticed his pallor and asked, "What has given you such a fright today, Father?" "A most remarkable monk has arrived," the prince replied.
"He has been sent by the Great Tang in the East to worship the Buddha and fetch the scriptures, and he came to present his passport.
When I invited him to take a meal he told me that he had some disciples outside the palace, so I asked them in.
When they came in a moment later they didn't kowtow to me but just said, 'How do you do?' That was upsetting enough.
Then when I looked at them I saw that they were all as ugly as demons, which gave me quite a shock.
That's why I'm looking pale." Now the three young princes were no ordinary boys. They were all fond of the martial arts, so they stretched out their hands, rolled up their sleeves and said, "They must be evil spirits from the mountains disguised as Journey to the West humans.
Wait while we fetch our weapons and take a look at them." Splendid young princes! The eldest wielded a brow−high rod, the second a nine−toothed rake and the third a black−painted cudgel, and the three of them strode with great valour and spirit out of the palace, shouting, "What's this about monks fetching scriptures?
Where are they?" "Young prince," replied the superintendent of the kitchens and the others on their knees, "they're eating in the Gauze Pavilion." The young princes then charged straight in without stopping to think as they shouted, "Are you men or monsters?
Tell us at once and we'll spare your lives." This gave Sanzang such a fright that he turned pale, dropped his bowl, bowed to them and replied, "I have come from Great Tang to fetch the scriptures.
I am a man, not a monster." "You look human enough," the princes said, "but the three ugly ones are definitely monsters." Pig kept eating and ignored them, while Friar Sand and Monkey bowed and said, "We're all human.
Our faces may be ugly but our hearts are good, and despite our clumsy bodies we have good natures.
Where are you three from, and why are you shooting your mouths off so wildly?" "These three gentlemen are His Royal Highness's sons," explained the superintendent of the kitchens and the others who were standing at the side of the pavilion.
"Well, Your Highnesses," said Pig, throwing down his bowl, "what are you carrying those weapons for?
Do you want a fight with us?" The second prince strode forward wielding his rake in both hands to strike at Pig, which made him say with a chuckle, "That rake of yours is only fit to be the grandson of my one." With that he stripped down, pulled his own rake out from his belt and swung it, making ten thousand beams of golden light, then went through some movements, leaving a thousand strands of auspicious vapor.
The second prince was so terrified that his hands went weak and his muscles turned numb and he lost the nerve for any more showing off.
When Monkey saw that the oldest of the young princes was leaping about with a brow−high rod he brought his own gold−banded cudgel out from his ear and shook it to make it as thick as a bowl and twelve or thirteen feet long.
Ramming it into the ground, he made a hole about three feet deep in which it stood upright, then said with a smile, "I'm giving you this cudgel." As soon as the prince heard this he threw his own rod down and went to take the cudgel, but though he pulled at it with all his strength he couldn't move it by as much as a hair's breath.
Then he straightened himself up and shook it, but it was as if it had taken root.
At this the third prince started acting wild, moving into the attack with his black−painted cudgel.
Friar Sand dodged the blow, then brought out his own demon−quelling staff, and as he fingered it brilliant light and glowing, coloured clouds came from it, leaving the superintendent of the kitchens and the rest of them wide−eyed and speechless.
The three young princes then kowtowed, saying, "Divine teachers, divine teachers, we mere mortals failed to recognize you.
We beg you to give us a display of your powers." Monkey went up to them, effortlessly picked up his cudgel and said, "It's too cramped here for me to do my stuff.
I'm jumping up into the auto play around and give you something to see." Journey to the West The splendid Great Sage went whistling up by somersault and stood on an auspicious cloud of many colours up in mid−air about three hundred feet above the ground.
Then he moved up and down and spun to left and right as he performed a Canopy from Which Flowers Are Scattered and a Twisting Dragon with his gold−banded club. At first both he and the cudgel moved like flowers being added to brocade, but later he could no longer be seen as the whole sky was filled with the whirling cudgel.
As he roared his approval from down below Pig could not keep still, and with a great shout of "I'm going to have a bit of fun too!" the splendid idiot rode a breeze up into the air and started swinging his rake.
He went three times up, four times down, five times to the left, six times to the right, seven times forwards and eight times backwards as he ran through all the movements he knew, filling the air with a noise like a howling gale.
Just when he had warmed up Friar Sand said to Sanzang, "Master, let me go up and give a show too." Springing up into the air with both feet, the splendid monk whirled his club through the air, which glittered with golden light.
Wielding his demon−subduing cudgel he performed a Red Phoenix Facing the Sun and a Hungry Tiger Seizing Its Prey, attacking hard and defending with time to spare as he turned for a sudden forward thrust.
The three brother disciples all gave a most imposing display of their magical powers.
This was indeed An image of the dhyana, no common sight; The causation of the Great Way filling all of space.
Metal and wood fill the dharma−world with their might; A pinch of elixir produces perfect unity.
The quality of these magic warriors is often displayed; The splendor of their weapons is widely revered.
Lofty though India is, The princes of Yuhua now return to the central truth.
This all so terrified the three young princes that they fell to their knees in the dust; and all the staff in the Gauze Pavilion, high and low, together with the senior prince in his palace, all the soldiers, civilians, men and women, Buddhist monks and nuns, Taoist clergy, lay people−−everyone in fact−−all invoked the Buddha, kowtowed, held sticks of incense and worshipped.
Indeed: All the monks were converted at the sight of the true images, Bringing blessings to mankind and the joys of peace.
From here the achievement was won on the road to enlightenment; Journey to the West All joined in meditation and worshipped the Buddha.
When the three of them had given a display of their heroic powers they brought their auspicious clouds down to land, put their weapons away, joined their hands together in homage to the Tang Priest, thanked him and took their seats again.
The three young princes hurried back into the palace to report to their father, "A most wonderful thing has happened, Father. Today has been a tremendous success.
Did you see the performance in the sky just now?" "When I saw the coloured clouds glowing in the sky a little while back I, your mother and everyone else in the inner palace burned incense and worshipped," the prince, their father, replied.
"I don't know where the gods or immortals who had gathered there were from." "They weren't gods and immortals from somewhere else," the young princes said. "They were the three hideous disciples of the monk who's going to fetch the scriptures.
One of them uses a gold−banded iron cudgel, one a nine−toothed take, and one a demon−quelling staff, all exactly the same as our three weapons.
When we asked them to give us a display they said it was too cramped down here to be able to manage, so they'd go up into the sky to give us a show.
Then they all went up on clouds, filling the sky with auspicious clouds and vapors.
They only came down a moment ago, and they're now sitting in the Gauze Pavilion.
We are all very taken with them and we'd like to make them our teachers and learn their skills to protect the country with. This really will be an enormous achievement.
I wonder what Your Majesty thinks." When the prince, their father, heard this he was convinced and agreed.
Father and sons then went straight to the Gauze Pavilion, going on foot instead of by carriage, and without any parasols.
The four travelers had by now packed up their luggage and were just about to go to the palace to thank the prince for the meal and start out on their journey again when they saw the prince of Yuhua and his sons come into the pavilion and prostrate themselves before them.
The venerable elder hurriedly rose and prostrated himself to return the courtesy, while Monkey and the rest of them moved aside with a hint of a mocking grin.
When the kowtowing was over the four travelers were happy to go into the palace on being invited to do so and take seats of honour.
Then the senior prince got up and said, "Tang Master, there is one thing I would like to ask of you, but I do not know whether your three illustrious disciples will grant it." "My disciples will obey any instruction that Your Royal Highness gives them," Sanzang replied.
"When I first saw you gentlemen," said the prince, "I took you for pilgrim monks from distant Tang, and because I am a mere mortal with fleshly eyes I treated you in a most offhand way.
It was only when I saw Teacher Sun, Teacher Zhu and Teacher Sand whirling around in the sky that I realized you are immortals and Buddhas.
My three wretched sons have been fond of the martial arts all their lives and they now wish most sincerely to be accepted as your disciples and learn some of your skills.
I beg that in the greatness of your hearts you will agree to be the salvation of my boys.
I will certainly reward you with all the wealth of the city." When Brother Monkey heard this he could not restrain himself from replying with a chuckle, "You really don't understand, Your Royal Highness.
As monks we'd love to have disciples, and your fine sons have their hearts set on goodness. But you mustn't talk about material benefits.
As long as they can get on with us we'll Journey to the West look after them." This delighted the prince, who ordered a great banquet in the main hall of the palace.
It was amazing:
no sooner had he issued his order than everything was there.
This is what could be seen: Fluttering silken decorations, Darkly fragrant incense smoke.
Gold−inlaid tables hung with knotted silks, Dazzling the eyes; Lacquered chairs with cushions of brocade, Making them even more splendid.
Fresh fruit, Fragrant tea.
Three or four courses of pure confectioneries, One or two servings of rich and pure breadrolls.
The crisp steamed honeycakes were even finer; The deep−fried sweets were truly delicious.
There were jugs of mild rice−wine, Better than nectar when poured; Servings of Yangxian tea that is fit for immortals, More fragrant than cassia when held in the hands.
Every possible dish is provided; All that is offered is outstanding.
Meanwhile there was singing, dancing, instrumental music, acrobatics and opera to entertain them.
Master, disciples, the prince and his sons all had a day of delight, and after night fell unnoticed they dispersed.
The princes then had beds and curtains set up in the pavilion and invited their teachers to turn in for the night; early the next morning they would piously burn incense and call on them again to ask them to teach their martial skills.
These orders were obeyed, and hot, scented water was brought in for the travelers to bath in, after which everyone went to bed.
At that time Journey to the West The birds perched high in the trees and all was silent; The poet came down from his couch to end his chanting.
The light of the Milky Way now filled the sky, And the grass grew thicker along the overgrown path.
The bang of a washing stick came from another courtyard; The distant mountains and passes made one long for home.
The chirp of crickets expressed people's feelings, Chirruping at the bedside interrupted one's dreams.
That describes the night.
Early the next morning the prince and his three sons came to call on the venerable elder again.
The previous day they had greeted each other with the etiquette appropriate to a prince, but today's greetings were those appropriate to teachers.
The three young princes kowtowed to Monkey, Pig and Friar Sand, then asked with bows, "Will you let your disciples have a look at your weapons, honoured teachers?" As soon as Pig heard this request he happily brought out his iron rake and threw it on the ground, while Friar Sand tossed his staff against the wall.
The second and third young princes sprang to their feet to pick them up, but they might just as well have been dragonflies trying to shake a stone pillar: they both strained themselves till they were red in the face without moving the weapons in the slightest.
When their elder brother saw this he said, "Don't waste your efforts, brothers.
Our teachers' weapons are all magical ones.
Goodness only knows how heavy they are." "My rake's not all that heavy," said Pig with a smile.
"It only weighs a couple of tons−−5,048 pounds including the handle." The third prince then asked Friar Sand how heavy his staff was.
"It's 5,048 pounds too," replied Friar Sand with a smile.
The oldest of the young princes then asked Brother Monkey to let him see the gold−banded cudgel.
Monkey produced the needle from his ear, shook it in the wind to make it as thick as a rice bowl, and stood it upright in the ground in front of him, to the consternation and alarm of all the princes and officials.
The three young princes then kowtowed again and said, "Teacher Zhu and Teacher Sand carry their weapons under their clothes where they can get them out.
Why do you take yours out of your ear, Teacher Sun?
How do you make it grow in the wind?" "You wouldn't realize that this isn't some mere mortal object," Monkey replied.
"When chaos was first parted the iron was cast: Yu the Great had the work done himself.
Journey to the West When he unified the depths of rivers, lakes and seas This cudgel served as a measuring rod.
In the prosperity after mountains and seas had been ordered It floated to the gates of the Eastern Ocean.
Over the years it gave off a coloured glow, Learned to shrink and to grow and shine with pure light.
It was my destiny to recover this rod Which endlessly changes when I say the spell.
When I tell it to grow it fills the universe, But it can be as tiny as a needle's eye.
It's known as As−You−Will and called gold−banded; In Heaven and on Earth it is quite unique.
Its weight is thirteen thousand and five hundred pounds; Whether thick or fine it can bring life or death.
Once it helped me make havoc in Heaven, And took part when I attacked the Underworld.
It always succeeds in subduing dragons and tigers, Everywhere wipes out monsters and ogres.
If it points up the sun goes dark; Heaven, earth, gods, devils, all are afraid.
Passed on by magic since the birth of time, This is no ordinary piece of iron." When the young princes had heard this they all started kowtowing endlessly, bowing over and over again as they earnestly begged for instruction.
"Which fighting skills do the three of you want to learn?" Monkey asked.
Journey to the West "The one of us who uses a rod wants to learn that," the young princes replied, "the one who fights with a rake wants to learn the rake, and the staff man wants to learn the staff." "Teaching would be easy enough," replied Monkey with a smile, "except that you're all too weak to be able to use our weapons, so you won't be able to master them.
'A badly−drawn tiger only looks like a dog.' As they used to say in the old days, 'If the teaching isn't strict it shows the teacher is idle; if the student doesn't learn it's his own fault.' If you're really sincere you'd better burn incense and bow to Heaven and Earth.
I'll give you some magic strength before teaching you how to fight." The three young princes were very pleased to hear him say this, and they at once carried in an incense table themselves, washed their hands, lit incense sticks and bowed to Heaven.
This done, they asked their teachers to instruct them.
Monkey stepped down and said to the Tang Priest with a bow, "Please forgive your disciple, honoured Master.
Ever since in your goodness you rescued me at the Double Boundary Mountain and I became a Buddhist all those years ago we've been travelling West. Although I've never done very much to repay your kindness I have crossed plenty of rivers and mountains and done everything I possibly could.
Now that we've come to this land of the Buddha and had the good fortune of meeting these three young princes, they've taken us as their teachers of martial arts.
As our pupils they'd be your pupils' pupils, so I ask you respectfully, Master, to allow us to instruct them." Sanzang was delighted, and when Pig and Friar Sand saw Monkey bowing to him they kowtowed too and said, "Master, we're stupid and too awkward with words to be able to explain things properly.
Please take your dharma seat and let each of us take a pupil. It'll be fun, and something to remind us of our journey West." Sanzang was happy to agree.
Monkey then took the three young princes into a quiet room behind the pavilion where he drew a star−chart of the Dipper and told them to prostrate themselves inside it while they shut their eyes and settled their spirits.
Meanwhile he silently said the words of the spell, recited a mantra, and blew magic breath into the hearts of the three of them.
He put their primal spirits back into their original home, taught them magical spells, gave each of them immense strength, applied the right heat, and performed a magic that replaced their old bodies and bones with new ones.
After the heat circulated in a roundabout way through their bodies the three young princes came to, stood up, rubbed their faces, summoned up their spirits, and all found that they were much stronger. The eldest of them could pick up the gold−banded cudgel, the second could swing the nine−toothed rake, and the third could raise the demon−quelling staff.
When the king saw this he was beside himself with delight, and arranged another vegetarian feast for the Tang Priest and his three disciples. In front of the banquet each of the princes was taught his own skill:
the one who was learning the rod practised with the rod, the one who was learning the rake practised with the rake, and the one who was learning the staff practised with the staff.
Though the young princes did manage a few turns and movements it took a lot of effort, and going through a series of movements left them gasping for breath, so that they could not go on.
Besides this, the weapons they were using had the power of transformation, so that as the princes advanced, retreated, attacked and lifted the weapons shrunk, grew and went through amazing changes by themselves. But the princes were, after all, only mortals, and were unable to keep up with the speed of their weapons.
Later that day the banquet came to an end.
The next day the three princes came back once more to express their thanks and say, "We are very grateful to you, divine teachers, for giving us this strength, but when we try to spin your divine weapons around we can only move them with great difficulty.
We would like to get smiths to make lighter copies of them, but we don't know whether you would agree to that, Teachers." Journey to the West "Great, great," said Pig.
"That's the way to talk.
You ought to have your own made because you can't use our weapons, and anyhow we need them to protect the Dharma and beat monsters." The princes then sent for smiths who bought ten thousand pounds of iron and steel, set up a workshop with a furnace in the front courtyard of the prince's palace, and began to cast the weapons.
On the first day the steel was made, and on the second Monkey and the other two were asked to bring out their gold−banded cudgel, nine−toothed rake and demon−quelling staff and put them under the matting shelter to be copied.
The work went on by night and day without stopping.
These weapons were the treasures they always carried with them that they could not be parted from for a moment. Normally they hid them about their persons.
Now the weapons were protected by coloured light, so that when they were put in the yard of the workshop for several days many beams of radiance reached up to the heavens, while every kind of auspicious vapor blanketed the earth.
That night an evil spirit, who was sitting out on a night watch in a cave called Tigermouth Cave on a mountain called Mount Leopard Head that was only some twenty−five miles from the city, noticed the glow and the auspicious vapors. Going up on his cloud to investigate he saw that the light came from the city, whereupon he brought his cloud down and went closer for a better look. Discovering that the light was coming from the weapons, he thought with delight and desire, "What wonderful weapons, what splendid treasures.
I wonder whose they are and why they've been left here.
This must be my lucky chance.
I'll take them, I'll take them." His covetousness now moved, he created a mighty wind, scooped up all three weapons and took them back to his cave.
Indeed: Not for one moment must the Way be left; What can be left is not the true Way.
Cultivation and trance will both be in vain When divine arms have been taken away.
If you do not know how these weapons were found, listen to the explanation in the next installment.
The Tawny Lion Spirit Arranges a Rake Feast in Vain Metal, Wood and Earth Make Havoc on Mount Leopard Head The story tells how after days on end of hard work the smiths all went to sleep that night, only to get up at dawn to start again and find that the three weapons had disappeared from under the matting shelter.
Dumbfounded with horror, they started looking for them everywhere, and when the three young princes came out of the inner quarters to watch, the smiths all kowtowed to them and said, "Young masters, we don't know where the divine teachers' three weapons have all gone." When the young princes heard this news they trembled and said, "We expect our masters put them away last night." Rushing to the Gauze Pavilion, they found the white horse still tethered in the walkway and could not help shouting, "Teachers, are you still asleep?" Journey to the West "We're up," Friar Sand replied, and opened the door of their room to let the young princes in.
When they saw that the weapons were not there they asked with alarm, "Masters, have you put your weapons away?" "No," replied Monkey, springing up.
"The three weapons disappeared during the night," the princes explained.
"Is my rake still there?" Pig asked as he scrambled to his feet.
"When we came out a moment ago we saw everyone searching for them," the princes replied. "When they couldn't find them we wondered if you had put them away, which is why we came to ask.
As your treasures can shrink or grow we wonder if you've hidden them about yourselves to play a trick on us." "Honestly, we haven't," said Monkey.
"Let's all join the search." When they went to the matting shelter in the yard and could see that there really was no sign of the weapons Pig said, "You smiths must have stolen them.
Bring'em out at once. Do it right now or I'll kill you.
I'll kill you, I say." The smiths kowtowed desperately and said with tears pouring down their faces, "Your Lordships, we went to sleep last night because we'd been working so hard for days on end. When we got up this morning they'd gone. We're only ordinary mortals. We could never have moved them.
Spare our lives, Your Lordships, spare our lives." Monkey said with bitter regret, "It's our fault.
After we'd shown them what they look like to copy we should have kept them on us instead of leaving them lying there.
I suppose our treasures' glowing clouds and light must have alerted some monster who came and stole them during the night." "Nonsense, brother," Pig replied.
"This is a peaceful, orderly sort of place, not somewhere in the wilds or the mountains. No monsters could possibly have come here.
I'm sure it was those evil smiths who stole our weapons. They could tell they were treasures from the light shining from them. They must have left the palace last night and got a whole gang together to carry or drag them out.
Bring'em here!
I'm going to hit them." The smiths kowtowed and swore to their innocence for all they were worth.
Amid all this commotion the senior prince came out, and when he asked what had happened the color drained from his face too. After muttering to himself in a low voice for a while he said, "Divine teachers, your weapons were not mere mortals' ones. Even if there had been a hundred or more people they would never have been able to move them.
Besides, my family has been ruling this city for five generations. I'm not boasting, but I do have a certain reputation for being a good man.
The soldiers, civilians and artisans who live here fear my laws, and I am certain that they could never have had so wicked an idea.
I hope that you divine teachers will think again." "No need for any more thinking about it," replied Brother Monkey with a smile, "and no need to make the smiths suffer for what's not their fault.
I would like to ask Your Royal Highness if there are any evil monsters in the mountains and forests around the city." "That's a very good question," the prince replied.
"There is a mountain North of the city called Mount Leopard Head, with a Tigermouth Cave in it.
People often say that immortals, or tigers and wolves, or evil spirits live there.
As I've never been there to find out the truth I am not sure what kind of creatures there are." Journey to the West "No need to say any more," replied Monkey with a laugh. "It must be someone wicked from there who knew they were treasures and came during the night to steal them.
Pig, Friar Sand," he ordered, "stay here to guard the master and the city while I go for a look round." He then told the smiths to keep the furnace burning and carry on forging the new weapons.
The splendid Monkey King took his leave of Sanzang and whistled out of sight.
Soon he was on Mount Leopard Head, which took him but an instant as it was only ten miles from the city.
As he climbed to the summit to look around he saw that there was quite an air of evil about it.
Indeed, it was A long dragon chain of hills, A mighty formation.
Sharp peaks thrusting into the sky, Streams flowing fast along chasms deep.
In front of the mountain grow cushions of rare plants; Behind the mountain strange flowers form brocade. Tall pine and ancient cypress, Old trees and find bamboo.
Crows and magpies sing as they fly, Cranes call and gibbons scream.
Below the beetling scar David's deer go in twos; In front of the sheer rock−face Are pairs of badgers and foxes.
Dragons from afar emerge briefly from the waters Of the twisting, winding stream that runs deep under the ground.
This ridge runs right to the edge of Yuhua, A place of beauty for a thousand ages.
Just as he was surveying the scene Monkey heard voices on the other side of the mountain, turned quickly round to look, and saw a couple of wolf−headed ogres climbing towards the Northwest and talking loudly as Journey to the West they went.
"They must be monsters patrolling the mountain," Monkey guessed.
"I'm going to listen to what they have to say." Making magic with his hands and saying the words of a spell Monkey shook himself, turned into a butterfly, spread his wings and fluttered after them.
It was a very lifelike transformation: A pair of powdery wings, Two silver antennae.
In the wind it files very fast; In the sun it's a leisurely dancer.
It crosses rivers and walls in a flash. Enjoys stealing fragrance and playing with catkins.
This delicate creature loves the taste of fresh flowers It shows its beauty and elegance as it pleases.
He flew to a spot right above the evil spirits' heads, where he floated and listened to what they had to say.
"Brother," one of them shouted suddenly, "our chief keeps on striking it lucky. The other month he caught himself a real beauty to live with him in the cave, and he was as pleased as anything about that.
Then last night he got the three weapons, which really are priceless treasures.
Tomorrow there's going to be a Rake Banquet to celebrate, so we're all going to benefit." "We've been quite lucky too," the other replied, "being given these twenty ounces of silver to buy pigs and sleep.
When we get to Qianfang Market we can have a few jugs of wine to start with, and then fiddle the accounts to make ourselves two or three ounces of silver to buy ourselves padded jackets for the winter.
It's great, isn't it?" As they laughed and talked the two monsters hurried along the main path at a great speed.
When Monkey heard about the banquet to celebrate the rake he was quietly delighted.
He would have liked to kill the devils, but it was not their fault and, besides, he had no weapon.
So he flew round till he was in front of them, turned back into himself and stood at a junction along the path.
As the devils gradually came closer he blew a mouthful of magic saliva at them, recited the words Om Humkara and made a fixing spell that held the two wolf−headed spirits where they were.
Their eyes were fixed in a stare, they could not open their mouths, and they stood upright, both legs rigid.
Monkey then knocked them over, undid their clothes and searched them, finding the twenty ounces of silver in a purse carried by one of them in the belt of his kilt. Each of them was also carrying a white lacquered pass.
One of these read "Wily Freak" and the other read "Freaky Wile." Having taken their silver and undone their passes the splendid Great Sage went straight back to the city, where he told the princes, the Tang Priest, the officials high and low and the smiths what had happened.
Journey to the West "I reckon my treasure's the one that shone the brightest," said Pig with a grin. "That's why they're buying pigs and sheep for a slap−up meal to celebrate. But how are we going to get it back?" "We'll all three of us go," said Monkey.
"This silver was for buying pigs and sheep. We'll give it to the smiths: His Royal Highness can provide us with some animals.
Pig, you turn yourself into Wily Freak, I'll turn into Freaky Wile, and Friar Sand can be a trader selling pigs and sheep. We'll go into Tigermouth Cave, and when it suits us we'll grab our weapons, kill all the monsters, come back here to pack up and be on our way again." "Terrific," said Friar Sand.
"No time to lose. Let's go." The senior prince agreed with the plan and told his steward to buy seven or eight pigs and four or five sheep.
The three of them left their master and gave a great display of their magic powers once outside the city.
"Brother," said Pig, "I've never seen that Wily Freak, so how can I possibly turn myself into his double?" "I did fixing magic on him to keep him over there somewhere," Monkey said, "and he won't come round till tomorrow.
I can remember what he looks like, so you stand still while I tell you how to change.
Yes, like this...no, a bit more like that....That's it.
That's him." While the idiot said an incantation Brother Monkey blew on him with magic breath, turned him into Wily Freak's double and gave him a white pass to tuck in at his waist.
Monkey then turned himself into Freaky Wile with a pass at his waist too, and Friar Sand made himself look like a travelling dealer in pigs and sheep.
Then they drove the pigs and sheep together along the path West towards the mountain.
Before long they were in a mountain gully, where they met another junior devil. He had the most horrible face.
Just look: A pair of round and bulging eyes Shining like lanterns; A head of red and bristly hair, Blazing like fire.
A red nose, A twisted mouth, Sharp and pointy fangs; Protruding ears, A brow that seemed hacked into shape, And a green and bloated face.
He was wearing a pale yellow tunic And sandals made of sedge.
Journey to the West He looked most imposing, like some evil god, As he hurried along like a vicious demon.
This devil was carrying a coloured lacquer invitation box under his left arm as he greeted Monkey and the other two with a call of "Freaky Wile, good to see you both.
Did you buy us some pigs and sheep?" "Can't you see we're driving them along?" Monkey replied.
"Who's this gentleman?" the devil asked, looking at Friar Sand.
"He's the dealer in pigs and sheep," Monkey replied.
"We still owe him a couple of ounces of silver, so we're taking him home with us to fetch it.
Where are you going?" "To Bamboo Mountain to invite His Senior Majesty to the feast tomorrow morning," the devil said.
Taking his cue from the devil's tone of voice, Monkey then asked, "How many guests will there be altogether?" "His Senior Majesty will take the place of honour," the devil replied, "and with our own king, chiefs and the rest of them there'll be over forty." As they were talking Pig called, "Get a move on!
The pigs and sheep are going everywhere." "You go and invite them while I get a look at that invitation," Monkey said, and as the devil regarded him as one of their own kind he opened the box, took out the invitation and handed it to Monkey. This is what Monkey read when he unfolded it:
A banquet is being given tomorrow morning to celebrate the capture of the rake, and if you will condescend to cross the mountain, honoured ancestor, Primal Sage of Ninefold Numinosity, I will be deeply grateful.
With a hundred kowtows, Your grandson, Tawny Lion When Monkey had read it he handed it back to the devil, who returned it to its case and carried on towards the Southeast.
"Brother," Friar Sand asked, "what did it say on the invitation?" "It was an invitation to the Rake Banquet," Monkey replied.
"It was signed, 'with a hundred kowtows, your grandson Tawny Lion,' and the invitation was being sent to the Primal Sage of Ninefold Numinosity.'" Journey to the West "Tawny Lion must be a golden−haired lion who's become a spirit," said Friar Sand with a smile, "but I wonder who the Primal Sage of Ninefold Numinosity is." Pig's reaction was to laugh and say, "He's mine." "Why should he necessarily be yours?" Monkey asked.
"There's an old saying that goes, 'a mangy old sow can put a golden lion to flight,'" Pig replied.
"That's why I know he's mine." As they talked and laughed the three of them drove the pigs and sheep along till they could see the gates of Tigermouth Cave.
Outside the gates there were, Green mountains all around, Ranges forming a mighty wall.
Creepers clung to the sheer rock faces, Thorns hung down from the towering cliffs.
Bird song came from all around the woods, While flowers gave a welcome by the entrance.
This cave was a match for the Peach Blossom Spring, A place to avoid the troubles of the world.
As they came closer to the mouth of the cave they saw a crowd of evil spirits of every age and kind playing under the blossoming trees, and when they heard Pig's shouts of "Hey!
Hey!" as he drove the pigs and sheep they all came out to meet them.
The pigs and sheep were caught and trussed up.
The noise had by now disturbed the demon king inside, who came out with ten or more junior demons to ask, "Are you two back?
How many animals did you buy?" "Eight pigs and seven sheep−−fifteen altogether," Monkey replied.
"The pigs cost sixteen ounces of silver and the sheep nine.
We were only given twenty ounces, so we still owe five.
This is the dealer who's come with us for the silver." "Fetch five ounces of silver, little ones," the demon king ordered on hearing this, "and send him on his way." "But the dealer hasn't only come to get his silver," Monkey replied.
"He's come to see the banquet too." "What nerve, Freaky Wile!" said the furious demon abusively.
"You were sent off to buy things, not to talk about banquets." "As you've got those amazingly fine treasures, my lord," Pig said, stepping forward, "what's the harm in letting him have a look?" Journey to the West "Damn you too, Wily Freak," said the demon with an angry snort.
"I got these treasures from inside the city of Yuhua. If this stranger sees them and talks about them in the city the word will get around and the prince will come to demand them.
What'll we do then?" "My lord," Monkey replied, "this dealer comes from the other side of Qianfang Market. That's a long way from the city, and he's not a city man either, so where would he go telling tales?
Besides, he's hungry, and the two of us haven't eaten.
If there's any food and liquor in the place why don't we give him some before sending him on his way?" Before he could finish speaking a junior devil came out with five ounces of silver that he gave to Monkey, who in turn handed it to Friar Sand with the words, "Take your silver, stranger, then come round to the back for something to eat with us." Taking his courage in his hands, Friar Sand went into the cave with Pig and Monkey.
When they reached the second hall inside they saw on a table in the middle of it the nine−toothed iron rake set up in all its dazzling brightness to receive offerings.
At the Eastern end of the table was leant the gold−banded cudgel, and at the Western end the demon−quelling staff.
"Stranger," said the demon king who was following them in, "that's the rake shining so brightly in the middle. You're welcome to look, but don't tell anyone about it, whatever you do." Friar Sand nodded in admiration.
Oh dear!
This was a case of "when the owner sees what's his he's bound to pick it up." Pig had always been a rough customer, and once he saw his rake he was not going to talk about the facts of the case, but charged over, pulled it down and swung it around as he turned back into himself. He struck straight at the evil spirit's face, not caring now about the proper ways of using his weapon.
Monkey and Friar Sand each rushed to one end of the table to grab his own weapon and turn back into himself.
As the three brothers started lashing out wildly the demon king had to get out of their way in a hurry, go round to the back and fetch his four−bright halberd with its long handle and sharp, pointed butt. Rushing into the courtyard, he used this to hold off the three weapons and shout at the top of his voice, "Who do you think you are, tricking me out of my treasures by impersonation?" "I'll get you, you hairy beast," Monkey cursed back.
"You don't know who I am.
I'm a disciple of Tang Sanzang, the holy monk from the East.
When we came to Yuhua to present our passport the prince told his three sons to take us as their teachers of fighting skills. They were having weapons copied from ours.
That was why ours were left in the courtyard for you to sneak into the city and steal in the middle of the night. And you accuse us of tricking them out of you by impersonation!
Stay right there and try a taste of our three weapons." The evil spirit at once raised his halberd to fight back.
They fought from the courtyard out through the front gate, three monks chasing a single demon. It was a splendid battle: The cudgel whistled like the wind, The rake's blows came raining down.
The demon−quelling staff filled the sky with glowing mist; The four−bright halberd gave off clouds.
Journey to the West They were like the three immortals refining elixir, Making dazzling light that frightened gods and ghosts.
Monkey was brilliant at displaying his might; The evil spirit was wrong to have stolen the treasures.
Marshal Tian Peng showed off his divine powers, While the great general Sand was heroic and splendid.
As the three brothers fought with skill and one mind A great battle took place in Tigermouth Cave.
The ogre was full of power and cunning, A fit match for the four heroes.
They fought until the sun set in the West, When the demon weakened and could hold out no longer.
After their long fight on Mount Leopard Head the evil spirit shouted at Friar Sand, "Watch this halberd!" As Friar Sand fell back to dodge the blow the evil spirit escaped through the opening he left and fled by wind to the Xun quarter to the Southeast.
Pig started rushing after him to catch him, but Monkey said, "Let him go.
As the old saying goes, 'never chase a desperate robber.' Let's leave him nothing to come back to." Pig agreed, and the three of them went back to the entrance of the cave, where they killed all the hundred and more evil spirits great and small.
It turned out that they were all really tigers, wolves, tiger cats, leopards, red deer and goats.
Monkey used one of his powers to bring all the valuables and fabrics, as well as the bodies of all the animals they had killed, the pigs and the sheep out of the cave.
Friar Sand used some dry wood he found to start a fire that Pig fanned with both his ears.
The cave was soon burnt out, and they took what they had brought with them back to the city.
The city gates were wide open; people had not yet gone to bed. The senior prince and his sons were still waiting in the Gauze Pavilion.
The three disciples dropped all the dead wild animals and sheep as well as the valuables with loud thumps into the courtyard, filling it up as they called out, "Master, we're back.
We've won." The senior prince then expressed his thanks to them, the Tang priest was delighted, and the three young princes fell to their knees to bow. "Don't thank us," Friar Sand said, helping them to their feet.
"Come and see what we've got." "Where are they from?" the senior prince asked.
Journey to the West "The tigers, wolves, tiger cats, leopards, red deer and goats were all monsters that made themselves into spirits.
When we'd got our weapons back we fought our way out through the gates.
Their demon king is a golden−haired lion who fights with a four−bright halberd. He battled it out with us till nightfall, then ran away to the Southeast.
Instead of chasing him we made sure he'd have nowhere to come back to by killing all these devils and bringing back all his things." This news both delighted and alarmed the senior prince:
he was delighted at their triumphant return; worried that the demon would seek his revenge later.
"Don't worry, Your Royal Highness," said Monkey. "I've thought about it very carefully, and I'll deal with it properly.
I promise to exterminate the demons completely before we go. We'll definitely not leave you with trouble that'll come back later.
When we went there at noon we ran into a little green−faced, red−haired devil who was carrying an invitation. What it said on it was:
'A banquet is being given tomorrow morning to celebrate the capture of the rake, and if you will condescend to cross the mountain, honoured ancestor, Primal Sage of Ninefold Numinosity, I will be deeply grateful.' It was signed:
'with a hundred kowtows, your grandson, Tawny Lion'.
When the evil spirit was defeated just now he must have gone to have a word with his grandfather. They're bound to come looking for us to get their revenge tomorrow morning, and when that happens I'll wipe them all out for you." The senior prince thanked him and had supper arranged.
When master and disciples had eaten, everybody went to bed.
The story now tells of how the evil spirit really did head Southeast to Bamboo Mountain, in which there was a cave called the Nine−bend Twisty Cave where the evil spirit's grandfather, the Primal Sage of Ninefold Numinosity, lived.
That night the demon did not stop treading the wind until he reached the cave's entrance in the last watch.
When he knocked on the gates and went in a junior devil greeted him with the words, "Your Majesty, Greenface brought the invitation last night, and the old gentleman invited him to say till this morning to go to your Rake Banquet with him.
Why have you come here so very early to invite him yourself?" "I hate to have to say it," the evil spirit replied, "but the banquet is off." As they were talking Greenface came out from the inner part of the cave to say, "What are you doing here, Your Majesty?
As soon as His Senior Majesty's up he's coming to the celebration with me." The evil spirit was so distraught that he could say nothing, but only wave his hands.
A little later the old demon got up and called for the evil spirit, who dropped his weapon and prostrated himself on the ground to kowtow, tears streaming down his cheeks.
"Worthy grandson," the old demon said, "you sent me an invitation yesterday, and this morning I'm on my way to the celebration.
So why have you come yourself, looking so miserable and upset?" "I was taking a stroll in the moonlight the night before last," the evil spirit replied, still kowtowing, "when I saw a dazzling light rising up to the sky from the city of Yuhua.
I hurried there to take a look and saw that it came from three weapons in the prince's palace: a nine−toothed rake with gold in it, a staff and a gold−banded cudgel.
I used my magic to take them away and decided to have a Rake Banquet to celebrate. I sent some of my underlings to buy pigs, sheep and fruit for the feast that I invited you to come and enjoy, Grandfather.
But after I sent Greenface over with the invitation yesterday Wily Freak and the other one who'd been told to buy pigs and sheep came back with a dealer, a stranger, for some silver.
The stranger was all set on seeing the banquet. I refused as I was afraid he'd spread the news around.
Then they said they were hungry and asked for some food to eat, so I told them to go round the back to eat.
When they got inside and saw the weapons they Journey to the West said they were theirs.
They each snatched one and turned back into their real selves. One was a monk with a hairy face and a mouth like a thunder god's, one was a monk with a long snout and big ears, and one was a monk with a really sinister face. The three of them yelled at me and started lashing out: they didn't care at all.
I just managed to fetch my four−bright halberd and come out to hold them at bay.
When I asked them who they were and how they dared go in for impersonation they told me they were disciples of the Tang Priest who's been sent to the Western Heaven by Great Tang in the East. When they went to present their passport on their way through the city the princes pressed them to stay and teach them martial arts. They said their three weapons had been left in the palace yard for copies of them to be made, and that I'd stolen them. Then they went for me with great fury.
I didn't know what those three monks are called, but they're all very good fighters. As I was no match for them by myself I had to run away and come here.
If you have any love for your grandson I beg you to lend me your arms in order to get my revenge on those monks." After a moment's silent thought the old demon replied with a smile, "So it's them.
Worthy grandson, you made a big mistake provoking him." "Do you know who they are, grandfather?" the other asked.
"The one with a long snout and big ears is Zhu Bajie," the old demon said, "and the one with a horrible face is Friar Sand.
They're not too bad. But the one with a hairy face and a mouth like a thunder god is called Sun the Novice.
He's got really tremendous magical powers. When he made great havoc in Heaven five hundred years ago a hundred thousand heavenly troops couldn't catch him. And he's a most determined hunter.
He's like a policeman who'll search mountains and seas, smash caves, storm cities and cause all sorts of trouble. Why did you have to provoke him? Never mind.
I'll go with you and capture those so−and−sos and the prince of Yuhua to avenge you." On hearing this the evil spirit kowtowed again in thanks.
The senior demon immediately mustered his grandsons Monkey Lion, Snowy Lion, Leo, Gryphon, Raccoon−dog Lion and Elephant−fighter, each of whom carried a sharp weapon. With Tawny Lion leading the way each of them set off a powerful gale that carried them straight to Mount Leopard Head, where there was an all−pervasive smell of smoke and fire and all that could be heard was sobbing.
When they looked more closely they saw Wily Freak and Freaky Wile weeping for their lord.
"Are you the real Freak and Wile or impostors?" the evil spirit shouted as he went up to them.
Falling to their knees and kowtowing with tears in their eyes, the two devils replied, "We're no impostors.
After we were given the silver to buy pigs and sheep yesterday we met a monk with a hairy face and a mouth like a thunder god in the wide valley to the West of the mountain. When he spat on us our legs went all weak, our mouths went stiff, we couldn't speak and we couldn't move.
He knocked us over, found and stole our silver and took our passes off us.
We were left in a daze till we came round just now.
When we got home we found the place still on fire and all the buildings burnt down.
We were crying so bitterly because you, my lord, and all the chiefs had disappeared.
We don't know how the fire was started." When the evil spirit heard this he could not stop his tears from gushing forth as he stamped his feet in fury, let loose heaven−shaking roars and exclaimed in hatred and fury, "Damned baldies!
Vicious beasts! How could you be so evil?
You've destroyed my cave palace and burnt my beauty to death. You've killed everyone, young and old, in the household.
I'm so angry I could die!" The old demon then told Monkey Lion to take hold of Tawny Lion, saying, "Grandson, what's done is done. Upsetting yourself won't do you any good.
What you must do now is summon up all your energy to catch those monks in the city." Journey to the West The evil spirit was still crying as he replied, "Grandfather, this mountain palace of mine wasn't built in a day. Now those damned baldies have destroyed everything!
My life's not worth living!" With that he broke free and flung himself forward to smash his head against the rock−face, only stopping after Snowy Lion and Monkey Lion had made great efforts to calm him.
They then left the cave and all headed for the city.
With a roaring wind and in a thick fog they approached the city, so frightening all the people living outside the city wall that they abandoned their belongings and dragged or carried their children with them as they fled into the city. Once the people were all inside the gates were shut.
A report was then made to the palace that a disaster was upon them.
When the prince, who was taking a vegetarian breakfast in the Gauze Pavilion with the Tang Priest and the others, heard this report he went out to ask about it:
"A whole crowd of evil spirits are heading for the city with sandstorms, flying stones, fogs and wind." "Whatever shall we do?" asked the prince, deeply alarmed.
"All stop worrying," said Brother Monkey, "all stop worrying.
It's the evil spirit from Tigermouth Cave who ran away when he was beaten yesterday. He went to the Southeast to gang up with the Primal Sage of Ninefold Numinosity or whatever he's called and now he's here.
We brothers are going out.
Tell them to shut all the city gates, and send men to hold the city wall." The prince ordered that the city gates be shut, sent men to the wall, and went with his sons and the Tang Priest to inspect.
The army's banners blotted out the sun, and the cannon fire reached the sky as Monkey, Pig and Friar Sand left the city amid wind and clouds to give battle.
Indeed: Because they were careless the weapons were lost, Which led to attacks by the devilish host.
If you do not know the outcome of the battle listen to the explanation in the next installment.
By Giving and Receiving the Master and the Lion Turn into One After Stealing the Way and Obstructing Dhyana Ninefold Numinosity Is Pacified The story tells how the Great Sage Sun left the city with Pig and Friar Sand and looked the monsters in the face to see that they were all lions of various kinds. The Tawny Lion Spirit was leading, with Leo and Elephant−fighter Lion on his left, Gryphon and Raccoon−dog Lion on his right and Monkey Lion with Snowy Lion behind him. In the middle of them all was a nine−headed lion.
The ogre Greenface was holding a canopy of brocade embroidered with flowers just behind the nine−headed lion; while Wily Freak and Freaky Wile carried a pair of red flags.
They were all drawn up at a hollow place.
In his rough way Pig went up to them to shout abusively, "Ogres! Thieves! Treasure−stealers! What did you go there and gang up with that hairy lot for?" To this the Tawny Lion Spirit retorted, gnashing his teeth in fury, "Vicious baldies!
When I was alone Journey to the West yesterday the three of you beat me and I had to run away. You should have done right, instead of burning my cave palace, destroying my mountain home and murdering my family.
My hatred for you is as great as the ocean.
Stay where you are and take this from my halberd!" The splendid Pig raised his rake to parry the blow.
When the two of them had just started fighting and neither was yet coming out on top Monkey Lion joined in, swinging his spiked iron club, as did Snowy Lion with his three−edged mace. "Welcome," shouted Pig.
Watch him as he charges straight forward to meet their onslaught and fight with them all.
Friar Sand quickly pulled his demon−quelling staff out from where he was at the side and hurried forward to help Pig, at which Leo Spirit, Gryphon Spirit, Elephant−fighter Spirit and Raccoon−dog Spirit all piled in.
The Great Sage Monkey held the evil spirits at bay with his gold−banded cudgel.
Leo fought with a club, Snowy with a bronze hammer, Elephant−fighter with a steel spear and Raccoon−dog with a battleaxe. The fight between the seven lion spirits and the three ferocious monks was a splendid one:
Club, hammer, spear, axe and three−edged mace, Spiked club, ball−staff and four−bright halberd:
Seven lions with seven deadly weapons, Shouting their war cries as they surround three monks.
Powerful was the Great Sage's gold−banded cudgel; Friar Sand's staff was almost matchless in the world.
Pig moved around with the power of a whirlwind As his flashing rake gave off baleful light.
All, displaying their might, blocked before and behind, Held off the onslaughts with daring and courage.
From the walls of the city the prince lent support, Where his soldiers felt braver as they beat drums and gongs.
Throwing and thrusting, all showed off their magic, Turning heaven and earth both dark and upside−down.
After the evil spirits had been fighting the Great Sage and the two others for half a day, night fell.
Pig by now was dribbling and his legs were going weak, so he feinted with his rake and fled in defeat.
Journey to the West "Where do you think you're going?" Snowy Lion and Monkey Lion shouted.
"Take this!" The idiot could not dodge them, and he took a heavy blow from the mace on his spine that laid him flat on the ground crying out, "I'm done for, I'm done for!" The two lion spirits grabbed Pig by the bristles on his neck and by his tail and carried him over to see the nine−headed lion, "Grandfather," they reported, "we've caught one of them." Before the words were out of their mouths Friar Sand and Monkey also had to fall back, beaten.
When the evil spirits all came after them Monkey pulled out a handful of hairs, chewed them to pieces, spat them out, shouted, "Change!" and turned them into more than one hundred little Monkeys who went round and round, surrounding Snowy, Leo, Elephant−fighter, Raccoon−dog and Tawny Lion.
Friar Sand and Monkey then came forward to join in the fight again.
Later that night they caught Leo and Gryphon and put Raccoon−dog and Elephant−fighter to flight.
When Tawny Lion reported to the old demon that two of the lions had been lost the demon ordered, "Tie Pig up but don't kill him.
When they give our lions back we'll return Pig to them.
If they're stupid enough to kill them we'll make Pig pay with his life." That evening all the fiends slept outside the city.
The story now turns to the Great Sage Sun, who carried the two lion spirits to beside the city wall, from where the senior prince saw him and ordered that the gates be opened. Twenty or thirty officers were sent out with rope to tie the lion spirits up and carry them into the city.
The Great Sage then put his magic hairs away and went straight with Friar Sand to the wall tower, where he saw the Tang Priest.
"This is a terrible business," the Tang Priest said. "Is Wuneng still alive?" "No problem," Brother Monkey replied.
"As we've captured a couple of the evil spirits they won't possibly dare harm him.
Have them tied up tight.
I'll swap them for Pig tomorrow morning." The three young princes then kowtowed to Monkey and said, "When you were fighting them at first you were by yourself, Teacher.
Then when you pretended to run away and came back again there were over a hundred of you. How was that done?
When you came back to the city wall after capturing the evil spirits there was only one of you again. What magical powers did you use to do that?" "I have 84,000 hairs on my body," Monkey replied.
"Each of them can become ten, and the ten become a hundred, so I can do millions and millions of transformations.
It's extra body magic." The princes all kowtowed as a vegetarian feast was brought to the tower for them.
All along the battlements lanterns and banners were displayed. There was the sound of clappers, bells, gongs and drums as the watches were changed, arrows passed on, cannons fired and warcries shouted.
Soon it was dawn, and the old demon sent for Tawny Lion Spirit to make a plan of action:
"You must all use your wits to capture Sun the Novice and Friar Sand while I make a secret flight up onto the wall to capture their master, the old prince and his sons.
I'll take them back to the Nine−bend Twisty Cave and wait for you to come back in triumph." Accepting this plan, Tawny Lion took Monkey Lion, Snowy Lion, Elephant−fighter and Raccoon−dog back to beside the city wall, all carrying their weapons and demanding battle amid winds and fog.
Journey to the West On the other side Monkey and Friar Sand jumped on the wall, where Monkey yelled abusively at the top of his voice, "Thieving damned ogres!
Give me my brother Pig back this moment and I'll spare your lives.
If you don't I'll smash your bones to powder and chop you all into little pieces." With no further argument the evil spirits all charged into the attack.
The Great Sage and Friar Sand had to use skill and cunning to hold the five lions at bay.
This fight was very different from the one on the previous day. As an evil wind howled across the land Black fog blotted out the sky.
Moving stones and flying sands alarmed both gods and demons; As the trees in the forest fell the tigers and wolves were afraid.
Fierce was the spear of steel and bright the axe, Merciless the rod, the halberd and the brazen hammer.
They wished they could swallow Monkey up whole, And capture Friar Sand live and kicking.
The Great Sage's As−You−Will cudgel Could attack and defend with miraculous effect.
Friar Sand's demon−quelling staff Had won its fame outside the Hall of Miraculous Mist.
Now that it moved with its magical powers, It would achieve glory in the West by wiping out demons.
While the five lion spirits with coats of different colours were fighting really well with Monkey and Friar Sand the old demon flew on a black cloud straight to the wall tower, where he shook his heads, which gave the military and civil officials, Sanzang, the senior prince and the soldiers guarding the wall such a fright that they all fell off.
The demon then charged into the tower, opened his mouths, took Sanzang, the senior prince and his sons in them one by one, and went back to the hollow ground, where he took Pig in another mouth, one of the nine he had in his nine heads.
One mouth held the Tang Priest, one Pig, one the senior prince, one his eldest son, one the second son and one the third son. With six mouths full of six people he still had three mouths empty and wide open as he roared, "I'm going back ahead." The five junior lion spirits all fought more bravely than ever now that they had seen their grandfather's triumph.
Journey to the West As soon as Monkey heard the yells from the wall and realized he had fallen for a trick, he gave Friar Sand a quick shout to be careful then pulled all the hairs off his arms, put them in his mouth, chewed them up and spat them out as well over a thousand little Monkeys who swarmed into the attack.
They knocked Monkey Lion over, took Snowy alive, captured Elephant−fighter, laid Raccoon−dog Lion low and killed Tawny Lion; but as they returned to the city wall with a great hubbub they let Greenface, Wily Freak and Freaky Wile escape.
When the officers on the wall saw what had happened they opened the gates, tied up the five lion spirits with ropes and carried them into the city.
But before they could deal with them the princess appeared, sobbing and weeping, to say, "Holy teachers, His Royal Highness the prince, our sons and your master are all dead.
How ever is this isolated city to survive?" Putting his magic hairs away, Monkey bowed to her and said, "Don't upset yourself, Princess.
It was only because I'd captured seven of his lion spirits that the old demon carried off my master, His Royal Highness and your sons with catching magic. I'm certain they'll come to no harm.
My brother−disciple and I will go to his mountain first thing tomorrow morning, and I can guarantee that we'll catch the old demon and bring your four princes back to you." When the princess and her womenfolk heard this they all bowed to Monkey and said, "We pray that His Royal Highness and his sons will all be safe and that our dynasty will be secure." When their bowing was done the womenfolk all returned to the palace in tears.
"Skin the Tawny Lion spirit we killed," Brother Monkey instructed the officials, "and have the five who are still alive securely tied up and put under lock and key.
Bring us some vegetarian food to eat before we go to sleep. Stop worrying:
I promise nothing will go wrong." The next morning the Great Sage took Friar Sand up on an auspicious cloud.
Before long they were at the top of Bamboo Mountain, and as they brought their cloud down to look they saw that it was magnificent:
Rows of jutting peaks, Sheer and craggy ridges.
In the deep gill waters gently flow; Flowers weave a fragrant brocade before the beetling cliff, Where the ridges twist and double back, Encircled by the ancient winding paths.
When the crane comes the pine has a companion, And the rock is left alone as the cloud drifts away.
The black ape heads for brightness when looking for fruit; The deer rejoice in the warming sun as they search for flowers.
The green phoenix sings sweetly Journey to the West And the golden bird's melodies never stop.
In spring the peach blossom contends with the plum; In summer the willow and locust trees are rivals.
In autumn are carpets of chrysanthemums, And in winter the snow flies all around.
Here there is beauty throughout the year, Where the scenery can compare with Yingzhou's magic land.
As the two of them were standing on the mountain admiring the view Greenface suddenly appeared in a ravine between cliffs. He was holding a short cudgel.
"Where do you think you're going?" Monkey shouted.
"I'm here." This gave the young devil such a fright that he went running and tumbling down the ravine. Monkey and Friar Sand went straight after him but could find no sign of where he had gone.
When they went further and searched around they found a cave palace with double gates of mottled stone that were firmly closed.
Above the gates a stone tablet was set on which was written in large block letters:
NINE−BEND TWISTY CAVE, MIGHTY BAMBOO MOUNTAIN Now when the junior devil ran inside the cave he had shut the gates firmly behind him.
Once inside he reported to the old demon, "My lord, those two monks are outside." "Have your lord, Monkey Lion, Snowy Lion, Elephant−fighter and Raccoon−dog come back yet?" the old demon asked.
"I haven't seen them," the junior demon replied.
"There were just the two monks looking around from high up on the peak.
As soon as I saw them I turned and ran. As they came after me I shut the gates." The old demon bowed his head in silence at this news.
After a while his tears began to flow as he called out, "This is terrible.
My grandson Tawny Lion is dead. My grandsons Monkey Lion and the rest of them have all been captured by those monks and taken into the city.
How am I to get my revenge?" Pig was tied up nearby, crammed in together with the Tang Priest and the princes, terrified and miserable until he heard the old demon saying that his grandsons had been captured and taken into the city. At this he said with quiet delight, "Don't be afraid, Master. Cheer up, Your Royal Highness. My elder brother has won.
He's Journey to the West captured the whole lot of the devils and he's found his way here to rescue us." When he had said this the old demon could be heard shouting, "Little ones, guard the place well while I go out to catch those other two monks.
Then we can punish them all together." Watch him as he strides off without armor or weapons.
When he heard Monkey shouting he threw the gates of the cave wide open and went straight for him, not deigning to answer.
Monkey raised his iron cudgel to stop him with a blow to the head while Friar Sand swung his staff at him.
As the demon shook his principal head the eight other heads to left and right of it all opened their mouths, with which they gently picked Monkey and Friar Sand up and carried them into the cave.
"Fetch rope," he ordered; and Wily Freak, Freaky Wile and Greenface, who had come back after their escape the previous night, brought two ropes with which they tied the two of them up very securely.
"Impudent ape," said the old demon, "you captured my seven grandsons.
But now I've caught you four monks and the four princes I've got enough to ransom them with.
Little ones, get some thorns and willow rods and beat this ape for me to avenge my grandson Tawny Lion." The three junior devils then beat Monkey with willow rods, but Monkey's body had been so toughened that all the rods could do was to scratch his itches.
He made no sound and was not in the least bothered, no matter how hard they hit him.
The sight of it, however, made Pig, the Tang Priest and the princes all feel their hair standing on end.
Before long the rods started to break up, but the demons kept on till evening, keeping no count of the number of strokes.
Friar Sand was most upset to see Monkey being given so long a flogging, so he said, "Let me take a hundred or so for him." "Don't be so impatient," the old demon replied, "you'll get your beating tomorrow.
You'll all be done in turn." "That means it'll be me the day after tomorrow," said Pig with alarm.
The beating continued for a while as night slowly fell.
"Little ones," the old demon called, "stop for now. Light the lamp and go for something to eat and drink. I'm off to my Brocade Cloud Den for a little shut−eye.
You three have all had a hard time, so keep a close watch on them.
We'll carry on with the beatings tomorrow." The three junior devils moved a lamp over and hit Monkey some more on the top of his head with their willow rods, tic−tic−toc, toc−toc−tic, like the rhythm of a wooden clapper, sometimes fast and sometimes slow.
By then it was very late and they all fell asleep.
Monkey now used escaping magic to shrink himself, wriggled out of his bonds, shook his fur, straightened up his clothes, took the cudgel out of his ear and shook it till it was as thick as a well−bucket and about twenty feet long. Then he said to the three junior devils, "You animals, you hit me an awful lot of times, and now I'm going to return the compliment.
I'll just shove this at you and see how you like it." One gentle push from the cudgels turned the three devils into three lumps of minced pork.
Monkey then turned up the lamp and released Friar Sand.
Pig, who was feeling desperate about being tied up, could not stop himself from yelling at the top of his voice, "My hands and feet are tied up so tight they're swollen.
Why don't you come and free me?" The idiot's shout at once woke up the old demon, who rolled straight out of bed and called out, "Who's setting them free?" The moment Monkey heard this he blew out the lamp, smashed his way through several sets of Journey to the West doors with his cudgel and fled, not bothering about Friar Sand and the rest of them, while the old demon went into the main hall shouting, "Little ones, why's there no light?
Don't let them get away!" He shouted once without getting an answer, then again, and still no answer.
When he fetched a lantern and looked all he could see were three gory lumps of minced meat on the floor. The prince, his sons, the Tang Priest and Pig were still there, but Monkey and Friar Sand had disappeared.
He lit a torch, searched the front and the back and could find only Friar Sand, who was still standing pressed against the wall of a corridor.
The demon knocked him down, tied him up as before, and carried on looking for Monkey.
Seeing that pair after pair of his doors had been smashed down, he realized that Monkey had destroyed them in his flight.
Instead of giving chase he patched up and blockaded the doors and guarded his home.
The story now tells how Monkey left the Nine−bend Twisty Cave and rode by auspicious cloud straight back to the city of Yuhua, where all the local deities and spirits as well as the god of the city could be seen bowing in mid−air to greet him.
"Why have you only come to see me today?" Monkey asked.
"When we knew that the worthy prince was entertaining you in Yuhua, Great Sage," they replied, "we did not venture to greet you.
But now that the princes have been captured by ogres and you have subdued those monsters we have come to welcome you with kowtows." While Monkey was abusing them the Gold−headed Protector and the Six Ding and Six Jia generals escorted a local deity in and made him kneel on the ground.
"Great Sage," they said, "we've arrested this ground devil." "What are you making a noise here for instead of guarding my master on Bamboo Mountain?" Monkey yelled.
"Great Sage," the Ding and Jia gods replied, "the evil spirit caught the Curtain−raising General and tied him up again after you escaped.
As we could see how great his magic powers are we've brought the local deity of Bamboo Mountain here.
He knows all about that evil spirit's background, so we beg you to question him, Great Sage, and find out how best to deal with him and deliver the holy monks and worthy princes from their suffering." When Monkey heard this he was delighted.
"The old demon came down to Bamboo Mountain the year before last," the local deity said, shivering and shaking as he kowtowed.
"The Nine−bend Twisty Cave used to be the den of six lions. Once the old demon came the six lions all took him as their grandfather.
He is a nine−headed lion called the Primal Sage of Ninefold Numinosity.
If you want to deal with him you must go to the Wonderful Crag Palace in the uttermost East and fetch his master here to subdue him.
Nobody else can possibly do it." When Monkey heard this he thought for a long time before saying, "The Wonderful Crag Palace in the uttermost East is where the Heavenly Honoured Saviour of the Great Monad lives. Yes, he does have just such a nine−headed lion under his throne.
Protector, Jias," he ordered, "go back with the local deity and keep a secret watch on the master, my brother disciple, the prince of the city and his sons.
The city god must guard the wall and moat.
Off you go." The gods all took up guard as instructed.
The Great Sage set off his somersault cloud and traveled through the night till it was about the last watch, when he reached the Eastern Gate of Heaven, where he ran into the Heavenly King Virupaksa with his retinue of heavenly soldiers and warriors, who stopped, put their hands together in greeting and asked, "Where are you going, Great Sage?" Journey to the West "I'm off to the Wonderful Crag Palace," Monkey replied when he had returned their greetings.
"Why have you come to the Eastern Heaven instead of following your road to the Western Heaven?" Virupaksa asked.
"When we reached the city of Yuhua," Monkey replied, "the prince of the city entertained us and told his three sons to take us as their teachers of martial arts. We had a most unpleasant surprise: coming up against a gang of lion monsters.
Now I'm going to ask the Heavenly Honoured Saviour of the Great Monad, the chief monster's owner, to subdue him and save my master." "It was because you wanted to be a teacher that you provoked that trouble with the lions," said the heavenly king.
"How true," replied Monkey with a smile, "how true." The heavenly soldiers and warriors all raised joined hands in greeting then stood aside to let him pass.
Monkey went in through the Eastern Gate of Heaven and was soon at the Wonderful Crag Palace.
This is what could be seen: Coloured clouds behind coloured clouds, Purple mists and rich, green vegetation.
The roof−tiles are a surge of golden flame, And at the gates are imposing beasts of jade.
Flowers grow between gate towers, round which red mists drift; The sun shines on turquoise vapors rising from the woods.
All the immortals pay their respects, And a thousand sages make everything flourish.
The halls of the palace are like layers of brocade; Windows and pavilions open on all sides.
Azure dragons glow with sacred clouds; Golden beams of brilliant light come from the magic mists.
This is a land of splendor and eternal joy, The Wonderful Crag Palace in the uttermost East.
There was an immortal boy wearing a rainbow mantle standing at the palace gates, and as soon as he noticed the Great Sage he went in to report, "My lord, the Great Sage Equaling Heaven who made havoc in Heaven is here." When the Heavenly Honoured Saviour of the Great Monad heard this he ordered all the immortals in attendance on him to go out to welcome Monkey and bring him into the palace.
Here the Heavenly Honoured One was sitting on a nine−coloured lotus throne amid countless rays of auspicious light, and when he saw Monkey he came down from his throne to greet him while Monkey bowed to him from below.
Journey to the West "Great Sage," the Heavenly Honoured One said, returning his bow, "I haven't seen you for years, but I did hear that you have abandoned the Way for Buddhism and are escorting the Tang Priest to fetch the scriptures from the Western Heaven. I presume that you have now succeeded." "Not yet," Monkey replied, "but near enough.
I have escorted the Tang Priest as far as Yuhua, where the prince told his three sons to take me and the other two as their teachers of martial arts and had copies of our three magic weapons made. The weapons were, to our surprise, stolen one night.
When I searched for them the next day I found that they had been stolen by a spirit turned by a golden−haired lion from Tigermouth Cave on Mount Leopard Head.
I tricked them back from him by cunning, whereupon the spirit ganged up with some other lion spirits to give me a tremendous fight.
One of them is a nine−headed lion with enormous magic powers who carried my master, Pig, the prince and his three sons to the Ninebend Twisty Cave on Mount Bamboo.
When Friar Sand and I went to look for them the next day we were carried off too. He had me tied up and hit so often I lost count.
Luckily I was able to make my get−away by magic, but they're still suffering there.
When I questioned the local deity I found out that you were his master, Heavenly Honoured One, which is why I'm here to ask you to subdue the lion and rescue them." As soon as the Heavenly Honoured One heard this he sent his immortal officers to the lion house to call out his lionkeeper slave and question him.
The lionkeeper slave was sleeping so deeply that the officers had to push and shake him before they could wake him up and drag him into the main hall.
Here the Heavenly Honoured One asked him, "Where is the lion?" All the slave could do was to kowtow with tears streaming down his face, pleading, "Spare me, spare me." "The Great Sage Sun is here," the Heavenly Honoured One replied, "so I won't have you beaten just yet.
You must explain this instant your carelessness in letting the nine−headed lion escape." "My lord," the lionkeeper replied, "I stole and drank a jug of wine I saw in the Sweet Dew Palace of the Great Chiliocosm. Before I realized what had happened I was dead drunk.
It must have slipped its chains and got away." "That wine was given me by Lord Lao Zi of the Supreme Ultimate," the Heavenly Honoured One replied. "It's called Cyclical Nectar, and after drinking that you would have slept for three days.
How many days has the lion been gone?" "What the local deity said was that he went down there the year before last, which would mean two years or more," the Great Sage said.
"That's right," the Heavenly Honoured One said with a smile, "A day in the palaces of Heaven is a year in the mortal world.
Get up," he said to the lion−tamer. "I'll spare your life. Come down to the lower world with the Great Sage and me to recapture him.
You immortals can all go back.
None of you need come with us." The Heavenly Honoured One, the lion−keeper slave and the Great Sage all went by cloud straight to Bamboo Mountain, where the Protectors of the Four Quarters and the Centre, the Six Dings, the Six Jias and the local deity of the mountain all knelt to greet them.
"Has my master been harmed while you people have been protecting him?" Brother Monkey asked.
"The evil spirit was so angry that he went to sleep," the gods replied.
"He didn't torture them any more." "That Primal Sage of mine is a true soul who has long cultivated the Way," the Heavenly Honoured One remarked. "A single call from him will go up to the Three Sages and down to the Underworld. He wouldn't Journey to the West kill anyone lightly.
Great Sage Sun, go to his gates, challenge him to battle and draw him outside for us to catch." As soon as Monkey heard this he sprang towards the mouth of the cave, brandishing his cudgel and shouting loudly and abusively, "Damned evil spirit, give me my people back!
Damned evil spirit, give me my people back!" He shouted several times, but the old demon was fast asleep and nobody answered.
Monkey lost his patience, swung his cudgel and smashed his way inside, still cursing.
Only then did the old demon wake up, rise to his feet and yell with great fury, "I'm coming for you!" He shook his heads and opened his jaws to pick Monkey up.
As Monkey turned and fled the evil spirit chased after him till they were outside the cave, shouting, "Where do you think you're going, you thieving ape?" "How dare you go on behaving so dreadfully!" said Monkey with a grin from where he was standing on the top of a high cliff. "You haven't even got the sense to realize that your life's at stake.
Don't you see your master's here?" By the time the evil spirit reached the cliff in pursuit of Monkey the Heavenly Honoured One had said a spell and shouted, "I'm here, my little Primal Sage." Recognizing his master, the monster gave up the struggle and lay down with all four feet on the ground, kowtowing.
The lionkeeper then ran over to him, took hold of his mane, and punched him hundreds of times on the neck, saying abusively, "Why did you run away, animal?
You got me into terrible trouble." The lion kept his mouths shut and said nothing, not daring to move, and the lionkeeper only stopped hitting him when his fist was tired out.
When a brocade saddlecloth had been put on the animal's back the Heavenly Honoured One mounted and shouted to it to go.
They then rose up on coloured clouds and went straight back to the Wonderful Crag Palace.
After addressing his thanks skywards the Great Sage went into the cave and freed first the prince of Yuhua, then Sanzang, then Pig, Friar Sand and the three young princes.
After this they made a leisurely search of the cave and led everyone outside.
Pig then fetched some dry brushwood, piled it at the front and the back, and started a fire that left the Nine−bend Twisty Cave looking like a ruined, burnt−out kiln.
Monkey released all the gods, ordered the local deity to keep guard on it, and told Pig and Friar Sand to use their magic to carry the four princes back to the city while he helped the Tang Priest along.
They were soon back at the city, where the princess and the officials all came out to greet them. It was now getting dark, and a vegetarian feast was provided for everyone to enjoy.
The venerable elder and his disciples slept in the Gauze Pavilion once more, and the princes in the living quarters of the palace.
Of that night no more need be said.
The next day the prince issued an order for another great vegetarian banquet to be laid on.
Each of the officials high and low in the palace expressed his gratitude, and Monkey asked for butchers to slaughter the six lions who were still alive, skin them like the tawny lion, and prepare their meat to be eaten.
The prince, who was delighted with this proposal, gave the order for them to be killed.
One animal was kept for the inside and outside palace staff, one was given to the chief administrator and the other officials in the palace, and the flesh of the other five was cut into lumps weighing one or two ounces that officers distributed among the soldiers and civilians inside and outside the city wall so that they could all eat a little. Thus the people could both try the taste and overcome their fear.
Every single household was most impressed.
Journey to the West By now the smiths had made the three weapons and were kowtowing to Monkey, saying, "My lord, we have finished our work." "How heavy are they?" Monkey asked.
"The gold−banded cudgel weighs a thousand pounds," the smiths replied, "and the nine−toothed rake and the demon−quelling staff each eight hundred pounds." "That'll do," said Monkey, who then had the three princes asked to come out.
As each took his weapon they said to the senior prince, "Your Royal Highness, our weapons have now been finished." "They almost cost both your father and yourselves their lives," the senior prince replied.
"Thanks to our divine teachers' powers," the young princes said, "we were all saved and the evil spirits have been wiped out. We'll have no trouble from them in future.
Now this really is a world at peace with calm seas and rivers running clear." The four princes then rewarded the smiths and went to the Gauze Pavilion to thank the teachers.
Sanzang told the Great Sage and the other two to pass on some more martial skills quickly so as not to delay their journey.
The three of them all swung their weapons in the palace yard as they taught the secrets one by one.
Within a few days the three young princes were all skilled performers. They also mastered all the seventy−two routines of attack, retreat and fast and slow fighting.
This was firstly because the princes were all thoroughly determined, and secondly because the Great Sage Sun had given them the divine strength beforehand that enabled them to lift and move the thousand−pound cudgel and the eight−hundred−pound rake and staff.
There was all the difference in the world between their present skills and those they had had before, and there is a poem that goes:
When they celebrated their fortune in finding divine teachers They never expected their studies to alert a lion spirit.
With evil destroyed the country was at peace; The frontier was settled as all were devoted to the one Entity.
Ninefold Numinosity's powers lasted through their many clashes Till the Way was achieved with all−round expertise.
The brilliant teaching would be passed on for ever, And Yuhua know eternal peace and joy.
The prince then gave another great banquet to thank the three teachers, and a huge dish of gold and silver was brought out as a reward.
"Take it straight back inside," Monkey said with a smile, "take it straight back.
We're monks, and that's no use to us." "We really can't take gold or silver," put in Pig who was standing beside him, "but the lion spirits tore our clothes to ribbons.
If you could give us a change of clothing that would be very kind of you." The prince Journey to the West ordered his tailors to fetch some bolts of blue, red and brown brocade and make each of them a garment after the style and colours of their old ones.
The three of them were delighted to accept and put on their new brocade tunics, after which they packed up the luggage and set off on their way again.
Everyone inside and outside the city, whether young or old, exclaimed that they were arhats and living Buddhas come down to earth.
Crowds packed the streets to the sound of drums and music, and banners flew overhead.
Indeed: From the gate of every family the incense smoke arose; At every household's door coloured lanterns hung in rows.
The people only went back after seeing them for a long way along their journey. Only then did the four travelers manage to leave the city and head West.
By leaving they shook off all thought and immersed their hearts in the True Achievement.
Indeed: Free from thought and worry, the Buddha's land they seek, Going faithfully, sincerely, towards the Vulture Peak.
If you do not know how much further the journey was to be or when it was to end, listen to the explanation in the next installment.
Admiring the Moon Festival Lanterns in Jinping The Tang Priest Confesses in Dark Essence Cave Where should one strive to practice dhyana? Swiftly to extirpate the misdeeds of the thought−horse and the mind−ape.
When they are firmly tethered they give off radiance, But whoever halts falls to the three paths of suffering.
If one allows the divine elixir to leak away, The jade−pure nature will wither as one slackens.
Anger, joy and worry must all be swept away: When the wonderful mystery is gained it seems like nothing.
Journey to the West The story tells how the Tang Priest and his three disciples left the city of Yuhua and had a very easy journey in what really was a land of paradise.
When they had been travelling for five or six days another city appeared.
"Where is this?" the Tang Priest asked Brother Monkey.
"It's a city," Monkey replied, "but there are no flags on the poles above the city wall and I don't know this area, so I'll ask when we get closer." When they reached the Eastern suburb they found it noisy with bars and tea−houses and bustling with a rice market and oil shops.
Some idlers who were wandering in the streets with nothing better to do crowded round for a better look when they saw Pig's long snout, Friar Sand's black face and Monkey's red eyes, but they dared not come any closer to question the travelers.
The Tang Priest was sweating with the worry that they would provoke trouble as they crossed several more streets and had still not yet reached the city wall.
Then they saw a monastery gate over which were the words CLOUDS OF COMPASSION MONASTERY.
"What about going in here to give the horse a rest and take a meal?" the Tang Priest suggested, to which Monkey replied, "Splendid, splendid." The four of them then went inside, and this is what they saw:
Splendid, towering buildings, Gleaming bases for statues..
The Buddha hall rise above the clouds; The monks' cells lie in the moonlit silence.
Red mists circle the stupas; In the shade of jade−green trees the scripture−wheel is cool.
This is a true Pure Land, Another Naga Palace, Where purple mists surround the Mahavira Hall.
The cloisters are never empty of people enjoying the sights, And visitors climb the pagoda that is always open.
Incense burns in the stand at every moment, And lamps shine on the altar through the night.
A golden bell rings rhythmically in the abbot's lodgings As monks worship the Buddha by reciting sutras.
Journey to the West As the four of them looked around a monk came along the cloister and said to the Tang Priest with polite gestures of greeting, "Where have you come from, Teacher?" "From the Tang Court in China," the Tang Priest replied, at which the monk went down on his knees to kowtow, only to be quickly helped up by the Tang Priest, who asked, "Why do you perform this great courtesy, reverend abbot?" "All the lovers of goodness here who read the sutras and recite the name of the Buddha hope to achieve rebirth in your land of China, so that when I saw you coming in your magnificent mitre and robes I was certain that your present splendor must be the result of your successful cultivation in earlier lives.
That's why it is right to kowtow to you." "It alarmed me," said the Tang Priest with a smile, "it alarmed me. I am only an itinerant monk, and know no splendor at all.
To be able to live at your leisure and ease as you do, abbot, is real bliss." The monk then led the Tang Priest to worship the Buddha statues in the main hall. It was only now that Sanzang called for his disciples.
After seeing their master start talking to the monk, Monkey and the other two had been standing in a group with their faces averted, holding the horse's bridle and looking after the luggage, so that the monk had not noticed them.
But when they turned round on hearing the Tang Priest's call the sight of them so frightened the monk that he called out, "My lord, why are your distinguished disciples so hideously ugly?" "Ugly they may be," the Tang Priest replied, "but they do have some magical powers.
I have been very grateful for their protection all the way along the journey." As they were speaking more monks came out to greet them.
The monk who had been the first to welcome the visitors explained to the others, "This teacher has come from Great Tang in China, and these three gentlemen are his distinguished disciples." "Teacher," said the others with mixed pleasure and apprehension, "why have you come here from Great China?" "I have been commanded by the Tang emperor to worship the Buddha and seek the scriptures in the Western Heaven," Sanzang replied.
"As I was passing this way I have come to your monastery to ask where we are and take a vegetarian meal before setting out again." The monks were all delighted, and they invited the visitors into the abbot's lodgings, where there were some more monks who were performing ceremonies on behalf of benefactors.
The monk who had met them first went on to explain to the others, "Come and have a look at what people from China are like:
some are handsome and some are ugly.
The beauty of the handsome ones could never be caught in a painting or drawing, and the ugly ones look really weird." Both the monks and the benefactors all came to greet them, after which everyone sat down.
When tea had been drunk the Tang Priest inquired, "What is this fine country called?" "This is Jinping, one of the outer prefectures of India," the monks replied.
"How far is it from this prefecture to Vulture Peak?" the Tang Priest asked.
"It is about seven hundred miles from here to the capital," the monks replied, "and we have walked that distance.
As we haven't gone further Journey to the West West to Vulture Peak we don't know how far that is and would not like to make a wild guess." The Tang Priest thanked them.
A little later a vegetarian meal was provided, after which the Tang Priest wanted to be on his way, only to be pressed to stay by the monks and the benefactors who said, "Teacher, you must stay for a couple of days or so.
Enjoy the Full Moon Festival before you go on your way." "On my journey I have only been aware of mountains and rivers and the danger of running into ogres or monsters," the Tang Priest replied, "and I have lost my sense of time. I don't know when Full Moon is." "It's because your heart is so set on worshipping the Buddha and on enlightenment that you have not thought about it, Teacher," the monks replied.
"Today is the thirteenth of the first month and the lanterns will be tried out tonight.
The day after tomorrow is the fifteenth, when the festival begins, and it goes on till the lanterns are put away on the eighteenth or nineteenth.
We enjoy celebrations here and our prefect, who cares for the people, has lanterns set out everywhere and music played all night.
We also have a Bridge of Golden Lamps−−it's an ancient tradition that still flourishes.
If you will stay for a few days, my lords, our monastery can certainly afford to entertain you." The Tang Priest had no choice but to stay.
As the bell and drum in the Buddha hall resounded to the skies the faithful came in from the streets bringing lanterns to present to the Buddha.
The Tang Priest and the rest of them came out of the abbot's lodgings to look at the lanterns, after which everyone turned in.
The next day, when they had eaten the vegetarian breakfast the monks of the monastery brought them, they strolled in the garden at the back.
It really was a lovely place: It is the first month of the year, The beginning of the spring.
The wooded garden is quiet and elegant; The beauty of the scene subdued.
Throughout the four seasons flowers and trees contend; Turquoise peaks rise behind each other.
Fragrant flowers are growing before the steps, And scent comes from the plum−tree's branches.
Where there is red it joins the tender peach blossom; Where there is green it mingles with the willows' fresh green.
Forget about the splendor of the Gold Valley Garden; Say nothing of the Wang River landscapes painted by Wang Wei.
In the flowing stream Journey to the West The wild ducks bob and rise; Among bamboos by the thousand Poets ponder their choice of words.
Tree and herbaceous peonies, myrtle, fleeting−smile flowers, That waken when their time is due; Camellias, red plum blossom, winter jasmine and daphne, All early to open out their beauty.
The snow piled by the hidden cliff seems frozen solid still; The clouds that drift by the distant trees already bring early traces of spring.
The deer sees its reflection beside the pool; Cranes come to hear the lute beneath the pines.
A few halls and pavilions to East and West, Where travelers may stay; Buildings and pagodas to North and South Where monks may meditate in peace.
Among the flowers Are one or two houses to nourish one's nature, Where double eaves rise above each other.
Amid the hills and streams Are three or four cells in which to reline magic, Peaceful and light.
This is indeed a natural spot for a recluse: Why look elsewhere for the earthly paradise?
After a day enjoying the garden they inspected the lanterns in the Buddha hall before going to look at the lantern festival.
This is what they saw: Journey to the West A splendid city of agate, A fairyland of glass; Palaces of crystal and mica, Like layer upon layer of brocade, Openwork carving behind openwork carving.
The dazzling bridge of stars moved heaven and earth While trees of fire made waves of red Flutes and drums played in the streets.
A moon like a ring of jade hung over a thousand gates; Fragrant breezes blew through ten thousand homes.
There were giant turtle peaks soaring on high, Fishes and dragons emerging from the sea, Phoenixes sporting in the sky.
As all admired the moon and the lanterns The atmosphere was full of harmony.
Among the crowds dressed in fine silks All enjoyed the songs and panpipes.
Carriages rumbled along. There was no end of beautiful faces, Dashing gallants, And marvellous sights.
When Sanzang and the others had looked at the lanterns in the monastery they wandered around the streets of the Eastern suburb, not going back to bed till the second watch in the middle of the night.
The next day Sanzang said to the monks, "I made a vow to sweep pagodas, and on the occasion of tonight's Moon Festival I would like to ask the reverend abbot to open the doors of the pagoda to allow me to fulfil this vow." The monks opened the doors, and when Friar Sand fetched his cassock and brought it to him on the ground floor he put it over his shoulders and prayed to the Buddha.
Then he swept the ground floor with a broom, took the cassock off and gave it back to Friar Sand.
He swept the second story next, and so on story by story till he reached the top.
In every story there was a Buddha, and in each one he opened all the windows, Journey to the West swept the floor, and enjoyed the splendid views.
By the time he had finished sweeping and come down again it was late and all the lamps had been lit.
It was now the night of the full moon.
"Venerable teacher," the monks said, "last night you only saw the lamps in our humble monastery and the outskirts of the city.
As tonight is the main festival why don't we go into the city to see the golden lamps there?" The Tang Priest was glad to follow this suggestion, and he went with his three disciples and the monks of the monastery into the city to see the lanterns.
Indeed: On the festive fifteenth night The harmony of spring begins with the first full moon.
Decorated lanterns hang in the busy markets As all sing the songs of a world at peace.
Over the lantern light in streets and markets The moon's round mirror rises in the sky Like a silver dish, driven by the charioteer Ping Yi.
The lanterns were like a brocade carpet woven by fairies; The lanterns were reflected by the moon, Doubling its brilliance; The moon shone on the lanterns, Making them resplendent.
There was no end of iron−chain star bridges, Lantern flowers and trees of fire.
Snowflake lanterns, Plum−blossom lanterns, Like fragments of ice in spring; Embroidered screen lanterns, Painted screen lanterns, Made up from every color.
Walnut lanterns, Journey to the West Lotus lanterns, Hung high on lantern towers; Blue lion lanterns, White elephant lanterns, Fixed on lofty frames.
Shrimp lanterns, Terrapin lanterns, Placed in front of awnings; Goat lanterns, Hare lanterns, Bringing the eaves to life.
Eagle lanterns, Phoenix lanterns, Lined up next to each other; Tiger lanterns, Horse lanterns, Being carried along together.
Red−crowned crane lanterns, White deer lanterns, Carrying the Star of Longevity; Goldfish lanterns, Whale lanterns, On which rode the poet Li Bai.
Giant turtle mountain lanterns, Where gods and immortals gathered; Revolving horse lanterns Journey to the West On which warriors joined combat.
The towers of lanterns on thousands of houses Made a world of clouds and smoke for several miles.
On one side, shining reins and flying jade saddles; On the other, rumbling carriages leave fragrance behind.
On the red balcony, Leaning against the railings, Behind the curtains, Shoulder to shoulder, Hand in hand, Pairs of beauties were eager for the fun.
By the bridge over green waters, Noisy, Many−coloured, Drunken, Laughing Couples enjoyed the brilliant sights.
All of the city's flutes and drums were playing; Panpipes and songs went on all night.
There is also this poem as evidence:
Amid the fine brocades, of lotus were the songs; This blessed land at peace was full of many throngs.
The lanterns and the moon upon this festive night Foretold rich harvests after rain and wind just right. Journey to the West This was a night when the curfew was relaxed, so that there were huge crowds and a great commotion.
People were dancing, walking on stilts, wearing masks and riding elephants, pushing and crowding to East and to West as they looked all around.
When they reached the bridge of golden lamps the Tang Priest and the monks pushed forward for a look and saw that it consisted of three golden lamps each the size of a water vat and shaped like a two−storied pavilion with a light shining out through intricate gold and silver filigree openwork.
Glazed ceramic tiles inside the lamps reflected their light. They were so bright they outshone the moon, and their oil was very fragrant.
"What sort of oil do those lamps burn?" the Tang Priest asked the monks, "and why does it smell so remarkably good?" "You wouldn't know that, Teacher," the monks replied.
"There is a county near this prefecture called Mintian. In the whole county there are 240 wards, and when we have our annual assignment of jobs to be done for the state, 240 households have to provide oil.
All the other jobs assigned by the prefecture or county are reasonable enough, but these oil households have a very hard time. Every household has to take it on for a year, and it costs them over two hundred ounces of silver.
The oil isn't ordinary oil but perfumed refined butter oil.
One ounce costs two ounces of silver and a pound costs thirty−two ounces.
Each of the lamps holds five hundred pounds of oil, making 1,500 pounds for the three of them, costing 48,000 ounces of silver.
With other miscellaneous expenses it comes to over 50,000 ounces. And that only lasts three nights." "How can so much oil be used up in only three nights?" Monkey asked.
"In each lamp there are forty−nine big wicks about the size of an egg made of rushes wrapped in silk floss," the monks explained.
"When they have burned for one night the Lord Buddhas appear, the oil all vanishes and the lamp goes out." "I suppose the Lord Buddhas take all the oil," said Pig with a grin as he stood at one side.
"That's right," the monks replied, "that's what everyone in the city has always said ever since ancient times.
If the oil runs dry they say that the Buddhas have taken the oil and the crops will certainly be bountiful; but if it doesn't dry up on one occasion there will be famine, drought and the wrong weather at the wrong time in that year.
That's why everyone makes this offering." As they were talking there was the howling of a wind up in the air, sending everyone who was admiring the lanterns fleeing in terror.
The monks could not hold their ground either. "Let's go back, venerable teacher," they said, "the wind's here.
It's the Lord Buddhas bringing blessings. They're here to see the lanterns." "How can you tell that?" the Tang Priest asked.
"It's the same every year," the monks replied. "The wind blows up before the third watch.
Everybody gets out of the way as they know that it is the Lord Buddhas bringing down blessings." "I am one who thinks of, invokes and worships Buddhas," the Tang Priest said.
"If the Buddhas are honoring us with their presence on this festive occasion it would be wonderful to be able to worship them." He rejected the monks' repeated urgings to go back, and a little later the forms of three Buddhas appeared in the wind and approached the lamps.
The Tang Priest was so excited that he ran to the top of the lamp bridge and threw himself down worship.
Journey to the West Brother Monkey rushed forward in alarm to drag him to his feet and say, "They're no good, Master.
I'm sure they're evil." Before the words were even out of his mouth the lamps all went out as with a great whoosh the Tang Priest was swept up by the wind.
It was terrible! Who knew what evil monsters from what cave in what mountain had been posing as Buddhas to watch the golden lamps?
Pig and Friar Sand were thrown into such panic that they rushed all about, searching and calling for their master.
"Brothers," called Monkey, "no use shouting here.
The master's bliss has turned to disaster.
He's been carried off by evil spirits." "How can you tell that, my lord," the appalled monks asked.
"You're just a bunch of mortals," Monkey replied with a grin, "so you haven't realized what's been happening all these years. The evil spirits have fooled you into thinking they're true Buddhas coming down to accept the offerings of lamps.
The Buddhas that appeared when the wind blew just now were three evil spirits.
My master didn't realize who they were, so he went up on the top of the bridge to worship them. They covered up all the lights and carried him off together with the oil in the lamps.
As I was a bit too late the three of them got away by wind." "Brother," said Friar Sand, "Whatever are we to do?" "Not a moment to lose," said Monkey.
"You two go back the monastery with the monks and look after the horse and the luggage.
I'm going after them while this wind's still blowing." The splendid Great Sage then shot up by his somersault cloud into mid air, picked up the stench of the wind and headed Northeast in pursuit, carrying on till all of a sudden the wind dropped at dawn.
A great mountain could be seen, a most steep, towering and splendid mountain: Many a foothill and ravine, Twisting and bending streams.
Creepers hang from the beetling precipice, Pine and cypress rise from the lonely rock.
Cranes cry in the morning mists, Wild geese call among the clouds at dawn.
Jutting peaks like a row of halberds, Jagged crags of interlocking rocks.
The summits rise to eighty thousand feet, And sheer−walled ridges make a thousand angles.
Wild flowers and noble trees all flourish with the spring; Journey to the West Cuckoo and oriole respond to the scenery with song.
Majestic beauty, Towering grandeur, Steep, grotesque crags hard to climb.
One will stay there long in silence: All that can be heard are tigers and leopards breathing.
River deer and white deer wander around; Jade−coloured hares and gray wolves come and go.
The stream in the deep ravine will flow for a million miles; Twisting torrents splash loud against the rocks.
While the Great Sage was on the top of a scar looking for his way he saw four people coming from the Western slopes driving three goats and all shouting, "New Year." Monkey's fiery eyes with their golden pupils flashed as he took a closer look to see that they were the four Duty Gods of the year, the month, the day and the hour in disguise.
The Great Sage then pulled out his iron cudgel, shook it till it was as thick as a ricebowl and about twelve feet long and sprang down from the cliff with a shout of, "Where are you skulking off to like that, trying to hide your faces?" When the four Duty Gods realized that he had rumbled them they at once turned back into their normal selves, kowtowed beside the path and said, "Forgive us, Great Sage, forgive us." "Just because I haven't had any jobs for you recently you thought I was getting lax and so you've all become very casual," Monkey said. "You didn't even greet me. It's outrageous!
Why aren't you giving my master your secret protection?
Where are you going?" "Because your master somewhat forgot his dhyana nature and was so eager to enjoy himself in the Clouds of Compassion Monastery in Jinping Prefecture," the Duty Gods said, "he met with evil at the height of splendor, his joy turned to disaster, and he was captured by the evil spirits.
The Defenders of the Faith are looking after him at the moment.
We realized that you would be coming after him this very night, Great Sage, and we came here to report to you in case you did not know the mountains and forests here." "If you were here to report," said Brother Monkey, "why did you disguise your identities, why were you driving three goats, and what were you shouting and yelling for?" "The three goats were for luck at the beginning of the year.
They are to drive away the evil that's obstructing your master." Journey to the West Monkey had been absolutely determined to beat them, but on hearing this explanation he let them off and put his cudgel away as his fury turned to delight. "Are there evil spirits on this mountain?" he asked.
"Yes," they replied, "yes.
This mountain is called Green Dragon Mountain and there's a cave in it called the Dark Essence Cave where three evil spirits live. The oldest is called King Cold−avoider, the second is called King Heat−avoider and the third is called King Dust−avoider.
They've lived here for a thousand years and have been fond of refined butter oil since they were children. Ever since they became spirits some years ago they've been pretending to be Buddhas to trick the officials and people of Jinping into setting out those golden lamps full of the refined butter oil that they take in their Buddha guises in the middle of every first month.
When they saw your master this time they realized that he was a holy monk and carried him off to the cave too. Any day now they'll slice off his flesh to fry in the refined butter.
You must use your skills to save him as soon as possible." On hearing this Monkey dismissed the four Duty Gods with a shout and went round the mountain looking for the cave.
Within a mile or two he saw a rock face by a gill, at the foot of which was a stone building with a pair of stone doors that stood ajar.
Beside the doors was a stone tablet on which was inscribed GREEN DRAGON MOUNTAIN DARK ESSENCE CAVE Not daring to go in uninvited, Monkey stopped and called, "Give me my master back at once, monster." With a great noise the doors burst wide open, and out rushed a crowd of bull−headed demons who glared as they asked, "Who are you, yelling here like that?" "I'm the senior disciple of the holy monk Tang Sanzang who's come from Great Tang in the East to fetch scriptures," Monkey replied.
"He was looking at the lanterns in Jinping along our way when your chief demons carried him off here.
Give him back at once if you want me to spare your lives.
If you don't I'll turn our den upside−down and turn all you demons into just pus and blood." As soon as the junior demons heard this they rushed inside to report, "Disaster, Your Majesties, disaster!" The three old evil spirits had taken Sanzang into the depths of the cave and with no further ado were telling their underlings to strip him and wash him with water from the torrent. They were just about to have him sliced and diced into tiny pieces to fry in the refined butter when they heard the report of disaster from outside.
The oldest demon king asked with some alarm what had happened.
"There's a hairy−faced monk who looks like a thunder god outside," the junior devils replied. "He's shouting that Your Majesties carried his master here and wants him given back straight away if our lives are to be spared.
Otherwise he'll turn our den upside−down and turn us all into pus and blood." This news shocked the demon kings, who all said, "We've only just caught the wretch, and haven't even asked him his name and his background.
Little ones, dress him again and bring him here to be questioned.
We must find out who he is and where he's from." A crowd of devils untied the Tang Priest, put his clothes back on and pushed him to before the thrones, where he fell to his knees, trembling with fear, and pleaded, "Spare my life, Your Majesties, spare my life." Journey to the West "Where are you from, monk?" the three evil spirits said, all talking at once, "and why did you rush into the way of our clouds instead of avoiding the Buddha images?" "I have been sent by the Great Tang Emperor in the East to worship the Lord Buddha and fetch the scriptures from the Great Thunder Monastery in India," Sanzang replied with kowtows.
"When I went into the Clouds of Compassion Monastery for a vegetarian meal the monks there pressed me to stay to see the lanterns at the Moon Festival.
Seeing Your Majesties appearing as Buddhas from the bridge of golden lamps I kowtowed to you because my mortal eyes took you for real Buddhas.
That's why I got in the way of your clouds, Your Majesties." "How long was the journey from your country in the East to here?" the evil spirits asked.
"How many people have you got with you?
What are they called?
Tell us the truth straight away and we'll spare your life." "My secular name was Chen Xuanzang," the Tang Priest replied, "and I was a monk in the Jinshan Monastery from boyhood.
Later I was given official rank as a monk in the Hongfu Monastery in Chang'an.
When the minister Wei Zheng beheaded the Dragon King of the River Jing in his dream and the Tang emperor came back to life after his travels in the underworld, a Great Land and Water Mass was held for the rebirth of souls. The Tang emperor chose me to officiate at this ceremony and expound the great principles.
The Bodhisattva Guanyin appeared during the mass and informed me that in the Thunder Monastery in the Western Heaven there are three stores of true scriptures that can carry the dead up to Heaven. I was sent to fetch them and given the title Sanzang, or "Three Stores." As I use Tang as my surname people call me Tang Sanzang.
I have three disciples.
The first one is called Sun Wukong the Novice, and he is the Great Sage Equaling Heaven who has been converted to the truth." This news came as a shock to the evil spirits, who asked, "Did this Great Sage Equaling Heaven make great havoc in Heaven five hundred years ago?" "Yes, yes," the Tang Priest said.
"The second one is called Zhu Wuneng or Zhu Bajie. He is Marshal Tian Peng come down to earth.
The third is Sha Wujing, or Friar Sand, the Curtain−lifting General in mortal reincarnation." "It's as well we haven't eaten him yet," the evil spirits all exclaimed in horror.
"Little ones, lock the Tang Priest in iron chains at the back. When we've caught his three disciples we'll eat them together." They then mustered a force of armed yak, water−buffalo and ox spirits to go outside carrying bugles, waving banners and beating drums.
Once the three evil spirits were fully clad in their armor they went out and shouted, "Who's that who dares come here shouting like that?" Monkey slipped round behind the scar to have a good look, and this is what the evil spirits were like:
Multi−coloured faces, round eyes, Towering horns.
Four sharp−pointed ears, Neat and shining bright.
Bodies patterned like a painting, Journey to the West Covered with brocades that shine like fireflies.
The first one wore a hat of foxes' fur And hot steam rose from the long hairs of his face.
The second wore a flaming cloak of lightest gauze And had four gleaming, jade−like hooves.
The third had a mighty roar like thunder; His sharp and pointed fangs were just like silver needles.
Each was brave and fierce As they carried their three weapons; One used a battle−axe, One was an expert in the cutlass, And the third had a knotted flail resting on his shoulders.
The other evil spirits, tall and short, fat and thin, senior and junior, were all cattle−headed monsters carrying spears or clubs.
There were three big banners clearly inscribed with the words "King Cold−avoider," "King Heat−avoider" and "King Dust−avoider." After looking at all this for a while Monkey lost his patience and went up to them with a shout of, "Can you recognize Monkey, thieving damned ogres?" "Are you the Sun Wukong who made havoc in Heaven?" the evil spirits shouted back.
"It really is a case of I heard your name before I saw your face: The sight of that would bring the gods disgrace.
So all you are is a macaque." "I'll get you, you lamp−oil thieves," Monkey retorted in high dudgeon. "Don't talk such rubbish, you smooth−tongued monsters.
Give my master back at once." With that he advanced and swung his iron cudgel, to be parried by the old demons who raised their weapons to meet the blow.
A splendid fight ensued in the mountain hollow: Battle−axe, cutlass and flail Journey to the West Met by the Monkey King's lone cudgel.
Cold−avoider, Heat−avoider and Dust−avoider Had heard of the Great Sage Equaling Heaven.
When the cudgel rose it scared demons and gods; Axe and cutlass hacked and flew.
A primal dharma image of true emptiness Holding off three demons masquerading as Buddhas.
Their noses all greasy with this year's stolen oil, They tried to snatch the monk sent by the emperor.
One for his master's sake feared not the lengthy road; The others in their greed had lamps offered every year.
All that could be beard was clash of axe and cutlass And the noisy clatter of the cudgel.
With clashes and lunges three fought against one As each showed his skill with blocks and parries.
They fought from dawn till almost nightfall And a victor had yet to emerge in the struggle.
By the time Monkey's cudgel had gone 150 rounds with the three demons it was nearly evening and the outcome was still in doubt.
Then Dust−avoider sprang forward from the ranks with a swing of his flail and waved a flag, whereupon the crowd of cattle−headed demons swarmed round Monkey, encircling him and swinging wildly at him with their weapons.
Seeing that things were going badly, Monkey set off his somersault cloud and fled in a whoosh.
The demons did not go after him but called their devils back so that everyone could have an evening meal.
They told the junior devils to take a bowl of food to Sanzang as well: he was not to be dealt with until Monkey had been caught.
As the master was a lifelong vegetarian and was besides feeling miserable he sobbed and let none of the food touch his lips.
The story tells how Monkey rode his cloud back to the Clouds of Compassion Monastery and called, "Brothers." Journey to the West On hearing this Pig and Friar Sand, who were waiting for him and discussing what to do, came out together to greet him with the words, "Brother, why are you only back now after being away all day?
What's happened to the master?" "I followed the smell of the wind right through the night till we got to a mountain and it disappeared," Monkey replied with a smile.
"Luckily the four Duty Gods told me that the mountain's called Green Dragon Mountain and that there's a Dark Essence Cave on it where three evil spirits live: King Cold−avoider, King Heat−avoider and King Dust−avoider.
They've been stealing the oil here for years on end by disguising themselves as Buddhas to trick the officials of Jinping Prefecture.
When they came across us this year they wickedly carried our master off with them.
I told the Duty Gods and the rest of them to give the master some secret protection while I shouted insults at them from outside their doors.
When the three demons came out they all looked like bullheaded demons.
The first of them fought with a battle−axe, the second with a cutlass and the third with a flail.
They had a whole gang of cattle−headed monsters with them, waving banners and beating drums.
The fight went on all day and was still in the balance when one of the demon kings waved a flag to bring all the junior devils forward.
As it was late and I was worried that I couldn't beat them I came back by somersault cloud." "I reckon it must be the Demon King of Fengdu who's making trouble for you," said Pig.
"What makes you guess that?" Friar Sand asked.
"I can tell because our big brother said they were all cattle−headed monsters," replied Pig with a laugh.
"No, no," said Monkey.
"I saw them and they were all rhinoceros spirits." "If they're rhinos we've just got to catch them and saw their horns off," said Pig.
"They'll be worth quite a bit of silver." As they were talking the monks all asked Monkey if he had eaten any supper.
"I'll have something if it's no trouble," Brother Monkey replied, "but I can do without just as well." "Surely you're hungry after fighting all day, my lord," the monks said.
"You can't get hungry in a mere day," Monkey laughed.
"I once went without food for five hundred years." The monks did not know whether he was telling the truth or joking, and a little later food was brought in that Monkey ate, after which he said, "Tidy up and go to sleep.
We'll go and fight them again tomorrow and capture the demon kings so as to rescue the master." "What nonsense, brother," said Friar Sand, who was standing to one side.
"As the saying goes, 'Delay brings wisdom.' It'll be terrible if that monster stays awake tonight and murders the master.
We'd better go there right now and make such a row that he can't do anything.
It may go badly wrong if we lose a single moment." When Pig heard this he braced himself and said, "Friar Sand's right. Let's go and put down those demons.
The moon's bright enough." Accepting their advice, Monkey left his instructions with the monks of the monastery. "Look after the luggage and the horse. When we've captured the evil spirits we'll bring them back here to prove to the prefect that they're imposters. Then he can end the oil levy and relieve the common people of this hardship.
That'll be a good thing, won't it?" The monks all accepted their orders while the three of them left the city by auspicious cloud.
Indeed: Journey to the West Idleness and unrestraint Threw the dhyana into confusion; Danger and catastrophe Led the Way−heart into delusion.
If you don't know who was to win this encounter listen to the explanation in the next installment.
Three Monks Wage a Great Fight on Green Dragon Mountain Four Stars Seize the Rhinoceros Monsters The story tells how after the Great Sage Monkey took his two brother disciples by gale and cloud to the Northeast they were soon bringing their cloud down at the entrance to the Dark Essence Cave on Green Dragon Mountain. Pig was just about to smash the doors in when Monkey said, "Wait a moment.
I'll go in and find out whether the master's still alive before we have it out with him." "But the doors are shut very tightly," said Friar Sand.
How will you get in?" "I've got my methods," Monkey replied.
The splendid Great Sage then put his cudgel away, made a spell with his fingers while saying the magic words, called "Change!" and turned into a fire−fly. He was really nimble.
Just look at him: Wings that shine like shooting stars: The ancients say fire−flies grow from rotting plants.
His powers of transformation are truly great, And he loves to wander all around.
When he flies to the stone doors to look within A draft blows through the crack beside him.
A single jump and he is in the dark courtyard, Watching the movements of the evil spirits.
Journey to the West As he flew in he saw some cattle sprawled around on the ground, fast asleep and snoring like thunder.
In the main hall nothing was moving, and all the doors were closed.
Not knowing where the three evil spirits were sleeping, he went through the hall and shone with his light into the back, where he heard sobs.
The Tang Priest was chained to a pillar under the eaves at the back and weeping.
Monkey kept out of sight as he listened to what he was crying about, and this is what he heard: "Since I left Chang'an in China some ten years back and more, I have had to suffer much crossing all those rivers and mountains.
I came out to the West at a very happy season, Arriving in the city for the festival of lanterns.
"I failed to understand that the Buddhas were impostors All because my fate seems to doom me to distress.
My disciples gave pursuit and will use their mighty powers:
I pray they will be able to achieve a great success." Delighted to hear this, Monkey spread his wings and flew closer to his master, who wiped away his tears and observed, "Goodness, the West really is different.
This is only the first month of the year, when dormant insects are just beginning to wake up.
Fancy seeing a fire−fly now!" "Master," said Brother Monkey, unable to keep quiet any longer, "I'm here." "I was just wondering how there could be a fire−fly at this time of year, and it's you," the Tang Priest replied with delight.
"Master," said Monkey, turning back into himself, "the journey's been held up so long and so much effort has been wasted because you can't tell true from false.
All the way along I've told you demons are no good, but you will kowtow to them. When those devils covered up the lamps to steal the refined butter oil they carried you off too.
I told Pig and Friar Sand to go back to the monastery and keep an eye on our things while I followed the smell of the wind here.
I didn't know what the place was called, but luckily the four Duty Gods told me that this is Dark Essence Cave on Green Dragon Mountain.
I fought the monsters all day long till I went back at evening, told my brother−disciples the full story, and came back here with them instead of going to bad.
As I thought it was too late at night to fight and didn't know where you were I transformed myself to come in and find out what's going on." "Are Pig and Friar Sand outside?" the happy Tang Priest asked.
"Yes," Monkey replied.
"I've just had a look around and seen that the evil spirits are all asleep.
I'll unlock you, smash the doors down and get you out." The Tang Priest nodded his head in gratitude.
Journey to the West Using his unlocking magic, Monkey made the lock open at a touch.
He was just leading his master to the front of the cave when the demon kings could be heard shouting from their bedrooms, "Shut the doors tight, little ones, and be careful of fire.
Why can't we hear the watchmen calling the watches?
Where are the clappers and bells?" After a day's hard fighting the junior demons were all asleep, exhausted; and they only woke up when they heard the shout. To the sound of clappers and bells several of them came out from the back holding weapons and beating gongs, and they just happened to bump into Monkey and his master.
"Where do you think you're going, my fine monks, now you've broken the locks?" the junior devils all shouted together, and with no further argument Monkey pulled out his cudgel, shook it to make it as thick as a rice bowl and struck, killing two of them at a blow.
The rest of them dropped their weapons, went to the central hall, beat on the doors and shouted, "Disaster, Your Majesties, disaster.
The hairy−faced monk's got inside and he's killing people." The moment the three demons heard this they tumbled out of their beds and ordered, "Catch them!
Catch them!" This gave the Tang Priest such a fright that his hands and legs turned weak.
Monkey abandoned him and stormed his way forward, swinging his cudgel.
The junior devils could not stop him as, pushing two or three aside here and knocking two or three over there, he smashed several pairs of doors open and rushed straight out, shouting, "Where are you, brothers?" Pig and Friar Sand greeted him, rake and staff raised for action, with the question, "What's up, brother?" Monkey told them all about how he had transformed himself to rescue the master, been found by the spirits when they woke up, and been forced to abandon him and fight his way out.
Now that they had recaptured the Tang Priest, the demon kings had him locked up in chains again and questioned him in the glare of lamplight, as they brandished cutlass and axe.
"How did you open the lock, damn you," they asked, "and how did that ape get inside?
Confess this moment and we'll spare your life, or else we'll cut you in half." This so terrified the Tang Priest that he fell to his knees shivering and shaking and said, "Your Majesties, my disciple Sun Wukong can do seventy−two kinds of transformations.
Just now he turned into a fire−fly and flew in to rescue me.
We never realized that Your Majesties would wake up or that we would bump into Their Junior Majesties.
My wicked disciple wounded a couple of them, and when they all started shouting and going for us with weapons and torches he abandoned me and escaped." "If we'd woken up earlier he'd never have got away," the three demon kings said with loud guffaws.
They then told their underlings to fasten the doors firmly at front and back and stop shouting.
"As they've shut the doors and stopped shouting I think they must be going to murder the master," said Friar Sand.
"We must act." "You're right," said Pig.
"Let's smash the doors," The idiot showed off his magical powers by smashing the stone doors to smithereens with a blow from his rake then shouted at the top of his voice, "Thieving, oil−stealing monsters!
Send my master out right now!" This gave the junior devils inside the doors such a fright that they tumbled and ran inside to report, "Disaster, Your Majesties, disaster.
The monks have smashed the front doors." Journey to the West "They're outrageous, damn them," the three demon kings said in a great fury, and when they had sent for their armor and fastened it on they took their weapons and led their underlings into battle.
It was now about the third watch of the night, and the moon in the middle of the sky made all as bright as day.
As they led their forces out they wasted no more words and started fighting.
Monkey held off the battle−axe, Pig blocked the cutlass, and Friar Sand took on the flail.
Three monks with cudgel, staff and rake; Three evil monsters both brave and angry.
The battle−axe, the cutlass and the flail Made howling winds and set the sand flying.
In their first clashes they breathed out baleful mists, Then as they flew around they scattered coloured clouds.
The nailed rake went through its routines round the body, The iron cudgel was even more splendidly heroic, And the demon−quelling staff was something rarely seen on earth; But the unrepentant ogres would not yield a foot of ground.
The bright−bladed axe had a sharp−pointed butt, The whirling flail made a pattern of flowers, And the flashing cutlass swung like a painted door; But the monks were their match.
One side was fighting with fury for their master's life; The other hit at their faces so as not to release the Tang Priest.
The axe hacked and the cudgel blocked in the struggle for mastery; The rake swung and the cutlass struck as they fought; The knotted flail and the demon−quelling staff, Coming and going in a splendid display.
Journey to the West When the three monks and the three monsters had been fighting for a long time without either side coming out on top King Cold−avoider shouted, "Come on, little ones!" The monsters all charged at Pig, quickly tripping him up and bringing him to the ground.
Several water−buffalo spirits dragged and pulled him inside the cave, where they tied him up.
When Friar Sand saw that Pig had disappeared and heard the mooing of all the cattle he then raised his staff, feinted at King Dust−avoider and tried to flee, only to be rushed by another crowd of spirits who pulled at him, sending him staggering.
However hard he struggled he could not get up, and he too was carried off to be tied up. Realizing that he was in an impossible situation, Monkey escaped by somersault cloud.
When Pig and Friar Sand were dragged to him the Tang Priest said with tears welling up in his eyes at the sight of them, "Poor things! You two have been caught too.
Where's Wukong?" "When he saw we'd been caught he ran away," Friar Sand replied.
"Wherever he has gone he will certainly have gone to fetch help," said the Tang Priest. "But who knows when we will be delivered?" Master and disciples felt thoroughly miserable.
The story tells how Brother Monkey rode his somersault cloud back to the Clouds of Compassion Monastery, where the monks met him with the question, "Have you been able to rescue Lord Tang?" "It's difficult," said Monkey, "very difficult.
Those three evil spirits have tremendous magical powers, and when we three had fought them for a long time they called up their underlings to capture Pig and Friar Sand.
I was lucky to get away." "My lord," said the monks with horror, "if someone who can ride mists and clouds as you can couldn't catch them, your master is bound to be killed." "No problem," Monkey replied, "no problem.
My master's under the secret protection of the Protectors, the Guardians, the Dings and the Jias. He has besides eaten Grass−returning Cinnabar. I'm sure his life will be safe. The only trouble is that those demons really know their stuff.
You people look after the horse and the luggage while I go up to Heaven to get some troops." "Can you go up to Heaven, my lord?" asked the terrified monks.
"I used to live there," replied Monkey with a smile.
"Because I wrecked the Peach Banquet when I was Great Sage Equaling Heaven, our Buddha subdued me, so that now I've no option but to redeem my crimes by guarding the Tang Priest while he fetches the scriptures. All along the journey I've been helping the good and fighting against the evil.
What you don't realize is that the master is fated to have these troubles." When the monks heard this they kowtowed in worship, while Monkey went outside and disappeared with a whistle.
The splendid Great Sage was soon outside the Western Gate of Heaven, where the Metal Planet, Heavenly King Virudhaka and the four spirit officers Yin, Zhu, Tao and Xu were talking to each other.
As soon as they saw Monkey coming they hastily bowed to him and said, "Where are you going, Great Sage?" "After we reached Mintian County in Jinping Prefecture on the Eastern borders of India," Monkey replied, "my master, the Tang Priest who I'm escorting, was being entertained by the monks of the Clouds of Compassion Monastery for the Full Moon Festival.
When we went to the Bridge of Golden Lamps there were three golden lamps full of over fifty thousand ounces of silver's worth of scented refined butter oil that the Buddhas came down to take every year.
While we were admiring the lamps three Buddha images did come Journey to the West down to earth, and my master was gullible enough to go on the bridge to worship them.
I told him they were a bad lot, but by then the lamps had been covered up and the master carried off with the oil by a wind.
When I'd followed the wind till dawn I reached a mountain, where the four Duty Gods fortunately told me that it was called Green Dragon Mountain with a Dark Essence Cave in it where three monsters lived:
King Cold−avoider, King Heat−avoider and King Dust−avoider.
I hurried to their doors to demand the master and fought them for a while without success, so I got in by transforming myself to find the master locked up but unharmed.
I released him and was just taking him out when they woke up and I had to flee again.
Later I fought hard against them with Pig and Friar Sand, but the two of them were both captured and tied up.
That's why I've come up to inform the Jade Emperor, find out about the monsters' background and ask him to give orders to have them suppressed." At this the Metal Planet burst out laughing and said, "If you've been fighting the monsters why can't you tell where they're from?" "I can see that," Monkey replied. "They're a bunch of rhino spirits.
But they have such enormous magical powers that I can't beat them and I'm desperate." "They are three rhinoceros spirits," the Metal Planet explained.
"Because their form is seen in heaven they cultivated their awareness for many years and became true spirits able to fly on clouds and walk in mists.
Those monsters are fanatical about cleanliness and don't like the look of their own bodies, and are always going into the water to bathe.
They have lots of different names: there are she−rhinos, he−rhinos, gelded rhinos, spotted rhinos, humao rhinos, duoluo rhinos and heaven−connected brindled rhinos.
They all have a single nostril, three types of hair and two horns. They roam the rivers and seas and can travel through water.
It looks as though Cold−avoider, Heat−avoider and Dust−avoider have nobility in their horns, which is why they call themselves kings.
If you want to catch them, they will submit to the four beast stars belonging to the element wood." "Which four wood stars?" Monkey asked.
"Could I trouble you, venerable sir, to spell it out for me?" "Those stars are spread out in space outside the Dipper and Bull Palace," the planet replied with a smile.
"If you submit a memorial to the Jade Emperor he will give you detailed instructions." Raising his clasped hands as he expressed his thanks, Monkey went straight in through the heavenly gates.
He was soon outside the Hall of Universal Brightness, where he saw the heavenly teachers Ge, Qiu, Zhang and Xu, who asked, "Where are you going?" "We've just reached Jinping Prefecture," Monkey replied, "where my master relaxed his dhyana nature by going to enjoy the Moon Festival lanterns and was carried off by evil monsters.
As I can't subdue them myself I've come to ask the Jade Emperor to save him." The four heavenly teachers then took Monkey to the Hall of Miraculous Mist to submit his memorial, and when all the ceremonials had been performed he explained his business.
The Jade Emperor then asked which units of heavenly soldiers he wanted to help him.
"When I arrived at the Western Gate of Heaven just now," Monkey replied, "the Metal Planet told me they were rhinoceros spirits that could only be subdued by the four beast stars belonging to the element wood." The Jade Emperor then told Heavenly Teacher Xu to go to the Dipper and Bull Palace with Monkey to fetch the four beast stars and take them down to the lower world to make the capture.
By the time they arrived outside the Dipper and Bull Palace the Twenty−eight Constellations were there to greet them.
"We are here by imperial command to order four beast stars belonging to the element wood to go down to the lower world with the Great Sage Sun," the heavenly teacher explained.
The Wooden Lesser Dragon of the Constellation Horn, the Wooden Unicorn of the Dipper, the Wooden Wolf of the Strider, and Journey to the West the Wooden Hyena of the Well all stepped forward from the side to ask, "Where are you sending us to subdue demons, Great Sage?" "So you're the ones," said Brother Monkey with a smile.
"That old man Metal Planet kept your names secret, and I didn't realize what he was driving at.
If he'd told me before that it was you four wooden animals from the Twenty−eight Constellations I'd have come here to invite you myself:
there'd have been no need to trouble His Majesty for an edict." "What a thing to say, Great Sage," the four wooden animals replied. "We'd never have dared to leave on our own authority in the absence of an imperial decree.
Where are they?
Let's go right away." "They are rhinoceros spirits in the Dark Essence Cave in Green Dragon Mountain to the Northeast of Jinping Prefecture." "If they're really rhinoceros spirits," said the Wooden Unicorn of the Dipper, the Wooden Wolf of the Strider and the Wooden Lesser Dragon of the Horn, "you'll only need Wooden Hyena from the Well Constellation.
He can eat tigers on mountains and capture rhinos in the sea." "But these aren't ordinary rhinos who gaze at the moon," replied Monkey.
"They have cultivated their conduct and found the Way and are a thousand years old.
All four of you gentlemen must come: no excuses.
If one of you can't capture them single−handed it'll be wasted effort." "You people are talking nonsense," the heavenly teacher added.
"The imperial command is that all four of you go, so go you must.
Fly there at once while I report back." The heavenly teacher then took his leave of Monkey and went.
"Delay no more, Great Sage," the four wooden ones said. "You challenge them to battle and lure them out so we can come from behind you and get them." Monkey then went up to the cave and shouted abusively, "Oil−thieving ogres!
Give my master back!" The doors, which Pig had smashed open, had been barricaded with a few planks by a number of junior devils, and when they heard his insults they rushed inside to report, "Your Majesties, the monk Sun is outside insulting us again." "We beat him and he ran away," said Dust−avoider, "so why's he back again today?
I think he must have got some reinforcements from somewhere." "We're not scared of any reinforcements he could get," said Cold−avoider and Heat−avoider scornfully.
"Let's get into our armor at once.
Little ones, surround him carefully and don't let him get away." Not caring about their lives, the evil spirits came out of the cave holding spears and swords, with banners waving and drums beating. "Back again, are you, macaque?" they shouted at Brother Monkey.
"Not afraid of another beating?" Nothing infuriated Monkey so much as the word "macaque," and he was grinding his teeth in rage as he lifted his cudgel to hit them.
The three demon kings brought their junior devils up to surround him, at which the four wooden beasts who were waiting to one side swung their weapons with shouts of, "Don't move, animals!" The three demon kings were of course most alarmed at the sight of the four stars, and they all said, "This is terrible, terrible. He's found the people who can beat us.
Run for your lives, little ones!" With that there was much roaring, lowing, panting and sighing as the junior devils all resumed their original appearances as yak, water−buffalo and ox spirits running all over the mountain.
The three demon kings also turned back into their true selves, put their hands down to become four−hoofed creatures like iron cannons, and galloped off to the Northeast, to be followed hard by the Great Sage leading the Wooden Hyena of the Well and the Wooden Journey to the West Lesser Dragon of the Horn.
While they were not going to relax for a moment, the Wooden Unicorn of the Dipper and the Wooden Wolf of the Strider were mopping up all the cattle spirits among the hollows, summits, ravines and valleys of the Eastern mountain. Some were killed and others taken alive.
They then went into the Dark Essence Cave to free the Tang Priest, Pig and Friar Sand.
Recognizing the two stars, Friar Sand bowed to them in thanks and asked, "What brought you two gentlemen here to rescue us?" "We came to rescue you because the Great Sage Monkey submitted a request to the Jade Emperor that we be sent," the two stars replied.
"Why has my disciple Wukong not come in?" the Tang Priest asked with tears in his eyes.
"The three old demons are rhinoceroses," the stars explained, "and when they saw us they fled for their lives to the Northeast. The Great Sage Sun has gone after them with the Wooden Hyena of the Well and the Wooden Lesser Dragon of the Horn.
We two wiped out the oxen then came here to rescue you, holy monk." The Tang Priest once again kowtowed in thanks then kowtowed to heaven.
"Master," said Pig, "overdone courtesy is hypocrisy. Stop kowtowing all the time.
The four star officers came at the Jade Emperor's command and as a favour to big brother.
The ordinary demons have all been wiped out, but we still don't know how the senior demons are to be put down.
Let's clear all the valuables out of the cave, wreck the place so as to dig out their roots, then go back to the monastery to wait for Monkey." "Marshal Tian Peng, your suggestion is right," said the Wooden Wolf of the Strider.
"You and the Curtain−lifting General escort your master back to the monastery to sleep while we head Northeast to fight the enemy." "Yes, yes," said Pig.
"With you two to help you're bound to wipe them all out.
Then you'll be able to report back on your mission." The two star officers immediately joined the chase.
After Pig and Friar Sand had found a bushel of valuables in the cave−−there was much coral, agate, pearls, amber, precious shells, jade and gold−−they carried them outside and invited the master to sit on the top of a crag while they started a fire that burned the whole cave to ashes.
Only then did they take the master back to the Clouds of Compassion Monastery in Jinping Prefecture.
Indeed: The classic says, "Disaster comes at the height of success." Indeed one can meet with evil in happiness.
For love of the lanterns the dhyana nature was disturbed; The heart set on the Way was weakened by a beautiful sight.
The great elixir has always had to be permanently guarded; Once it is lost one always comes to grief.
Shut it up tight; bind it fast; never idle. A moment's lack of care can lead one astray.
Journey to the West We will tell not of how the three of them went back to the monastery, their lives saved, but of how the Wooden Unicorn of the Dipper and the Wooden Wolf of the Strider were riding their clouds Northeast in pursuit of the demons when they lost sight of them in mid air.
On reaching the Western Ocean they saw the Great Sage Monkey down by the sea a long way away, shouting.
"Where have the monsters gone, Great Sage?" they asked, bringing their clouds down.
"Why didn't you two come after them and help put them down?" Monkey replied.
"How can you have the nerve to ask that question?" "When we saw that you and the stars from the Well and the Horn had routed the demons and were going after them, Great Sage," the Wooden Unicorn of the Dipper replied, "we were sure you'd capture them, so we two wiped out the rest of the devils, rescued your master and fellow−disciples from the cave, searched the mountain, burned the cave out, and entrusted your master to your two fellow−disciples to take back to the Clouds of Compassion Monastery in the city.
We only came after you this way when you had been gone for such a long time." "In that case you did very well," said Brother Monkey, his wrath now turned to pleasure. "Thank you for going to so much trouble.
The only thing is that when we'd chased the three ogres this far they plunged into the sea.
The two stars from the Well and the Horn followed close behind them while I stayed on the shore to cut off their escape.
Now you're here you can block them on the shore while I go there." The splendid Great Sage then swung his cudgel and made a spell with his fingers as he cleared a way through the waters, plunging deep into the waves, where the three monsters were locked in a life−and−death struggle with the Wooden Hyena of the Well and the Wooden Lesser Dragon of the Horn.
"Monkey's here," he shouted, springing forward. The evil spirits could barely hold off the two star officers, so when they heard Monkey's great yell at this moment of crisis they turned and fled for their lives into the middle of the sea.
Their horns were very good at parting the waters, and they cleared their way through the sea with a whooshing noise, the two star officers and the Great Sage Monkey chasing after them.
A yaksha who was patrolling the Western Ocean with a shelled warrior saw from a distance the way the rhinoceroses were parting the waters, recognized Monkey and the two stars, and rushed back to the crystal palace to report to the dragon king in alarm, "Your Majesty, the Great Sage Equaling Heaven and two stars from the sky are chasing three rhinoceroses this way." When the old dragon king Ao Shun heard this he said to his heir, Prince Mo'ang, "Muster our water forces at once. I'm sure it must be the three rhinoceros spirits Cold−avoider, Heat−avoider and Dust−avoider who've provoked Sun the Novice. As they're in the sea now we'd better lend a hand." Having been given his orders Ao Mo'ang hastened to muster his troops.
A moment later a fully−armed force of tortoises, soft−shelled turtles, alligators, bream, mackerel, mandarin fish, carp, and prawn and crab soldiers charged out of the crystal palace shouting their battle−cries together to stop the rhinoceros spirits.
Unable to go any further forward, the rhinoceroses made a hasty retreat, only to find their escape blocked by the stars from the Well and the Horn as well as the Great Sage.
In their panic they failed to stay in a group, but scattered as they fled for their lives. Dust−avoider was soon surrounded by the old dragon king's men. A delighted Monkey called out, "Stop! Take him alive!
Don't kill him!" When Mo'ang heard this order he rushed forward, knocked Dust−avoider to the ground, put an iron hook through his snout and tied all his hoofs together.
Journey to the West The old dragon king then divided his forces into two to help the star officers capture the other two monsters.
As the young dragon prince led his men forward the Wooden Hyena of the Well reverted to his real form to hold Cold−avoider down and start eating him in big and little bites.
"Well Star!" Mo'ang shouted. "Don't kill him!
The Great Sage Monkey wants him alive, not dead." Mo'ang shouted several times, but by then the Hyena had already gnawed right through the monster's throat.
Mo'ang ordered his prawn and crab soldiers to carry the dead rhinoceros back to the palace of crystal, then joined the Wooden Hyena of the Well in the pursuit.
Heat−avoider, who was being driven back towards them by the Wooden Lesser Dragon of the Horn, ran straight into the star from the Well, at which Mo'ang ordered his tortoises, soft−shelled turtles and alligators to spread out in the winnowing−fan formation to encircle the monster.
"Spare me, spare me!" the monster pleaded.
The wooden Hyena of the Well sprang forward, grabbed the monster by the ear, seized his sword, and shouted, "I won't kill you. I won't kill you.
I'll take you to the Great Sage Monkey for him to deal with you." The troops then went back to the crystal palace, where they reported, "We've got them both." Monkey saw that one was lying headless and gory on the ground, while the other was being forced to kneel by the Wooden Hyena of the Well twisting his ear.
"That head wasn't cut off with a weapon," Monkey said on going up for a closer look.
"If I hadn't shouted so hard the star officer of the Well would have eaten the whole of him up," replied Mo'ang with a smile. "Very well then," said Monkey.
"In that case you'd better get a saw to cut off his horns and have his hide removed for us to take.
We'll leave the flesh for your worthy father the dragon king and yourself to enjoy." A chain was then run through Dust−avoider's nose for the Wooden Lesser Dragon of the Horn to lead him by, and the same was done to Heat−avoider for the Wooden Hyena of the Well.
"Take them to the prefect of Jinping," said Monkey.
"Investigate them, question them about all the years they masqueraded as Buddhas to harm the people, then off with their heads." They all then did as Monkey told them, taking their leave of the dragon king and his son and emerging from the Western Ocean, leading the rhinoceroses with them.
When they met the other two stars from the Strider and the Dipper they went by cloud straight back to Jinping Prefecture.
Here Monkey called out as he stood in mid air on a beam of auspicious light, "Mr. Prefect, subordinate officials, soldiers and civilians of Jinping, listen to what I say. We are holy monks sent by the Great Tang in the East to fetch the scriptures from the Western Heaven.
In this prefecture and its counties you have had to make offerings in golden lamps every year to these rhinoceros monsters pretending to be Buddhas coming down to earth.
When we came here and were admiring the lamps at the Moon Festival these monsters carried the oil and our master off together. I asked for some gods from heaven to capture them.
We've cleaned out their cave and wiped out the monsters. They won't be able to give you any more trouble.
You needn't waste the people's money making offerings in golden lamps here any more." When Pig and Friar Sand, who were just escorting the master back into the Clouds of Compassion Monastery, heard Monkey talking from up in the sky they abandoned their master, dropped the luggage and shot up into the air by cloud to ask Monkey about how the demons had been beaten.
Journey to the West "One of them was chewed to death by the star from the Well," Monkey replied, "and we've got his sawn−off horns and his hide with us.
The other two we've brought back alive." "Throw the pair of them down into the city," said Pig, "for the officials and everyone else to see. Then they'll know we're gods and sages.
I'll trouble you four star officers to put your clouds away, land, and come into the prefectural court with us to execute the monsters.
The facts are clear and the penalty's the right one.
There's nothing else to be said." "Marshal Tian Peng is right, and he knows the laws too," the four stars said.
"I have learned a bit during my years as a monk," Pig replied.
The gods then pushed the rhinoceroses, which fell wreathed in coloured clouds into the prefectural court, to the astonishment of the prefectutal officials and everyone else inside and outside the walled city, who all set up incense tables outside their houses, and bowed their heads to worship the gods from heaven.
A little later the monks of the Clouds of Compassion Monastery carried the venerable elder into the court in a sedan chair. When Sanzang met Monkey he kept thanking him, adding, "I am very grateful for the trouble I have put the star officers to in rescuing us.
I had been very anxious when I did not see you, worthy disciple, but now you have returned in triumph.
I wonder where you had to chase the monsters to before you caught them." "After I left you the day before yesterday," Monkey replied, "I went up to heaven to make some enquiries. The Metal Planet knew that the monsters were rhinoceroses, so he told me to ask for the four beast stars that belong to the element wood.
So I submitted a memorial to the Jade Emperor and he sent them straight to the mouth of the cave, where they gave battle.
When the demon kings fled, the stars from the Dipper and the Strider rescued you, Master, I chased the demons with the Well and the Horn stars straight to the Western Ocean, where the dragon king sent his son out with their troops to help us.
That's how the monsters were captured and brought here for questioning." The venerable elder was full of endless praise and thanks.
The prefectural and county officials and their subordinates all lit precious candles and whole containers of incense sticks as they kowtowed in respect, A little later Pig lost his temper, pulled out his monastic knife and beheaded first Dust−avoider, then Heat−avoider, each with a single stroke.
Then he removed their four horns with a saw.
The Great Sage Monkey then had another suggestion to make: "You four star officers must take these four rhinoceros horns to the upper world to offer to the Jade Emperor as trophies when you report back on your mission." As for the two horns he had brought back from the sea, he said, "We'll leave one here to guard the storehouses of the prefectural palace and as evidence that from now on no more lamp−oil will ever be levied.
We'll take the other to offer to the Lord Buddha on Vulture Peak." The four stars were delighted, and after bowing to take their leave of the Great Sage they rose by coloured cloud to report back to the Jade Emperor.
The prefectural and county officials kept the master and his disciples for a great vegetarian banquet to which all the rural officials were also invited.
Notices were issued to tell the military and civil population that golden lamps were not to be lit the next year, and that the duty of serving as an oil−purchasing household was abolished for ever.
Butchers meanwhile were instructed to remove the rhinoceros skins to be steeped in saltpeter and smoked dry for making into armor, while the flesh was to be distributed to the officials.
At the same time money and grain that had been raised by unjust fines on innocent people were spent to buy a plot of privately−owned empty land. On this a temple to the four stars who had put the demons down, as well as a shrine to the Tang Priest and his three disciples, were to be built. Stone tablets with inscriptions were to be set up for each of them to record their deeds for ever as a mark of gratitude.
Journey to the West Master and disciples relaxed and enjoyed the offerings.
They had hardly a moment to themselves as they had so many invitations from the 240 lamp−oil households.
Pig was delighted to have so much to eat, and he always kept in his sleeve some of the treasures he had collected in the cave to give to all his hosts to thank them for their banquets.
When they had stayed there for a month and were still unable to get away the Tang Priest ordered Monkey.
"Wukong, give all the remaining valuables to the monks in the Clouds of Compassion Monastery.
Let's leave before dawn, without letting the rich families here know.
If we are so eager to enjoy ourselves here that we delay in fetching the scriptures we may offend the Lord Buddha and cause some catastrophe. That would be terrible." Monkey then disposed of all the objects.
When they got up early the next morning at the fifth watch Pig was woken up to get the horse ready.
The idiot had eaten and drunk so well that he was still half asleep as he said, "Why get the horse ready so early?" "The master says we've got to be going," Monkey shouted.
"That reverend gentleman doesn't do things right," the idiot said, rubbing his eyes.
"We've had invitations from all 240 of the big families, but only had thirty or so good vegetarian meals so far. How can he be making me go hungry again?" When the venerable elder heard this he retorted abusively, "Dreg−guzzling idiot! Stop talking such nonsense! Get up at once!
If you go on arguing back like that I'll tell Wukong to smash your teeth in with his gold−banded cudgel." At the mention of a beating the idiot gesticulated frantically as he said, "The master's changed. Usually he favours me and likes me and protects me because I'm so stupid. When you want to hit me, brother, he usually persuades you not to.
So why's he dead set on telling you to hit me today?" "The master's angry with you for being so greedy," Monkey replied, "and holding us up on our journey.
If you don't want me to hit you, pack the luggage and get the horse ready." As the idiot really was scared of being hit he jumped out of bed, got dressed and shouted to Friar Sand, "Get up right now!
He's going to start hitting." Friar Sand then jumped up too, and they both got everything packed.
"Keep quiet," said the Tang Priest, waving his hands about, "and don't disturb the monks." He quickly mounted, after which they opened the gate of the monastery and found their way out.
Indeed, this departure was Letting the phoenix escape from the birdcage of jade; Secretly opening locks so the dragon goes free.
If you don't know what the households who still wanted to thank them did at daybreak, listen to the explanation in the next installment.
Journey to the West In the Almsgiver's Garden Antiquity and Causes Are Discussed In the Court of India the King Meets the Monks When thoughts arise there surely will be desire, Longing is certain to lead one to disaster.
Why should intelligence distinguish the three ranks of nobility?
When conduct is complete it naturally returns to the primal sea.
Whether you become an immortal or a Buddha, All must be arranged from within.
In absolute purity, with all dust removed, All will be achieved and one will rise to heaven.
The story tells how when Sanzang and his disciples were nowhere to be seen at dawn the monks in the Clouds of Compassion Monastery all said, "We couldn't keep them, we couldn't say goodbye to them, and we weren't able to ask them for anything.
We've let those living Bodhisattvas slip clean away." As they were talking, some of the great families from the Southern outskirts of the city came in with invitations, at which the monks clapped their hands in regret and said, "We were caught off our guard last night:
they all rode off by cloud." Everyone then kowtowed to heaven in gratitude.
The news was spread to all the officials in the city, who told the great families to prepare the five kinds of sacrificial animal, flowers and fruit to offer to the shrines in thanksgiving.
The story tells how the Tang Priest and his three disciples fed on the wind and slept in the open, travelling uneventfully for the best part of a month.
One day they suddenly saw a high mountain.
"Disciples," said the Tang Priest in fear, "the ridge in front of us is very steep.
You must be very careful." "As our journey has brought us so close to the land of the Buddha there will definitely be nothing evil here," said Monkey.
"Don't worry, Master." "Disciple," the Tang Priest replied, "although we are not far from the Buddha's land the monks told us in the monastery the other and they didn't know how much further after that." "Have you forgotten the Heart Sutra that the Rook's Nest Hermit taught you again, Master?" asked Monkey.
"The Prajna−paramita Heart Sutra is constantly with me, like my habit and begging bowl," Sanzang replied. "There has not been a day ever since the Rook's Nest Hermit taught it to me that I have not recited it.
I have never forgotten it for a moment. I can even recite it backwards.
How could I possibly forget it?" Journey to the West "You can only recite it, Master," said Monkey.
"You never asked the hermit to explain it." "Ape!" retorted Sanzang. "How can you say I don't understand it?
Do you understand it then?" "Yes," Monkey replied, "I do." After that neither Sanzang nor Monkey made another sound. This had Pig falling about with laughter, while Friar Sand was hurting himself, he was so amused. "Nonsense," said Pig. "We all started out in life as monsters.
We're not Dhyana monks who've heard the sutras being explained or Buddhist priests who've been taught the dharma.
He's pretending, just putting on an act. How can you say you understand?
Well then, why aren't you saying anything?
We're listening.
Please explain." "Second brother," said Friar Sand, "leave him be.
Big brother's only talking big like that to keep the master going.
What he knows about is how to use a cudgel. What does he know about explaining sutras?" "Stop talking such nonsense, Wuneng and Wujing," said Sanzang.
"Wukong understands the wordless language. That is true explanation." As master and disciples talked they did indeed cover a long distance, leaving the ridge behind them. They saw a big monastery beside the road.
"Wukong," said Sanzang. "There's a monastery ahead. Just look at it.
It's neither too big nor too small, But has green glazed tiles; Neither too new nor too old, And with a red wall.
Leaning canopies of azure pines can just be seen: Who knows how many thousand years old they are?
Listen to the murmur of the waters in the channel, Cut from the mountain untold dynasties ago.
Above the gates is written, 'Spread Gold Dhyana Monastery'; The tablet is inscribed, 'Ancient relic.'" Journey to the West Monkey saw that it was called the Spread Gold Dhyana Monastery, and Pig said so too.
'"Spread Gold,'" Sanzang wondered as he sat on his horse, "'Spread Gold' ...Can we be in the country of Sravasti?" "This is very remarkable, Master," said Pig.
"In all the years I've been with you you've never known the way before, but you seem to know it now." "No," Sanzang replied, "I have often read in the scriptures about the Buddha being in the Jetavana garden in the city of Sravasti.
The Venerable Almsgiver Sudatta tried to buy it from the prince as a place to ask the Buddha to preach in.
The prince refused to sell the garden, and said he would only part with it if it were covered with gold.
When the Venerable Almsgiver heard this he had gold bricks made with which he covered the whole garden to buy it. Then he invited the Buddha to preach on the dharma.
I am sure that the name Spread Gold Monastery must refer to that story." "We're in luck," said Pig with a smile, "If that story's true we can find ourselves one of those bricks as a present to give people." Everybody laughed, after which Sanzang dismounted.
As they went in through the monastery gates they saw people carrying loads with shoulder−poles or on their backs, pushing carts, or sitting in loaded carts. Others were sleeping or talking.
The sight of the master, who was so handsome, and his three hideous disciples rather frightened them, so they drew back to make way.
Worried that his disciples would provoke trouble, Sanzang kept saying, "Behave yourselves!
Behave yourselves!" They were all very restrained.
As they went round the Vajra Hall a Dhyana monk of most unworldly appearance came out to meet them:
A face like a shining full moon, A body like a bodhi tree.
The wind blew through the sleeve round his staff, As his sandals trod the stony path.
When Sanzang extended a monastic greeting to him the monk returned his courtesy and asked, "Where are you from, teacher?" "I am Chen Xuanzang," Sanzang replied, "sent to the Western Heaven at the command of the Great Tang emperor in the East to worship the Buddha and fetch the scriptures.
As my journey brings me here I am paying you this hasty visit to request a night's shelter before continuing on my way tomorrow." "This monastery of ours is one that receives people from all quarters," the monk replied.
"Everyone is welcome to visit, and we would be especially happy to provide for so holy a monk from the East as your reverend self." Sanzang thanked him and called to his three disciples to come with him as they crossed the cloister and refectory and went to the abbot's lodgings.
When they had exchanged courtesies they sat down as befits host and guests.
Monkey and the other two sat down as well, their hands at their sides.
The story tells how, on learning that monks from Great Tang in the East who were going to fetch the scriptures had arrived, all in the monastery, young and old alike, whether permanent inmates, itinerant monks, Journey to the West elders or novices came to see them.
After tea had been drunk a vegetarian meal was brought in.
While Sanzang was still saying the grace before the meal Pig in his impatience had already grabbed and wolfed down steamed buns, vegetarian dishes and soup noodles.
In the crowded abbot's lodgings those who knew better were admiring Sanzang's majestic bearing, while those who enjoyed fun watched Pig eat.
When Friar Sand cast his eyes around and saw what was happening he gave Pig a discreet pinch and muttered, "Behave yourself!" At this Pig started a desperate howl of, "All this 'behave yourself, behave yourself!' I'm starving!" "You don't understand, brother," Friar Sand replied with a smile.
"When it comes to the belly, all the well−behaved people in the world are exactly the same as we two." Only then did Pig stop eating.
After Sanzang had said the grace for the end of the meal the attendants cleared the tables and Sanzang expressed his thanks.
When the monks asked about why they had come from the East, Sanzang's conversation turned to ancient sites and he asked them about the name Spread Gold Monastery.
"This used to be the Monastery of the Venerable Almsgiver in the country of Sravasti," the monks answered.
"It was also known as the Jetavana and its name was changed to its present one after the Venerable Almsgiver covered the ground with gold bricks, in those days the Venerable Almsgiver used to live in the country of Sravasti, and our monastery was his Jetavana, which is why it was renamed the Almsgiver's Spread Gold Monastery.
The site of the Jetavana is at the back of the monastery.
Whenever there has been a torrential rainstorm in recent years, small pieces of gold and silver have been washed out, and some people are lucky enough to pick them up." "So the story is a true one," said Sanzang, going on to ask, "Why did I see so many travelling merchants with horses, mules, carts and carrying−poles resting here when I came in through the gates of your monastery?" "This mountain is called Mount Hundredfoot," the monks replied.
"We used to live in peace and prosperity here, but with the cyclic progression of the natural forces a number of centipede spirits have for some inexplicable reason appeared.
They attack people on the roads and though nobody gets killed people don't dare to travel.
At the foot of the mountain there's a Cock−crow Pass that people only dare to cross after cock−crow.
As all these strangers arrived late they are worried that it would not be safe and are putting up here tonight.
They'll set out at cock−crow." As master and disciples were talking a vegetarian meal was brought in that they ate.
Sanzang and Monkey were strolling in the light of the rising half moon when a lay brother came to announce, "Our ancient master would like to meet the gentlemen from China." Sanzang at once turned to see an ancient monk holding a bamboo cane who came forward to greet him and ask, "Are you the teacher come from China?" "You do me too great an honour," Sanzang replied, returning his greeting.
The old monk was full of admiration for him, asking how old he was.
"I have wasted forty−five years," Sanzang replied.
"May I ask how old you are?" "Just one sixty−year cycle older than you, teacher," the other answered.
"Then you're a hundred and five this year," Brother Monkey said.
"How old do you think I am?" Journey to the West "Teacher," the old monk replied, "your appearance seems so ancient and your spirit so pure that I could not tell in a hurry, especially by moonlight with my poor eyes." After talking for a while they walked to the back cloister for a look round.
"Where is the site of the Almsgiver's Garden that you mentioned just now?" Sanzang asked.
"Outside the back gate," the other replied.
On the order being given for the back gate to be opened immediately, all that could be seen was the ruined base of a stone wall.
Putting his hands together, Sanzang sighed and said, "I think of the benefactor Sudatta Who gave his treasures to help the needy The fame of Jetavana long endures; Where is he now with the enlightened arhat?" After a leisurely stroll enjoying the moonlight they sat down for a while on a terrace, where they heard the sound of sobbing.
As Sanzang listened with a still heart he could hear that the weeper was grieving because her parents did not know of her suffering.
This moved him to sorrow, and he found himself in tears as he turned to the monks and asked, "Who is it being so sad, and where?" On hearing this question the ancient monk sent all the others away to prepare tea, and when nobody else was around he kowtowed to the Tang Priest and Brother Monkey.
"Venerable abbot," said Sanzang, helping him to his feet again, "why do you pay me this courtesy?" "As I am over a hundred," the ancient monk replied, "I do know a little of the ways of the world; and in between periods of meditation and stillness I have seen some things.
I know a certain amount about you, my lord, and your disciples, and you are not like other people.
The only teachers here who would be able to analyze this most painful business are you." "Tell me what it's all about," said Monkey.
"A year ago today," the ancient monk replied, "I was concentrating my mind on the nature of the moon when I suddenly heard a gust of wind and the sound of someone grieving.
I got out of bed, went into the Jetavana and saw a beautiful girl there.
'Whose daughter are you?' I asked her.
'Why are you here?' 'I am a princess, the daughter of the king of India,' the girl replied.
'The wind blew me here when I was looking at the flowers by moonlight.' I locked her up in an empty room that I bricked up like a prison cell, just leaving a gap in the door big enough to pass a bowl through.
That day I told the other monks that she was an evil spirit I had captured.
But as we monks are compassionate I couldn't kill her, and every day she is given two meals of simple food and drink to keep her alive.
The girl is clever enough to understand what I mean, and to prevent herself from being sullied by the other monks she has pretended to be deranged and slept in her own piss and shit.
During the day she talks nonsense or just sits there in silence, but in the still of the night she cries because she misses her parents.
I've been into the city several times to make enquiries about the princesses, but not a single one is missing.
So I have put her under stronger locks, and I am even more determined not to let her go.
Now that you have come here, teacher, I beg you to go to the capital and use your dharma powers to find out the truth.
Journey to the West You will thus be able both to rescue the good and display your magical powers." When Sanzang and Monkey heard this they noted it very carefully.
As they were talking two junior monks came in to invite them to take tea and go to bed, so they went back inside.
Back in the abbot's lodgings Pig and Friar Sand were grumbling, "We'll have to be on our way at cock−crow tomorrow, so why aren't you in bed yet?" "What's that you're saying, idiot?" Monkey asked.
"Go to bed," Pig replied.
"Why are you admiring the blooming scenery this late?" At this the ancient monk left them, and the Tang Priest went to bed.
Sweet dreams of flowers in the moonlit silence; Warm breezes coming through the window gauze.
As water drips in the clepsydra to fill three sections, The Milky Way shines on the splendors of the palace.
They had not slept long that night when they heard the cocks crowing.
The traders in front of the monastery all got up noisily and prepared their breakfast by lamplight.
The venerable elder woke up Pig and Friar Sand to bridle the horse and pack up, while Monkey called for lamps to be lit.
The monks of the monastery, who were up already, set out tea, soup and snacks, and waited on them.
Pig ate a plate of steamed buns with delight then took the luggage and the horse outside while Sanzang and Brother Monkey took their leave of all the monks.
"Please don't forget about that very tragic business," said the ancient monk. "I'll give it all my attention," Monkey replied, "all my attention.
Once I'm in the city I'll be able to find out the truth from what I hear and see." They traders noisily set off together.
By the last watch of the night they were through Cockcrow Pass, and by ten in the morning the walls of the city were in sight.
It was indeed a powerful city as strong as an iron cauldron, the heavenly capital of a divine region.
The city Was a crouching tiger or a coiled dragon on high ground, Colorful with its phoenix towers and unicorn halls.
The waters of the royal moat encircled it like a belt; In his mountainside paradise were many a monument.
The morning sun lit up banners by the high−way; Journey to the West The spring wind carried the sound of pipes and drums across the bridges.
The wise king was dressed in robes and crown, The crops were abundant and the splendor manifest.
That day they reached the streets of the Eastern market, where the traders all put up at inns.
As Sanzang and his disciples were walking in the city they came to a government hostel and went inside.
The hostel manager went to report to the hostel superintendent that there were four strange−looking monks outside who had arrived with a white horse.
On being told about the horse the superintendent realized that they must be on an official mission, so he went out to welcome them.
"I have been sent by the Tang court in the East to the Great Thunder Monastery on Vulture Peak to see the Buddha and seek the scriptures," Sanzang replied with a bow. "I have a passport to present at court for inspection. I would be grateful if I could spend the night in Your Excellency's distinguished hostel.
I will be on my way when my business has been done." "This hostel has been established to entertain envoys and travelers," the superintendent replied, returning his bow, "so it is only right that we should entertain you.
Please come in, please come in." A delighted Sanzang invited his disciples to come in to meet the superintendent, who was quietly appalled by their hideous faces.
He did not know whether they were men or demons, so he trembled as he saw to tea and a vegetarian meal for them.
Noticing his fright, Sanzang said, "Don't be afraid, Your Excellency. My three disciples look hideous, but they are good at heart. As the saying goes, the faces are ugly but the men are kind.
There's nothing to be afraid of about them." The hostel superintendent's worries were eased when he heard this. "Where is your Tang court, Teacher of the Nation?" "In the land of China in the continent of Jambu," Sanzang replied.
"When did you leave home?" was the next question.
"In the thirteenth year of Zhenguan, fourteen years ago," Sanzang replied. "I had to cross thousands of rivers and mountains−−it was very hard−−to arrive here." "You are a holy monk," the hostel superintendent said.
"How old is your exalted dynasty?" Sanzang asked.
"This is the great land of India," the superintendent replied, "and the dynasty has endured for over five hundred years since our High Ancestor.
Our reigning sovereign, who is a lover of landscapes and flowers, is known as the Happy Emperor. His reign−period is called Jingyan and is now in its twenty−eighth year." "I would like to have an audience with His Majesty today to have the passport inspected and returned," said Sanzang.
"When does he hold court?" "Splendid," the superintendent said, "absolutely splendid.
Today is the twentieth birthday of Her Royal Highness, the king's daughter. A decorated tower has been built at the crossroads, where the princess is going Journey to the West to throw down an embroidered ball to let heaven decide who her husband it to be.
Today is a very lively one, and I believe that His Majesty will not yet have finished his morning audience.
This would be a good time to go if you wish to have your passport inspected and returned." Sanzang was just about to set happily off when the meal was brought in, so he ate it with the superintendent, Monkey and the other two.
By now it was past midday, and Sanzang said, "I had better be going." "I'll escort you, Master," said Brother Monkey.
"Me too," said Pig. "No, don't, brother," put in Friar Sand. "Your face is nothing much to look at, so there's no point in your going to look impressive outside the palace gates.
Best let our big brother go," "Wujing is right," Sanzang commented. "The idiot is coarse and stupid.
Wukong is more clever and subtle." The idiot thrust his snout out and said, "Apart from you, Master, there's not much to choose between our three faces." Sanzang then put on his cassock.
Monkey took the passport case had accompanied him.
In the streets everyone−−gentleman, peasant; artisan, trader, scholar, pen−pusher, dim−wit, or common man−−was exclaiming, "Let's go and see the embroidered ball being thrown." Sanzang stood beside the road and said to Monkey, "People, clothes, buildings, language and speech here are all the same as in our Great Tang.
I remember that my late mother married after throwing an embroidered ball to make the match she was destined for, and they have that custom here too." "What about us going to take a look too?" asked Monkey.
"No, no," Sanzang replied. "We are not wearing the right clothes for the occasion.
We might arouse suspicion." "Master," said Monkey, "you've forgotten what the ancient monk in the Spread Gold Monastery told us.
We could find out whether she is genuine or not while we're taking a good look at the decorated tower.
With all this bustle and activity the king is bound to be going to hear the princess's good news. He won't bother with court business.
Let's go." On hearing this Sanzang did indeed go with Monkey. All kinds of people were there to watch the throwing of the embroidered ball.
Oh dear!
Little did they know that by going they were like a fisherman casting his hook and line and catching himself trouble.
The story now explains that two years earlier the king of India had taken his queen, consorts and daughter into the royal garden to enjoy a moonlit night because he so loved landscapes and flowers. This had provoked an evil spirit, who had carried the princess off and turned herself into the girl's double.
When she learned that the Tang Priest was coming at this time, day, month and year the evil spirit had used the wealth of the kingdom to build the decorated tower in the hope of winning him as her mate and absorbing his true masculine primal essence to make herself a superior immortal of the Great Monad.
At the third mark of the noonday hour, when Sanzang and Monkey had joined in the crowd and were approaching the tower, the princess lit some incense and prayed to heaven and earth.
She was surrounded by five or six dozen exquisitely made−up beauties who were attending her and holding her embroidered ball for her.
The tower had many windows on all sides. As the princess looked around she saw the Tang Priest approaching, so she took the embroidered ball and threw it with her own hands at the Tang Priest's head.
It knocked his Vairocana mitre askew, giving him such a start that he immediately reached with both hands to Journey to the West steady the ball, which rolled down his sleeve.
At once there were great shouts from everyone on the tower of, "She's hit a monk! She's hit a monk!" Oh dear!
All the travelling merchants at the crossroads pushed and shouted as they rushed to grab the embroidered ball, to be met by Monkey with a shout and bared teeth as he bent forward then grew to the majestic height of thirty feet.
The hideous face he made gave them all such a fright that they collapsed and crawled about, not daring to come closer. A moment later they had all scattered and Monkey resumed his true form.
The maids, palace beauties and senior and junior eunuchs who had been in the tower all camp up to the Tang Priest, kowtowed to him and said, "Your Highness, we beg you to come to the palace to be congratulated." Sanzang was quick to return their greetings and help them all back to their feet.
He then turned back to grumble at Monkey, "Ape!
You've been trying to make a fool of me again." "It was your head the embroidered ball landed on," Monkey replied with a laugh, "and your sleeve it rolled into. Nothing to do with me, so what are you moaning at me for?" "What are we going to do?" Sanzang asked.
"Stop worrying, Master," Monkey said.
"While you go to the palace to see the king I'll go back to the hostel to tell Pig and Friar Sand to wait.
If the princess doesn't want you, that'll be that. You submit the passport and we can be on our way.
If the princess insists on marriage you must say to the king, 'Please send for my disciples so that I can take my leave of them.' When we three are summoned to court I'll be able to tell whether the princess is real or an impostor.
This is the trick called 'subduing a demon through marriage.'" The Tang Priest had nothing to say as Monkey turned away and went back to the hostel.
The venerable elder was hustled by the palace beauties and the rest of them to the foot of the tower, from where the princess came down to support him with her jade hand as they both entered the royal carriage. The retinue formed a procession to return to the palace gates.
The eunuch gate−officer at once reported to the king, "Your Majesty, Her Royal Highness the princess is outside the Meridional Gate, holding a monk's arm and waiting to be summoned.
I expect she hit him with her embroidered ball." The king was most displeased to hear this, and wanted to have the monk driven away, but as he did not know what the princess had in mind he restrained his feelings and summoned them in.
The princess and the Tang Priest came in to stand beneath the throne hall. Indeed: Man and future wife both hailed the king aloud; Good and ill together with deep respect kowtowed.
When this ceremonial had been performed they were called into the throne hall, where the king began by asking, "Where are you from, monk?
Did our daughter hit you with her ball?" Journey to the West The Tang Priest prostrated himself to reply, "I have been sent by the emperor of Great Tang in the continent of Jambu to the Western Heaven to worship the Buddha and seek the scriptures in the Great Thunder Monastery.
As I carry a passport for this long journey I was coming to present it for inspection at Your Majesty's dawn audience when I passed a decorated tower at a crossroads, never imagining that Her Royal Highness the princess would throw an embroidered ball that would hit me on the head.
As I am a monk and belong to a different faith I could not possibly marry your exquisite daughter, so I beg you to spare me the death penalty and return the passport.
Then I can be on my way and soon reach Vulture Peak, see the Buddha, ask for the scriptures and return to my own country, where Your Majesty's divine mercy will be for ever recorded." "So you are a holy monk from the East," the king replied.
"Indeed, 'a thread can draw together a fated match across a thousand miles.' Our princess has reached the age of nineteen and is still unmarried, and as the hour, day, month and year are all now auspicious a decorated tower was set up for her to choose a good husband by throwing the ball from it.
You just happened to be hit by it, and although this does not please us we would like to know the princess's views." "Your Majesty my father," the princess replied, kowtowing, "as the saying goes, 'Marry a cockerel and follow a cockerel; marry a dog and follow a dog.' I swore a vow beforehand, made the ball and told heaven, earth and the gods that heaven would choose as my husband the man my ball hit.
As the ball hit the holy monk today this must have been fated ever since an earlier incarnation, which is why we met today. I would never dare to change my mind.
I ask you to take him as your son−in−law." Only then was the king happy, and he commanded the chief royal astrologer to choose a day.
While organizing the trousseau the king issued proclamations to the world.
When Sanzang heard this, so far from thanking the king for his kindness, he pleaded, "Forgive me, forgive me." "You're most unreasonable, monk," the king replied.
"We offer you a nation's wealth to be our son−in−law. Why won't you stay here and enjoy yourself? All you can think about is fetching the scriptures.
If you go on refusing we will have the palace guards take you out and behead you." The venerable elder was so frightened by this that his soul left his body as he kowtowed, trembling, and submitted, "I am grateful for Your Majesty's heavenly grace, but there are four of us monks travelling West.
I have three disciples outside. If I am now to be taken as your son−in−law I beg you to summon them inside as I have not yet taken my leave of them.
Then you can return the passport and let them go at once, so that they will not fail in the purpose of their journey to the West." The king approved this request, asking, "Where are your disciples?" "In the government hostel for foreigners," Sanzang replied, and officers were at once sent to fetch the holy monk's disciples to receive the passport and be on their way, leaving the holy monk there to be the princess's husband.
The venerable elder could only rise to his feet and stand in attendance.
For the Great Elixir not to leak away the Triple Completeness is needed; Blame an evil fate if the ascetic way is hard.
The Way is in the sage traditions; cultivation depends on the self; Goodness is accumulated by people, but blessings come from Heaven.
Journey to the West Do not give play to the six sense−organs and their many desires; Open up the single nature, original and primary.
When there are no attachments or thoughts, purity comes of itself; Strive for liberation and achieve transcendence.
We will say no more of how officers were sent to the hostel to fetch Sanzang's three disciples.
Instead the story tells how Monkey, after taking his leave of Sanzang at the foot of the decorated tower, went happily back to the hostel, laughing aloud as he walked.
"Why are you laughing so cheerfully, brother," Pig and Friar Sand asked as they greeted him, "and why's the master disappeared?" "The master has found happiness," Monkey replied. "What happiness?" Pig asked.
"He hasn't reached the end of the journey, he hasn't seen the Buddha and he hasn't fetched the scriptures." "The master and I only got as far as the foot of a decorated tower at the crossroads," Brother Monkey replied.
"Just then the king's daughter hit the master with an embroidered ball, so he was hustled by palace beauties, pretty girls and eunuchs to the front of the tower, where he climbed into a carriage to go to the palace with the princess. He's been invited to become the king's son−in−law.
Isn't that something to be cheerful about?" When Pig heard this he stamped, beat his chest and said, "If I'd known beforehand, I'd have gone too. It was all Friar Sand's fault for making trouble.
I'd have run straight to the foot of the decorated tower, the embroidered ball would have hit me first time, and the princess would have taken me for her husband.
That would have been marvellous, terrific. I'm handsome and good−looking: I'd have been just the man. We'd all have been in luck and have had a good time.
It'd have been real fun." Friar Sand went up to Pig, rubbed his face and said, "Shameless, you're shameless! That's a handsome mug, I must say.
You're like the man who bought an old donkey for three−tenths of an ounce of silver and boasted that he'd be able to ride it.
If she'd hit you first time she wouldn't have wanted to wait till tonight before burning spells to get rid of you.
Do you think she'd have let trouble like you into the palace?" "You're being very disagreeable, you blacky," Pig replied.
"Ugly I may be, but I've got class.
As the old saying goes, 'When skin and flesh are coarse, the bones may yet be strong: everyone is good at something.'" "Stop talking nonsense, idiot," Monkey retorted, "and pack the baggage.
I expect the master will get anxious and send for us, so we must be ready to go to protect him at court." "You're wrong again, brother," said Pig.
"If the master's become the king's son−in−law and gone to take his pleasure with the king's daughter, he won't be climbing any more mountains, or tramping along the road, or running into demons and monsters. So what'll he want you to protect him from?
He's old enough to know what happens under the bedcovers.
He won't need you to hold him up." Monkey grabbed Pig by the ear, swung his fist, and said abusively, "You're as dirty−minded as ever, you cretin!
How dare you talk such nonsense!" While they were in the middle of their quarrel the hostel superintendent came to report, "His Majesty has sent an official here with a request for you three holy monks to present yourselves." Journey to the West "What's he really asking us to go for?" "The senior holy monk had the good fortune to be hit by the princess's golden ball and be taken as her husband," the superintendent replied, "which is why the official has come with invitations for you." "Where is the official?" Monkey asked.
"Send him in." The official then bowed in greeting to Monkey, after which he did not dare look straight at Monkey as he muttered to himself, "Is it a ghost? a monster?
a thunder god?
a yaksha?" "Why are you mumbling instead of saying whatever you have to say, official?" Monkey asked.
Trembling with terror, the official raised the royal edict with both hands as his words came tumbling out in confusion:
"Her Royal Highness−−invitation−−meet her new relations−−Her Royal Highness−−meet her relations−−invitation...." "We've got no torture equipment here and we're not going to beat you," Pig said, "so don't be frightened and take your time telling us." "Do you think he's scared you're going to beat him?" Monkey said.
"What he's scared of is your ugly mug. Get the carrying−pole load packed up at once.
We're taking the horse and going to court to see the master and talk things over." Indeed:
One you meet on a narrow path is hard to avoid; Determination can turn love to hatred.
If you do not know what was said when they met the king, listen to the explanation in the next installment.
The Four Monks Dine to Music in the Palace Gardens One Demon Loves in Vain and Longs for Bliss The story tells how Brother Monkey and the other two disciples went with the official who had brought the invitation to outside the Meridional Gate of the palace, where the eunuch gate officer immediately reported their arrival and brought back a summons for them to enter.
The three of them stood in a row, not bowing.
"Are you three gentlemen the illustrious disciples of the holy monk?
What are your names?
Where do you live?
Why did you become monks?
What scriptures are you going to fetch?" Monkey then came closer, intending to enter the throne hall.
"Don't move," one of the king's bodyguards shouted. "If you have anything to say, say it standing down there." "We monks like to step forward whenever we're given an opening," Monkey said with a smile, at which Pig Journey to the West and Friar Sand too approached the king.
Worried that their rough manners would alarm the king, Sanzang stepped forward and called out, "Disciples, His Majesty has asked you why you have come here.
You must submit your reply." Seeing his master standing in attendance beside the king, Monkey could not restrain himself from calling aloud, "Your Majesty is treating yourself with respect but others with contempt.
If you are taking my master as your son−in−law, why do you make him stand in attendance on you?
The normal custom is for a king to call his son−in−law Your Excellency, and an Excellency really ought to be sitting down." This gave the king so bad a fright that he turned pale and wished he could leave the throne hall.
But as this would have looked very bad he had to summon up his courage and tell his attendants of fetch an embroidered stool on which he invited the Tang Priest to sit.
Only then did Brother Monkey submit the following spoken memorial: "My ancestral home is the Water Curtain Cave in the Mountain of Flowers and Fruit in the land of Aolai in the Eastern Continent of Superior Body.
My father was heaven, my mother earth, And I was born when a rock split open.
1 took as my master a Taoist adept, And mastered the Great Way.
Then I returned to my land of immortals, Where I gathered all of us to live in our cave heaven.
In the ocean's depths I subdued the dragons, Then climbed the mountains to capture wild beasts.
I removed us from the registers of death, Put us on the rolls of the living, And was appointed Great Sage Equaling Heaven.
I enjoyed the heavenly palaces, And roamed around the splendid buildings.
I met the immortals of Heaven In daily carousals; Lived in the holy regions, Happy every day.
Journey to the West But because I disrupted the Peach Banquet, And raised a rebellion in the palaces of Heaven, I was captured by the Lord Buddha And imprisoned under the Five Elements Mountain.
When hungry I was fed on pellets of iron, When thirsty I drank molten copper: For five hundred years I tasted no food or tea.
Fortunately my master came from the East To worship in the West. Guanyin told him to deliver me from heavenly disaster. I was rescued from my torment To be converted to the Yogacarin sect.
My old name was Wukong; Now I am known as the Novice." When the king realized how important Monkey was he quickly came down from his dragon throne and walked over to steady the venerable elder with his hand and say, "Son−in−law, it was divine providence that brought us one such as yourself to be our kinsman through marriage." Sanzang thanked the king profoundly for his graciousness and urged him to return to his throne.
"Which gentleman has the distinction of being the second disciple?" the king asked.
Pig thrust his snout out to make himself look more impressive as he replied: "In previous lives old Pig used to be Given to pleasure and indolence.
I lived in confusion, My nature disordered and my heart deluded.
1 did not know how high the sky was or how deep the earth; I could not tell the ocean's width or the mountains' distance.
Then in the middle of my idleness Journey to the West I suddenly met a true immortal.
In half a sentence He undid the net of evil; With two or three remarks He smashed the gate to disaster.
Then I became aware, Took him as my master on the spot, Diligently studied the arts of the Double Eight, Respectfully refined the Triple Three's sequence.
When training was complete I was able to fly, And ascend to the heavenly palace.
The Jade Emperor in his benevolence Appointed me as Marshal Tian Peng, To command the marines of the River of Heaven, And wander at ease within the palace gates.
Then when I was drunk at the Peach Banquet I misbehaved with the goddess of the moon, Was stripped of my commission, And exiled to the mortal world.
Because I came into the wrong womb 1 was born with the likeness of a pig.
Living at the Mount of Blessing I committed unbounded evil.
When I met the Bodhisattva Guanyin She showed me the way of goodness.
I came over to the Buddhist faith Journey to the West To escort the Tang Priest On his journey to the Western Heaven, Seeking the marvellous scriptures.
My Dharma name is Wuneng, And people call me Bajie." When the king heard this he trembled with fear, not daring to look at him.
This made the idiot more spirited than ever, shaking his head, pursing his lips, thrusting his ears up and roaring with laughter.
Sanzang, worried that Pig was giving the king a fright, shouted, "Control yourself, Bajie." Only then did Pig put his hands together and pretend to behave himself.
"And why was the third distinguished disciple converted?" the king then asked.
Putting his hands together, Friar Sand said: "I was originally a mortal man, Who turned to the Way out of fear of the Wheel of Reincarnation.
1 wandered like a cloud to the corners of the seas. Roamed to the very ends of the sky.
I always wore the robe and held the begging−bowl, And ever concentrated my mind within the body.
Because of my sincerity I fell in with immortals, Raised the Baby Boy, To mate him with the Lovely Girl.
When the Three Thousand Tasks were achieved All was combined in the Four Images.
I rose above the boundary of the sky, Bowed to the dark vault of heaven, Journey to the West And was appointed Curtain−lifting General. 1 was in attendance on the Phoenix and Dragon Carriage, And General was my rank.
Because at the Peach Banquet 1 accidentally smashed a crystal bowl 1 was exiled to the Flowing Sands River, My face was altered, And I became an evil killer.
Fortunately the Bodhisattva traveled to the East To persuade me to turn to the faith And await the Buddha's son from Tang. Who would go to seek scriptures in the Western Heaven.
I became his follower and made a fresh start, Refining once more my great awareness.
I took my surname Sand from the river; My Buddhist name is Wujing, And my title Friar." The king was both most alarmed and most delighted to hear this. Delighted because his daughter had found herself a living Buddha, and alarmed by three veritable evil gods.
Just as the king was being torn between alarm and delight the chief astrologer submitted this memorial: "The wedding has been set for the twelfth day of this month, the day of water−rat, a lucky time at which all will be auspicious for nuptials." "What day is it today?" the king asked.
"Today is the eighth, the day of earth−monkey," the astrologer replied, "the day on which gibbons offer fruit, and the right day on which to advance worthies and accept their suggestions." This greatly pleased the king, who sent his officials in attendance to have the halls and pavilions in the royal garden swept clear. Here he invited his future son−in−law with his three distinguished disciples to stay while they waited for the nuptial feast at which the princess would marry him.
The underlings all carried out their instructions, the king ended the audience and the officials withdrew.
Journey to the West The story now tells how when Sanzang and his disciples reached the imperial garden night was falling. A vegetarian meal was laid on.
"We really deserve a meal today," said Pig with delight.
The people in charge brought in plain rice and pasta by the carrying−pole load. Pig kept eating a bowlful then taking a refill over and over again.
He only stopped eating when his stomach was completely full.
A little later the lamps were lit and the bedding laid out, after which everyone went to bed.
As soon as the venerable elder saw that there was nobody around he started to shout angrily at Monkey, berating him. "You macaque, Wukong! You keep ruining me.
I said we were just going to present the passport and told you not to go near the decorated tower. Why did you keep demanding to take me there to have a look? Well, did you have a good enough look?
Whatever are we to do about this trouble you have got us into?" "Master," replied Monkey, putting on a smile, "it was you who said, 'My late mother married after throwing an embroidered ball to make the match she was destined for.' I only took you there because you seemed to want to enjoy something of the past.
Besides, because I remembered what the ancient monk in the Almsgiver's Spread Gold Monastery said I came here to find out whether she's an impostor or not.
When I saw the king just now there was something a bit sinister about the way he looked, but I haven't yet seen what the princess is like." "What will happen when you see the princess?" the venerable elder asked.
"My fiery eyes with their golden pupils can tell whether someone's true or false, good or evil, rich or poor," Monkey replied.
"I'll know what to do and be able to sort out right and wrong." "So you've learned physiognomy in the last few days, elder brother," said Friar Sand and Pig with a smile.
"Physiognomists are just my grandson," Brother Monkey replied.
"Stop joking," shouted Sanzang.
"He definitely wants me now.
What are we to do about it?" "At that happy occasion on the twelfth the princess is bound to come out to pay her respects to her parents," said Monkey. "I'll take a look at her from where I'll stand by the side.
If she really is a woman you can be her consort and enjoy the kingdom's glory and splendor." This made Sanzang angrier than ever.
"You're a fine ape," he said abusively, "still trying to ruin me.
As Wuneng said, we have already done ninety−seven or ninety−eight hundredths of the journey. You're trying to destroy me with your crafty tongue again.
Shut up! Don't open that stinking mouth of yours any more.
Next time there's any misbehavior from you I shall start reciting that spell again, and that will be more than you can take." The mention of the spell being recited had Monkey falling straight to his knees before Sanzang and pleading, "Don't say it, don't say it!
If she's really a woman we'll all raise a rumpus in the palace during the wedding ceremony and get you out." While master and disciples were talking they had not noticed that it was now night.
Indeed: Slow dripped the clepsydras; Heavy hung the fragrance of the flowers.
Pearl curtains hung over splendid doorways; Journey to the West No fire or light was seen in the still courtyard.
Empty was the shadow of the deserted swing; All was silence when the flute's notes died away.
The room was surrounded by flowers and bright in the moonbeams, Lit by those spiky stars not blocked by any trees.
The cuckoo rested from her song; Long was the butterfly's dream.
The River Way spanned the celestial vault While white clouds made their way home.
Just when they were closest in feeling The willows swaying in the wind were more dispiriting than ever. "It's late, Master," said Pig. "Let's carry on arguing tomorrow morning.
Go to sleep now, go to sleep!" Master and disciples did then get a night's sleep.
The golden cockerel was soon greeting the dawn, and the king entered the throne hall for his audience.
This is what could be seen: A purple aura rising high above the opened palace As the winds carried royal music to the azure sky.
While clouds drifted, the leopard−tail banners moved; The sun shone upon the demon figures on the roof, and the jade pendants tinkled.
A scented mist delicately touched the palace's green willows, While dewdrops lightly moistened the garden flowers.
A thousand officials in ranks shouted and danced in homage: Seas and rivers were at peace and the state was unified.
Journey to the West When all the civil and military officials had paid their homage to him, the king proclaimed, "The Department of Foreign Relations will arrange a nuptial banquet for the twelfth.
Today the spring wine shall be prepared, and our future son−in−law shall be entertained in the royal gardens." The Protocol Office were told to lead the three worthy future royal in−laws to sit in the state hostel while the Department of Foreign Relations laid on a vegetarian banquet for the three of them.
The two departments arranged for the musicians of the court orchestra to play and look after them while they passed the days enjoying the beauty of spring.
As soon as Pig heard this he said, "Your Majesty, we always stay with our master: we never leave him for a moment.
As he's going to be drinking and feasting in the palace gardens we'd better go along for a couple of days' fun too if our master's to be your son−in−law.
Otherwise the deal's off." Seeing how ugly and coarse−spoken Pig was, twisting his head and neck, thrusting his snout out and waving his ears−−which all made him seem rather intimidating−−the king was so worried that Pig might ruin the wedding that he had to accede to the request.
"Prepare a banquet for two in the Sino−Barbarian Hall of Eternal Pacification for our son−in−law and ourself.
Prepare a meal for the other three gentlemen in the Pavilion of Lingering Spring.
We are afraid that it might be inconvenient for master and disciples to sit together." Only then did the idiot chant his respects to the king and thank him.
Everyone then withdrew, after which the king ordered the officials of the inner palace to prepare a banquet, and told the queens and consorts of the three palaces and six compounds to give the princess hair ornaments, cakes and other things for the wedding on the twelfth.
It was now about ten in the morning, and the king had a carriage ready in which to take the Tang Priest and the others to go to see the palace gardens. The gardens were a fine place:
The paths, inlaid with coloured stones, Have carved and chiseled balustrades.
Beside the paths inlaid with coloured stones Strange flowers spread over the rocks; Outside the carved and chiseled balustrades, And within them too, flower blossoms rare.
Early peach trees are a bewitching turquoise, And golden orioles dart among the willows.
The walker finds the fragrance fill his sleeve, And many pure scents imbue his clothing.
Phoenix terrace and dragon pool, Bamboo lodge and pine pavilion.
On the phoenix terrace Journey to the West Pipes are played to lure the phoenix to appear; In the dragon pools Fish are reared to become dragons and leave.
In the bamboo lodge are poems Whose well−chosen words match the "White Snow Melody" The books in the pine pavilion Are pearls and jade in blue−covered volumes.
Rocks and jade twist around the artificial hills; Deep are the blue−green waters of the winding stream.
Peony pavilions, Rose bowers, Make a natural brocade.
Trellises of jasmine, Beds of begonia, Are like sunset clouds or jeweled mosaics.
Herbaceous peonies are marvelously fragrant; Rare is the beauty of the mallows from Sichuan.
White pear and red apricot blossom vie in scent; Purple orchid and golden daylily compete in splendor.
Corn poppy, Lily magnolia buds, Azalea flowers, Are brilliantly coloured.
Magnolia flowers, Garden balsam, Plantain lilies, Journey to the West Tremble.
Everywhere red shines through the richness of cosmetics While heavy scents drift from a brocade surrounding screen.
The warmth returning with the East wind is greeted with joy; All the garden's beauties display their brilliance.
The king and his companions walked around enjoying the flowers for a long time.
Soon the officials of the Protocol Office came to invite Monkey and the other two to the Pavilion of Lingering Spring while the king led the Tang Priest by the hand to the Sino−Barbarian Hall so that they could all drink and feast.
These were splendid occasions with singing, dancing and instrumental music. Indeed: The sun shone from the majestic palace gates; Good auras filled the royal buildings.
The spring spread out an embroidery of flowers, And heaven's light shone from afar on the court robes.
Pipes and singers wafted their music as if in a banquet of immortals; The goblets flew, carrying jade liquor.
Master and subjects enjoyed the same pleasure As Sino−barbarian peace brought prosperity.
Seeing with what great respect he was being treated by the king, the venerable elder had nothing for it but to force himself to join in the celebrations. In fact he gave only a show of happiness: inside he was miserable.
As he sat there he saw four golden screens hanging on the wall, screens painted with scenes of the four seasons. Each picture had a poem on it by a famous academician. The poem on the spring scene read: The vital forces of heaven turn creation around; The world is happy and everything is renewed.
The peach and the plum blossoms vie in splendor; Swallows fly to the painted rafters, shaking the incense dust.
Journey to the West The poem on the summer scene read: In warm and sultry air all thoughts are slow The palace mallow and pomegranate reflect the sun's brilliance.
The jade flute's music disturbs the noonday dream; The scent of caltrops is wafted through the curtains.
The poem on the autumn scene read: One leaf on the parasol tree by the well is yellow; The pearl curtain is not rolled up on the night of frost.
After the autumn sacrifice the swallows abandon their nest; When the rush flowers snap, the wild geese leave for another land.
The poem on the winter scene read: The clouds fly over the rainy sky, all dark and cold; The North wind blows the snow into thousands of bills.
Deep in the palace the stove glows warm; They say the plum has blossomed by the jade balustrade.
When the king noticed the absorption with which the Tang Priest was gazing at the poems he said, "As you enjoy savoring the poems so much you must be a fine poet yourself, son−in−law.
If you do not begrudge your pearls we would like to invite you to make up a matching poem for each of them, ending three of the lines with the same word.
Will you agree?" The venerable elder was the sort of person who could be so carried away by a scene that he forgot the circumstances, someone who had an enlightened mind and thoroughly comprehended his own nature, so when Journey to the West the king pressed him so earnestly to match the verses he found himself saying the line, "The sun's warmth melts the ice the world around." This greatly pleased the king, who told the officials in attendance on him, "Fetch the four treasures of the study, so that our son−in−law can write down the matching verses he composes for us to savor at our leisure." The venerable elder was glad to comply. Picking up a brush, he produced matching lines.
The matching poem on the spring scene read: The sun's warmth melts the ice the world around; Within the palace garden, flowers are renewed.
Gentle winds and rain enrich the people; Rivers and seas are calm; gone is all worldly dust.
The matching poem on the summer scene read: The Dipper now points South; the day goes slow; Locust and pomegranate trees contend in brilliance.
Golden oriole and purple swallow sing in the willows, Their melodious voices drifting through red curtains.
The matching poem on the autumn read: Fragrant the green mandarin; the orange turns to yellow. Blue pine and cypress welcome frost's coming.
Half−open chrysanthemums make a tapestry on the trellis; Pipes and songs waft through the watery, cloud−covered land.
The matching poem on the winter scene read: Journey to the West As skies clear after welcome snow the air is cold; Grotesque−shaped crags and boulders mark jade hills.
As charcoal burns in the stove to warm the yogurt Singing with hands in their sleeves they lean on jade balustrades.
The king was utterly delighted by the matching verses.
"'Singing with hands in their sleeves they lean on jade balustrades' is really good," he said with admiration, and ordered the royal orchestra to set the new poems to music. The banquet did not break up until the day was over. Brother Monkey and the other two were also having a splendid meal in the Pavilion of Lingering Spring.
Each of them was feeling rather merry after downing a few cups, and they decided to go to see their master, who was in another building with the king. This made Pig start acting like the idiot he was.
"This is great," he yelled at once. "We're doing very nicely here. Today we've had a right good time.
But now we're full we ought to go to sleep it off." "You really are ill−bred, brother," said Friar Sand with a grin.
"How could you possibly go to sleep when you're as full as that?" "You wouldn't know," said Pig.
"There's a saying that goes, Unless you stretch out for a nap when you've dined How can your belly with fat be well lined?" When the Tang Priest had taken his leave of the king he went back to the pavilion and scolded pig: "Cretin! You acted coarser than ever.
What sort of place do you think this is, to shout and yell like that?
If you had made the king angry he would have had you killed." "Don't worry," Pig replied, "don't worry.
We're being treated as his in−laws, so it would be very awkward for him to get angry with us.
As the proverb goes, If you're related a beating can't rend it; If you are neighbors a cursing won't end it. We were only joking.
He's nothing to be frightened of." Journey to the West At this the venerable elder shouted, "Bring the idiot here.
Give him twenty strokes of the dhyana staff." Monkey then grabbed Pig and knocked him over, while Sanzang raised the cudgel to beat him.
"Master, Royal Son−in−law," the idiot shouted, "Spare me!
Spare me!" One of the officials who was present at the banquet persuaded Sanzang not to hit Pig, who clambered back on his feet, grumbling, "You're a fine excellency; you're a fine royal son−in−law. Applying the royal law before you're even married!" "Stop that nonsense," said Monkey, making a face at him, "stop that nonsense!
Go to bed at once." They then spent another night in the Lingering Spring Pavilion.
The next morning they feasted as before.
Before long they had been enjoying themselves for three or four days, by when it was that splendid day, the twelfth.
The officials of the three sections of the Department of Foreign Relations all submitted a memorial that said, "Since we received the edicts on the eighth the palace for the Royal Son−in−law has been built, and all that we are waiting for is for the trousseau to be installed.
The nuptial banquet has been prepared, with meat and vegetarian food for over five hundred guests." This greatly pleased the king, who was just going to invite his future son−in−law to come to the banquet when a eunuch from the inner quarters of the palace reported to him, "Your Majesty, Her Majesty the Queen asks you to come." The king then withdrew to the inner quarters of the palace, where the queens of the three palaces and the consorts of the six compounds brought the princess to the Sunlight Palace to talk and joke together.
The place was truly a mass of flowers or brocade. The magnificence and beauty was more than a match for the halls of heaven or the moon's pavilions; nor was it inferior to the jade palaces of immortals.
There are four new lyrics on the "Happy Gathering and Splendid Wedding" about it.
The lyric "Happy" goes: Delight and bliss!
The wedding is celebrated With its love and beauty.
Elegant court dresses That the Lady of the Moon could never rival; Dragon and phoenix hairpins, Sumptuous threads of flying gold.
Cherry lips, white teeth and rouge−red cheeks Sylphs with forms as delicate as flowers. Brocades upon brocades, Journey to the West An extravagance of color, Full of fragrance, A host of princesses.
The lyric "Gathering" goes: Gathering! Gathering!
Bewitching charms, Rivaling the great beauties of the past, Enough to topple a city or a state, Like flowers or jade.
Dressed to make them lovelier still, Even more dazzling in their finery, And the splendor of their jewels.
Their orchid hearts and natures were pure and lofty; Noble were their powder−white faces and ice−smooth skin.
The lines of their painted eyebrows were like distant hills; They formed a throng of willowy elegance. The lyric "Splendid" goes: Splendid! Splendid!
Jade girls, fairy maidens, Utterly adorable, Truly to be admired, Perfumed with fine fragrances, Journey to the West Adorned with cosmetics.
Although far from the Tiantai paradise, This was no mere palace of a king.
Sweet were their smiling words As the sound of pipes and songs was wafted around.
A thousand beauties, massed flowers, a splendid brocade: How could its match be found in the world?
The lyric "Wedding" goes: Wedding! Wedding!
Orchid Fragrance, Ranks of fairy girls, Crowds of beauties.
The royal concubines have put on new splendor; The princesses are in fresh garments.
Piled clouds of raven hair, Rainbow gowns over phoenix skirts.
Soft music of immortals, Two rows of purple and red.
In the past they pledged to ride in one phoenix chariot; This morning is the happy occasion and the splendid wedding.
When the king arrived his queens and consorts led the princess and the other palace ladies out to meet him.
The delighted king took them into the Sunlight Palace to sit down.
When the queens, consorts and others had made their obeisances the king said, "Princess, my good daughter, we think that your heart's desire was fulfilled when you had the good fortune to find the holy monk by throwing your ball from the decorated tower on the eighth.
The officials of all the departments have been most understanding of our wishes, so that Journey to the West everything is now ready.
As today is a lucky one let us hurry to the nuptial banquet and not be late." The princess stepped forward, went down in a kowtow, and submitted this petition:
"Your Majesty my father, I beg you to forgive your daughter for her effrontery, but I have a request to make. In the last few days it has been reported in the inner quarters of the palace that the Tang Priest has three extremely hideous disciples.
I couldn't bring myself to see them: I'm afraid the sight would terrify me.
So I beg you, Father, to send them out of the city. Otherwise the shock might be too much for my trail health and lead to disaster." "If you had not mentioned them, child," the king replied, "we would have very nearly forgotten about them.
They are indeed rather ugly, and for the last few days we have had them entertained in the Lingering Spring Pavilion.
When we go into the throne hall this morning we will return their passport and tell them to leave the city so that we can hold our banquet." The princess then kowtowed again in thanks, after which the king left in his carriage to enter the throne hall and issue a decree inviting his son−in−law and the other three gentlemen to attend.
Now the Tang Priest had been following the dates by counting on his fingers, so when he reached the twelfth he had a discussion with his three disciples before dawn. "It is the twelfth today," he said.
"How are we to cope?" "I've already noticed something of an ill−omened air about the king," Brother Monkey replied, "but the evil hasn't actually infected him or done any great harm.
The only thing is that I've not yet had a look at the princess. If she comes out and lets me take a peep at her I'll know whether she's an impostor or not, then I'll do something.
Don't worry.
He's bound to summon us now and send us three away from the city.
Accept the invitation and don't be afraid.
I'll slip back and stay close to you to protect you." As master and disciples were talking a royal equerry did indeed come with officials from the protocol office to bring an invitation.
"Let's go," said Monkey, "let's go.
I'm sure they're going to see us three on our way and keep you here, Master, for the wedding." "If they're seeing us off they're bound to give us hundreds and thousands of ounces of gold and silver," said Pig. "We'll be able to buy some presents to take home with us.
When I get back to my in−laws' place I'll be able to have a bit of fun again." "Shut up, second brother," said Friar Sand, "and stop talking such nonsense.
We'll do what big brother says." They then followed the officials to the foot of the throne hall steps, taking baggage and horse with them.
When the king had greeted them he commanded Monkey and the other two to come forward. "Hand your passport up," he said, "and we shall seal it, sign it and return it to you. You three gentlemen will be generously provided with funds for your journey and escorted on your way to see the Buddha on Vulture Peak.
If you come back with the scriptures you will also receive generous rewards.
We shall keep our son−in−law here:
there will be no need for you to worry about him." Monkey thanked the king, then told Friar Sand to take the passport out and hand it over.
The king read it, sealed and signed it, then brought out ten ingots of gold and twenty of silver that he wanted to present to them as gifts for his in−laws.
Pig, who always had been very keen on money and sex, stepped forward to accept them.
Monkey then gave a respectful chant and said, "We've disturbed you." As Monkey turned to go Sanzang hastily scrambled to his feet, grabbed hold of him, and said through clenched teeth, "You are all abandoning me." Journey to the West Brother Monkey pinched the palm of Sanzang's hand, gave him a meaningful look and said, "Unwind and take your pleasure here while we go to fetch the scriptures.
We'll call on you on our way back." Not knowing whether to believe this or not, the venerable elder refused to let him go.
When all the officials saw this they took it for a real parting.
Soon the king invited his son−in−law back into the throne hall, ordering the officials to escort the three gentlemen out of the city, whereupon Sanzang had to let go of Monkey and enter the hall.
As Brother Monkey and the other two went out through the palace gates they each took their leave.
"Are we really going?" asked Pig.
Monkey said nothing, and just walked back to the hostel, where the superintendent received them and provided tea and a meal.
"You two stay here," Monkey said to Pig and Friar Sand, "and whatever you do, don't show your faces.
If the hostel superintendent asks what's happening, give him vague answers. Don't say anything.
I'm going off to look after the master." The splendid Great Sage pulled out one of his hairs, blew on it with magic breath, called "Change!" and turned it into his own double to stay in the hostel with Pig and Friar Sand, while he himself leapt up into mid air in a flash, turning himself into a bee.
Yellow wings, sweet mouth and a sharp tail, He dances wildly in the wind, The brilliant thief of fragrance from the blossom Who sways his way through willows and flowers.
With many a drenching for his troubles He flies to and fro, but all in vain.
The thick delight be makes he never tastes; All he can do is leave his fame behind.
Watch him as he flies lightly into the palace, where he saw the Tang Priest sitting on an embroidered stool at the king's left, frowning and worried at heart.
Flying up to his master's Vairocana mitre, Monkey crept stealthily to his ear and said, "I'm here, Master, so don't fret." These words were heard by the Tang Priest alone,−−none of the ordinary mortals had any hope of hearing them−−so he felt relief at last.
Before long a eunuch came with an invitation: "Your Majesty, the nuptial banquet is set out in the Jay Palace. Her Majesty and the princess are awaiting you in the inner quarters.
They invite Your Majesty and His Excellency to go in for the wedding." Overwhelmed with happiness, the king went into the inner quarters with his son−in−law.
Indeed: Journey to the West The wicked king's love of flowers led to disaster; When the dhyana mind starts thinking, each thought brings sorrow.
If you don't know how the Tang Priest escaped once in the inner quarters of the palace, listen to the explanation in the next installment.
False and True Form Combine When the Jade Hare is Captured The True Female Is Converted and Meets With Spiritual Origin The story tells how the Tang Priest was feeling thoroughly miserable as he accompanied the king into the inner quarters, from where a great sound of drums and music arose and fine perfumes could be smelt.
He kept his head bowed, not daring to look up.
Monkey, secretly very pleased, had fixed himself to the Vairocana mitre, from where he used his magic light to look around with his fiery eyes and golden pupils.
There were two ranks of court ladies, making it seem like a palace of flowers or immortals, and finer than a spring breeze blowing past a brocade screen.
Indeed, they were Graceful and charming, Jadelike, and with ice−smooth skin.
Bewitching pairs more lovely than the girl of Chu, Beauties two by two, rivaling the lady Xi Shi.
Their hair was coiled high like flying phoenixes; Their eyebrows were just visible, low lines of distant hills.
Elegantly played the pipe and shawm; Fast sounded flute and drum.
All the notes of the scale rang out, Rising then falling again together.
Delightful were they as they danced and sang, A carpet of flowers, every one of them lovely.
Journey to the West Seeing that his master was not in the least moved by this Monkey silently smacked his lips in admiration and said, "What a fine monk! What a fine monk!
Dwelling amid splendor, his heart forms no attachment; Walking through magnificence, his mind is not confused." A little later the princess came out of the Jay Palace surrounded by the queens and consorts so greet the king with cheers of "Long live the king!
Long live the king!" This so alarmed the venerable elder that he trembled, not knowing what to do.
By now Monkey had already noticed a touch of the demonic−−though nothing very vicious−−that could just be made out in the aura above the princess's head.
Monkey crawled quickly to Sanzang's ear and said, "The princess is a fake, Master." "If she is a fake," the venerable elder replied, "then how are we to make her turn back into her real form?" "I'll give myself a magic body and catch her right here," said Monkey.
"That would terrify His Majesty," said Sanzang.
"Wait till he and his queens have withdrawn before using your magic." Now Monkey had been impatient by nature all his life, so he could not restrain himself.
With a great and angry roar he resumed his true from, rushed up and grabbed the princess. "You're a fine, evil beast," he said abusively.
"You've had no end of luxury here, you impostor, but it wasn't enough for you.
You're so sex−crazed you had to try to trick my master and destroy his primal masculinity." This struck the king speechless with fright, and made the queens and consorts fall about. The palace beauties all ran off to hide, fleeing for their lives.
It was just like A roaring wind in spring, The howling autumn gale.
When the roaring wind in spring blows through the wood A thousand blossoms are shaken; When the howling autumn gale hits the park Ten thousand leaves all swirl and fly.
The tree peony beneath the balustrade is snapped; Herbaceous peonies beside the balcony fall over. Journey to the West Hibiscus on the pond's banks are shaken all about.
While chrysanthemums are flung in heaps at the foot of the terrace.
The delicate begonia collapses in the dust; The fragrant rose is now sleeping in the wilds.
The spring wind smashes caltrop, lotus and pear; Winter snows weigh down the plum tree's tender blossoms.
The petals of the pomegranate Are scattered all around the inner courtyard; The branches of the willow Are blown sideways within the royal palace.
Fine blooms, and a night of raging wind and rain: Countless red petals carpet the ground with brocade.
Sanzang hastily put his trembling arms round the king and said, "Don't be afraid, Your Majesty.
It is only my wicked disciple using his magical powers to find out whether she is an impostor or not." Seeing that things were going badly for her, the evil spirit broke free, tore off her clothes, flung down her jewelry and hair ornaments and ran to the shrine of the local deity in the palace garden.
From here she brought out a short club shaped like the head of a trip−hammer, with which she started hitting wildly at Monkey as she turned quickly towards him.
Monkey, who had caught up with her at once, struck back at her face with his iron cudgel, Shouting and roaring at each other, the two of them started fighting in the palace gardens.
Then each began a great display of magic powers, riding clouds as they battled in mid air.
In this fight Great was the fame of the gold−banded cudgel; No one had heard of the hammerhead club.
One of them was there to fetch the true scriptures; The other was lingering for love of rare flowers.
Long had the demon known of the holy Tang Priest, And she longed to mate with his primal seed−juices.
Journey to the West In a past year she had carried off the real princess, And taken the form of the king's true daughter.
When she met the Great Sage, who saw her evil aura, He could tell true from false as he came to save a life.
The murderous club was flung at the head; The mighty iron cudgel struck back at the face.
Ranting and roaring, they were locked in struggle, Filling the skies and blotting out the sun.
As the two of them battled in mid air they terrified the common people of the city, and struck fear into all the officials at court.
The venerable elder kept saying as he supported the king, "Don't be alarmed, and please tell Her Majesty and all the others not to be afraid.
Your princess is an impostor pretending to be her.
When my disciple has captured her you will be able to see whether she is good or evil." Some of the bolder consorts brought clothes and jewelry to show the queen. "These are what the princess wore. She tore them off and is fighting that monk up in the sky stark naked.
She must be an evil spirit." Only then did the king, queens and consorts come to their senses and look up into the sky.
When the evil spirit and the Great Sage had been fighting for half a day without either emerging as victor Monkey threw his cudgel up and called "Change!" One turned into ten, ten into a hundred, and a hundred into a thousand.
Half the sky was filled with writhing serpents and pythons striking wildly at the evil spirit. With a flurry of her hands and feet she turned into a pure wind and fled into the azure sky.
Monkey said a spell, took all the iron cudgels back into a single cudgel, and went straight after her magic light.
As he approached the Western Gate of Heaven and saw the dazzling flags and banners Monkey shouted at the top of his voice, "Heavenly gatekeepers, stop that evil spirit and don't let her get away." The gate was being held by the Heavenly King Lokapala with the four great marshals Pang, Liu, Gou and Bi, who did indeed use their weapons to block the way.
As she could not get further she turned straight back and started fighting Monkey with her short club.
As he wheeled his iron cudgel the Great Sage looked carefully at her and saw that one end of her club was thick and one end thin, just like the lead of a trip−hammer used for hulling with a mortar, so he gave a furious roar and shouted, "Beast! What's that implement you're holding?
How dare you fight me with it?
Surrender at once or I'll smash your skull with a single blow from my cudgel." Grinding her teeth, the evil spirit replied, "You don't know about this weapon of mine, so listen while I tell you: Its immortal root was a piece of mutton−fat jade, Journey to the West Which took countless years to be worked into shape.
It was already mine when chaos was separated; When the primal disorder was sorted out I came first.
Its origins cannot be compared with mere mortal things; Its nature has always belonged to the highest heaven.
Embodying the golden light and the four images With the auspicious vapors of the Five Elements and the Three Primaries.
Long did it live with me in the Moon Palace, Staying beside me in the Cassia Hall.
For love of flowers I descended to the mortal world, Coming to India as a beautiful impostor.
The only reason why I shared the King's pleasures Was because I wanted my destined marriage with the Tang Priest.
How could you be so cruel as to ruin this fine mating, Pursuing me and giving rein to your vicious nature?
Great is the fame of this implement of mine, Which is older than your cudgel with gold bands.
It was a drug−pounding pestle in the Moon Palace: One blow from this and a life is ended." When Monkey heard this he replied with a mocking laugh, "Evil beast!
If you used to live in the Toad Palace you must have heard of my powers. How dare you argue with me!
Turn back into your real self and surrender at once if I'm to spare your life." "I know you," the monster replied.
"You're the Protector of the Horses who made great havoc in the palaces of Heaven five hundred years ago.
By rights I ought to give way to you, but because you've wrecked my marriage I hate you as much as if you'd killed my mother and father. It's more than I can stand for.
I'm going to kill you, you Protector of the Horses, for breaking the laws of Heaven." The words Protector of the Horses always infuriated the Great Sage, so the moment he heard them he flew into a great rage, lifted his iron cudgel and struck at her face.
The evil spirit swung her pestle in reply.
A ferocious battle then ensued in front of the Western Gate of Heaven.
In this combat there were Journey to the West A gold−banded cudgel, A drug−pounding pestle, Two immortals' weapons, a worthy match.
One had come down to earth for the sake of a marriage; The other was there to protect the Tang Priest.
It was because the king was not a righteous one And loved flowers that he attracted the evil spirit, Causing today's bitter strife As two of them gave Ml play to their stubbornness of heart.
Charging and rushing each other they strove for triumph; In cutting words they fought on with their tongues.
Rare was the martial prowess of the medicine pestle, But finer still was the iron cudgel's might.
A powerful golden light flashed at the heavenly gates; Brilliantly coloured mists went right down to the earth.
After a dozen rounds of fighting to and fro The evil spirit became too weak to resist.
When the evil spirit had fought another dozen or so rounds with Brother Monkey she could see how thick and fast his blows were coming, and realized that she could not win. Feinting with her pestle, she shook herself and fled due South in ten thousand beams of golden light with the Great Sage in pursuit.
Suddenly they reached a great mountain, where the evil spirit landed her golden light and disappeared into a cave.
Monkey, who was worried that she might escape, return to India and do some underhand harm to the Tang Priest, made sure he could recognize the mountain then turned his cloud round and went straight back to the capital.
It was now about four in the afternoon.
The king was clinging to Sanzang, shivering and shaking as he kept saying, "Save me, holy monk!" The consorts and queens were all in a panic as the Great Sage came down from the clouds with a cry of, "Here I am, Master!" Journey to the West "Stand still, Wukong," said Sanzang. "You must not alarm His Majesty.
Now, I am asking you what in fact happened about the imitation princess." Standing outside the Jay Palace, Monkey put his hands together in front of his chest and said, "The imitation princess was an evil spirit.
First of all I fought her for half a day, and she couldn't beat me, so she turned into a pure wind and fled straight to the gates of heaven. I shouted to the gods to block her way.
She turned back into her real self and fought another dozen or so rounds with me. Then she turned herself into golden light and fled due South to a mountain, beaten. I chased her as fast as I could till I got to the mountain, but I couldn't find her anywhere.
Then I came back because I was worried she might come here to harm you." When the king heard this he grabbed hold of the Tang Priest and asked, "If the false princess was an evil spirit, where is my real princess?" "When I've caught the false princess your real princess will turn up by herself," Monkey replied straight away.
When the queens and consorts heard this their fears vanished, and each of them came forward to bow and say, "We beg you to rescue our real princess, holy monk, and sort out the light from the dark. You will be richly rewarded." "This is no place for us to talk," said Monkey.
"I beg Your Majesty to go from the inner quarters to the throne hall with my master. Her Majesty and the rest of them should all go back to the inner palace, and my fellow−disciples Pig and Friar Sand should be sent for to protect my master so that I can go and subdue the demon.
That will keep a proper distinction between the inner and outer quarters of the palace, and spare me from worrying.
I am going to sort this out to show my sincerity." The king accepted the suggestion and was boundlessly grateful.
He led the Tang Priest out of the inner quarters and straight to the throne hall.
All the queens and consorts returned to the inner palace.
A vegetarian meal was ordered while Pig and Friar Sand were sent for.
The two of them soon arrived.
Monkey explained to them both about what had happened and told them to guard the master carefully.
The Great Sage set off by his cloud somersault and flew up into mid air.
All the officials in front of the throne hall looked up into the sky and bowed low.
The Great Sage Monkey went straight to the mountain that lay due South.
When the evil spirit had fled in defeat to the mountain and gone into her den she blocked the entrance with boulders and lay hidden there, terrified.
Having looked around for a while and seen no sign of life Monkey felt very impatient, so he made a spell with his hands and said the magic words, calling out the local deity and mountain god to be questioned.
A moment later the two gods arrived, kowtowed and said, "We didn't realize, we didn't realize. If we had known we'd have gone a long way to meet you. We beg you to forgive us." "I won't hit you just now," Monkey said.
"Tell me what this mountain's called.
How many evil spirits are there here?
Tell me the truth and I'll forgive you your crimes." "Great Sage," the two gods replied, "this mountain is called Mount Hairtrip.
There are three have warrens in the mountain, but from remote antiquity there have never been any evil spirits here. This is a blessed land of five felicities.
Great Sage, if you want to find an evil spirit, take the road to the Western Heaven." "I've reached the kingdom of India in the Western Heaven, where the king has a princess who was carried off by an evil spirit and abandoned in the wilds.
The evil spirit turned herself into the princess's double to deceive the king into building a decorated tower from which she could throw an embroidered ball to find herself a husband.
When I got to the foot of the tower while escorting the Tang Priest she deliberately hit the Tang Priest because she wanted to mate with him and lure his primal masculinity out of him.
When I saw through her I turned back into myself in the palace to catch her.
She threw off her human clothes and jewels and fought with me for half a day with a short club that she called a medicine−pounding pestle. Then she turned Journey to the West herself into a pure wind and disappeared.
When I chased her as far as the Western Gate of Heaven and fought another dozen or more with her she realized she couldn't beat me, turned herself into golden right and fled here.
Why didn't you see her!" When the two gods heard this they led Brother Monkey to search the three warrens.
When they first looked by the warren at the foot of the mountain a few frightened hares were startled and ran away.
When their search reached the cave at the top of the mountain they saw that the entrance was blocked with two great boulders.
"The evil spirit must have gone inside," the local god said, "when you were chasing her so hard." Monkey then pried the boulders apart with his iron cudgel.
The evil spirit, who was indeed hiding in there, sprang out with a whoosh, raising her medicine pestle to strike him with.
As Monkey swung his cudgel to parry her blow the mountain deity fell back in terror and the local god fled. From the demon's mouth came abusive grumbles:
"Who told you to bring him here to find me?" She continued to fend off the iron cudgel as she fled up into mid air in a fighting retreat.
Just at the moment of crisis, when it was getting late in the day, Monkey became more vicious than ever and his blows were even harder. He wished he could finish her off with a single stroke.
Just then a call came from the ninefold azure sky of, "Don't strike, Great Sage! Don't strike!
Be kind with your cudgel." When Monkey turned round he saw that it was the Star Lord of the Moon leading his beauties and immortals down on multicolored clouds to stand in front of him.
A flustered Monkey at once put his iron cudgel away, bowed and said, "Where are you going, Old Man?
I'm sorry I didn't keep out of your way." "The evil spirit fighting you is the Jade Hare who pounds the immortal elixir of mysterious dew in my palace," the Moon replied.
"A year ago she secretly opened the golden locks on the jade gates and absconded from the palace.
As I reckoned that she would be in mortal peril I have come here to save her life.
I do beg you, Great Sage, to spare her life out of consideration for me." Monkey assented, saying only, "I wouldn't dare harm her, I wouldn't dare.
No wonder she's so good with a medicine−pounding pestle. She's the Jade Hare.
What you don't know, Old Moon, is that she has kidnapped the king of India's daughter, made herself into the princess's double, and wants to ruin my master's primal masculinity although he's a holy monk. This is the truth.
We can't stand for crimes like that. How can you possibly let her off so lightly?" "There are things you don't know," the Moon replied.
"That king's daughter is no ordinary mortal.
She was the White Beauty from the Moon Palace. Eighteen years ago she slapped the Jade Hare, after which she longed for the human world and came down to it in a beam of magic light to the womb of the king's senior queen. She was born then.
The Jade Hare was getting her own back for that slap when she ran away from the palace last year and threw White Beauty into the wilds. But she was wrong to want to marry the Tang Priest.
That's an offence she mustn't get away with.
It was a good thing you were careful enough to see through her before she ruined your master.
But I plead with you to forgive her for my sake and let me take her back." "If that's why it happened," Brother Monkey replied with a smile, "I wouldn't dare to make any objections.
But if you take the Jade Hare back I'm worried that the king might not believe it, so I'd like to trouble you and the immortal sisters to take the Jade Hare over there to prove it to the king. Then I'll be able to show off my powers and explain how White Beauty came down to earth. I'll make the king fetch Princess White Beauty to prove the truth of retribution.
Journey to the West The Moon was persuaded, so he pointed at the evil spirit and shouted, "Repent and submit, evil beast!" The Jade Hare rolled on the ground and turned back into her real form.
Indeed she was Gap−lipped and sharp−toothed, Long−eared and with few whiskers.
Her body was covered with jade−coloured fur; When she stretched out her legs she flew over mountains.
Her straight nose was like yogurt, Glossier than face−cream with powder.
Two eyes glowed red, Brighter than dots of rouge on the snow.
Crouching on the ground She was a heap of pure white silk; When she stretched herself out She was a structure of dazzling silver wire.
Often did she Drink in the purest dew of the heavenly dawn, Pounding the elixir with her pestle of jade.
When the Great Sage saw this he was delighted, and treading clouds and light he led the way as the Moon Lord brought all the beauties and immortals, taking the Jade Hare with them as they headed straight for India.
It was now dusk, and the moon was slowly rising.
When they reached the walls of the capital they heard the drums being beaten on the watch−towers.
The king and the Tang Priest were still inside the throne hall, while Pig, Friar Sand and the officials were standing in front of the steps. They were just discussing whether the king should withdraw when a sheet of coloured cloud as bright as day was seen due South.
When they all raised their heads to look they heard the Great Sage Monkey shouting at the top of his voice, "Your Majesty, King of India, ask your queens and consorts to come out and look. Under this canopy is the Star Lord of the Moon Palace, and the immortal sisters to either side of him are the beauties of the moon.
This Jade Hare was the bogus princess of yours who has now turned back into her real form." The king then quickly called his queen, consorts, palace beauties and maids out, and they all kowtowed towards the sky. The king, the Tang Priest and the officials also bowed to the sky in thanks.
There was nobody in any house throughout the whole city who did not set out an altar on which to burn incense, kowtow and recite the name Journey to the West of the Buddha.
Just when everyone was looking up Pig felt a surge of uncontrollable desire, leapt up into the air and flung his arms round an immortal girl dressed in a rainbow. "We're old Mends, darling," he said. "Let's go and have a bit of fun." Monkey went up to Pig, grabbed hold of him, gave him a couple of slaps and swore at him: "You village idiot.
What sort of place is this for getting randy?" "I was just going to chat her up for a bit of fun," said Pig.
The Moon Lord had his celestial canopy turned about as he took the Jade Hare straight back to the Moon Palace with all his beauties. Brother Monkey threw Pig down into the dust, then was thanked by the king in the throne hall.
When the king was told what had happened he said, "We are very grateful to you, holy monk, for using your great magical powers to capture the imitation princess.
But where is our real daughter?" "She is no ordinary human either," Monkey replied, "but the immortal girl White Beauty from the Moon Palace.
Because she slapped the Jade Hare in the face eighteen years ago she yearned for the lower world, came down to the womb of Your Majesty's senior queen and was born here.
It was because the Jade Hare nursed her old grudge that she surreptitiously opened the golden lock on the jade gate's, came down here, abandoned White Beauty in the wilds and made herself look like White Beauty to deceive you.
The Moon Lord himself told me about this chain of events.
Today we've got rid of the imposter, and tomorrow I'll invite Your Majesty to go in your royal carriage to fetch the real one." This came as rather a shock to the king, who said with the tears streaming down his cheeks, "Daughter!
In all the time since we came to the throne as a child we have never even gone outside the city gates.
Where are we to go to look for you?" "No need to upset yourself," said Monkey with a smile. "Your daughter is now in the Almsgiver's Spread Gold Monastery, pretending to be mad. Everyone can go home now. Tomorrow morning I'll bring your real princess back to you." "Please stop worrying, Your Majesty," the officials all said, kowtowing.
"These holy monks are all Buddhas who can ride clouds and mists: they are sure to know all about causes and effects in the future and the past. If we trouble the holy monks to come with us tomorrow to look for her we will learn the truth." Accepting their suggestion, the king invited the monks to the Lingering Spring Pavilion, where a vegetarian meal was provided and they were to spend the night.
By now it was almost the second watch.
Indeed: The copper water−clock drips in the moon's bright glow; The chimes of the golden bell are carried by the wind.
When the cuckoo sings the spring is half−way gone; The blossoms fall aimlessly as the third watch draws near.
The swing casts a shadow in deserted royal gardens; Journey to the West The silver river spans the sky's blue vault.
No travelers are to be seen in markets and streets; The constellations make the night sky shine.
That night they all went to bed, and of that no more need be said.
During the night the king lost his demonic aura, and his spirit grew with great speed, so that at three marks after the fifth watch he came out of the inner quarters to give audience once more.
When the audience was over he ordered that the Tang Priest and his three disciples be fetched to discuss the search for the princess.
Sanzang then came and did obeisance to the king, while the Great Sage and the other two also paid their respects.
The king bowed to them and said, "Yesterday you spoke of our daughter the princess.
May we trouble you divine monks to find and rescue her?" "The day before yesterday we had been walking from the East till evening," the venerable elder replied, "when we saw the Almsgiver's Spread Gold Monastery. We went inside to ask for accommodation and had the good fortune to be entertained by the monks there.
After supper I took a moonlight stroll in the former Spread Gold Garden, and as I was looking at the remains I heard wailing.
When I asked what it was all about, an ancient monk, over a hundred years old, sent everyone else away before telling me, 'Now, about that wailing, in the late spring of last year I was enjoying the moon when suddenly heard a gust of wind and the sound of someone grieving. I got out of bed, went into the Jetavana and saw a girl there. When I questioned her the girl said, "I am a princess, the daughter of the king of India.
The wind blew me here when I was looking at the flowers by moonlight."' The ancient monk knows a lot about correct behavior, so he locked the princess up in a quiet, out−of−the−way cell.
As he was worried that the monks of the monastery might sully her he put it about that he had locked up an evil spirit.
The princess, who understood what he was doing, ranted and raved during the day and demanded food and tea.
Only late at night, when there was nobody about, did she think of her mother and father and cry for them.
The ancient monk did come to the capital to make enquiries several times, but when he found that the princess was well and in the palace he didn't dare say anything or submit a memorial.
When the ancient monk saw that my disciple had some magic powers he repeatedly insisted that we were to come here to investigate.
I never expected that she would turn out to be the Jade Hare from the Moon Palace who had put on an imitation of the real body and made herself look like the princess. She was also set on ruining my primal masculinity.
Fortunately my disciple showed his mighty magic and detected the fraud.
The Jade Hare has now been recaptured by the Moon Lord.
Your worthy princess is now pretending to be crazy in the Spread Gold Monastery." After hearing the story in all this detail the king started to weep aloud.
This soon alarmed the queens and consorts of the three palaces and six compounds, who all came out to ask why.
Everybody began to weep bitterly, and it was a long time before the king asked, "How far is the Spread Gold Monastery from the city?" "Only twenty miles," Sanzang replied.
The king then issued these commands: "Let the Queens of the Eastern and Western Palaces look after the court while the High Minister takes charge of the nation's business.
We are going to the monastery with our Senior Queen, our officials and the four holy monks to fetch the princess." Journey to the West Carriages were at once prepared and a line of them left the palace.
Watch as Brother Monkey sprang up into the air and with a bend of his back was the first to reach the monastery.
The monks all hastily knelt to greet him. "When you left, sir," they said, "you walked with the others, so why did you come down from the sky today?" To this Monkey replied with a smile, "Where is your ancient teacher?
Ask him to come out straight away, and set out incense tables to welcome His Majesty. The king and queen of India, the officials and my master are all coming." The monks could not understand what he meant, so they asked the ancient monk to come out.
When the ancient monk saw Monkey he prostrated himself before him with the words, "What has happened about the princess, sir?" Monkey told him all about how the imitation princess had thrown the embroidered ball, wanted to mate with the Tang Priest, been chased, fought, and been recaptured by the Moon Lord as the Jade Hare.
The ancient monk kowtowed to him again in thanks.
"Please stop kowtowing," said Monkey, helping him up, "please stop.
Hurry up and get ready to receive His Majesty." Only then did the monks realize that it was a girl locked up in the garden at the back. Surprised and delighted, they all set out a row of incense tables outside the monastery gates, put on their cassocks and started striking the bell and the drum.
Soon after this the king's carriage arrived. Indeed:
The sky is filled with clouds of holy incense; Sudden blessing comes to the monastery.
The rainbow flows for a thousand years; rivers and seas are pure. The eternal spring round which lightning flickers is finer than those of Yu and Tang.
Thanks to the royal grace the plants' colours are finer than ever; The wild flowers have extra fragrance because of this generosity.
Men of distinction have always left their mark behind them; Today all rejoice at an enlightened king's arrival.
When the king arrived outside the monastery gates the monks were all lined up on their knees in orderly ranks, bowing low in greeting.
Monkey stood in the middle.
"How did you arrive first, holy monk?" the king asked.
"It just took a little bend of my waist for me to get here," Monkey replied.
"Why were you such a long time coming?" After this the Tang Priest and the others all arrived.
He led the royal carriage to the building at the back where the princess was still raving and pretending to be crazy.
The ancient monk knelt down, pointed towards her and said, "This is Her Royal Highness the princess who was blown here by a wind the other year." The king ordered the cell opened.
When the iron locks were Journey to the West undone and the door opened the king and queen saw and recognized the princess. Not caring about the filth, they went up to her and threw their arms round her.
"Our poor child," they said, "how did you come to suffer these torments and have so terrible a time here?" How true it is that the meeting of parents and child is not like that of other people. The three of them sobbed aloud, their arms round each other's heads.
When they had cried for a while and told each other what had happened since they were parted, scented hot water was sent for. The princess bathed and changed her clothes before they all climbed into carriages to go back to the capital.
Monkey then put his hands together in greeting to the king and said, "I have something else to put to you, Your Majesty." "Say it, whatever it is, holy monk," the king said, returning his greeting, "and we will do as you ask." "This mountain of theirs," Monkey replied, "is called Mount Hundredfoot.
They tell me that centipedes have been turning into spirits here recently and injuring people by night. This is very awkward for travelling merchants.
As I see it, only chickens can deal with centipedes, so a thousand extra−large cockerels should be chosen and then scattered across the mountainside to get rid of these venomous insects.
The mountain could be renamed and you could make a land grant to these monks to thank them for looking after the princess." This suggestion pleased the king greatly, and he accepted it.
Officials were then sent back to the city to fetch cocks, while the mountain was renamed Mount Splendor.
The Department of Works was instructed to provide the materials for the monastery to be rebuilt, a deed of enfeoffment was written describing the mountain as "Mount Splendor, granted to the Almsgiver's Spread Gold Monastery," and the ancient monk was given the title National Benefactor Hierarch, a title that was to be handed on to his successors in perpetuity, together with a stipend of thirty−six bushels of grain.
The monks all thanked the king for his kindness and saw him off on his way back to the capital.
Here the princess returned to the inner palace and was greeted by all the ladies in turn.
A banquet was then laid on to cheer the princess up and congratulate her on her deliverance.
The queen and her daughter were reunited; king and ministers were together. We will not describe the night's feasting.
Early the next morning the king ordered that painters make portraits of the countenances of the four holy monks to be kept in the Sino−Barbarian Hall.
The princess was also invited to come out from the throne hall in her new finery to thank the Tang Priest and the other three for saving her from her suffering.
When she had thanked them the Tang Priest took his leave of the king to continue his journey West.
The king refused to let them go, but ordered great banquets at which they feasted for five or six days. The idiot really was given a good time, and he enjoyed putting as much food in his stomach as he possibly could.
When the king saw how determined they were to visit the Buddha he realized that no matter how hard he tried he would not be able to keep them. He had two hundred ingots of gold and silver brought out, as well as a tray of jewels for each of them as an expression of thanks.
Master and disciples refused to accept anything.
The king then ordered the royal carriage prepared, invited the master to enter it, and instructed officials to escort them a long way.
The queens, consorts, officials and common people all kowtowed endlessly in thanks.
As they went along the way their monks all came out to kowtow to them in farewell; none of them could bear to be parted from the travelers.
Seeing that the people seeing them off were unwilling to turn back. Monkey had no option but to make a spell with his hands and blow a magic breath in the direction of the trigram of the wind, Xun, so that a dark wind stopped all the escorts from seeing them. Only then did the travelers get away.
This was indeed a case of Washing away the waves of gratitude their natures returned to the end; Journey to the West Leaving the sea of gold they were aware of true emptiness.
If you do not know what happened on the journey ahead, listen to the explanation in the next chapter.
Squire Kou Entertains the Lofty Monk The Tang Priest Does Not Covet Wealth and Honour All kinds of matter are really without matter; No emptiness is truly empty.
Stillness and clamour, speech and silence, all are the same: Why bother to dream−talk in one's dreams?
The useful includes the useless in its application; Achievement lurks within failure.
When the fruit is ripe it reddens of itself; Do not ask how the seed is to be grown.
The story has told how the Tang Priest and his disciples used their magic powers to stop the monks of the Spread Gold Monastery.
When the monks saw after the black wind had passed that the master and his disciples had disappeared they thought that their visitors must have been living Buddhas come down to earth, so they kowtowed and went back. Of them we tell no more.
As master and disciples traveled West spring was giving way to early summer: The air was clear, mild and refreshing; Water chestnuts and lotuses were growing in the pool.
Plums were ripening after the rain; The wheat was forming as the breezes blew.
Flowers were fragrant where blossoms fell from trees; The oriole grew tired amid the willow's light branches.
Journey to the West Swallows over the river taught their young to fly; The pheasants fed their chirping chicks.
South of the Dipper the sun was always seen; All of creation shone with brightness.
We could never describe in full how they ate at dawn, found shelter at dusk, rounded ravines and climbed hills as they went along their way without incident for a fortnight.
Then another city wall appeared in front of them.
As they came closer to it Sanzang asked, "What sort of place is this, disciple?" "I don't know," Brother Monkey replied, "I don't know." "You've been this way before," put in Pig, "so how can you claim that you don't know?
I suppose you're being crafty and just pretending you can't recognize the place to make fools of us." "You're being completely unreasonable, you idiot," said Monkey.
"Although I've been this way several times I've always come and gone by cloud high up in the sky. I've never landed here.
I had no interest in the place, so why should I have looked it over?
That's why I didn't know.
I'm not being crafty, and not trying to make a fool of you either." While they were talking they came close to the city before they realized it.
Sanzang dismounted, crossed the drawbridge and went straight in through the gates. As they went along the main street there were two old men to be seen sitting under a portico and talking.
"Disciples," said Sanzang, "stand here in the middle of the road, keep your heads bowed and don't run wild.
I am going under that portico to ask where we are." Monkey and the others stood still as they had been told while the venerable elder went up to the two men, put his hands together and called out, "Greetings, benefactors." The two old men were idly chatting about such things as prosperity and decay, success and failure, sages and good men, their heroic deeds in ancient times, and where such men were now. Really, they said, it was enough to make you sigh.
When they suddenly heard Sanzang's greeting they returned it and asked, "What do you have to say to us, reverend sir?" "I am a monk who has come from far away to worship the Lord Buddha," Sanzang replied, "and I have just arrived here.
I wonder what this place is called, and where there are any pious folk from whom I might beg a meal." "This is the prefecture of Brazentower," one of the old men said, "and this is the county of Diling near Brazentower city.
If you want vegetarian food, reverend sir, you won't need to beg. Go past this archway to the street running North−south. There's a gate−tower shaped like a sitting tiger facing the East, and that's Squire Kou's house. In front of it is a sign that says 'All monks welcome'.
A monk from far away such as yourself will be given all you want.
Off you go, and stop interrupting our conversation." Sanzang thanked them, turned to Monkey and said, "This is Diling county in the prefecture of Brazentower.
The two old men said that on the street running North−south past this archway there is a gate−tower shaped Journey to the West like a sitting tiger that is Squire Kou's house. In front of it is a sign that says 'All monks welcome'.
They told me to go there for a vegetarian meal." "The West is a land of Buddhists," said Friar Sand, "and they really do feed monks.
As this is only a seat of local government we don't need to present our passport.
Let's go and beg ourselves a meal; that'll be all the better for travelling with." The master and his three disciples walked slowly along the main street, filling all the people in the market with alarm and suspicion as they crowded around, struggling to see what the strangers looked like.
Sanzang told his disciples to keep their mouths shut, saying, "Behave yourselves!
Behave yourselves!" The three of them kept their heads bowed, not daring to look up.
Then they turned a corner and did indeed see a main road running North−south.
As they were walking along it they saw a gate−tower like a sitting tiger.
On a screen wall inside the gateway hung a great sign on which were written the words "All monks welcome." "The West is indeed the land of the Buddha," said Sanzang. "Nobody, however clever or stupid, is dishonest.
I did not believe what the two old men told me.
Now I know it is just as they said." Being the boor that he was, Pig wanted to go straight in. "Just a moment, idiot," said Monkey.
"Wait till someone comes out so we can ask what to do before we go in." "Big brother's right," said Friar Sand.
"If we don't show respect for his privacy we might irritate the benefactor." They let the horse rest and put down the luggage outside the gates.
A little later a slave came out with a steelyard and a basket in his hands that the sudden sight of the strangers made him drop in alarm. "Master," he reported, running inside, "here are four strange−looking monks outside." At the time the gentleman was walking with a stick in the inner courtyard, reciting the name of the Buddha.
When he heard the report he dropped his stick and went out to welcome them. Their ugliness did not frighten him.
"Come in, come in," he said.
Behaving with all courtesy, Sanzang went inside with him.
The gentleman led them along a passageway and into a house, where he said, "The upper building includes a Buddha hall, a surra library and a refectory for you gentlemen.
The lower building is where your disciple's family lives." Sanzang expressed endless admiration.
He brought out and put on his cassock to worship the Buddha, then went up into the hall to have a look. What he saw was: Clouds of incense, Dazzling candles.
The−ball was filled with a brocade of flowers; All around was gold and many colours.
From red frames Hung a bell of purple gold; Journey to the West On a lacquered stand Was set a matching decorated drum.
Several pairs of banners Were embroidered with the eight treasures; A thousand Buddha statues Were all covered in gold.
Ancient bronze incense−burners, Ancient bronze vases, Carved lacquer tables, Carved lacquer boxes.
In the ancient bronze incense−burners Was always eaglewood incense; In the ancient bronze vases Were the colours of lotus blossoms.
On the carved lacquer tables Were fresh fruits; In the carved lacquer boxes Fragrant petals were piled.
In glass bowls Was pure, clear water; In crystal lamps The fragrant oil shone bright.
A metal chime Resounded long and slow.
This was like a treasure house untouched by the world, A family Buddha hall rivaling a monastery.
Journey to the West The venerable elder washed his hands, took a pinch of incense, kowtowed and worshipped, then turned back to greet the gentleman. "Wait a moment," Mr.
Kou replied. "Let us make our introductions in the sutra library." What they saw there was: A square stand and upright cupboards, Jade boxes and golden caskets.
On the square stand and in the upright cupboards Were piled up countless scriptures; In the jade boxes and golden caskets Were stored many a manuscript.
On lacquered tables Were paper, ink, brushes and inkstones, All the finest treasures of the study.
Before the scented screen Were calligraphy, paintings, a lute and chess, All for the most refined of interests.
A magic chime of light jade covered with gold, And a copper tripod in the wind and under the moon.
The clear breeze freshens the spirit; The purified heart is aware; the mind set on the Way is at ease.
When the venerable elder had reached the library and was going to bow to him Mr. Kou held on to prevent this and said, "Won't you take off your cassock?" Sanzang then took off his cassock, after which he greeted Mr. He then told Monkey and the other two to greet him too.
Orders were given for the horse to be fed and the luggage put in a corridor. The gentleman asked about their background.
"I have been sent by the emperor of Great Tang in the East," Sanzang said, "to the Vulture Peak in your splendid country to see the Lord Buddha and ask for the true scriptures.
I am here to request a meal because I Journey to the West have heard that in your distinguished household you honour monks.
After that we will be on our way." The gentleman's face was suffused with pleasure as he replied with a chuckle, "My name is Kou Hong, my other name is Kou Dakuan, and I have lived for sixty−four wasted years.
When I was forty I made a vow to feed ten thousand monks, and you will complete the number.
In the twenty−four years during which I have been feeding monks I have kept a record of their names.
Having nothing else to do in recent days I have counted the names of all the monks I've fed, and the score is now 9,996.
I was only short of four to make up the full number. Then today heaven has you four teachers down to me to complete the ten thousand.
Will you be so good as to tell me your names? I hope that you will stay for a month or more until I have celebrated the completion, after which I will send you teachers up the mountain in carrying−chairs or on horses.
Vulture Peak is only some 250 miles from here, not at all far away." Sanzang was thoroughly delighted to hear this, and he agreed to it all at once.
Several young and old servants fetched firewood, drew water, and brought rice, flour and vegetables into the house with which to prepare them a meal.
All this disturbed the gentleman's wife, who said, "Where have these monks come from, and why is everyone so busy?" "Four eminent monks have just arrived," the servants told her, "and when the master asked them where they were from they said they'd been sent by the emperor of the Great Tang in the East to go to worship the Lord Buddha on Vulture Peak. Goodness only knows how far it is to here from there.
The master said that they had been sent down from heaven and told us to get them a vegetarian meal quickly." The old woman was also very pleased to hear this, so she told a maid to fetch her clothes so that she too could go to see them.
"Only one of them is handsome, ma'am," the servant said. "The other three don't bear looking at.
They're really hideous." "What you people don't realize," the old woman replied, "is that if they look ugly, strange and freakish they must be heavenly beings come down to earth.
Hurry and tell your master straight away." The servant ran straight to the surra hall, where he said to the gentleman, "The old lady's here to pay her respects to the lords from the East." On hearing this Sanzang rose from his seat.
Before the words had all been spoken the old woman was already before the hall, where she lifted her eyes to see the Tang Priest's majestic countenance and his splendid bearing.
When she turned to see the extraordinary appearance of Monkey and the other two she was somewhat alarmed even though she knew they were heavenly beings come down to earth; she fell to her knees and bowed.
Sanzang quickly returned her courtesy, saying, "Bodhisattva, the honour you do me is undeserved." The old woman then asked her husband why the four reverend gentlemen were not all sitting together.
"We three are disciples," said Pig, thrusting his snout forward. Goodness!
His voice was like the roar of a tiger deep in the mountains. The old woman was terrified.
As they were talking another servant appeared to announce, "The two young masters are here too." When Sanzang turned quickly round to look he saw that they were two young scholars, who prostrated themselves to the venerable elder after walking into the sutra hall.
Sanzang was quick to return their courtesy.
Kou then came up to take hold of him and say, "These are my two sons. Their names are Kou Liang and Kou Dong. They have just come back from their school and have not yet had their lunch. They are here to pay their respects because they have heard that you teachers have come down to earth." "What fine sons," said Sanzang with delight, "what fine sons. Indeed: Journey to the West If you want to make a lofty match you must do good:
The success of your sons and grandsons depends on study." The two scholars then asked their father, "Where have these lords come from?" "From a long way away," Mr. Kou replied with a smile.
"The emperor of Great Tang in the East of the Southern Continent of Jambu has sent them to Vulture Peak to worship the Lord Buddha and fetch the scriptures." "We have read in the Compendious Forest of Facts that there are four continents in the world," the scholars said.
"This continent of ours is the Western Continent of Cattle−gift. There is also an Eastern Continent of Superior Body.
How many years did it take you to get here?" "I have been a long time on the journey," Sanzang replied with a smile, "met many vicious demons and monsters, and suffered greatly.
I have been greatly indebted to my three disciples for their protection.
Altogether it has taken me fourteen winters and summers to reach your splendid country." When the scholars heard this they said with unbounded admiration, "You really are holy monks, you really are." Before they had finished speaking a servant came in to invite them to eat:
"The vegetarian banquet has been set out, so will you eat, my lords?" The gentleman then sent his wife and sons back to the house, while he went with the four monks into the refectory for the meal.
Everything was set out very neatly. There were gold−lacquered tables and black−lacquered chairs.
In front were fine cakes of many colours that skilled chefs had made up in up−to−date styles.
The second row contained five dishes of hors−d'oeuvres, in the third row there were five dishes of fruit, and in the fourth were five large dishes of snacks.
Everything tasted good, looked good and smelt good. Vegetable soup, rice and steamed breadrolls were all spicy, piping hot, and most delicious. There was plenty to fill one's stomach.
Seven or eight servants rushed around waiting on them, while four of five cooks were kept constantly busy.
Just watch while some poured soup and others filled the rice bowls, coming and going like shooting stars chasing the moon.
Pig was finishing up bowls in single mouthfuls, like a gale blowing the clouds away.
Thus master and disciples ate their fill.
Sanzang then rose to thank Mr. Kou for the meal before setting out again.
The gentleman blocked his way saying, "Teacher, won't you take things easy and spend a few days here?
As the saying goes, it's nothing to start a journey but it's hard to end one.
I will send you on your way when we have celebrated the completion of my vow." Seeing how sincere and determined he was, Sanzang had no option but to stay.
Five to seven days quickly passed before Mr. Kou engaged twenty−four local Buddhist monks to perform a mass to celebrate the fulfillment of the vow.
The monks spent three or four days writing texts out and chose a lucky day on which to begin the Buddhist service.
The way they did it was like in the Great Tang.
There was A great display of banners, Journey to the West Where the golden countenance was set out; Rows of candles And incense burnt in offering.
Drums and gongs were beaten, Pipes and shawms were played.
Cloud−cymbals, Pure−toned flutes, Sounded in tune; To the beat of the drum, And the woodwind's notes, The words of sutras were recited in unison.
First the local god was put at ease, Then spirit generals were invited to come.
The documents were sent out, And they bowed low to the Buddha statues, Reciting the Peacock Sutra, Each word of which could sweep away disasters, A stand of lamps was lit for Bhaisajya−guru, To shine with flames of dazzling brightness.
They performed the Water Ceremony To end any sense of grievance.
Then they intoned the Avatamsaka Sutra To do away with slander.
The Three Vehicles of the Wonderful Law are very fine: Different monks are all the same.
Journey to the West The mass lasted for three days and nights before it ended.
In his longing to go to the Thunder Monastery the Tang Priest was determined to be on his way, so he took his leave of them and thanked them.
"Teacher, you are very eager to say good−bye," Mr. Kou said.
"I suppose you must have taken offence because for days on end we have been so busy with our service that we have treated you very offhandedly." "We have put your noble house to a great deal of trouble," Sanzang replied, "and I do not know how we will ever repay you. How could we possibly have taken offence?
But when my wise monarch saw me off through the passes all those years ago he asked me when I would be back. I wrongly told him that I would return in three years, never imagining that the journey would be so badly delayed that it has already lasted fourteen years.
I do not even know whether I will succeed in fetching the scriptures, and it will take me another twelve or thirteen years to get back. How am I to face the penalty for breaking my monarch's sage command?
I beg you, sir, to let me go to fetch the scriptures and return. Next time I come to your mansion I will be able to stay much longer." This was more than Pig could bear.
"You don't care at all about what we want, Master," he shouted at the top of his voice. "You're showing no consideration at all.
The old gentleman's very rich, and now he's fulfilled his vow to feed monks. Besides, he's really sincere about wanting to keep us here. It'd do no harm if we stayed here for a year or so. Why be so set on going?
Why leave all this good food to go begging for meals elsewhere?
Is it your parents' home ahead?" "All you care about is food, you cretin," shouted Sanzang angrily. "You don't care at all about the transference of cause and effect.
Really, you're such an animal you'd eat from the trough to scratch the itch in your belly.
If you people are going to be so greedy and stupid I'll go by myself tomorrow." Seeing that the master's attitude had changed, Monkey grabbed hold of Pig and punched his head. "You've got no sense, you idiot," he said abusively.
"You've made the master angry with us too." "He deserved that," said Friar Sand with a grin, "he deserved that.
He's disgusting enough even if he doesn't say a word, but he would have to interrupt." Breathing heavily, the idiot stood to one side, not daring to say another word.
Seeing the anger of master and disciple, Mr. Kou said, his face wreathed in smiles, "Do not be so short−tempered, teacher. Make yourself comfortable for the rest of the day.
Tomorrow I will have banners and drums brought here and ask some relations and neighbors to come to see you off." As they were talking the old woman come out again to say. "Venerable teacher, as you have come to our house you should not refuse too insistently.
How many days have you spent here now?" "It is already a fortnight," Sanzang replied.
"That fortnight is my gentleman's achievement," the old woman said.
"I have a little pin−money with which I would like to entertain you gentlemen for another fortnight." Before she had finished speaking Kou Dong and his brother came out again to say, "Your four lordships, in the twenty and more years during which our father has been feeding monks he has never met better ones than yourselves.
Now that by your gracious condescension you have made up the total you really have brought glory to our thatched hovel.
We two are too young to understand about cause and effect, but we have often heard it said, Journey to the West The husband gets what he has merited, The wife gets what she has merited; Nothing is got when nothing is merited.
Our father and mother each want to make a humble offering in order that each of them may merit a reward, so why must you refuse so insistently?
And as we two brothers have saved a little of our school fees we hope to be allowed to support you gentlemen for another fortnight before seeing you on your way.
"I dare not accept even the lavish hospitality of the venerable Bodhisattva your mother," Sanzang replied, "so how could I accept you brothers' generosity?
I could not possibly do so.
I really must set out today. Please, please do not take offence.
If I do not go now I will be unable to avoid execution for exceeding my emperor's time−limit by so long." When the old woman and her two sons realized that Sanzang was determined not to stay they started losing their patience. "We invite you very nicely to stay," they said, "but you're obstinately set on going.
If you're going, go, and cut out this chatter." Mother and sons then left to go back to the house. Pig could hold his tongue no longer.
"Master," he said to the Tang Priest, "don't overdo it.
As the saying goes, 'If you can stay, don't go away.' Let's stay here for another month to let the mother and her sons fulfil their wishes.
Why do you have to be in such a rush?" The Tang Priest made another angry noise at him and shouted again. The idiot then slapped his own face twice, saying, "Tut, tut, tut. Don't talk out of turn.
You spoke again." Brother Monkey and Friar Sand, who were standing to one side, started spluttering with laughter. The Tang Priest was angry with Monkey again.
"What are you laughing at?" he asked, and made the hand magic, ready to recite the Band−tightening Spell.
This so terrified Monkey that he fell to his knees at once and said, "I didn't laugh, Master.
Whatever you do, don't say the spell!
Don't say it!" Seeing that master and disciples were getting into a worse and worse temper with each other Mr. Kou gave up his insistence on their staying.
"Don't quarrel, teachers," he said, "I'll definitely see you on your way tomorrow morning." He then left the sutra hall and told his secretary to write a hundred or so invitations to his neighbors and relations to see the Tang Priest off to the West early the next morning.
He told the cooks to lay on a parting banquet, while also instructing his steward to have twenty pairs of coloured flags made, hire a band of musicians, and engage a group of Buddhist monks from the Monastery from the South and another group of Taoist priests from the Eastern Peak Temple. Everything was to be ready and in order by ten in the morning.
All the gentleman's staff went off to carry out their orders.
Soon it was evening again, and after supper everyone went to bed.
It was the time when Dots of homegoing rooks pass the lonely village; Drum and bell can be heard from each other's distant towers.
Journey to the West In streets and markets the bustle is stilled; In all the houses the lamps shine dimly.
Flowers in the breeze throw shadows under the moon; The stars shine bright against the Milky Way.
Where the cuckoo sings the night seems deeper; All natural sounds are stilled across the earth.
During the third and fourth watches of the night all the household servants in charge of various matters got up early to attend to their tasks.
Just watch. The cooks preparing the banquet were busy in the kitchen.
The people who had to buy coloured flags were bustling in front of the hall.
Those engaging Buddhist and Taoist clergy were hurrying about as fast as their legs could carry them.
Those hiring musicians were in a great rush.
The messengers delivering invitations ran all over the place, while the servants preparing the carrying−chairs and horses were calling to each other.
They were all shouting from the middle of the night until dawn, and by around ten o'clock everything was prepared. This was all because the family was rich.
The story tells how the Tang Priest and his disciples got up early to be waited on once more by that crowd of servants.
The venerable elder told them to pack the baggage and saddle the horse.
When the idiot heard that they were about to go he pulled a face, pouted and grumbled, but he still had to pack the clothes and begging bowls then go to look for the carrying pole.
Friar Sand brushed the horse, saddled and harnessed it, and stood waiting.
Brother Monkey put the nine−ringed monastic staff in his master's hand and hung the passport in a bag in front of his chest. They were now all ready to set out.
Kou then invited them into the large hall at the back, where a feast was set out that excelled even the one they had eaten in the refectory.
Curtains hung from on high; Screens stood all around.
In the middle was a picture: A mountain of long life and a sea of blessings. On both walls were displayed. Scrolls of spring, summer, autumn and winter.
From the dragon−patterned tripod came clouds of incense; Above magpie−tailed burners rose auspicious vapors.
In bowls were bunches of color, Fresh and brilliant flowers of splendid form.
Journey to the West The tables were piled with gold: Lines of confections shaped like lions and immortals.
Music and dancing before the steps were in true harmony; The dishes in the hall were like a brocade.
Exquisite soup and rice, both free of meat; The finest tea and the best of wines.
Although they were only commoners Their home was fine enough for a prince.
All that could be heard were happy sounds So loud they surprised the sky and shook the earth.
The venerable elder was just exchanging courtesies with Mr.
Kou when a servant came in to report, "The guests are all here." These were the people who had been invited−−neighbors, relations by marriage, and some of his pious friends who also fed monks and recited the name of the Buddha−−and all of them bowed to the venerable elder.
After the greetings had been made everyone sat down.
Outside the hall zithers and panpipes were played, while inside the hall pipas and songs accompanied the banquet. Pig paid great attention to this rich banquet.
"Brother," he said to Friar Sand, "relax and eat as much as you can.
There won't be anything as good as this to eat after we leave the Kou house." "Nonsense," Friar Sand replied with a laugh. "As the saying goes, No matter how splendid the banquet you eat, For only a while can it keep you replete. Your savings may meet the expense of the road, But savings can never in bellies be stowed." "You're hopeless," said Pig, "hopeless.
If I eat my fill today I won't feel hungry for the next three days." "Idiot," said Monkey, who had heard this. "Don't fill your belly till it bursts.
We've got to start walking now." They were still talking, and it was almost noon when Sanzang raised his chopsticks and said grace.
Pig grabbed a bowl, filled it with desperate speed, and ate five or six bowlfuls in succession, gulping down a whole bowlful at a time. Without any qualms at all he filled both his sleeves with steamed bread, twists, Journey to the West pancakes and cooked dishes before rising with his master.
Sanzang thanked the gentleman and everyone else, then they all went outside together.
Just look at the coloured banners, splendid canopies, drummers and instrumentalists outside. Only then did two groups of clergy, one Buddhist and one Taoist, arrive. "Gentlemen," said Mr. Kou, "you are late.
Our teacher is in a hurry to leave, so I will not be able to offer you a meal.
I'll show you my gratitude when we come back." Everyone then opened a way to let them through, the carriers carrying their chairs, the riders on their horses and the walkers on foot all let Sanzang and his three disciples go first.
The heavens rang with drumming and music, the flags and banner blotted out the sun, crowds pressed around, and carriages and horses were all packed close together as everyone came to watch Mr. Kou seeing the Tang Priest off.
The splendor all around was more magnificent than pearls or jade, and no less fine than brocade screens behind which spring lies hidden.
The Buddhist monks playing Buddhist tunes and the Taoist priests their Taoist airs all escorted the travelers out of the prefecture.
When they reached the three−mile pavilion, baskets of food and jars of drink were set out, cups were raised, and they all drank parting toasts.
Kou, loath to let them go, said as he choked back his tears, "Teacher, you must spend some more days with us on your way back with the scriptures to fulfil my longing." Overcome with gratitude, Sanzang thanked him at great length.
"If I reach Vulture Peak," he said, "and see the Lord Buddha the first thing I will do will be to praise your great virtue.
We will certainly come to kowtow to you in thanks on our return journey." As they talked they covered another mile or so without noticing it. Then the venerable elder insisted on taking his leave, at which Mr.
Kou turned back, sobbing aloud.
Indeed: He who had vowed to feed the clergy found enlightenment: He was not fated to see the Tathagata Buddha. We will tell not of how Mr.
Kou went home with everyone after seeing the travelers off as far as the three−mile pavilion, but of how the master and his three disciples went on for some twelve or fifteen miles. By now it was growing dark.
"It's late," Sanzang said.
"Where are we to spend the night?" Pig, who was carrying the pole, pulled a face and said, "You would have to leave ready−cooked meals behind and refuse to stay in a nice cool brick house so as to go wherever it is we're going. That's just asking for trouble.
It's very late now. What'll we do if it starts raining?" "Evil, insolent beast," cursed Sanzang, "complaining again.
As the saying goes, The capital may be remarkably fine, But we can't linger here for a very long time.
Journey to the West If we are fated to visit the Lord Buddha, fetch the true scriptures, go back to Great Tang and report to the emperor I will let you eat in the imperial kitchens for years on end. Then, you evil beast, you will swell up till you burst.
That will teach you to be such a greedy devil." The idiot chortled quietly to himself, but did not dare say another word.
When Brother Monkey raised his eyes to look around he saw some buildings beside the road and asked his master urgently, "Can we spend the night here?
Can we?" Sanzang went over to the place, where he saw a ruined memorial arch on which was inscribed THE VIHARA OF PADMAPRABHA "The Bodhisattva Padmaprabha was a disciple of the Buddha Sikhin," said Sanzang, dismounting. "He was dismissed for eliminating the Demon King of Poison Fire and turned into the Spirit Officer of the Five Manifests.
There must be a shrine here." They then all went in together.
The cloisters had all collapsed, the walls had fallen down, and there was no trace of anybody around, only of vegetation running wild.
They would have gone out again, but the sky had filled with dark clouds and it had started to pour with rain.
There was nothing for it but to find a place in the ruins where they could shelter from the storm.
They kept completely silent, not daring to speak aloud for fear that some evil demon might hear them.
Thus it was that they endured a sleepless night sitting or standing there.
Oh dear!
How true it is that Disaster strikes at triumph's height; In time of joy comes sorrow's blight.
If you don't know what happened when they carried on with their journey, listen to the explanation in the next installment.
The Monks and Their Supporters Meet With Demonic Attack The Sage Makes the Spirit Reappear to Save the Primal One We will tell not of how the Tang Priest and the others endured a hard night in the dilapidated palace of Padmaprabha, but of a group of evil villains in Diling county in the prefecture of Brazentower who had squandered all their families' fortunes in whoring, drinking and gambling.
Having nothing else left to live on they had formed a criminal gang of a dozen and more members and were discussing which family was the richest in the city and which the second richest. The idea was to rob them of their gold and silver and thus get some money to spend. Journey to the West "There's no need to go round making enquiries," one of them said, "or work it out in detail. The Mr.
Kou who saw the Tang monk off today is rolling in money.
Let's strike tonight in the rain. There'll be nobody ready for us in the streets and the fire wardens won't be patrolling. When we've stolen his property we'll be able to go with the girls, gamble and have a good time again.
That would be great, wouldn't it?" The other robbers were all delighted with the suggestion, and with one heart they all set out in the rain carrying daggers, spiked clubs, sticks, coshes, ropes and torches.
Flinging open the main gates of the Kou house they charged inside, shouting and sending everyone inside, young and old, male and female, scurrying into hiding.
The old woman hid under the bed and the old man slipped behind the gates, while Kou Liang, Kou Dong and their families fled for their lives in all directions.
Holding their knives in their hands and lighting torches, the bandits opened up all the chests in the house and grabbed as much of the gold, silver, jewelry, hair ornaments, clothing, vessels and other household goods as they wanted.
Kou could not bear to lose all this, so taking his life in his hands he come out from behind the gate to plead with the robbers. "Take as much as you want, great kings," he said, "but please leave me a few clothes to be buried in." The robbers were in no mood for argument.
They rushed up to him, tripped and kicked him to the ground.
Alas, His three souls vanished to the underworld; His seven spirits left the world of men.
The successful robbers left the Kou house, put up a rope ladder from the foot of the city wall, took it in turns to cross and fled Westwards in the rain.
Only when they saw that the robbers had gone did the servants of the Kou family dare show their heads again. When they looked for old Mr.
Kou and found him lying dead on the floor they started weeping aloud. "Heavens!
The master's been murdered!" they all said as they wept, embracing the body and sobbing in misery.
When it was almost the fourth watch the resentful Mrs. Kou, who was angry with the Tang Priest and his followers for rejecting their hospitality, and also because the extravagance of their send−off had provoked this disaster, decided to ruin the four of them.
Helping Kou Liang to his feet, she said, "Don't cry, my son.
Your father fed monks day in and day out.
Who ever would have thought that he would complete the number by feeding a gang of monks who'd murder him?" "Mother," the brothers asked, "how did those monks murder him?" "Those bandits were so bold and vicious that when they charged in I hid under the bed," she replied. "Although I was trembling I made sure to take a very good look at them by the light of the torches.
Do you know who they were?
The Tang Priest was lighting torches, Pig was holding a knife, Friar Sand was taking the gold and silver, and Monkey killed your father." The two sons believed all this.
"If you saw all that clearly, mother," they said, "you must be right.
They spent a fortnight in our house, so they knew all the doors, walls, windows and passageways. They must have been tempted by our wealth and come back here under cover of rain and darkness. How evil! They've stolen our property and murdered our father.
Once it's light we'll go to the local government and report them as wanted men." "What sort of wanted notice should we write?" Kou Dong asked.
Journey to the West "We'll write what our mother said," Kou Liang replied, and he wrote:
The Tang Priest lit the torches, Pig incited to murder, Friar Sand stole the gold and silver and Sun the Novice murdered our father.
The whole household was in such a hubbub that before they noticed it day had dawned.
While invitations were sent out to their relatives and a coffin was ordered Kou Liang and his brother went to the local government offices to deposit their complaint.
Now the prefect of Brazentower: Had always been upright, Was good by nature.
As a boy he had studied by the light of the snow; When young he had taken the palace examinations.
His heart was always set on loyalty and justice, And filled with thoughts of kindness and benevolence.
His name would be transmitted in annals for a thousand years, Like a Gong Sui or Huang Ba come back to life; His fame would resound for ten thousand ages in the balls of office, Zhuo Mao and Lu Gong reborn.
When he had taken his seat in the hall and declared that all matters could be dealt with, he ordered that the placard asking for plaints should be carried outside.
Kou Liang and his brother then came in holding the placard, knelt down and called aloud, "Your Honour, we have come to denounce some bandits as thieves and murderers." The prefect accepted their complaint and read what it had to say.
"I was told yesterday that your family completed your vow of feeding monks," the prefect said, "by feeding four distinguished ones, arhats from the Tang Dynasty in the East. You made a great display of sending them off with drums and music.
So how could such a thing as this have possibly happened?" "Your Honour," said Kou Liang, kowtowing, "our father Kou Hong had been feeding monks for twenty−four years.
These four monks who had come from afar just happened to make up the ten thousand, which was why he held a service to mark the completion and kept them there for a fortnight.
They got to know all the passageways, doors and windows.
They were seen off during the day and came back yesterday evening. During the dark and stormy night they charged into the house with torches and weapons to steal our gold, Journey to the West silver, jewelry, clothes and hair ornaments. They beat our father to death and left him lying on the ground.
We beg you to be our protector." On hearing this the prefect mustered infantry, cavalry and able−bodied civilian conscripts, 150 men in all, who rushed straight out of the Western gate carrying sharp weapons in pursuit of the Tang Priest and his three disciples.
The story now tells how master and disciples stayed in the ruins of the minor palace of padmaprabha until dawn, when they went out and started hurrying Westwards.
The bandits, who had gone along the main road West all night till daybreak after robbing the Kou family and leaving the city, had passed the palace of Padmaprabha and hidden in the mountains some six or seven miles to the West. Here they were just dividing up the gold and silver when the Tang Priest and his three followers came into view, also heading West along the road.
The bandits, whose greed was not yet sated, pointed at the Tang Priest and said, "Look!
Aren't they the monks who were seen off yesterday?" "And a very welcome arrival too," said the other bandits, laughing, "Let's do a bit more of our dirty business. Those monks coming along the road spent a long time in the Kou house. Goodness only knows how much stuff they're carrying. Let's hold them up, take their travel money and white horse, and share it all out.
That'll suit us very nicely." The robbers then rushed to the road, brandishing their weapons and yelling their war cry as they formed a line. "Stay where you are, monks," they shouted. "Leave some toll money and we'll spare your lives.
If so much as half a 'no' comes out through your teeth you'll all be cut down without mercy." The Tang Priest was shaking with terror as he sat on his horse. "What are we to do?" Pig and Friar Sand asked Brother Monkey with alarm.
"What are we to do?
We had a miserable night in the rain, and after starting out again this morning we're being robbed by bandits.
How true is it that troubles never come singly." "Don't be frightened, Master," said Monkey with a smile, "and stop worrying, brothers.
Wait while I go and ask them a few questions." The splendid Great Sage put on his tigerskin kilt, straightened up his brocade and cotton tunic, went up to them, put his hands together in front of his chest and asked, "What are you gentlemen doing?" "Don't you care whether you live or die, you swine?" the robbers yelled back at him. "How dare you question us!
Have you got no eyes in your head? Don't you realize who we great kings are?
Hand your toll money over at once and we'll let you go on your way." When he heard this, Monkey wreathed his face in smiles and replied, "So you're bandits who hold people up on the road." "Kill him!" the bandits yelled with fury.
"Your Majesties," said Monkey with feigned terror, "Your Majesties, I'm only a monk from the country. I don't know the right things to say. Please don't be angry if I've offended you, please don't.
If what you want is toll money all you have to do is to ask me: no need to ask the other three.
I'm the bookkeeper. All the money we get for chanting sutras and as alms, all we beg and all we're given, goes into the bundles, and I'm in charge of spending it.
The man on the horse is my master. All he can do is recite sutras. He doesn't care about Journey to the West anything else. He's forgotten all about wealth and sex, and he's got nothing at all.
The black−faced one is a junior I collected on our journey. All he can do is look after the horse.
And the one with a long snout is a laborer I hired. He's only good for carrying a pole.
Let those three go while I fetch our travel money, cassocks and begging bowls.
I'll give you all you want." "You seem to be an honest chap, monk," the robbers said, "so we'll spare your life.
Tell the other three to leave their luggage, and we'll let them go." Monkey turned back and gave them a look.
Friar Sand put down the carrying−pole with the luggage, and led the master's horse as they carried on Westwards.
Monkey bowed down to undo the bundle, took a pinch of dust from the ground, and scattered it on the bundle as he said the words of a spell.
It was body−fixing magic, so the moment he shouted, "Stop!" the thirty and more bandits all stood stock still, grinding their teeth, staring, their hands apart. None of them could speak or move.
"Come back, Master," shouted Monkey, "come back!" "This is terrible," said Pig in alarm, "this is terrible. Big brother's informed on us.
He isn't carrying any money on him, and there's no gold or silver in the bundle. He must be calling the master back to ask him to give up his horse.
He's going to get the clothes stripped off our backs." "Don't talk such rubbish, brother," said Friar Sand with a laugh.
"Big brother knows what he's doing. He's always been able to beat vicious monsters and demons up till now, so what do we have to fear from a few petty thieves?
He must be calling us back because he's got something to say to us.
Let's go straight there and find out." When the venerable elder heard this he cheerfully turned his horse round and went back. "Wukong," he called, "why have you called us back?" "Hear what these robbers have got to say for themselves," Brother Monkey said.
Pig went up to them, shoved them and asked, "Why don't you move, bandits?" The bandits remained completely unconscious and said nothing.
"They're thick, and dumb too," said Pig.
"I fixed them by magic," said Monkey with a laugh.
"Even if you fixed them," said Pig, "you didn't fix their mouths, so why aren't they making a sound?" "Please dismount and sit down, Master," said Brother Monkey.
"As the saying goes, 'People only get arrested by mistake; they never get released by mistake.' Knock all the robbers over, brother, and tie them up. Then we'll force them to make statements.
Find out if they're beginners or old hands." "Haven't got any rope," said Friar Sand.
Monkey then pulled out some of his hairs, blew on them with magic breath and turned them into thirty lengths of rope.
They all set to, knocked the robbers over, and tied their hands and feet together.
Then Monkey said the words that ended the spell, whereupon the bandits gradually revived.
Monkey invited the Tang Priest to take the seat of honour while he and the other two shouted, holding their weapons, "Hairy bandits!
How many of you are there altogether, and how many years have you been in this line of business?
How many things have you stolen?
Have you murdered anyone?
Is this your first offence? Journey to the West Or your second? Or your third?" "Spare our lives, your lordships," pleaded the robbers.
"Stop shouting," said Monkey, "and come clean." "We aren't hardened robbers, your lordships," they said. "We're all from good families.
Because we're a bad lot we squandered all the wealth we'd inherited in drinking, gambling, whoring and living it up. We've never worked, and now we've got no money either.
We found out that Mr. Kou's family was one of the richest in the prefecture of Brazentower, so last night we got together to rob it under cover of darkness and rain.
We stole some gold, silver, clothing and jewelry, and were just dividing it up in a mountain hollow to the North of the track when we noticed you gentlemen coming. Some of us recognized you as the monks Mr. Kou saw off, so we were sure that you must have some goods on you.
Then we saw how heavy your luggage was and how fast the white horse was going.
It was our disgraceful greed that made us try to hold you up.
Never did we imagine that you would have such divine powers and be able to tie us up.
We beg you to be merciful to us. Take back what we stole and spare our lives." Sanzang was violently shocked to hear that their booty had been stolen from the Kou household.
He stood up at once and said, "Mr. Kou was a very good man, Wukong, so how did he bring such a disaster on himself?" "It was all because the coloured hangings and fancy parasols, and the huge numbers of drummers and musicians when we were seen off attracted too much attention," replied Monkey with a smile. "That's why this gang of desperadoes attacked his house.
Luckily they ran into us, and we've taken back all the gold, silver, clothing and jewelry." "We put Mr.
Kou out for a whole fortnight," said Sanzang, "so we owe him a huge debt of gratitude that we have not yet been able to repay.
Would it not be a good deed to return this property to his house?" Monkey agreed, and he went to the mountain hollow with Pig and Friar Sand to fetch the booty, which they packed up and loaded on the horse.
He told Pig to carry the load of gold and silver while friar Sand carried their own luggage.
Monkey was just on the point of killing all the bandits with his cudgel when he had the worrying thought that the Tang Priest might get angry with him for committing murder. So he could only shake himself and take back all the hairs.
Now that their hands and feet had been untied the thieves all got up then fled for their lives into the undergrowth.
The Tang Priest then turned back the way he had come to return the booty to Mr.
In making this journey he was like a moth flying into a flame and coming to disaster.
There is a poem about it that goes:
Kindness to others is rarely with kindness rewarded; Kindness will often to hate and hostility lead.
Plunge in the water to rescue the drowning? You'll suffer. Think before acting and spare yourself grief you don't need.
Sanzang and his disciples were just heading back with the gold, silver, clothing and jewelry when the crowd of men armed with spears and swords arrived.
"Disciples," said Sanzang with alarm, "look at all those armed men coming here.
What is happening?" Journey to the West "It's a disaster," said Pig, "a disaster. They're the robbers we set free. They've found weapons and ganged up with some more people. Now they've come back and they're going to kill us." "They don't look like bandits, brother," said Friar Sand.
"Big brother, take a closer look." "The master's in bad trouble again," Monkey whispered to Friar Sand.
"These must be soldiers here to capture the bandits." Before he had finished saying this the soldiers were upon the master and his disciples, surrounding them.
"You're a fine bunch of monks," they said, "robbing a house then swaggering around here like this." They then rushed them, dragged the Tang Priest off his horse and tied him up.
Next they tied up Brother Monkey and the others, and carried them off hanging from poles, two men to each of them. Driving the horse along and seizing the baggage, they went back to the prefectural city.
This is what could be seen: The Tang Priest, Shivering and shaking, Weeping and lost for words.
Zhu Bajie, Muttering and grumbling, Full of complaints.
Friar Sand, Talking away, While secretly feeling uncertain.
Sun the Novice, Chuckling merrily, Ready to use his powers.
Hustled and carried along by the soldiers, they were soon back in the city, where the soldiers escorted them straight to the prefect's court.
"Your Honour," they reported, "the constables have captured the robbers and brought them back." The prefect, sitting in his place in the court, rewarded the constables, inspected the booty and sent for the Kou family to collect it.
Then he had Sanzang and the others brought into court. "You monks maintain that you come from a place far away to the East and are going to worship the Buddha in the Western Heaven," he said, interrogating them.
"But really you're housebreakers who used dirty tricks so Journey to the West that you could get to know your way around." "Your Honour," Sanzang replied, "we are not robbers. I would not dare to deceive you. We carry a passport with us as proof.
It was because we were so grateful to Mr. Kou's family for feeding us for a fortnight that when we ran into the robbers along our way we recovered the booty they had stolen from the Kou house. We were taking it back to the Kou house to pay our debt of gratitude when to our astonishment we were arrested as robbers by the constables.
We really are not robbers, and I beg Your Honour to investigate closely." "You only made up that fancy talk about paying a debt of gratitude because you were arrested by the soldiers," the prefect replied.
"If you really met other robbers why didn't you show your gratitude by capturing them and turning them in?
Why are only the four of you here?
Look at the wanted notice Kou Liang submitted.
He accuses you by name. How dare you still dispute it!" When Sanzang heard this he felt like a storm−tossed boat on the ocean, and all his souls flew away.
"Wukong," he said, "why don't you come forward and argue in our defense?" "The booty proves it," said Monkey.
"Arguing would do no good." "That's right," the prefect said. "The booty is all here as proof. Do you still dare to deny it?
Fetch the head−clamp," he instructed his underlings, "and put it round the head of the bald robber. Then beat him again." Monkey was now very anxious.
"Even though my master is fated to suffer this," he thought to himself, "I mustn't let it be too tough for him." Seeing the yamen runners tightening the cord to fix the head−clamp in place he opened his mouth to speak.
"Please don't squeeze that monk's head, Your Honour.
When we robbed the Kou house last night I was the one who lit the torches, carried the sword, stole the goods and killed the man. I was the ringleader. If you want to torture anyone, torture me. It's nothing to do with them.
The only thing is that you mustn't let me go." On hearing this the prefect ordered, "Put the clamp on him first." The underlings then all fell on Monkey, fixed the clamp on his head, and tightened it so hard that the cord snapped with a twang.
The clamp was fastened, tightened and snapped with a twang again.
They did this three or four times, and the skin on his head was not even creased.
When they changed the cord and were tightening it again someone was heard coming in to report, "Your Honour, the Lord Assistant Protector Chen from the capital is coming.
Will you please come to greet him outside the city?" The prefect then ordered the head torturer, "Throw the bandits into gaol and keep a good eye on them.
The torture and interrogation will continue after I have gone to greet my superior." The head torturer then marched the Tang Priest and the other three into the gaol.
Pig and Friar Sand carried their luggage in with them.
"Disciple," said Sanzang, "what are we to do?" "In you go, Master," said Monkey with a grin, "in you go. There aren't any dogs barking in there.
It'll be a lark." The four of them were then taken inside, and each of them was pushed on a torture rack, to which their bellies, heads and chests were tightly fastened.
The warders then started beating them up again.
Finding the agony unbearable, Sanzang called out, "Whatever shall I do, Wukong?
Whatever shall I do?" Journey to the West "They're beating us because they want money," Brother Monkey replied.
"As the saying goes, Stay put when things are going well; Spend cash when things are going ill.
They'll stop if you give them some money." "But where am I to get money from?" Sanzang asked.
"If you haven't any money," Monkey replied, "clothes will do.
Give them the cassock." These words cut Sanzang to the heart, but realizing that the beating was more than he could take he could only say, "Do as you will, Wukong." "Gentlemen," Monkey called out, "there's no need to beat us any more.
There's a brocade cassock in one of the two bundles we brought in with us that's worth a fortune.
Open them up and take it." When the warders heard this they all set to together, opening the bundles up to search them.
There were some cotton clothes and a document case, but none of these were worth anything.
Seeing something glowing brightly inside several layers of oiled paper the warders realized that it must be a treasure.
When they shook it open and looked at it, this is what it looked like: Exquisitely decorated with shining pearls, Set with some wonderful Buddha treasures.
Embroidered dragons curled around; Flying phoenixes adorned brocade edges.
As they all struggled to look they disturbed the head gaoler, who came up to them and shouted, "What are you all making this row about?" Falling to their knees, the warders replied, "His Honour has just started a case against four monks and sent them here.
When we roughed them up a bit they gave us these two bundles.
After we opened them we saw this, and we don't know how to deal with it. It would be a real pity to tear it up to divide between us, but it would be hard on everyone else if just one of us had it.
It's a good thing you've come, sir:
you can give us a ruling." The head gaoler could see that it was a cassock.
Then he inspected the other clothes and the document case, and on opening the case to read the passport he saw that it was covered with seals and signatures from many states. "It's a good thing I saw this in time," he said. "If I hadn't, you people would have caused bad trouble.
These monks aren't robbers. On no account touch their things.
When His Honour questions them again tomorrow Journey to the West we'll find out the truth." The warders then gave the wrapping cloths back to the prisoners, who repacked them and handed them over to the head gaoler for safekeeping.
Evening was slowly drawing in. The drum could be heard from its tower, and the fire wardens began their patrols.
By the third mark of the fourth watch Monkey could see that the others had stopped groaning and were fast asleep.
"The master was fated to meet with the hardship of a night in gaol," he thought. "That was why I said nothing in our defense and didn't use my magic powers.
But now the fourth watch is nearly over, and his suffering's almost done.
I'd better start getting things sorted out if we're to leave this gaol at dawn." Just watch as he uses his powers to make himself smaller, get off the rack, shake himself and turn into a midge who flies out of the prison through a gap between the tiles over the eaves.
By the light of the stars and the moon in the still, silent night sky, he could see where he was going, and he flew quietly straight towards the gates of the Kou house. On the West side of the road was a house where a lamp was shining brightly, and as he flew closer for a better look he saw that it was a house of beancurd−makers.
An old man could be seen looking after the fire while an old woman was squeezing out the bean juice.
"Wife," the old man suddenly called out, "Mr. Kou had wealth and sons, but he didn't live long.
When we were boys we were both at school together. I was five years older than him.
His father was called Kou Ming. In those days he had less than 150 acres. He couldn't even collect his overdue rents.
Old Kou Ming died when his son was nineteen, and once the young man took charge of the household things went really well.
He married the daughter of Zhang Wang−−she used to be known as Threadneedle when she was a girl, but she made her husband a rich man. Once she came into his house his crops were good and the debts to him got paid. Whatever he bought showed a profit, and whatever he went in for made money. His family's worth a hundred thousand now.
When he reached forty he turned pious and he fed ten thousand monks. Fancy him being kicked to death by robbers last night! Poor man.
He was only sixty−four.
Who would have thought so good a man would meet with so evil a reward and be murdered just when everything was going well for him? What a pity!
What a pity!" By the time Monkey had listened to all this it was now at the first mark of the fifth watch.
He then flew into the Kou house, where a coffin was placed in the main room. A lamp was burning at the head, and around the coffin was incense, candles and fruit.
His wife was weeping beside him, and the two sons also came to kowtow and weep, while their wives brought two bowls of rice as an offering.
Monkey landed at the head of the coffin and coughed.
This gave the two daughters−in−law such a fright that they ran outside waving their arms about.
Kou Liang and his brother lay on the floor, too terrified to move, and crying out, "Oh, father, oh!" Their mother, being bolder, hit the head of the coffin and said, "Have you come back to life, old man?" "No," replied Monkey, imitating Mr.
Kou's voice, to the great alarm of the two sons, who kept kowtowing, weeping, and repeating, "Oh, Father, oh!" Their mother summoned up even more courage to ask, "Husband, if you haven't come back to life why are you talking?" "King Yama has sent demons to bring me here to talk to you," Monkey replied.
"He told me that Threadneedle Zhang had been lying and trying to frame the innocent." In her surprise at hearing him call her by the name she had been known as a child, the old woman fell at once to her knees, kowtowed and said, "You're a fine old man!
Fancy calling me by my childhood name at this age!
What lies have I been telling?
Which innocent people have I framed?" Journey to the West "Wasn't there something about 'The Tang Priest lit the torches, Pig incited to murder, Friar Sand stole the gold and silver, and Sun the Novice murdered our father?'" Monkey replied.
"Your lies have landed those good men in terrible trouble.
What really happened was that the Tang Priest and the other three teachers met some bandits and got our property back for us to show their thanks. How good of them!
But you had to concoct a wanted notice and send our sons to denounce them to the authorities.
The court threw them in gaol without making a careful investigation.
The gaol god, the local deity and the city god were all so alarmed and uneasy that they reported it to King Yama, and he ordered demons to escort me back home. I'm to tell you to have them released as soon as possible.
If you don't, I will have to make havoc here for a month. Nobody in the household, young or old−−not even the dogs and the chickens−−will be spared." Kou Liang and his brother kowtowed again and begged, "Please go back, Father, and don't harm us all.
At dawn we'll submit a petition to the court for their release and withdraw our charge against them. We only want peace for both the living and the dead." When Monkey heard this he called out, "Burn sacrificial paper money.
I am leaving." All his family started burning paper money.
Monkey then rose up on his wings and flew straight to the prefect's residence. Bending low to look he saw that there was a light in the bedroom: the prefect was already up. When Monkey flew into the main room, he saw a scroll−painting hanging on the back wall.
It showed an official riding a piebald horse with several servants holding a blue umbrella and carrying a folding chair.
Monkey did not know what the picture was about, but landed in the middle of it.
All of a sudden the prefect came out of the bedroom and bent low to comb and wash himself.
Monkey gave a sharp cough, alarming the prefect and sending him hurrying back into his bedroom.
When he had combed his hair, washed himself and put on his formal clothes the prefect came out to burn incense to the picture and pray to it. "Venerable uncle, divine Jiang Qianyi, your dutiful nephew Jiang Kunsan is now prefect of Brazentower, thanks to the hereditary privilege won for me by your ancestral virtue, and also to my success in the examinations. Morning and evening I offer incense without interruption. Why did you speak today?
I beg you not to haunt us and terrify the household." "So this is a holy picture of his ancestor," Brother Monkey thought with a hidden smile, and making the most of this chance he called out, "Nephew Kunsan, you have always been uncorrupt in the office you were given through ancestral privilege. How could you have been so stupid yesterday?
You took four holy monks for thieves and threw them into prison without finding out why they had come.
The prison god, the local deity and the city god were all so disturbed by this that they reported it to the king of Hell. He told demon envoys to bring me here to speak to you and advise you to consider the circumstances and find out the truth, and release them at once.
Otherwise you'll have to come back to the Underworld with me for the case to be sorted out." When the prefect heard this he replied in terror, "Please go back now, sit.
Your nephew will go straight into court and release them at once." "Very well then," Monkey said. "Burn some sacrificial paper money.
I am going to report back to King Yama." The prefect lit incense, burned paper money and bowed in thanks.
When Monkey flew out again and looked around he saw that the East was already turning white.
He then flew to the Diling county office, where all the county officials could be seen in the courtroom.
"If I talk when I'm a midge," he thought, "and someone spots me it'll give the game away.
That wouldn't do." So he gave himself a giant magical body where he was in mid air, and stretched down one foot that filled the whole courtroom.
"Listen to me, you officials," he shouted. "I am the Roving God Rambler, sent here by the Jade Emperor. He says that sons of the Buddha on their way to fetch the scriptures have been beaten up in the prefectural gaol here, which has disturbed the gods of the three worlds. He has asked me to tell you to release them at once.
If anything goes wrong I'm to use my other foot to kick all you county and prefecture officials Journey to the West to death, then crush all the people around here and trample the whole city to dust and ashes." At this the county magistrate and the other officials all fell to their knees and kowtowed in worship.
"Please go back now, superior sage," they pleaded.
"We are now going to the prefectural offices to request His Honour to release them immediately.
We implore you not to move your feet and terrify us to death." Only then did Monkey put away that magical body, turn into a midge again and fly back into the gaol through a gap between the tiles at the eaves, climb into his rack and go to sleep.
The story now tells that no sooner had the prefect entered his courtroom and ordered the notice inviting people to submit written requests to be carried outside than Kou Liang and his brother fell to their knees at the entrance, holding the notice in their arms.
The prefect ordered them to come in, and when the prefect read the document that the two of them submitted he said in fury, "Yesterday you handed me a wanted notice. The thieves were arrested and you had the booty back.
So why are you asking for them to be released today?" "Your Honour," the two brothers replied, tears streaming down, "last night our father's spirit appeared to us and said 'the holy monks from Tang captured the bandits, took our property back from them, released them and were kindly bringing the goods back to us to show their gratitude. How could you have treated them as robbers, captured them and made them suffer in gaol?
The local god in the gaol and the city god were so alarmed and uneasy that they reported it to King Yama. King Yama ordered demons to escort me back to tell you to go to the prefectural court and submit another plea for the Tang Priest's release and thus avoid disaster.
Otherwise everybody in the household would be killed.' This is why we have come with this request for their release.
We beg you to help us, Your Honour." On hearing this the prefect thought, "Their father is a new ghost whose body is still warm, so it's not surprising that he should have appeared to them after what happened.
But my uncle has been dead for five or six years. Why did he appear to me early this morning and tell me to investigate and release them?
It really does look as though an injustice has been done." As the prefect was thinking things over the magistrate and other officials of Diling county came rushing into the courtroom to say in a wild panic, "Disaster, Your Honour, disaster! The Jade Emperor has just sent the Roving God Rambler down to earth to tell you to release those good men from gaol this very moment.
The monks captured yesterday weren't robbers: they are disciples of the Buddha going to fetch the scriptures.
If there's any delay he's going to kick all us officials to death, then trample the whole city and all the people in it to dust and ashes." The prefect turned pale at this new shock, then told the head gaoler to write a release order and deliver them to the court.
The prison doors were immediately opened and they were led out.
"Goodness knows what sort of beating we're in for today," said Pig gloomily.
"I can guarantee that they won't dare give you a single clout," said Monkey with a grin. "I've fixed everything up.
When you go into the courtroom you absolutely mustn't kneel. He'll come down into the court to invite us to take the best seats.
Then we'll ask for our luggage and the horse back from him.
If anything's missing I'll give him a beating for your entertainment." Before he had finished speaking they reached the entrance to the courtroom, where the prefect, the county magistrate and all the other officials came out to welcome them with the words, "When you holy monks arrived yesterday we were under urgent pressure to meet our superiors. In addition, we did see the stolen goods.
That is why we did not find out the truth." The Tang Priest put his hands together in front of his chest, bowed and recounted in detail everything that had happened.
Journey to the West The officials were all voluble in admitting, "We were wrong, we were wrong.
Please, please don't be angry with us." They then asked if the monks had lost anything in the prison.
Monkey stepped forward, opened his eyes wide in a glare and yelled at the top of his voice, "Our white horse was taken by the court officers, and the gaolers took our luggage. Give it back right now. It's our turn to torture and question you lot how.
What should the punishment for wrongfully arresting innocent people as bandits be?" Seeing how ugly he was acting, the prefectural and county officials were all terrified. They told the people who had taken the horse to return the horse, and the men who had taken the luggage to return every single piece of it.
Just look at how viciously the three disciples start acting, while the officials could only blame the Kou family to cover up their own blunder.
"Disciples," said Sanzang, trying to calm them down.
"Let us go to the Kou house to question them and argue it out with them in order to make everything clear. Then we can find out who it was who took us for robbers." "Good idea," said Brother Monkey.
"I'll call the dead man back and ask him who killed him." Friar Sand hoisted the Tang Priest up on the horse right there in the courtroom, then escorted him outside with much shouting.
All the prefectural and county officials accompanied them to the Kou house, so alarming Kou Liang and his brother that they kowtowed repeatedly in front of the gateway then led them into the hall. This was where old Mr.
Kou's coffin lay, and the whole family was to be seen weeping inside the mourning drapes around it.
"Stop howling, you lying old woman," Monkey shouted. "You tried to get innocent men killed. Wait till I call your husband back. We'll see what he has to say about who murdered him.
That'll shame her." The officials all thought that Monkey was joking, but then he said, "Please keep my master company for a moment, Your Honors, Pig, Friar Sand, protect him well.
I'm off.
I'll soon be back." The splendid Great Sage bounded outside and rose up into the sky.
Coloured clouds were all around to cover up the house. Auspicious auras filled the sky to protect the primal deity.
Only then did everyone recognize that Monkey was an immortal who could ride clouds and mists, and a sage who could bring the dead back to life. We will not tell of how they all burned incense and worshipped.
The Great Sage went straight to the Underworld by somersault cloud and charged into the Senluo Palace, causing such alarm that:
The Ten Kings of the Underworld came out to raise their bands in greeting; The demon judges of the five regions kowtowed in welcome.
Journey to the West A thousand trees of knives all leaned away; Ten thousand hills of swords all leveled themselves.
In the City of the Unjustly Slain the fiends were converted; Under the bridge over Punishment River the dead return to life.
The divine light was like the grace of Heaven, And everywhere shone bright in the palaces of darkness.
The Ten Kings received the Great Sage, greeted him, and asked him why he had come.
"Who's got the ghost of Kou Hong who used to feed monks in Diling County in the prefecture of Brazentower?" said Monkey.
"Find him and give him to me at once." "Kou Hong is a very good man," the Ten King replied. "He came here himself. No demon had to envoys drag him here with their hooks.
He met King Ksitigarbha's Goldenclad Boy, who took him to see Ksitigarbha." Monkey then took his leave of them and went straight to the Turquoise Cloud Palace, where he saw the Bodhisattva King Ksitigarbha.
When the Bodhisattva had greeted him Monkey explained what had happened.
"Liang Hong's allotted span had been completed," the Bodhisattva said with delight, "and his life was over. That is why he left the world behind and came here without touching his bed.
As he was such a good man who had fed monks I have made him a chief recorder in charge of the register of good deeds.
But since you have come here to fetch him, Great Sage, I shall grant him a twelve−year extension of his life on earth.
Let him leave with the Great Sage." The Goldenclad Boy then led out Kou Hong, who on seeing Monkey kept saying, "Teacher, save me!
Teacher!" "You were kicked to death by robbers," said Monkey, "and now you're in the Bodhisattva King Ksitigarbha's place in the Under world.
I've come to fetch you and take you to the world of the living to sort this matter out.
The Bodhisattva will let you go back and has given you another twelve years of life, after which you'll come back here." The old gentleman kowtowed to him endlessly.
Having thanked and taken his leave of the Bodhisattva, Monkey blew on Kou Hong, turned him into vapor, tucked him into his sleeve and left the Underworld to go back to the world of the living.
He rode his cloud back to the Kou house, told Pig to lever the lid off the coffin and pushed Kou Hong's spirit back into the body.
A moment later Kou Hong started breathing as he came back to life.
Climbing out of his coffin, he kowtowed to the Tang Priest and his three disciples with the words, "Teachers, teachers, I was wrongly killed, but my master went to the Underworld to bring me back to life.
I owe him my recovery." His thanks were unending.
When he turned round and saw all the officials drawn up in line he kowtowed again and asked, "Why are all your lordships in my house?" "Your sons first submitted a wanted notice," the prefect replied, "and accused the holy monks by name.
I sent men to arrest them, not realizing that the holy monks had met the robbers who raided your house, taken the booty off them and were returning it to your house.
I was wrong to have them arrested, and I had them thrown Journey to the West into gaol without making a detailed investigation.
Last night your spirit appeared, my late uncle came to lodge a complaint with me, and the Roving God Rambler came down to earth in the county offices. After so many manifestations I released the holy monks, and they have brought you back to life." "Your Honour," said Mr.
Kou on his knees, "these four holy monks really have been wronged.
That night over thirty bandits with torches and weapons robbed my house.
Because I could not bear to lose all those things I tried to reason with the robbers, but to my horror they kicked me to death.
What's it got to do with these four gentlemen?" He then called for his wife. "Why did you people make that lying report about who had killed me?
Will you please determine their punishments, Your Honour." Everyone in the family, young and old alike, kowtowed.
In his magnanimity the prefect spared them from punishment.
Kou Hong then ordered a banquet to thank the prefectural and county officials for their generosity.
The officials all returned to their offices without sitting down at the banquet.
The next day the sign announcing that monks would be fed was hung out again, and another attempt was made to keep Sanzang there.
Sanzang refused absolutely to stay any longer. Once again Mr.
Kou invited his friends and relations, arranged for flags and canopies and saw them off as before.
Indeed: However remote the place evil deeds can be done; Heaven may be high, but it does not desert the good.
Steadily they plod along towards the Tathagata Until they reach the gate of bliss on Vulture Peak.
If you do not know what happened when they met the Buddha, listen to the explanation in the next installment.
When the Ape and the Horse Are Tamed They Cast Off Their Husks When All the Deeds Have Been Done Reality Is Seen The story told how after coming back to life Mr. Kou once more arranged for parasols, banners, drummers, musicians, Buddhist monks, Taoist priests, his friends and his relations to see Sanzang off again.
But instead of describing this we will tell of the Tang Priest and his three disciples taking the main road. The West was indeed a land of the Buddha, unlike anywhere else. They saw precious flowers, rare grasses, ancient cypresses and hoary pines.
In all the places they passed through every family was pious and fed monks.
Under every mountain people cultivated their conduct; in all the forests travelers recited sutras Master and disciples took shelter each night and set out at dawn, till six or seven days later a mass of high buildings and splendid halls suddenly came into view.
Truly they were: Thrusting a hundred feet into the heavens, Journey to the West Touching the Milky Way in the sky.
Lower your head and see the setting sun; Put out your hand and pluck a shooting star.
The spacious windows enclose the cosmos; The towering roofbeams join up with the clouds.
Yellow cranes bring letters as the autumn trees grow old; Coloured phoenix epistles come in the fresh evening breeze.
These are sacred and precious palaces and gates, Jeweled, intricate buildings and courtyards.
In the holy halls the Way is discussed; Sutras are transmitted throughout the universe.
The flowers are beautiful as they turn towards the spring; Green are the pine trees in the rain.
Purple fungus and immortals' fruits ever flourish; All beings respond as red phoenixes soar.
Sanzang raised his whip and pointed with it as he said, "What a fine place, Wukong." "Master," said Monkey, "when you were in those delusive places where you saw false images of Buddhas you insisted on prostrating yourself in front of them.
But today, when you've reached the real place where there is the true image of the Buddha, you won't even dismount.
What do you mean by it?" No sooner did he hear this than Sanzang sprang straight out of the saddle and went to the gateway.
A young lay brother who stood to one side of the monastery gateway called out, "You must be the people from the East who have come to fetch the scriptures." The venerable elder quickly straightened his clothes and raised his head to look around.
He saw that the boy was Wearing clothes of golden brocade, Waving a jade−handled whisk.
Wearing clothes of golden brocade Journey to the West He feasted in pavilions by the Jasper Pool; Waving a jade−handled whisk He dusted the steps of the purple palaces.
At his side hung an immortal's tablet; And on his feet were sandals.
He was a true winged adept, Elegant and remarkable.
Having won immortality he lived in a wonderful land, Cultivating eternal life and escaping from worldly dust.
The holy priest did not recognize the stranger on Vulture Peak, The Gold−crested Immortal of yesteryear. The Great Sage Monkey did, however, recognize him.
"Master," said Monkey, "this is the Great Gold−crested Immortal who lives at the Jade Truth Temple at the foot of Vulture Peak.
He is here to greet us." Only then did Sanzang realize who he was and step forward to salute him.
"You have finally arrived here this year," replied the Great Immortal with a smile. "I was fooled by the Bodhisattva Guanyin.
Ten years ago she went to the East at the Buddha's command to find the Pilgrim who would fetch the scriptures. She told me then he would be here within two or three years.
I have been waiting for years on end with no news of you at all.
I never thought that it would be this year before we met." Putting his hands together in front of his chest, Sanzang replied, "I am very grateful to you for your kindness, Great Immortal, very grateful." Sanzang and his three disciples led the horse and carried the baggage with them into the Taoist temple, where they were introduced to all the Great Immortals there.
Tea and a vegetarian meal were then ordered, and the Taoist boys were told to heat scented water for the holy monks to bathe in before climbing to the Buddha land.
Indeed: When achievements are complete it is right to bathe; The fundamental nature has been trained into innate truth.
Many thousand troubles and today: The nine prohibitions and triple surrender lead to renewal.
The monsters all done with, they climb to the Buddha land; Journey to the West With disasters ended they see the Sramana.
Dirt and filth now washed away, they are wholly pure; Returning to the fundamental, their bodies are imperishable.
By the time master and disciples had bathed the day was drawing to a close. They spent the night in the Jade Truth Temple.
The next morning the Tang Priest changed into his brocade cassock, put on his Vairocana mitre and grasped his monastic staff in his hand to climb the steps of the main hall and take his leave of the Great Immortal.
"Yesterday you were in rags," the Great Immortal said with a smile, "but today you are dressed in splendor. I can see from your appearance that you are indeed a son of the Buddha." Sanzang then bowed in farewell.
"Wait a moment," the Great Immortal said.
"I will see you off." "There's no need for you to see us off," Monkey replied.
"I know the way." "What you know," said the Great Immortal, "is the way by cloud. The holy monk has never gone by cloud. He must go by the overland way." "You're right," replied Monkey.
"Although I've been here several times I've always come and gone by cloud. I've never come here on foot.
If there's an overland route I'll trouble you to see us along it.
My master is very serious about worshipping the Buddha, so I'd be very grateful if you could hurry up about it." The Great Immortal chuckled as he took the Tang Priest by hand and led the Incense to the gate of the Dharma.
The way led not out by the temple's front entrance but through the main hall and out through the back gate.
Pointing towards Vulture Peak, the Great Immortal said, "Holy monk, do you see the auspicious light of many colours and the richly textured aura in the sky? That is the summit of Vulture Peak, the holy territory of the Lord Buddha." As soon as he saw it the Tang Priest bowed low.
"Master," said Brother Monkey with a smile, "we haven't got to the place for bowing yet.
As the saying goes, 'The mountain may be in view, but your horse will collapse before you get there.' We're still quite a long way from the place, so why start bowing now?
If you bow all the way from here to the top, however many times will you have to hit your head on the ground?" "Holy monk," said the Great Immortal, "You, the Great Sage, Marshal Tian Peng, and the Curtain−raising General have now reached the blessed land and seen Vulture Peak.
I am going back now." Sanzang took his leave of the Great Immortal and continued on his way.
The Great Sage led the Tang Priest and the others slowly up Vulture Peak.
Within a couple of miles they reached a river of mighty rolling waves some three miles wide. There was no sign of anyone anywhere around.
"Wukong," said Sanzang with alarm, "we have come the wrong way. I wonder if the Great Immortal misdirected us.
This river is so wide and the waves so big, and there are no boats to be seen.
How are we to cross it?" Journey to the West "He didn't send us the wrong way," replied Monkey with a smile.
"Look over there. That's a bridge, isn't it?
Once we're over that we'll have completed the true achievement." When the venerable elder and the others went closer to look they saw a tablet beside it on which were written the words CLOUDTOUCHING CROSSING. Now this bridge was only a single log.
Indeed: From afar it seemed to span the void like a beam of jade; Seen closer, the bridge was but a withered spar crossing the water.
To bind a river and frame the sea is easier Than walking along the trunk of a single tree.
The glow of a myriad rainbows spread out all around; A thousand lengths of fine white silk stretched to the edge of the sky.
It was narrow, slippery and hard to cross, Unless one was a god who could walk on coloured clouds.
"Wukong," said Sanzang in fear and trembling, "no mortal man could cross that bridge.
Let us look elsewhere to find the way." "But this is the way," replied Monkey with a smile, "this is the way." "Nobody's going to dare cross that even if it is the right way," said Pig with alarm.
"The river's so wide, and there are those terrible waves, and all there is is that narrow, slippery tree−trunk.
We couldn't take a single step." "You all stand there while I go on it to show you," replied Monkey.
The splendid Great Sage strode forward and sprang on the single−trunk bridge. He quickly ran across to the other side, swaying as he went, and called out, "Come over, come over." The Tang Priest waved in refusal, while Pig and Friar Sand bit their fingers and said, "It's much too hard." Monkey then ran back again from the far side and pulled at Pig.
"Come with me, you idiot," he said, "come with me." "It's too slippery, it's too slippery," said Pig, lying down on the ground. "I could never cross it.
Please spare me that and let me cross by wind and mist." Monkey held him down as he replied, "This is no place for you to be allowed to go riding wind and mist.
You can only become a Buddha by crossing this bridge." "Brother," said Pig, "I'll never make it.
Honestly, I can't walk across." Journey to the West As the two of them were pulling at each other and fighting, Friar Sand went over to talk them round. Only then did they let go of each other.
Sanzang then looked round to see a man poling a boat towards them from downriver and shouting, "Ferry! Come aboard." "Stop fooling around, disciples," said a delighted venerable elder.
"There is a ferry−boat coming." The other three sprang to their feet and all watched together as the boat drew closer. It was a bottomless craft.
Monkey had already spotted with the golden pupils in his fiery eyes that this was the Welcoming Lord Buddha, who is also known as Ratnadhvaja, the Royal Buddha of Brightness, but instead of giving this away he just kept calling, "Over here, punt, over here." A moment later the ferryman had punted his boat up to the bank and was again shouting, "Ferry!
Come aboard!" Sanzang was once more alarmed at the sight.
"Your boat has no bottom," he said, "so however could you ferry anyone across?" "This boat of mine," the Buddha said, "Has been famous since Chaos was first divided, And been punted by me without any changes.
It is stable in wind and stable in waves, Enjoying great peace with no start and no end.
Untouched by the six types of dust, it returns to the One, Carries on calmly through all kinds of calamity.
Hard it is for a bottomless boat to cross the oceans, But since ancient times it has ferried all creatures." The Great Sage Monkey put his hands together in front of his chest and thanked him with the words, "I am grateful to you for your generosity in coming to welcome my master.
Step aboard, Master.
That boat of his may have no bottom, but it's stable, and won't capsize even in wind and waves." The venerable elder was still very doubtful, but Monkey seized him by the arms and pushed him forward.
Unable to keep on his feet, the master tumbled into the water, where the ferryman grabbed hold of him at once and stood him on the boat.
The master shook his clothes and stamped his feet, complaining about Monkey, who led Friar Sand and Pig to stand on board bringing the luggage and the horse with them.
Gently and strongly the Buddha pushed off, at which a corpse came floating downstream, to the horror of the venerable elder.
"Don't be frightened, Master," said Monkey.
"That's you." "It's you, it's you," said Pig.
Friar Sand clapped his hands as he said, "It's you, it's you!" Journey to the West The boatman gave a call, then also put in, too, "It's you! Congratulations!
Congratulations!" The three of them all joined in these congratulations as the ferryman punted the boat quickly and steadily over the immortal Cloud−touching Crossing.
Sanzang turned around and sprang lightly ashore on the opposite bank.
There is a poem about this that goes: When the womb−born flesh and body of blood is cast aside, The primal spirit finds kinship and love.
On this morning of actions completed and Buddhahood attained The thirty−six kinds of dust from the past are washed away.
This was indeed what is meant by great wisdom, the boundless dharma of crossing to the other bank.
When the four of them climbed the bank and looked back the bottomless boat had already disappeared, goodness knew where.
Only when Brother Monkey explained that it had been the Welcoming Buddha did Sanzang find enlightenment At once he turned round to thank his three disciples.
"Let's not exchange thanks," said Monkey. "We've helped each other.
You saved us three, Master, and showed us the way to win merit so as to complete the true achievement.
And we have protected you, Master, holding to the faith and helping you happily to cast off your mortal body.
Master, look at the magnificent scenery ahead. Flowers, grasses, pines and bamboo, as well as phoenixes, cranes and deer. Compare it with those places where evil beings created illusions through transformation.
Ask yourself which is beautiful and good, and which ugly and evil." Sanzang was full of expressions of gratitude.
All of them were now light of body and cheerful as they walked up Vulture Peak.
Soon the ancient Thunder Monastery could be seen: Its rooftops touched the heavens, Its roots joined with the Sumeru range.
Amazing peaks spread out in serried rank; Craggy rocks formed interlocking shapes.
Under the hanging scar were wonderful plants and flowers; Beside the winding path grew magic mushrooms and orchids.
Immortal apes were picking the fruit of the peach trees, Like gold amid burning flames; White cranes perched in the branches of the pines As if they were jade creatures amid smoke.
Journey to the West Coloured phoenixes in pairs, Green phoenixes two by two.
The pairs of coloured phoenixes Brought blessings on the world as they called to the sun; The green phoenixes two by two Danced in the wind, a rare and wonderful sight.
On the gleaming golden tiles were figures of mandarin ducks; The brilliantly patterned bricks were set with agate.
To East and West Were flowers of palaces and pearls of gateways; To North and South Were endless precious pavilions and high buildings.
The Devaraja Hall streamed with coloured light; Purple flames rose before the Lokapalas Chamber.
Stupas stood out, And fragrant were the blossoms of the udumbara tree.
Truly this was a place so fine it might have come from heaven, Where the days seemed long under leisurely clouds.
Away from the mortal world, all fates came to an end; All kalpas were complete within the Dharma hall.
As master and disciples walked freely and at their ease up to the summit of Vulture Peak lay people could be seen under the green pines, and pious men and women amid the jade−coloured cypresses.
The venerable elder bowed to them politely, whereupon all the lay men and women, monks and nuns all hastened to put their hands together and say to him, "Do not bow to us, holy monk.
Come back and talk with us when you have seen Sakyamuni." "It's a bit early for that," replied Monkey with a grin.
"Let's go and worship the boss." Journey to the West The venerable elder waved his arms and performed a ritual dance as he followed Monkey straight to the gates of the Thunder Monastery, where four great vajrapanis greeted them with the words, "Have you arrived now, holy monk?" "Yes," Sanzang replied with a bow, "Your disciple Xuanzang has arrived." Having given this reply he was about to go in through the gateway.
"Please wait for a moment, holy monk," the vajrapanis said.
"Let us report before you come in." The vajrapanis sent a report of the Tang Priest's arrival to the four great vajrapanis on the middle gates, who in turn reported it to the inner gates, inside which were divine monks making offerings.
As soon as they heard of the Tang Priest's arrival they all hurried to the Mahavira Hall, where they announced to the Tathagata Sakyamuni Buddha, "The holy monk from the Tang Court has arrived at your noble monastery to fetch the scriptures." The Lord Buddha was very pleased.
He called together his Eight Bodhisattvas, Four Vajrapanis, Five Hundred Arhats, Three Thousand Protectors, Eleven Heavenly Shiners and Eighteen Guardians, who drew themselves up in two lines and passed on the Buddha's command summoning the Tang Priest to enter. Thus it was that the invitation was sent down from one level to the next:
"Let the holy monk come in." Observing the requirements of ritual, the Tang Priest went in through the gate with Wukong and Wujing, who were leading the horse and carrying the luggage. Indeed:
In the past he had struggled to fulfil his commission After leaving the emperor at the steps of the throne.
At dawn he had climbed mountains in mist and in dew; At dusk he had slept on rocks amid the clouds.
He had carried his stick across three thousand rivers, And climbed up countless crags with his monastic staff.
His every thought had been set on the true achievement, And today he was finally to see the Tathagata.
As the four of them arrived in front of the Mahavira Hall they all prostrated themselves and kowtowed to the Tathagata, then to their left and right.
After they had each completed three rounds of Worship they then knelt before the Buddha to present their passport.
When the Tathagata had read it carefully he handed it back to Sanzang, who bowed his head low and reported, "Your disciple Xuanzang has made the long journey to your precious monastery at the command of the Great Tang emperor to beg for the true scriptures that will save all living beings.
I implore the Lord Buddha in his goodness to grant them at once so that I may return to my country." Journey to the West The Tathagata then opened his compassionate mouth and in the great mercy of his heart said to Sanzang, "Your Eastern land is in the Southern Continent of Jambu. As the sky is lofty there, the soil deep, its products many, and the people multitudinous there is much covetous−ness, murder, debauchery, lying, deception and dishonesty.
They do not follow the Buddhist teaching, do not turn towards good destinies, and do not honour the sun, moon and stars or value the five grains.
They are not loyal, filial, righteous or kind. In the delusion of their hearts they mislead themselves, cheating on weights and measures, taking life and killing animals, thus creating such boundless evil karma and such a superabundance of sin and evil that they bring the catastrophe of hell on themselves.
That is why they must fall for ever into the dark underworld to suffer the torments of being hammered, smashed, ground and pounded, or are reborn as animals.
Many of them take the shape of furry, horned creatures to pay back the debts they owe from earlier lives and feed others with their own flesh.
It is for such reasons that some fall into the Avici Hell, from which they never emerge to be reborn.
Although Confucius established the doctrine of benevolence, righteousness, correct behavior and wisdom, and although successive emperors have applied the penalties of imprisonment, exile strangulation and beheading, none of this affected those stupid, benighted, self−indulgent and unrestrained people.
I have Three Stores of scriptures that offer deliverance from suffering and release from disaster.
Of these Three Stores one is the Store of Dharma that deals with Heaven; one is the Store of Sastras that deal with the Earth, and one is the Store of Sutras that can save ghosts.
There are thirty−five scriptures altogether, in 15,144 scrolls.
These are indeed the path to the truth, the gateway to goodness.
They include everything about the astronomy, geography, personalities, birds beasts trees, flowers, objects of use and human affairs of the world's four continents.
Now that you have come from afar I would present them all to you to take away with you, but the people of your country are stupid and coarse. They are slanderers of the truth who cannot understand the mysteries of our teachings.
Ananda, Kasyapa," he called, "take the four of them to the foot of the jewel tower and give them a vegetarian meal.
After the meal open up the pavilion, select a few rolls from each of the thirty−five scriptures in my Three Stores, and tell them to propagate these scriptures in the East, where they may eternally grant their great goodness." Acting on the orders of the Buddha the two arhats then led the four pilgrims to the bottom of the tower, where no end of rare and wonderful jewels and treasures were set out.
Here the divinities who made offerings set out a vegetarian banquet, with immortal food, immortal delicacies, immortal tea, immortal fruit, and every kind of culinary delight not to be found in the mortal world.
Master and disciples bowed their heads to the ground in thanks for the Buddha's kindness and proceeded to eat to their hearts' content.
Indeed Precious flames and golden light dazzled the eye, While the rare incense and delicacies were marvelously fine.
The thousand−storied golden pavilion was infinitely lovely, And pure sounded immortals' music on the ear.
Meatless food and magic flowers of the sort that are rare on earth, Fragrant teas and exotic dishes that give eternal life.
After a long period of enduring a thousand kinds of suffering, Today comes the glorious happiness of the Way completed.
Journey to the West This was a piece of good fortune for Pig, and a great, benefit to Friar Sand as they ate their fill of the food in the Buddha's land that gave eternal life and new flesh and bones for old.
The two arhats kept the four of them company till the meal was over, after which they went to the treasure pavilion, where the doors were opened for them to go in and look.
Over this all was a thousandfold aura of coloured light and auspicious vapors, while brilliant mists and clouds of good omen wafted all around.
All over the scripture shelves and on the outside of the cases were pasted red labels on which were neatly written the titles of the scriptures.
They were the Nirvana sutra 748 rolls Bodhisattva sutra 1,021 rolls Akasagarbha sutra 400 rolls Surangama sutra 110 rolls Collection of sutras on the meaning of grace 50 rolls Determination sutra 140 rolls Ratnagarbha sutra 45 rolls Avatamsaka sutra 500 rolls Sutra on Worshipping Bhutatathata 90 rolls Mahaprajnaparamita sutra 916 rolls Mahaprabhasa sutra 300 rolls Adbhuta−dharma sutras 1,110 rolls Vimalakirti sutra 170 rolls The Three Sastras 270 rolls Diamond sutra 100 rolls Saddharma sastra 120 rolls Buddhacaritakavya sutra 800 rolls Pancanaga sutra 32 rolls Bodhisattva−vinaya sutra 116 rolls Mahasamnipata sutras 130 rolls Makara sutra 350 rolls Journey to the West Saddharma−pundarika sutra 100 rolls Yoga sutra 100 rolls Precious Eternity sutra 220 rolls Sutra on the Western Heaven 130 rolls Samghika sutra 157 rolls Samyukta−Buddhadesa sutra 1,950 rolls Mahayana−sraddhotpadasa sutra 1,000 rolls Great Wisdom sutra 1,080 rolls Ratna−prabhava sutra 1,280 rolls Original Pavilion sutra 850 rolls Principal vinaya sutra 200 rolls Ananda and Kasyapa led the Tang Priest to read the titles of all the scriptures. "You have come here from the East, holy monk," they said to him.
"Have you brought us any presents?
Hand them over right now, then we can give you the scriptures." When Sanzang heard this he said, "Your disciple Xuanzang has come a very long way, and I did not bring any with me." "That's very fine," the two arhats said with a laugh.
"If we hand the scriptures over for nothing, they'll be passed down through the ages and our successors will have to starve to death." Monkey could not stand hearing them talking tough like this and refusing to hand the scriptures over, so he shouted, "Let's go and report them to the Tathagata, Master. We'll get him to give me the scriptures himself." "Shut up!" said Kasyapa.
"Where do you think you are, acting up like this?
Come here and take the scriptures." Pig and Friar Sand, who were keeping their own tempers under control, calmed Monkey down.
They turned back to accept the scriptures, which were packed one by one into the luggage. Some of it was put on the horse's back, and the rest tied up as two carrying−pole loads that Pig and Friar Sand shouldered. They all then returned to the Buddha's throne, kowtowed, thanked the Tathagata and went straight out.
They bowed twice to every Buddha and every Bodhisattva they met.
When they reached the main entrance they bowed to the bhiksus, the bhiksunis, the laymen and the laywomen, taking their leave of each one. Then they hurried back down the mountain.
The story tells not of them but of the Ancient Buddha Dipamkara, who had been quietly listening in the library when the scriptures were handed over. He understood perfectly well that Ananda and Kasyapa had handed over wordless scriptures.
"Those stupid monks from the East didn't realize that those were wordless scriptures," he thought with a smile to himself. "The holy monks journey across all those mountains and rivers will be a complete waste. Who is in attendance here?" he called, and the arhat Suklavira stepped forward.
Journey to the West "Use your divine might," Dipamkara instructed him, "and go after the Tang Priest like a shooting star.
Take the wordless scriptures from him and tell him to come back to fetch the true scriptures." The arhat Suklavira then flew off on a storm wind that roared away from the Thunder Monastery as he gave a great display of his divine might.
That splendid wind really was A warrior from the Buddha's presence, Greater than the two wind gods of the Xun quarter.
The angry roars from his divine orifices Were more powerful by far than the puffs of a young girl.
This wind made Fish and dragons lose their dens, While the waves flowed backwards in rivers and seas.
Black apes could not present the fruit they carried; Yellow cranes turned back to the clouds as they sought their nests.
Ugly rang the song of the red phoenix; Raucous were the calls of the multicolored pheasants.
The branches of hoary pines were broken As the flowers of the udumbara blew away.
Every cane of green bamboo bowed low; All the blooms of golden lotus swayed.
The sound of the bell was carried a thousand miles While the chanting of sutras flew lightly up the ravines.
Ruined was the beauty of flowers under the crag; The tender shoots of plants were laid low by the path The brilliant phoenixes could hardly spread their wings; White deer hid beneath the cliffs.
The heavens were heavy with fragrance Journey to the West As the clear wind blew right through the clouds.
The Tang Priest was walking along when he smelt the fragrant wind, but he paid no attention to it, taking it for an auspicious sign of the Lord Buddha.
Then a noise could be heard as a hand reached down from midair to lift the scriptures lightly off the horse's back, which gave Sanzang such a shock that he beat his chest and howled aloud.
Pig scrambled along in pursuit, Friar Sand guarded the carrying−poles loaded with scriptures, and Brother Monkey flew after the arhat.
Seeing that Monkey had almost caught up with him, and frightened that the merciless cudgel would make no bones about wounding him badly, the arhat tore the bundle of scriptures to shreds and flung it into the dust.
When Monkey saw the bundle falling in pieces that were being scattered by the fragrant wind he stopped chasing the arhat and brought his cloud down to look after the scriptures.
The arhat Suklavira put the wind and the clouds away, then went back to report to Dipamkara.
When Pig, who was also in pursuit, saw the scriptures falling he helped Monkey to collect them up and carry them back to the Tang Priest.
"Disciples," the Tang Priest exclaimed, tears pouring from his eyes, "even in this world of bliss evil demons cheat people." After gathering up the scattered scriptures in his arms Friar Sand opened one of them up and saw that it was as white as snow: not a word was written on it.
Quickly he handed it to Sanzang with the remark, "There's nothing in this scroll, Master." Monkey opened out another scroll to find that it had nothing written in it either.
Pig opened another and it too had nothing in it.
"Open them all for us to examine," said Sanzang.
Every single scroll was blank paper.
"We Easterners really do have no luck," he said, sighing and groaning. "What point is there in fetching wordless scriptures like these?
How could I ever face the Tang emperor?
I will have no way of avoiding execution for the crime of lying to my sovereign." Monkey, who already understood what had happened, then said to the Tang Priest, "Say no more, Master.
Ananda and Kasyapa gave us these scrolls of blank paper because we hadn't got any presents to give them when they asked for them.
Let's go back, report them to the Tathagata and get them accused of extortion." "That's right," shouted Pig, "that's right.
Let's report them." The four of them then hurried up the mountain again, and after a few steps they were rushing back to the Thunder Monastery.
Before long they were once more outside the gates of the monastery, where everyone raised their clasped hands in greeting. "Have you holy monks come to exchange your scriptures?" they asked with smiles.
Sanzang nodded and expressed his thanks.
The vajrapanis did not block them, but let them go straight in to the Mahavira Hall.
"Tathagata," yelled Monkey, "our master and the rest of us have had to put up with endless monsters, demons, troubles and hardships to get here from the East to worship you. You gave the orders for the scriptures to be handed over, but Ananda and Kasyapa didn't do so because they were trying to extort things from us. They conspired and deliberately let us take away blank paper versions without a single word written on them.
But what's the point in taking those?
I beg you to have them punished, Tathagata." "Stop yelling," replied the Lord Buddha with a smile.
"I already know that they asked you for presents. But the scriptures cannot be casually passed on.
Nor can they be taken away for nothing.
In the past bhiksus and holy monks went down the mountain and recited these scriptures to the family of the elder Zhao in the land of Journey to the West Sravasti. This ensured peace and safety for the living and deliverance for the dead members of the family. All that was asked for was three bushels and three pecks of granular gold.
I said they had sold the scriptures too cheap, so I saw to it that Zhao's sons and grandsons would be poor.
You were given blank texts because you came here to fetch them empty−handed.
The blank texts are true, wordless scriptures, and they really are good.
But as you living beings in the East are so deluded and have not achieved enlightenment we'll have to give you these ones instead.
Ananda, Kasyapa," he called, "fetch the true scriptures with words at once.
Choose a few rolls from each title to give them, then come back here and tell me how many." The two arhats then led the four pilgrims to the foot of the library building and once again asked the Tang Priest for a present.
Having nothing else to offer, he ordered friar Sand to bring out the begging bowl of purple gold and presented it with both hands. "Your disciple is poor and has come a very long way," he said, "and I did not bring any presents with me.
This bowl was given to me by the Tang emperor with his own hands to beg for food with on my journey.
I now offer it to you as a token of my heartfelt feelings. I beg you arhats not to despise it but to keep it.
When I return to my court I shall report this to the Tang emperor, who will certainly reward you richly.
I only ask you to give me the true scriptures that have words to save me from failing in my imperial mission and making this long, hard journey for nothing." Ananda accepted the bowl with no more than a hint of a smile.
The warriors guarding the precious library building, the kitchen staff responsible for the spices and the arhats in charge of the library rubbed each other's faces, patted each other's backs, flicked each other with their fingers and pulled faces. "Disgraceful," they all said with grins, "disgraceful.
Demanding presents from the pilgrims who've come to fetch the scriptures!" A moment later Ananda was frowning with embarrassment but still holding the bowl and not letting go.
Only then did Kasyapa go into the library to check the scriptures through one by one and give them to Sanzang.
"Disciples," called Sanzang, "take a good look at them, not like last time." The three of them took the rolls and examined them one by one. All had words.
5,048 rolls were handed over, the total in a single store.
They were neatly packed up and put on the horse, and those left over were made into a carrying−pole load for Pig to take.
Friar Sand carried their own luggage, and as Brother Monkey led the horse the Tang Priest took his staff, pushed his Vairocana mitre into position, shook his brocade cassock, and went happily into the presence of the Tathagata.
Indeed: Sweet taste the True Scriptures of the Great Store, Created fine and majestic by the Tathagata.
Remember what Xuanzang suffered to climb this mountain: Ananda's greed was something ridiculous.
What they did not notice at first Dipamkara helped them to see; Later the scriptures were real and they then found peace.
Successful now, they would take the scriptures to the East; Where all could be refreshed by their life−giving richness.
Journey to the West Ananda and Kasyapa led the Tang Priest to see the Tathagata, who ascended his lotus throne and directed the two great arhats Dragon−queller and Tiger−subduer to strike the cloud−ringing stone chimes that summoned all the Three Thousand Buddhas, Three Thousand Protectors, Eight Vajrapanis, Four Bodhisattvas, Five Hundred Arhats, Eight Hundred Bhiksus, the host of laymen, bhiksunis, laywomen, and the greater and lesser honoured ones and holy monks of every cave, every heaven, the blessed lands and the magic mountains. Those who were supposed to sit were asked to ascend their precious thrones, and those who were supposed to stand stood on either side.
All of a sudden heavenly music rang out from afar and magical sounds wafted around. The air was full of countless beams of auspicious light and of aura upon aura as all the Buddhas gathered together to pay their respects to the Tathagata.
"How many rolls of scripture have you given them, Ananda and Kasyapa?" the Tathagata asked.
"Please tell me the numbers one by one." The two arhats then reported, "We are now handing over for the Tang court the Nirvana sutra−−400 rolls Bodhisattva sutra−−360 rolls Akasagarbha sutra−−20 rolls Surangama sutra−−30 rolls Collection of sutras on the meaning of grace−−40 rolls Determination sutra−−40 rolls Ratnagarbha sutra−−20 rolls Avatamsaka sutra−−81 rolls Sutra on Worshipping Bhutatathata−−30 rolls Mahaprajnaparamita sutra−−600 rolls Mahaprabhasa sutra−−50 rolls Adbhuta−dharma sutras−−550 rolls Vimalakirti sutra−−30 rolls The Three Sastras−−42 rolls Diamond sutra−−1 rolls Saddharma sastra−−20 rolls Journey to the West Buddhacaritakavya sutra−−116 rolls Pancanaga sutra−−20 rolls Bodhisattva−vinaya sutra−−60 rolls Mahasamnipata sutras−−30 rolls Makara sutra−−140 rolls Saddharma−pundarika sutra−−10 rolls Yoga sutra−−30 rolls Precious Eternity sutra−−170 rolls Sutra on the Western Heaven−−30 rolls Samghika sutra−−110 rolls Samyukta−Buddhadesa sutra−−1,638 rolls Mahayana−sraddhotpadasa sastra−−50 rolls Great Wisdom sutra−−90 rolls Ratna−prabhava sutra−−140 rolls Original Pavilion sutra−−56 rolls Principal vinaya sutra−−10 rolls Mahamayuri−vidyarajni sutra−−14 rolls Vynaptimatra−tasiddhi sastra−−10 rolls Abhidharma−kosa sastra−−10 rolls From the thirty−five scriptures in all of the stores we have selected 5,048 rolls to give to the holy monk. These will be kept and handed down in Tang.
They have now all been packed neatly and put on the horse or made into carrying−pole loads.
The pilgrims are only waiting to express their thanks." Sanzang and his three followers then tethered the horse, put down the loads, joined their hands in front of their chests and bowed in worship.
"The achievement of these scriptures is immeasurable," the Tathagata said to the Tang Priest, "Although they are the source of foreknowledge and reflection for my school they are truly the origin of all Three Schools.
If they reach your Southern Continent of Jambudvipa they must not be treated with disrespect when they are shown to all living beings.
Nobody who has not bathed, avoided eating meat and observed the prohibitions Journey to the West may open the rolls.
Treasure them. Honour them.
They include the esoteric mysteries of the way of immortality and wonderful methods for discovering all transformations." Kowtowing in thanks, Sanzang faith fully accepted these instructions and determined to carry them out, did three more circuits of homage round the Lord Buddha then with dutiful and sincere obedience accepted the scriptures and went out with them through the third of the monastery gates, where he thanked all the holy beings one by one again.
Of him we will say no more. After sending the Tang Priest on his way the Tathagata dissolved the assembly that had been called to pass on the scriptures.
The Bodhisattva Guanyin then stepped forward from the side, put her hands together and submitted to the lord Buddha, "It has been fourteen years from the time when your disciple went to the East that year to find the man who would fetch the scriptures to his success today. That makes 5,040 days.
May the World−honoured One allow the holy monks to go back East from the West within eight days, so as to complete the number of rolls in one store, and then your disciple may report his mission as completed." "What you say is quite right," replied the Tathagata with delight.
"You are permitted to report the completion of your mission." With that he instructed the Eight Vajrapanis, "You are to use your divine might to escort the holy monks back to the East, where they will hand the true scriptures over to be kept there. After escorting the holy monks back, you may return to the West.
This must be done within eight days in order to match the number of rolls in one store.
There must be no disobedience or delay." The vajrapanis caught up with the Tang Priest.
"Come with us, scripture−fetchers," they called; and the Tang Priest and the others became light and strong as they floated up on clouds after the vajrapanis.
Indeed: Nature revealed and mind made clear, they visited the Buddha; Actions complete and all achieved, they flew aloft.
If you do not know how they passed on the scriptures after returning to the East, listen to the explanation in the next installment.
When the Nine Nines Are Complete the Demons Are All Destroyed After the Triple Threes Are Fulfilled the Way Returns to Its Roots The story goes on to tell how the Eight Vajrapanis escorted the Tang Priest back to their country, but we will not go into that now.
Outside the gates the Protectors of the Four Quarters and the Centre, the Four Duty Gods, the Six Dings, the Six Jias and the Guardians of the Faith went up to the Bodhisattva Guanyin and said, "We, your disciples, have given secret help to the holy monk in obedience to your dharma command, Bodhisattva.
Now that they have fulfilled their deeds and you have reported your mission accomplished to the Lord Buddha, we would like to report the completion of our mission." "Permission granted." The Bodhisattva replied with delight, "permission granted." The Bodhisattva then went on to ask, "What were the thoughts and actions of the Tang Priest and his three disciples on their journey?" Journey to the West "They really were pious and determined," the deities all replied, "as we are sure will not have escaped your profound perception.
But the Tang Priest's sufferings truly beggar description.
Your disciples have made a careful record of the disasters and hardships that he has endured on his journey.
This is the account of his ordeals." The Bodhisattva read it through from the beginning, and this is what was written in it: "We Protectors were sent at the Bodhisattva's command, To keep a close record of the Tang Priest's ordeals. The Golden Cicada's exile was the first ordeal; Being born and almost killed was the second ordeal; Abandonment in the river under the full moon was the third ordeal; Finding his mother and getting revenge was the fourth ordeal; The tigers he met after leaving the city were the fifth ordeal; Falling into the pit was the sixth ordeal; The Double Forked Peak was the seventh ordeal; The Double Boundary Mountain was the eighth ordeal; Exchanging horses at the ravine was the ninth ordeal; The fire at night was the tenth ordeal; The loss of the cassock was the eleventh ordeal; Subduing Pig was the twelfth ordeal; The obstacles created by the Yellow Wind Monster were the thirteenth ordeal; Asking the help of Lingji was the fourteenth ordeal; The hard crossing of the Flowing Sands River was the fifteenth ordeal; Winning over Friar Sand was the sixteenth ordeal; The appearance of the four holy ones was the seventeenth ordeal; In the Wuzhuang Temple was the eighteenth ordeal; The difficulty of reviving the manfruit was the nineteenth ordeal; The dismissal of the Mind−ape was the twentieth ordeal; Journey to the West Getting lost in Black Pine Forest was the twenty−first ordeal; Delivering the letter to Elephantia was the twenty−second ordeal; To be turned into a tiger in the palace hall was the twenty−third ordeal; Meeting the monsters on Flat−top Mountain was the twenty−fourth ordeal; To hang in the Lotus Flower Cave was the twenty−fifth ordeal; The rescue of the king of Wuji was the twenty−sixth ordeal; The transformation by the demons was the twenty−seventh ordeal; The encounter with the monster of Mount Hao was the twenty−eighth ordeal; The holy monk being carried off by the wind was the twenty−ninth ordeal; The attack on the Mind−ape was the thirtieth ordeal; Inviting the holy one to subdue the fiend was the thirty−first ordeal; Sinking in the Black River was the thirty−second ordeal; The moving in Tarrycart was the thirty−third ordeal; The enormous wager was the thirty−fourth ordeal; Casting out the Taoists and promoting the Buddhists was the thirty−fifth ordeal; The great river met on the way was the thirty−sixth ordeal; Falling into the River of Heaven was the thirty−seventh ordeal; The appearance with the fish basket was the thirty−eighth ordeal; Meeting the monster on Mount Jindou was the thirty−ninth ordeal; All the gods of heaven being unable to subdue him was the fortieth ordeal; Asking the Buddha about his origins was the forty−first ordeal; To be poisoned by drinking the water was the forty−second ordeal; Being kept in Womanland of Western Liang for the wedding was the forty−third ordeal; The agonies of the Pipa Cave were the forty−fourth ordeal; The Mind−ape's second dismissal was the forty−fifth ordeal; Telling the macaques apart was the forty−sixth ordeal; Journey to the West Being held up by the Fiery Mountains was the forty−seventh ordeal; Obtaining the plantain−leaf fan was the forty−eighth ordeal; Tying up the demon king was the forty−ninth ordeal; Sweeping the pagoda in Jisai city was the fiftieth ordeal; The recovery of the treasures and the rescue of the monks were the fifty−first ordeal; Reciting poems in the Thorn Forest was the fifty−second ordeal; Trouble in the Lesser Thunder Monastery was the fifty−third ordeal; The capture of the heavenly gods was the fifty−fourth ordeal; Being stopped by the filthy Runny Persimmon Lane was the fifty−fifth ordeal; Healing in Purpuria was the fifty−sixth ordeal; Saving from debility was the fifty−seventh ordeal; Subduing fiends and rescuing the queen was the fifty−eighth ordeal; Delusion by the seven passions was the fifty−ninth ordeal; The wounding of the Many−eyed Monster was the sixtieth ordeal; Being held up by the Lion was the sixty−first ordeal; Dividing demons into three categories was the sixty−second ordeal; Meeting disaster in the city was the sixty−third ordeal; Asking the Buddha to subdue the demon was the sixty−fourth ordeal; The rescue of the boys in Bhiksuland was the sixty−fifth ordeal; Telling the true from the evil was the sixty−sixth ordeal; Saving the monster in the pine forest was the sixty−seventh ordeal; Lying sick in the monastic cell was the sixty−eighth ordeal; Capture in the Bottomless Cave was the sixty−ninth ordeal; Delays in Dharmadestructia were the seventieth ordeal; Meeting the monster on Hidden Clouds Mountain was the seventy−first ordeal; Begging for rain in Fengxian was the seventy−second ordeal; Journey to the West The loss of the weapons was the seventy−third ordeal; The rake banquet was the seventy−fourth ordeal; Troubles on Bamboo Mountain were the seventy−fifth ordeal; Suffering in Dark Essence Cave was the seventy−sixth ordeal; Catching Rhinoceros was the seventy−seventh ordeal; Being required to marry in India was the seventy−eighth ordeal; Imprisonment in Brazentower was the seventy−ninth ordeal; Casting of the body at the Lingyun Crossing was the eightieth ordeal; The journey was one of 36,000 miles, And the ordeals of the holy monk are all clearly recorded." Casting her eyes over the record, the Bodhisattva quickly said, "In the Buddha's school 'nine nines' are needed before one can come to the truth.
The eighty ordeals that the holy monk has endured are one short of the full number.
"Go after the vajrapanis," she ordered a protector, "and tell them to create another ordeal." The protector headed East by cloud as soon as he was given this order, and after a day and a night he caught up with the Eight Vajrapanis. "It's like this, you see," he said, whispering in their ears in explanation, adding, "so you must do as the Bodhisattva commands and not disobey." When the Eight Vajrapanis heard this they stopped the wind with a swishing sound and dropped the four of them to the ground, horse, scriptures and all.
Oh dear!
It was a case of The Way of reaching the truth through the nine nines is hard; Hold fast to your determination to stand at the mysterious pass.
Only through rigorous effort can the demons be repelled; Perseverance is essential to the true Dharma's return.
Do not mistake the scriptures for something easily won; Of many a kind were the hardships endured by the holy monk.
The marvellous union has always been hard to achieve: The slightest mistake and the elixir will not be made.
Journey to the West As his feet touched common ground Sanzang felt alarmed.
"Marvellous," said Pig, roaring with laughter, "just marvellous! It's a case of more haste less speed." "It really is marvellous," said Friar Sand.
"They're giving us a rest here after going so fast." "As the saying goes," remarked the Great Sage, "'Wait ten days on a sandbank, then cross nine in a single day.'" "Stop arguing, you three," said Sanzang.
"Find out which way we have come and where we are." "We're here!" said Friar Sand after looking all around, "We're here!
Listen to the water, Master." "From the sound of the water I suppose it must be your family home," observed Brother Monkey.
"His home is the River of Flowing Sands," said Pig.
"No, it's not that," replied Friar Sand.
"It's the River of Heaven." "Take a careful look at the other side, disciple," said Sanzang, at which Monkey sprang into the air, shaded his eyes with his hand, and took a careful look around. "Master," he said after coming down again, "this is the West bank of the River of Heaven." "I remember now," said Sanzang.
"On the East bank there is Chen Family Village.
When we came here the other year they were so grateful to us for rescuing their son and daughter that they wanted to build a boat to take us across, but the White Soft−shelled Turtle carried us over.
As I recall, there was no sign of human life anywhere on the West bank.
Whatever are we to do now?" "They say that common mortals can be sinners," said Pig, "but the vajrapanis who serve the Buddha in person are too.
The Buddha ordered them to bring us back East, so why have they dropped us half way home? We're stuck here now.
How ever are we going to get over?" "Stop complaining, brother," said Friar Sand.
"Our master has found the Way. He cast off his mortal body at the Cloud−touching Crossing, so he won't possibly fall into the water now.
Our big brother and we two can all do levitation magic, so we can carry the master across." Monkey laughed to himself under his breath as he replied, "We can't do it, we can't do it." Why do you think he said that they couldn't do it?
If he had been prepared to use his divine powers and give away the secret of flying then master and disciples would have been able to cross a thousand rivers.
But he understood that as the Tang Priest had not yet completed the nine nines he was fated to undergo another ordeal, which was why he had been held up here.
Talking as they walked slowly along, master and disciples headed straight to the river−bank, where all of a sudden they heard someone calling, "This way, Tang Priest, this way!" They were all surprised, and when they looked up there was no sign of anyone around, and no boat either.
There was only a big, white, scabby−headed soft−shelled turtle raising its head by the bank and calling, "Master, I have been waiting for you all these years.
Why have you only just come back?" "We troubled you in the past, old turtle," said Monkey with a smile, "and this year we meet again." Sanzang, Pig and Friar Sand were all delighted.
Journey to the West "If you really do want to look after us, come ashore," Monkey said, at which the turtle climbed out of the river with a bound.
Monkey had the horse tied to the turtle with Pig squatting behind the horse's tail. The Tang Priest stood to the left of the horse's neck and Friar Sand to its right, while Monkey stood with one foot on the turtle's neck and the other on his head. "Take it easy and take it steady," he said.
The turtle strode across the water just as if his four feet were walking on flat land, carrying the master and his three disciples, five of them altogether including the horse, straight back to the Eastern bank.
This was Indeed: The mystery of the Dharma within the unique sect: When the demons are all defeated man and heaven are made known.
Only now can the original face be seen, And the causes of the one body all be complete.
Hold to the Three Vehicles to come and go at will; After the elixir's nine transformations you may do what you like.
Carry your bundle, let your staff fly, and understand the inexpressible; Lucky they were on their return to meet the Ancient Turtle.
Carrying them on his back, the Ancient Soft−shelled Turtle walked across the waves for the best part of a day. It was nearly evening when, as they approached the East bank, he suddenly asked, "Venerable master, some years ago I begged you when you reached the West and saw our Tathagata Buddha to ask him when I would be converted and how long I would live." Now ever since the venerable elder had reached the Western Heaven, bathed in the Jade Truth Temple, cast off his mortal body at the Cloud−touching Crossing and walked up the Vulture Peak, his heart had been set only on worshipping the Buddha; and when he met all the Buddhas, Bodhisattvas, holy monks and others his whole mind had been devoted to fetching the scriptures. He had given no attention to anything else, and so had not asked about how long the Ancient Turtle would live.
Having nothing he could say, and not daring to lie to or deceive the turtle, Sanzang was quiet for a long time and gave no reply.
When the turtle realized that Sanzang had not asked the questions on his behalf he gave a shake of his head and submerged with a loud splash, dropping the four of them, horse, scriptures and all, into the water. Oh dear!
But luckily the Tang Priest had cast off his mortal body and achieved the Way.
If he had still been as he had before he would have sunk to the bottom.
It was also lucky that the white horse was a dragon, that Pig and Friar Sand could swim, and that Brother Monkey gave a smiling and magnificent display of his great magic powers as he lifted the Tang Priest out of the water and up the East bank.
The only thing was that the bundles of scriptures, the clothes and the saddle were all soaked.
Master and disciples had climbed up the bank to get themselves sorted out when a sudden fierce wind blew up, the sky turned dark, and amid thunder and lightning stones and sand flew all around. This is what could be Journey to the West seen:
A wind Throwing heaven and earth into chaos; Thunder Rocking mountains and rivers; Lightning Flying like fire through the clouds; Mists Covering all of the earth.
The wind howled; Loud roared the thunder.
The lightning streaked red, While clouds blocked out the moon and the stars.
The wind−blown dust drove into the face, And tigers and leopards hid in terror.
The lightning flashes set birds cawing, And tress all vanished in the spreading mists.
The wind whipped up the waves of the River of Heaven; The thunder terrified the fish and dragons in the River of Heaven; The lightning lit up the whole of River of Heaven; The mists enshrouded in darkness the banks of the River of Heaven.
Splendid wind! Mountains toppled; pines and bamboo fell.
Splendid thunder! Its majesty alarmed insects and spread terror. Journey to the West Splendid lightning!
It moved across the sky and lit up the wilds like golden snakes.
Splendid mist! Darkening the whole of space, obscuring the nine heavens.
This alarmed Sanzang, who pressed down on the bundles of scriptures, while Friar Sand held down their carrying−pole and Pig clung to the white horse.
Monkey, however, swung his iron cudgel around with both hands as he kept guard to both right and left.
Now the wind, mist, thunder and lightning were all signals made by evil demons who wanted to steal the scriptures that had been fetched.
They tried all night to grab them until the dawn; only then did they stop.
The venerable elder, whose clothes were all soaking wet, shivered and shook as he said, "How did all this start, Wukong?" "Master," Brother Monkey replied, snorting with fury, "you don't understand the inner truth.
By escorting you to fetch these scriptures we have won the great achievement of heaven and earth. You will enjoy perpetual youth, and your dharma body will never decay.
This is something heaven and earth can't stand for, and the demons and gods detest. They wanted to come and steal them in the darkness.
But because the scriptures were soaked through and your true dharma body was holding them down, the thunder could not bombard them, the lightning could not illuminate them and the mist could not obscure them.
It was also because I whirled my iron cudgel around to make its pure Positive nature protect them.
Since dawn the Positive has been in the ascendant again, which is why they can't take them now." Only then did Sanzang, Pig and Friar Sand realize what had happened and all express unbounded thanks.
A little later, when the sun was shining from high in the sky, they took the scriptures to the top of a high cliff, opened the bundles and put them out to dry.
The rocks on which the scriptures were dried in the sun remain there to this day.
Then they spread their clothes and shoes out to dry beside the cliff while they stood there, sat down, or leapt around.
Indeed: The pure Positive body was happy in the sun, When Negative demons dared not use their might.
Even when water is dominant the true scriptures will win, Not fearing wind or thunder, lightning, mist or light.
After this clarification they come to the true perception; From now on they will reach the immortals' land in peace.
On the rocks where the scriptures were dried their traces still remain; Journey to the West Never again will any demons come back to this place.
As the four of them were checking through the scriptures and drying them in the sun one by one some fishermen who were passing the river bank lifted up their heads and saw them there.
One of the fishermen recognized them and said, "Venerable teachers, didn't you cross this river the other year when you were on your way to the Western Heaven to fetch the scriptures?" "Yes, yes," said Pig, "that's right.
Where are you from?
How did you know who we are?" "We're from Chen Village," the fisherman replied.
"How far is Chen Village from here?" Pig asked.
"It's seven miles South from this gulch," the fisherman said. "Let's take the scriptures to Chen Village and dry them there," said Pig. "There's somewhere we can stay there, and we'll be able to get something to eat. Besides, we can get their family to wash our clothes.
That'll be best, won't it?" "We will not go there," said Sanzang.
"When we have dried everything here we can pack up and find our way back." The fishermen, who passed the gulch to the South, happened to meet Chen Cheng. "You two old gentlemen," they called, "the teachers who went to be sacrificed instead of your children the other year have come back." "Where did you see them?" Chen Cheng asked.
"Drying their scriptures in the sun on the rocks," the fishermen replied.
Chen Cheng then took several of his tenants across the gulch, saw the pilgrims, and hurried towards them to kneel and say, "My lords, now that you are coming back with your scriptures, your achievement completed and your deeds done, why don't you come to my house? Why are you hanging around here?
Won't you please come straight to the house?" "We'll go with you when we've dried our scriptures in the sun," Monkey replied.
"How did your scriptures and clothes all get wet, my lords?" Chen Cheng asked.
"The other year the White soft−shelled Turtle kindly carried us West across the river," Sanzang replied, "and this year he carried us across it Eastwards.
We were approaching the bank when he put some questions to me about the enquiries he had asked me to make with the Lord Buddha about how long he would live. Now I never made this enquiry, so he soaked us all in the water.
That was how they got wet." Sanzang then told the whole story in all its details, and as Chen Cheng was so sincere in pressing his invitation Sanzang could do nothing but pack up the scriptures.
As it was not realized that the ends of several rolls of the Buddhacaritakavya sutra had stuck to the rock when wet, the ends were torn off, which is why the Buddhacaritakavya sutra is incomplete to this day and there are still traces of writing on the rocks where the scriptures were dried in the sun.
Journey to the West "We were careless," Sanzang said with remorse.
"We did not pay enough attention." "You're wrong," said Monkey with a laugh, "you're wrong.
Heaven and earth are incomplete and this scripture used to be complete. Now it's been soaked and torn to fulfil the mystery of incompleteness.
This is not something that could have been achieved through human effort." When master and disciples had finished packing the surras they returned with Chen Chang to his village.
In the village one person told ten, ten told a hundred, and a hundred a thousand, till all of them, young and old, came out to welcome and see the pilgrims.
As soon as Chen Qing heard of it he had an incense table set out to greet them in front of the gates; he also ordered drummers and players of wind instruments to perform.
A moment later the travelers arrived and were welcomed and taken inside.
Chen Qing led out his whole household to greet them with bows and thank them for their earlier kindness in saving their son and daughter.
Tea and a vegetarian meal were then ordered; but since receiving the immortal food and immortal delicacies of the Lord Buddha and casting off his mortal body to become a Buddha, Sanzang had lost all desire for mortals' food.
As the two old men's urgings were so insistent, he took some of the food as a mark of gratitude.
The Great Sage Monkey had never been one to eat cooked food, so he said, "That will be enough." Friar Sand did not eat either, and even Pig was not the Pig he used to be:
he soon put his bowl down.
"Aren't you eating any more either, idiot?" Monkey asked.
"I don't know why," Pig said, "but my stomach's gone weak all of a sudden." The vegetarian banquet was then cleared away as the old men asked about how they had fetched the scriptures.
Sanzang then gave them a detailed account that started with the bath in the Jade Truth Temple and the lightening of their bodies at Cloud−touching Crossing and went on to tell how they had seen the Tathagata at Thunder Monastery, been feasted at the jeweled tower, given the scriptures in the precious library−−wordless scriptures at first because when the two arhats had demanded presents they had refused them−−had gone back to pay their respects to the Tathagata again to be given the number of rolls in a single store, had been plunged into the water by the White Soft−shelled Turtle, and nearly had the scriptures stolen in the darkness by evil spirits. After telling all this Sanzang took his leave.
But the whole family of the two old men was not at all willing to let them go. "We have been under a great debt to you for saving our children that we have not yet been able to repay," they said.
"We have built a Temple of Deliverance where incense has been burned to you ever since without ceasing." Then they called out the children in whose place Monkey and Pig had gone to be sacrificed, Chen Guan−given and Pan of Gold, to kowtow in thanks and ask them into the shrine to take a look.
Sanzang then put the bundles of scriptures in front of the hall of their house and read them one roll of the Precious Eternity sutra.
Then they went to the temple, where the Chens had set out delicacies.
Before the pilgrims could sit down another group of people came to invite them to another meal, and before they could pick up their chopsticks yet another group came with a third invitation.
This went on and on without end, so that they had no chance to eat properly.
Sanzang, who dared not decline the invitations, had to make gestures of eating.
The shrine was indeed most handsomely built: The gateway was thickly painted in red Thanks to the generous donors.
A tower rose there Journey to the West Where houses with a pair of cloisters had now been built.
Red were the doors And the Seven Treasures were finely carved.
Incense floated up to the clouds; Pure light filled the vault of space.
Some tender cypress saplings were still being watered; A number of pine trees did not yet form a grove.
Living waters met one in front Where the waves of the River of Heaven were rolling; High cliffs rose behind Where range upon range of mountains joined the earth dragon.
When Sanzang has seen everything he climbed the high tower, where statues of the four pilgrims had been placed.
"Looks just like you, brother," said pig, tugging at Monkey, when he saw them.
"Second brother," said Friar Sand, "Your statue's just like you too.
The only thing is that the master's is too good−looking." "It is very good," said Sanzang, "it is very good." They then came downstairs, where people were still waiting, and urged them to eat the vegetarian food that was set out in the hall and in the cloisters behind it.
"What happened to the Great King's Temple that used to be here?" Brother Monkey asked.
"It was demolished that year," the old men replied.
"My lords, we have had good harvests every year since this monastery was established, thanks to your lordships' blessed protection." "That was heaven's gift," said Monkey with a smile, "nothing to do with us.
But after we have gone this time I guarantee that the families in your village will have many sons and grandsons, flourishing livestock, wind and rain at the right time year in and year out, and rain and wind year out and year in at the right time." The people all kowtowed in thanks.
What could then be seen were a countless number of people lined up behind each other to offer fruit and other vegetarian food.
"I'll be blowed," said Pig with a laugh.
"In the old days, when I could eat, nobody ever asked me to do so ten times over.
But now, when I can't, one family won't wait for another to finish before offering me food." Although he was feeling full he did get going a little and ate eight or nine meatless dishes; and despite having an injured stomach he also downed twenty or thirty steamed breadrolls.
When they were all full, more people came with further invitations.
"Grateful though I am for your great affection," Sanzang said, "I do not deserve Journey to the West it.
I hope that we may be allowed to rest tonight. Tomorrow morning we will accept some more." It was now late at night.
Sanzang, who was guarding the true scriptures and would not leave them for a moment, sat in meditation at the foot of the tower to keep a vigil.
As the third watch of the night approached he said quietly, "Wukong, the people here know that we have found the Way and completed our undertaking.
As the old saying goes, 'The true adept does not show his face; who shows his face is no true adept.' I am afraid that if we tarry too long here that we may fail in our main enterprise." "What you say is right, Master," Monkey replied.
"Let's slip quietly away in the middle of the night while they're all sound asleep." Pig too understood, Friar Sand comprehended very clearly, and the white horse also knew what he meant. So they got up, quietly loaded the packs, shouldered the poles, and carried the things out along the cloister.
When they reached the main gates and found them locked Monkey used unlocking magic to open the inner gates and the main gates.
They followed the path East, only to hear the Eight Vajrapanis calling from mid−air.
"Come with us, escapers." The venerable elder then smelt incense as he rose up into the air.
This was indeed a case of: When the elixir is formed one sees the original face; When the body is strong one can then visit one's sovereign.
If you do not know how he saw the Tang emperor, listen to the explanation in the next installment.
The Journey Back to the East Is Made The Five Immortals Achieve Nirvana We will tell not of how the four travelers escaped and rose on the wind with the vajrapanis, but of the many people in the Temple of Deliverance in Chen Village. After they rose at dawn to prepare more fruit and delicacies to offer they came to the ground floor of the tower and found the Tang Priest gone.
Some asked questions and others searched. They were all thrown into panic and did not know what to do. "We've let those living Buddhas all get clean away," they lamented as their howls rose to the skies.
As there was nothing else they could do about it they carried all the food they had prepared to the ground floor of the tower as offerings and burned imitation paper money.
From then on four major sacrifices and twenty−four minor sacrifices were held every year.
In addition people praying for cures or safety, seeking marriages, making vows, and seeking wealth or sons came at every hour of every day to bum incense and make offerings. Indeed:
Incense smoked in the golden burner for a thousand years; The light burned in the lamps of jade through eternity.
Journey to the West We will say no more of this, but tell of how the Eight Vajrapanis used a second fragrant wind to carry the four pilgrims off again. Some days later they reached the East, and Chang'an came gradually into view.
Now after seeing the Tang Priest off from the city on the twelfth day of the ninth month in the thirteenth year of Then Guan the Emperor Taizong had in the sixteenth year sent officials of his Department of Works to build a Watching For the Scriptures Tower outside the city of Chang'an to receive the scriptures. Here Taizong went in person every year.
It so happened that on the very day the emperor went to the tower the Western sky was filled with auspicious light and gusts of scented wind.
"Holy monk," the vajrapanis said, stopping in mid air, "this is the city of Chang'an.
We cannot come down as the people here are too clever: we are afraid that they might give away what we look like.
The Great Sage Monkey and the other two gentlemen cannot go there either.
You must go there yourself to hand the scriptures to your monarch then come back here.
We will be waiting for you up in the clouds ready to go to report back on your mission." "Although what you respected gentlemen say is right," replied the Great Sage, "how could my master possibly shoulder the pole for carrying the scriptures?
And how could he lead this horse?
We'll have to take him there.
May I trouble you to wait a moment up in the air?
We wouldn't dare keep you waiting." "The other day the Bodhisattva Guanyin informed the Tathagata," the vajrapanis replied, "that the return journey would take only eight days, so as to make up the number of rolls of scriptures in the Tripitaka.
We have already spent over four days, and we are worried that Pig will be so greedy for blessings and honors that he will make us overrun the time limit." "The master's a Buddha now," Pig replied with a smile, "and I want to become one too. So why should I want to be greedy?
Cheeky great fools!
Wait here while we hand the scriptures over, then we'll come back to return with you." The idiot then shouldered a pole while Friar Sand held the horse and Brother Monkey led the holy monk as they brought their cloud down to land beside the Watching For the Scriptures Tower.
When Taizong and his officials all saw this they came down to greet the travelers with the words, "You are back, Imperial Younger Brother." The Tang Priest fell to the ground in a kowtow, only to be helped back to his feet by Taizong, who asked, "Who are these three?" "They are disciples I took on along the way," Sanzang replied. Taizong was delighted.
"Harness the horses to our imperial carriage," he ordered his aides, "and invite the Imperial Younger Brother to mount his steed and return to the palace with us." The Tang Priest thanked him and mounted his horse.
The Great Sage followed closely behind, whirling his golden cudgel. Pig and Friar Sand led the horse and shouldered the pole as they followed the emperor back to Chang'an. Indeed:
In that year of peace and rising prosperity Civil and military officials are calm and magnificent.
At a land and water mass the clergy displayed the dharma; Journey to the West The monarch commands his ministers in the throne hall of the palace.
A passport was given to Tang Sanzang; The primal cause of the scriptures has been matched to the Five Elements.
Through painful tempering all monsters have been destroyed; Now he returns in triumph to the capital.
The Tang Priest and his three disciples followed the imperial carriage back to the palace. Everybody in the capital knew that the pilgrim who had gone to fetch the scriptures had now returned.
When the monks, young and old, of the Hongfu Monastery in Chang'an where the Tang Priest used to live saw that the tops of a number of pine trees were all leaning towards the East they exclaimed in astonishment, "Odd, very odd!
There's been no wind today, so why are the tops of these trees all bent?" "Fetch our vestments at once," said one of them who was a former disciple of Sanzang.
"The master who went to fetch the scriptures is back." "How do you know?" the other monks all asked.
"When the master left many years ago," the former disciple replied, "he said that when the branches and tops of the pines turned East three, four, six or seven years after he had gone he would be back.
My master speaks with the holy voice of a Buddha: that is how I know." They quickly put on their habits and went out.
By the time they reached the Western street, messengers had arrived to say, "The pilgrim who went for the scriptures has just returned, and His Majesty is bringing him into the city." As soon as they heard this the monks all hurried over to meet him.
When they saw the imperial carriage they dared not come close, but followed it to the palace gates, where the Tang Priest dismounted and went inside with his disciples.
The Tang Priest stood at the foot of the steps to the throne hall with the dragon horse, the load of sutras, Monkey, Pig and Friar Sand.
Emperor Taizong then summoned the Younger Brother to enter the throne hall and invited him to sit down, which the Tang Priest did with thanks. He then had the scriptures carried up.
Monkey and the others unpacked the scrolls, which the officials in personal attendance handed to the emperor.
"How many scriptures are there?" the emperor asked.
"And how did you fetch them?" "When your clerical subject reached Vulture Peak and saw the Lord Buddha," Sanzang replied, "he told the arhats Ananda and Kasyapa to take us first to a precious tower where we were given meatless food, then to the library, where we were handed the scriptures.
The arhats demanded presents, but as we had not brought any we had none to give.
Then they gave us the scriptures. When we had thanked the Buddha for his goodness and were travelling East the scriptures were snatched away by a demonic gale.
Luckily my disciples were able to recover them by using magic powers, but they had been blown all over the place.
On opening them out to look at them we found that they were all blank, wordless versions.
We were so shocked that we went back to report to the Buddha and plead for the real ones.
What the Lord Buddha said was, 'When these scriptures were composed, bhiksus and holy monks went down the mountain and recited them to the family of the elder Zhao Journey to the West in the land of Sravasti. This ensured peace and safety for the living and deliverance for the dead members of the family. All that was asked for was three bushels and three pecks of granular gold.
I thought that they sold the scriptures too cheap, so I saw to it that Zhao's sons and grandsons would be poor.' When we realized that the two arhats were demanding a present and that the Lord Buddha knew all about it we had no choice but to give them our begging bowl of purple gold. Only then did they hand over the true scriptures with words.
There are thirty−five of them, and a number of rolls from each of them was selected to be given us, making a total of rolls.
This corresponds to the number of rolls in a single Store." At this Taizong was more delighted than ever.
"Let the Protocol Office arrange a thanksgiving banquet in the Eastern hall," he ordered, at which he suddenly saw the three disciples standing at the foot of the steps, looking very strange indeed. "Are your distinguished disciples foreigners?" he asked.
"My senior disciple's surname is Sun," the venerable elder replied with a bow, "his Buddhist name is Wukong, and I also call him Sun the Novice.
He originally came from the Water Curtain Cave on the Mountain of Flowers and Fruit in the country of Aolai in the Eastern Continent of Divine Body.
For making great havoc in the palaces of heaven five hundred years ago he was crashed by the Lord Buddha in a stone cell in the Double Boundary Mountain on the Western frontier. After the Bodhisattva Guanyin persuaded him to mend his ways he accepted conversion, so when I arrived there I delivered him.
I am greatly indebted to him for my protection.
My second disciple Zhu has the Buddhist name Wuneng, and I also call him Pig.
He came from the Cloud Pathway Cave on the Mountain of Blessing, and was a monster in Gao Village in the land of Stubet until he was converted by the Bodhisattva and subdued by Wukong.
He has made great efforts, carrying the load all along the way, and been very useful in crossing rivers.
My third disciple's surname is Sha and his Buddhist name Wujing.
He used to be a monster in the Rowing Sands River. He too was converted by the Bodhisattva and now believes in the Buddhist faith.
The horse is not the one that my sovereign gave me." "How is that?" Taizong asked.
"Its markings are the same." "When your subject was going to cross the waters of the Eagle's Sorrow Gorge by Coiled Snake Mountain my original horse was devoured by this one," Sanzang replied.
"Sun the Novice obliged me by having the Bodhisattva asked about the horse's background. It was originally the son of the Dragon King of the Western Sea who had been sent there because of an offence. He too, was saved by the Bodhisattva, who told him to work for me and turned him into a horse with the same markings as the original one.
He has been very helpful in climbing mountains, crossing ridges, fording rivers and negotiating difficult country. On the outward journey I rode him, and he carried the scriptures on the way back:
I have depended greatly on his efforts." Taizong was full of boundless praise on learning this.
"How long in fact was your journey to the far West?" he asked.
"I remember the Bodhisattva saying that it was 36,000 miles," Sanzang replied, "but I kept no record of the distances along the way.
All I know is that we experienced fourteen winters and summers.
Every day there was a mountain or a ridge.
The woods were big and the rivers wide.
I also met several kings who inspected and stamped my passport.
Disciples," he ordered, "fetch the passport and hand it to His Majesty." When Taizong examined it he saw that it had been issued on the twelfth day of the ninth month of the thirteenth year of Zhen Guan. "You did indeed make a long and protracted journey," he observed with a touch of a smile.
"It is now the twenty−seventh year of Zhen Guan." On the passport were the seals of the monarchs of Elephantia, Wuji, Tarrycart, the Womanland of Western Liang, Jisai, Purpuria, Leonia, Bhiksuland and Dharmadestructia; as well as the seals of the chief officials of Fengxian, Yuhua and Jinping.
When Taizong had read through the passport he put it away.
Journey to the West Soon the officials in personal attendance on the emperor came to invite them to go to the banquet, whereupon Taizong led Sanzang by the hand out of the throne hall, asking, "Do your distinguished disciples know how to behave themselves?" "My disciples were all demons from mountain villages and from the wilderness," Sanzang replied, "so they do not understand the etiquette of the sacred court of China.
I beg you to forgive them for any offences, Your Majesty." "We won't blame them," Taizong said with a smile, "we won't blame them.
They are all invited to come with us to the banquet in the Eastern pavilion." Thanking him once again, Sanzang called his three disciples, and they all went to the Eastern pavilion to look.
This was indeed the great land of China, no ordinary place.
Just look; Coloured silks hung from the gates, Red carpets were spread on the floor.
Heavy, rare fragrances, Fresh and exotic foods.
Amber cups, Glazed dishes, Set with gold and nephrite; Plates of yellow gold, White jade bowls, Inlaid with patterns.
Tender braised turnips, Sugar−dredged taros, Wonderful sweet mushrooms, Fine fresh seaweed, Several servings of bamboo shoots with ginger, A number of rounds of mallows with honey, Wheat gluten with leaves of the tree of heaven, Tree fungus and thin strips of beancurd, Journey to the West Agar and aster, Noodles with ferns and dried rose−petals, Peppers stewed with radish, Melon shredded with mustard.
The dishes of vegetables were fine enough, But the rare and wonderful fruit was outstanding:
Walnuts and persimmon cakes, Longans and lichees, Chestnuts from Xuanzhou and Shandong jujubes, Gingko fruit from South of the Yangtse and hare−head pears, Hazelnuts, pine nuts and lotus seeds, all big as grapes, Torreya nuts and melon seeds the size of water chestnuts, Olives and wild apples, Pippins and crabs, Lotus root and arrowhead, Crisp plums and red baybfenies.
Nothing was missing, All was complete.
There were steamed honey pastries and other confections, Best wines and fragrant tea and things out of the ordinary.
Words could not describe the countless delicacies: The great land of China was not Western barbary.
The master and his three disciples, together with the civil and military officials, stood to left and right as Emperor Taizong took his seat in the middle.
There was singing, dancing and instrumental music, and all was ordered and solemn as the celebration lasted for the rest of the day.
Indeed: Journey to the West The monarch's banquet was finer than those of ancient Tang and Yu; Great was the blessing of the true scriptures obtained.
This was a story to be told with glory for ever: The light of the Buddha shines throughout the imperial capital.
That evening they thanked the emperor for his kindness, after which Taizong returned to the living quarters of the palace and the officials went home.
The Tang Priest went back with his followers to the Hongfu Monastery, where the monks welcomed his with kowtows.
No sooner had he gone in through the gates than the monks reported, "Master, these tree−tops all suddenly leaned East this morning.
As we remembered what you had said we went out of the city to meet you, and you had indeed come." Overcome with delight, the venerable elder then entered the abbot's lodgings.
This time Pig neither shouted for tea and food nor made a row.
Brother Monkey and Friar Sand also both behaved well.
As the achievement was now complete they were naturally peaceful.
At nightfall they went to bed.
Early the next morning Taizong announced to his officials at his dawn audience, "When we thought of the most profound and great achievement of our Younger Brother that we have no way of rewarding we were unable to sleep all night.
We managed to draft a few colloquial sentences with which to express our thanks, but could not write them out.
Officials of the Secretariat," he ordered, "write them all down while we recite them to you." This is the text he dictated:
It is known that Heaven and Earth have their forms as a demonstration of how they provide the cover and support in which life is contained, whereas the four seasons are invisible, hiding the cold and heat with which they transform all creatures.
Thus it is that by examining Heaven and looking at the Earth even the stupid can know about their origins, but few are the wise who can exhaust the numbers of the Negative and the Positive.
Heaven and Earth, which are enveloped by the Negative and Positive, are easily understood because of their images, but the Negative and Positive are hard to fathom because they are formless.
If images are clear and can be grasped even the stupid will not be confused; if forms are hidden and invisible even the wise will be at a loss.
The way of the Buddha honors emptiness, rides on the mystery and controls silence, yet saves all beings and dominates all regions.
When it raises up the numinous there is nothing higher; when it represses its own divine strength there is nothing lower.
When it is big it extends throughout the cosmos; when tiny it can be contained in a fraction of an inch.
It does not die and it is not born; it endures a thousand aeons and is eternal.
Half hidden and half manifest, it controls all blessings and makes them exist for ever.
Mysterious is the wonderful Way; none of those who follow it know its limits.
Silent is the flow of the Dharma: of those who grasp it none finds its source.
So how can mortal fools in their stupidity follow it without doubts or delusion?
The great teaching arose in the West.
Later a wondrous dream came to the Han court, spreading its brilliance and charity to the East.
In ancient times, when the Buddha's forms and traces were shared around, they converted people before word could be spread abroad.
In the age when they were sometimes visible and sometimes invisible, the people looked up to them and followed them.
But later the image was obscures and nirvana was reached, it moved away and left the world, the golden countenance was hidden away and no longer radiated its brilliance in the three thousand worlds.
Pictures of the lovely image were made, vainly Journey to the West trying to show the Buddha's thirty−two holy marks.
Thereafter his subtle words were widely propagated, rescuing birds on the three roads of life; the teachings he left behind were spread afar, guiding all living beings along the ten stages of development.
The Buddha has scriptures that can be divided into the Greater and Lesser Vehicles.
There is also magic, the art of spreading mistakes and making right into wrong.
Now our priest Xuanzang, the Master of the Law, is the leader of the Dharma faith.
In his youth he was so careful and perceptive that he soon became aware of the value of the three voids.
As he grew up the clarity of his spirit embraced the four kinds of patience in his conduct.
Not even a pine tree in a wind or the moon reflected in water could be compared with his purity; immortals' dew and bright pearls are no match for his lustrous splendor.
His wisdom encompasses all without encumbrance; his spirit fathoms the formless.
Rising far above the six impurities, he extends his fragrance through a thousand ages.
When he concentrated his mind on the inner sphere he grieved at the torments suffered by the true Dharma; when he settled his thoughts on the gate of mystery he was distressed by the distortion of the profound writings. He longed to put them back into order so that the teachings of the past could be propagated again; and to root out apocryphal texts, enabling the true ones to stay in circulation so as to open the way for later scholars.
That is why he lifted up his heart towards the Pure Land, and made a Dharma journey to the West, braving the dangers of distant lands as he walked alone, trusting to his staff.
When the snow whirled around at dawn the land would disappear in a moment; and when the dust started to fly at evening the sky was blotted out.
He advanced through the mists across a thousand leagues of mountains and rivers, making his way forward through the frosts and rains of a hundred changes of season.
With great single−mindedness and making light of his efforts he longed deeply to reach his goal.
He wandered around the West for fourteen years, visiting every one of those exotic countries in his search for the true teaching.
He visited the Twin Trees and the Eight Rivers, savoring the Way and braving the wind.
In Deer Park and on Vulture Peak he gazed upon wonders and marvels.
He received the good word from ancient sages and the true teaching from superior worthies, probing deep within the wonderful gates, and exhausting the mysteries.
The Way of the Three Vehicles and the Six Disciplines gallop across the field of his heart; a hundred cases of texts belonging to one Store roll like waves in the sea of his eloquence.
Infinitely many are the countries he has visited; and vast the number of the scriptures he has collected.
He has obtained 5,048 rolls of all thirty−five of the essential texts of the Great Vehicle to be translated and made known in China so that the wonderful cause may be promoted.
The clouds of mercy he has drawn from the far West will shed their Dharma rain here in the East.
The holy teachings that had been incomplete are now complete once more; the common folk who had sinned are brought back to blessings.
The searing flames of fire have been damped down, and all have been saved from the ways of delusion; the muddied waves in the water of wisdom have been made clear once more as all gather on the other bank.
From this it can be learned that the evil fall because of their karma, while the good rise because of their destiny.
The origins of these rises and falls lie in one's own actions.
This can be compared with a cassia growing on a high mountain, where only clouds and dew can nourish its blossom, or a lotus emerging from green waters, its leaves unsullied by flying dust.
It is not that the lotus is pure by nature and the cassia unsullied: they are good because one attaches itself to what is lofty, where mean and trivial things cannot encumber it, while the other depends on what is clean, where filth cannot dirty it.
Now if plants that know nothing can become good by building themselves up through goodness, how much the more so should conscientious people achieve blessing through blessed cause and effect.
It is now to be hoped that the true scriptures will be propagated as endlessly as the alternation of sun and moon; and that this blessing will extend for ever, eternal like heaven and earth.
As soon as this had been written out the holy monk, who was waiting outside the palace gates to express his thanks, was summoned. The moment he heard the summons, Sanzang hurried and performed the ritual of kowtows.
Taizong then invited him into the throne room and handed him the document, Sanzang read it through, prostrated himself once more in thanks, and submitted this memorial:
"Your Majesty's writing is both lofty and in the ancient style; it is reasoned, profound and subtle.
But I do not know what its title is." Journey to the West "What we drafted orally last night," Taizong replied, "We would call a 'Preface to the Holy Teaching'.
Would that be acceptable?" The venerable elder kowtowed and expressed his thanks at great length.
Taizong then said, "Our talent makes us ashamed by comparison with what is recorded on jade tablets; our words are not worthy of what is inscribed on metal or stone.
As for the Inner Scriptures, we are even more ignorant of them.
The text we drafted orally is truly a base and clumsy composition that sullies golden tablets with brush and ink, and is like placing pebbles in a forest of pearls.
When we reflect on it we are filled with embarrassment.
It is most unworthy of merit; we have put you to the trouble of thanking us for nothing." The officials all expressed their congratulations and kowtowed before the imperial text on the holy teaching, which was going to be published everywhere in the capital and the provinces.
"Would you be willing to recite some of the true scriptures for us, Younger Brother?" Taizong asked.
"Your Majesty," Sanzang replied, "if true scriptures are to be recited it must be done in the Buddha's ground.
A throne hall is no place for the recital of scriptures." Taizong was most pleased to accept this.
"Which is the purest monastery in the city of Chang'an?" he asked his officers it attendance, at which the Academician Xiao Yu slipped forward from his rank to memorialize, "The Monastery of the Wild Goose Stupa in the city is the purest of them all." Taizong then ordered his officials, "Each of you is reverently to bring a few rolls of the true scriptures and accompany us to the Monastery of the Wild Goose Stupa, where we shall invite our younger brother to preach on the scriptures." The officials, all carrying some rolls of the scriptures, went with Taizong to the monastery, where a high platform was erected and everything was neatly set out.
"Pig, Friar Sand," the venerable elder commanded, "bring the dragon horse with you and put the luggage in order.
Monkey will stay beside me." He then addressed the emperor, saying, "If Your Majesty wishes to spread the true scriptures throughout the world copies must be made before they can be published.
The original texts must be stored as great treasures.
They may not be shown any disrespect or be defiled." "Younger Brother," replied Taizong with a smile, "what you say is very correct, very correct." He then ordered the officials of the Hanlin Academy and the Palace Secretariat to copy out the true scriptures and had another monastery, the Copying Monastery, founded to the East of the city wall.
The venerable elder mounted the platform with several scriptures in his hands. He was just about to begin reciting them when scented breezes began to waft around and the Eight Great Vajrapanis appeared in mid−air to shout aloud, "Scripture−reciter, put those scriptures down and come back to the West with us." Monkey and the other two, who were standing below Sanzang, all rose up above the ground together with the white horse.
Sanzang put the scriptures down and also rose up to the ninth level of clouds, then went away with them through the air.
Taizong and his officials were all so alarmed that they kowtowed to the sky.
This was indeed a case of The holy monk long strove to fetch the scriptures; For fourteen years across the West he strayed.
He journeyed hard and met with much disaster; Journey to the West By mountains and by rivers long delayed.
Completing eight times nine and one nine more, His deeds filled worlds in numbers beyond measure.
He went back to his country taking sutras That people in the East will always treasure.
When Taizong and all the officials had finished worshipping, eminent monks were selected to prepare a great Land and Sea Mass in the Monastery of the Wild Goose Stupa at which the true scriptures of the Great Store would be recited, and by which all evil−doing ghosts in the underworld would be saved, and goodness would spread all around.
We will not describe how copies were made of the scriptures and published throughout the empire.
The story tells instead how the Eight Vajrapanis led the venerable elder, his three disciples and the horse, all five of them back to Vulture Peak.
The journey to Chang'an and back had taken eight days.
Just when all the deities of Vulture Peak were listening to the Buddha preaching, the Eight Vajrapanis led master and disciples in.
"In obedience to the golden command," they reported to the Tathagata, "your disciples have carried the holy monks back to the land of Tang, where they handed the scriptures over.
We have now come to report our mission completed." The Tang Priest and his disciples were then told to step forward and be given their jobs.
"Holy Monk," the Tathagata said, "in an earlier life you were my second disciple, and called Master Golden Cicada.
But because you would not listen to my sermon on the Dharma and had no respect for my great teaching I demoted your soul to be reborn in the East.
Now, happily, you have come over to the faith and rely on our support; and in following our teaching your achievement in fetching the true scriptures has been very great. Your reward will be to be promoted to high office as the Candana−punya Buddha.
Sun Wukong, when you made great havoc in the palaces of heaven I had to use powerful magic to crush you under the Five Elements Mountain until, happily, your heaven−sent punishment was completed and you were converted to the Sakyamuni's faith.
It was also fortunate that you suppressed your evil side and gave play to your good side as you won glory by defeating monsters and demons along the journey. All that was begun has now been completed and you too will be rewarded with high office as the Victorious Fighting Buddha.
Zhu Wuneng; you used to be a water god in the River of Heaven as Marshal Tian Peng. Because of your drunken flirtation with an immortal maiden at the Peach Banquet you were sent down to be born in the lower world as a beast.
From your love of the human body you sinned in the Cloud Pathway Cave on the Mount of Blessing before your conversion to the great faith and entry into our Buddhist sect.
You guarded the holy monk on his journey, but your heart is still unregenerate, and you are not yet purged of your lust.
But as you won merit by carrying the luggage you will be rewarded with promotion as the Altar Cleanser." "They've both been made Buddhas," Pig shouted, "so why am I only the Altar Cleanser?" "Because you have a voracious appetite, a lazy body and a huge belly," the Tathagata replied.
"Now very many people in the world's four continents believe in our teachings. I will ask you to clean up the altars after all Buddhist services: your post is of a rank that provides plenty to eat.
What is wrong with that?" Journey to the West "Sha Wujing, you used to be the Curtain−lifting General until you were banished to the lower world for smashing a crystal bowl at a Peach Banquet.
You fell into the River of Flowing Sands where you sinned by killing and eating people, until, thank goodness, you were converted to our teaching, sincerely relied on our support, and won merit by protecting the holy monk and leading the horse up the mountain. Your reward will be elevation to high office as the Golden Arhat." Then he said to the white horse.
"You were originally the son of Guangjin, the Dragon King of the Western Ocean.
Because you disobeyed your father you were punished for being unfilial until you too were converted to the Dharma and to our faith. Every day you carried the holy monk to the West, and after that you carried the holy scriptures back to the East. For these achievements you will be rewarded by being made a Heavenly Dragon of the Eight Classes of Being." The venerable elder and his three disciples all kowtowed to express their thanks, and the horse showed its gratitude too.
A protector was then ordered to take the horse straight down to the Dragon−transforming Pool by the precipice at the back of Vulture Peak and push him into the pool.
At once the horse stretched itself out, shed all its hair, and acquired horns. Golden scales grew all over its body and a silver beard sprouted on its cheeks and chin. Then, shining all over with auspicious aura and with clouds of good omen in every claw, it flew up from the Dragon−transforming Pool to coil itself around the Heaven−supporting Winged Column.
All the Buddhas expressed their admiration for the Tathagata's great magic.
"Master," Monkey said to the Tang Priest, "now that I've become a Buddha just like you, surely I don't have to go on wearing this golden band. Do you plan to say any more Band−tightening Spells to tighten it round my head?
Say a Band−loosening Spell as quickly as you can, take it off, and smash it to smithereens. Don't let that Bodhisattva or whatever she is make life miserable for anyone else with it." "It was because you were so uncontrollable in those days that this magic was needed to keep you in order." Sanzang replied.
"Now that you are a Buddha it can of course go. There is no reason for it to stay on your head any longer.
Feel there now." When Monkey raised his hands to feel he found that it had indeed gone.
The Candana−punya Buddha, the Victorious Fighting Buddha, the Altar Cleanser and the Golden Arhat had all completed the true achievement and reached their proper places. The heavenly dragon horse had also come back to its true self.
There is a poem to prove this that goes: All of reality turns to dust; When the four appearances combine the body is renewed.
The substance of the Five Elements is all void; Forget about the passing fame of fiends.
With Candana−punya comes the great awakening; When duties are completed they escape from suffering.
Great is the blessing of scriptures spread abroad; Within the only gate five sages dwell on high.
Journey to the West When the five holy ones had taken their places all the Buddhas, Bodhisattvas, holy monks, arhats, protectors, bhiksus, lay people, deities and immortals from every cave and every mountain, great gods, Ding and Jia gods, duty gods, guardians, local deities, and all teachers and immortals who had achieved the Way−−all of whom had originally come to hear the preaching−−resumed their own places.
Just look at it: The coloured mists surround the Vulture Peak; Auspicious clouds are massed in the world of bliss.
Golden dragons lie at peace, Jade tigers all are quiet.
Black hares come and go at will; Tortoises and snakes coil all around.
Phoenixes red and green are in high spirits; Happy the dark apes and white deer.
Throughout the year amazing flowers bloom; Immortal fruit grows in all four seasons.
Lofty pine and ancient juniper, Blue−green cypress and slender bamboo.
Plums of every color, in blossom or in fruit, Eternal peaches, sometimes ripe and sometimes new.
A thousand kinds of fruit and flower vie in beauty; All of the sky is filled with auspicious mists. They all put their hands together in front of their chests in salutation and recited together:
"Homage to the ancient Dipamkara Buddha.
Homage to Bhaisajya−guru−vaiduryaprabhasa Buddha.
Homage to Sakyamuni Buddha.
Homage to the Buddhas of Past, Present and Future.
Homage to the Pure and Happy Buddha.
Journey to the West Homage to Vairocana Buddha.
Homage to Ramadhvaja−raja Buddha.
Homage to Maitreya Buddha.
Homage to Amitabha Buddha.
Homage to Amitayus Buddha.
Homage to Buddha Who Leads to the Truth.
Homage to the Imperishable Vajra Buddha.
Homage to Ratnaprabhasa Buddha.
Homage to the Nagaraja Buddha.
Homage to the Buddha of Zealous Goodness.
Homage to the Precious Moonlight Buddha.
Homage to the Buddha Free of Stupidity.
Homage to Varuna Buddha.
Homage to Narayana Buddha.
Homage to Punyapuspa Buddha.
Homage to the Buddha of Meritorious Talent.
Homage to the Good Wandering Buddha.
Homage to the Illustrious Candana−punya Buddha Homage to the Manidhvaja Buddha.
Homage to the Buddha of the Torch of Wisdom.
Homage to the Buddha of Great Virtues.
Homage to the Brilliant Buddha of Great Compassion.
Homage to the Maitribala−raja Buddha.
Homage to the Wise and Good Leader Buddha.
Homage to the Vyuharaja Buddha.
Homage to the Buddha of Golden Splendor.
Journey to the West Homage to the Buddha of Brilliant Talent Homage to the Buddha of Wisdom.
Homage to the Buddha of the World's Calm Light.
Homage to the Sunlight and Moonlight Buddha.
Homage to the Sunlight and Moonlight Pearl Buddha.
Homage to the Supreme Buddha King of the Banner of Wisdom.
Homage to the Sughosa Buddha.
Homage to the Buddha of the Banner of Unceasing Radiance.
Homage to the Buddha of the World−watching Lamp.
Homage to the Supreme Dhanna King Buddha.
Homage to the Buddha of Sumeru Light.
Homage to the Buddha Prajnabala King.
Homage to the Brilliant Buddha of the Golden sea.
Homage to the Buddha of Universal Light.
Homage to the Buddha of Illustrious Talent.
Homage to Candana−punya Achievement Buddha.
Homage to the Victorious Fighting Buddha.
Homage to the Bodhisattva Guanyin.
Homage to the Bodhisattva Mahasthama.
Homage to the Bodhisattva Manjusri Homage to the Bodhisattva Samantabhadra.
Homage to the Bodhisattvas of the Ocean of Purity.
Homage to the Buddhas and Bodhisattvas of the Lotus Pool Assembly.
Homage to all the Bodhisattvas of the Utterly Blissful Western Heaven.
Homage to the Three Thousand Protector Bodhisattvas.
Homage to the Five Hundred Arhat Bodhisattvas.
Journey to the West Homage to the Bhiksu, Bhiksuni, Upasaka and Upasaka Bodhisattvas.
Homage to the Bodhisattvas of the Boundless Dharma.
Homage to the Holy Vajra Bodhisattvas.
Homage to the Altar−cleansing Bodhisattva.
Homage to the Golden Arhat Bodhisattva of the Eight Treasures.
Homage to the Bodhisattva Heavenly Dragon of Eight Classes of Being.
Thus it is that all the Buddhas of every world Are willing with this achievement To adorn the Pure Land of the Buddha.
Above we can repay the fourfold kindness, Below we save those suffering in the three paths of life.
Let anyone who sees or hears Cherish the enlightened mind.
May all be reborn in the Land of Bliss, To end this present life of retribution.
All the Buddhas of Past, Present and Future in the Ten Regions, all the Bodhisattvas and Mahasattvas, Maha−prajnaparamita." Here ends the Journey to the West.

CHAPTER 1.
Three Heroes Swear Brotherhood In The Peach Garden; One Victory Shatters The Rebels In Battlegrounds.
Domains under heaven, after a long period of division, tends to unite; after a long period of union, tends to divide. This has been so since antiquity.
When the rule of the Zhou Dynasty weakened, seven contending kingdoms sprang up, warring one with another until the kingdom of Qin prevailed and possessed the empire.
But when Qin's destiny had been fulfilled, arose two opposing kingdoms, Chu and Han, to fight for the mastery. And Han was the victor.
The rise of the fortunes of Han began when Liu Bang the Supreme Ancestor slew a white serpent to raise the banners of uprising, which only ended when the whole empire belonged to Han . This magnificent heritage was handed down in successive Han emperors for two hundred years, till the rebellion of Wang Mang caused a disruption. But soon Liu Xiu the Latter Han Founder restored the empire, and Han emperors continued their rule for another two hundred years till the days of Emperor Xian, which were doomed to see the beginning of the empire's division into three parts, known to history as The Three Kingdoms.
But the descent into misrule hastened in the reigns of the two predecessors of Emperor Xian—Emperors Huan and Ling—who sat in the Dragon Throne about the middle of the second century.
Emperor Huan paid no heed to the good people of his court, but gave his confidence to the Palace eunuchs.
He lived and died, leaving the scepter to Emperor Ling, whose advisers were Regent Marshal Dou Wu and Imperial Guardian Chen Fan.
Dou Wu and Chen Fan, disgusted with the abuses of the eunuchs in the affairs of the state, plotted the destruction for the powerabusing eunuchs. But Chief Eunuch Cao Jie was not to be disposed of easily. The plot leaked out, and the honest Dou Wu and Chen Fan were put to death, leaving the eunuchs stronger than before.
It fell upon the day of full moon of the fourth month, the second year, in the era of Established Calm , that Emperor Ling went in state to the Hall of Virtue.
As he drew near the throne, a rushing whirlwind arose in the corner of the hall and, lo!
from the roof beams floated down a monstrous black serpent that coiled itself up on the very seat of majesty.
The Emperor fell in a swoon. Those nearest him hastily raised and bore him to his palace while the courtiers scattered and fled.
The serpent disappeared.
But there followed a terrific tempest, thunder, hail, and torrents of rain, lasting till midnight and working havoc on all sides.
Two years later the earth quaked in Capital Luoyang, while along the coast a huge tidal wave rushed in which, in its recoil, swept away all the dwellers by the sea. Another evil omen was recorded ten years later, when the reign title was changed to Radiant Harmony :
certain hens suddenly crowed.
At the new moon of the sixth month, a long wreath of murky cloud wound its way into the Hall of Virtue, while in the following month a rainbow was seen in the Dragon Chamber.
Away from the capital, a part of the Five Mountains collapsed, leaving a mighty rift in the flank.
Such were some of various omens.
Emperor Ling, greatly moved by these signs of the displeasure of Heaven, issued an edict asking his ministers for an explanation of the calamities and marvels. A court counselor, Cai Yong, replied bluntly:
“Falling rainbows and changes of fowls' sexes are brought about by the interference of empresses and eunuchs in state affairs.” The Emperor read this memorial with deep sighs, and Chief Eunuch Cao Jie, from his place behind the throne, anxiously noted these signs of grief.
An opportunity offering, Cao Jie informed his fellows, and a charge was trumped up against Cai Yong, who was driven from the court and forced to retire to his country house. With this victory the eunuchs grew bolder.
Ten of them, rivals in wickedness and associates in evil deeds, formed a powerful party known as the Ten Regular Attendants—Zhang Rang, Zhao Zhong, Cheng Kuang, Duan Gui, Feng Xu, Guo Sheng, Hou Lan, Jian Shuo, Cao Jie, and Xia Yun. One of them, Zhang Rang, won such influence that he became the Emperor's most honored and trusted adviser.
The Emperor even called him “Foster Father.” So the corrupt state administration went quickly from bad to worse, till the country was ripe for rebellion and buzzed with brigandage.
At this time in the county of Julu was a certain Zhang family, of whom three brothers bore the name of Zhang Jue, Zhang Bao, and Zhang Liang, respectively. The eldest Zhang Jue was an unclassed graduate, who devoted himself to medicine.
One day, while culling simples in the woods, Zhang Jue met a venerable old gentleman with very bright, emerald eyes and fresh complexion, who walked with an oak-wood staff. The old man beckoned Zhang Jue into a cave and there gave him three volumes of the “Book of Heaven.” “This book,” said the old gentleman, “is the Way of Peace. With the aid of these volumes, you can convert the world and rescue humankind.
But you must be single-minded, or, rest assured, you will greatly suffer.” With a humble obeisance, Zhang Jue took the book and asked the name of his benefactor.
“I am Saint Hermit of the Southern Land,” was the reply, as the old gentleman disappeared in thin air.
Zhang Jue studied the wonderful book eagerly and strove day and night to reduce its precepts to practice. Before long, he could summon the winds and command the rain, and he became known as the Mystic of the Way of Peace.
In the first month of the first year of Central Stability , there was a terrible pestilence that ran throughout the land, whereupon Zhang Jue distributed charmed remedies to the afflicted. The godly medicines brought big successes, and soon he gained the tittle of the Wise and Worthy Master.
He began to have a following of disciples whom he initiated into the mysteries and sent abroad throughout all the land. They, like their master, could write charms and recite formulas, and their fame increased his following.
Zhang Jue began to organize his disciples. He established thirty-six circuits, the larger with ten thousand or more members, the smaller with about half that number. Each circuit had its chief who took the military title of General.
They talked wildly of the death of the blue heaven and the setting up of the golden one; they said a new cycle was beginning and would bring universal good fortune to all members; and they persuaded people to chalk the symbols for the first year of the new cycle on the main door of their dwellings. With the growth of the number of his supporters grew also the ambition of Zhang Jue. The Wise and Worthy Master dreamed of empire.
One of his partisans, Ma Yuanyi, was sent bearing gifts to gain the support of the eunuchs within the Palace.
To his brothers Zhang Jue said, “For schemes like ours always the most difficult part is to gain the popular favor. But that is already ours.
Such an opportunity must not pass.” And they began to prepare.
Many yellow flags and banners were made, and a day was chosen for the uprising.
Then Zhang Jue wrote letters to Eunuch Feng Xu and sent them by one of his followers, Tang Zhou, who alas! betrayed his trust and reported the plot to the court.
The Emperor summoned the trusty Regent Marshal He Jin and bade him look to the issue. Ma Yuanyi was at once taken and beheaded.
Feng Xu and many others were cast into prison. The plot having thus become known, the Zhang brothers were forced at once to take the field. They took up grandiose titles:
Zhang Jue the Lord of Heaven, Zhang Bao the Lord of Earth, and Zhang Liang the Lord of Human. And in these names they put forth this manifesto:
“The good fortune of the Han is exhausted, and the Wise and Worthy Man has appeared.
Discern the will of Heaven, O ye people, and walk in the way of righteousness, whereby alone ye may attain to peace.” Support was not lacking.
On every side people bound their heads with yellow scarves and joined the army of the rebel Zhang Jue, so that soon his strength was nearly half a million strong, and the official troops melted away at a whisper of his coming.
Regent Marshal and Guardian of the Throne, He Jin, memorialized for general preparations against the Yellow Scarves, and an edict called upon every one to fight against the rebels.
In the meantime, three Imperial Commanders—Lu Zhi, Huangfu Song, and Zhu Jun—marched against them in three directions with veteran soldiers. Meanwhile Zhang Jue led his army into Youzhou, the northeastern region of the empire.
The Imperial Protector of Youzhou was Liu Yan, a scion of the Imperial House.
Learning of the approach of the rebels, Liu Yan called in Commander Zhou Jing to consult over the position. Zhou Jing said, “They are many and we few.
We must enlist more troops to oppose them.” Liu Yan agreed and he put out notices calling for volunteers to serve against the rebels.
One of these notices was posted up in the county of Zhuo, where lived one man of high spirit.
This man was no mere bookish scholar, nor found he any pleasure in study.
But he was liberal and amiable, albeit a man of few words, hiding all feeling under a calm exterior.
He had always cherished a yearning for high enterprise and had cultivated the friendship of humans of mark.
He was tall of stature. His ears were long, the lobes touching his shoulders, and his hands hung down below his knees. His eyes were very big and prominent so that he could see backward past his ears. His complexion was as clear as jade, and he had rich red lips.
He was a descendant of Prince Faubus of Zhongshan whose father was the Emperor Myers, the occupant of the Dragon Throne a century and a half BC. His name was Liu Bei. Many years before, one of his forbears had been the governor of that very county, but had lost his rank for remissness in ceremonial offerings. However, that branch of the family had remained on in the place, gradually becoming poorer and poorer as the years rolled on.
His father Liu Hong had been a scholar and a virtuous official but died young.
The widow and orphan were left alone, and Liu Bei as a lad won a reputation for filial piety.
At this time the family had sunk deep in poverty, and Liu Bei gained his living by selling straw sandals and weaving grass mats.
The family home was in a village near the chief city of Zhuo.
Near the house stood a huge mulberry tree, and seen from afar its curved profile resembled the canopy of a wagon.
Noting the luxuriance of its foliage, a soothsayer had predicted that one day a man of distinction would come forth from the family.
As a child, Liu Bei played with the other village children beneath this tree, and he would climb up into it, saying, “I am the Son of Heaven, and this is my chariot .” His uncle, Liu Yuanqi, recognized that Liu Bei was no ordinary boy and saw to it that the family did not come to actual want.
When Liu Bei was fifteen, his mother sent him traveling for his education. For a time he served Zheng Xuan and Lu Zhi as masters. And he became great friends with Gongsun Zan.
Liu Bei was twenty-eight when the outbreak of the Yellow Scarves called for soldiers.
The sight of the notice saddened him, and he sighed as he read it.
Suddenly a rasping voice behind him cried, “Sir, why sigh if you do nothing to help your country?” Turning quickly he saw standing there a man about his own height, with a bullet head like a leopard's, large eyes, a swallow pointed chin, and whiskers like a tiger's. He spoke in a loud bass voice and looked as irresistible as a dashing horse.
At once Liu Bei saw he was no ordinary man and asked who he was.
“Zhang Fei is my name,” replied the stranger.
“I live near here where I have a farm; and I am a wine seller and a butcher as well; and I like to become acquainted with worthy humans.
Your sighs as you read the notice drew me toward you.” Liu Bei replied, “I am of the Imperial Family, Liu Bei is my name.
And I wish I could destroy these Yellow Scarves and restore peace to the land, but alas! I am helpless.” “I have the means,” said Zhang Fei. “Suppose you and I raised some troops and tried what we could do.” This was happy news for Liu Bei, and the two betook themselves to the village inn to talk over the project.
As they were drinking, a huge, tall fellow appeared pushing a hand-cart along the road. At the threshold he halted and entered the inn to rest awhile and he called for wine. “And be quick,” added he, “for I am in haste to get into the town and offer myself for the army.” Liu Bei looked over the newcomer, item by item, and he noted the man had a huge frame, a long beard, a vivid face like an apple, and deep red lips.
He had eyes like a phoenix's and fine bushy eyebrows like silkworms. His whole appearance was dignified and awe-inspiring.
Presently, Liu Bei crossed over, sat down beside him and asked his name. “I am Guan Yu,” replied he.
“I am a native of the east side of the river, but I have been a fugitive on the waters for some five years, because I slew a ruffian who, since he was powerful, was a bully.
I have come to join the army here.” Then Liu Bei told Guan Yu his own intentions, and all three went away to Zhang Fei's farm where they could talk over the grand project.
Said Zhang Fei, “The peach trees in the orchard behind the house are just in full flower.
Tomorrow we will institute a sacrifice there and solemnly declare our intention before Heaven and Earth. And we three will swear brotherhood and unity of aims and sentiments; thus will we enter upon our great task.” Both Liu Bei and Guan Yu gladly agreed.
All three being of one mind, next day they prepared the sacrifices, a black ox, a white horse, and wine for libation. Beneath the smoke of the incense burning on the altar, they bowed their heads and recited this oath: “We three—Liu Bei, Guan Yu, and Zhang Fei—though of different families, swear brotherhood, and promise mutual help to one end. We will rescue each other in difficulty; we will aid each other in danger.
We swear to serve the state and save the people.
We ask not the same day of birth, but we seek to die together.
May Heaven, the all-ruling, and Earth, the all-producing, read our hearts; and if we turn aside from righteousness or forget kindliness, may Heaven and Human smite us!” They rose from their knees.
The two others bowed before Liu Bei as their elder brother, and Zhang Fei was to be the youngest of the trio.
This solemn ceremony performed, they slew other oxen and made a feast to which they invited the villagers. Three hundred joined them, and all feasted and drank deep in the Peach Garden. The next day weapons were mustered. But there were no horses to ride.
This was a real grief, but soon they were cheered by the arrival of two horse dealers with a drove of horses.
“Thus does Heaven help us,” said Liu Bei.
And the three brothers went forth to welcome the merchants. They were Zhang Shiping and Su Shuang from Zhongshan. They went northwards every year to buy horses. They were now on their way home because of the Yellow Scarves.
The brothers invited them to the farm, where wine was served before them. Then Liu Bei told them of the plan to strive for tranquillity.
Zhang Shiping and Su Shuang were glad and at once gave the brothers fifty good steeds, and beside, five hundred ounces of gold and silver and one thousand five hundred pounds of steel fit for the forging of weapons. The brothers expressed their gratitude, and the merchants took their leave. Then blacksmiths were summoned to forge weapons.
For Liu Bei they made a pair of ancient swords; for Guan Yu they fashioned a long-handled, curve blade called Green-Dragon Saber, which weighed a full one hundred twenty pounds; and for Zhang Fei they created a ten-foot spear called Octane-Serpent Halberd.
Each too had a helmet and full armor.
When weapons were ready, the troop, now five hundred strong, marched to Commander Zhou Jing, who presented them to Imperial Protector Liu Yan.
When the ceremony of introduction was over, Liu Bei declared his ancestry, and Liu Yan at once accorded him the esteem due to a relation.
Before many days it was announced that the rebellion had actually broken out, and a Yellow Scarves chieftain, Cheng Yuanzhi, had invaded the region with a body of fifty thousand rebels.
Liu Yan bade Zhou Jing and the three brothers to go out to oppose them with the five hundred troops.
Liu Bei joyfully undertook to lead the van and marched to the foot of the Daxing Hills where they saw the rebels.
The rebels wore their hair flying about their shoulders, and their foreheads were bound with yellow scarves.
When the two armies had been drawn up opposite each other, Liu Bei rode to the front, Guan Yu to his left, Zhang Fei to his right. Flourishing his whip, Liu Bei began to hurl reproaches at the rebels, crying, “O malcontents!
Why not dismount and be bound?” Their leader Cheng Yuanzhi, full of rage, sent out one general, Deng Mao, to begin the battle.
At once rode forward Zhang Fei, his octane-serpent halberd poised to strike.
One thrust and Deng Mao rolled off his horse, pierced through the heart. At this Cheng Yuanzhi himself whipped up his steed and rode forth with sword raised ready to slay Zhang Fei.
But Guan Yu swung up his ponderous green-dragon saber and rode at Cheng Yuanzhi.
At the sight fear seized upon Cheng Yuanzhi, and before he could defend himself, the great saber fell, cutting him in halves.
Two heroes new to war's alarms, Ride boldly forth to try their arms.
Their doughty deeds three kingdoms tell, And poets sing how these befell.
Their leader fallen, the rebels threw away their weapons and fled. The official soldiers dashed in among them. Many thousands surrendered and the victory was complete. Thus this part of the rebellion was broken up.
On their return, Liu Yan personally met them and distributed rewards.
But the next day, letters came from Imperial Protector Gong Jing of Qingzhou saying that the rebels were laying siege to the chief city and it was near falling. Help was needed quickly. “I will go,” said Liu Bei as soon as he heard the news.
And he set out at once with his own soldiers, reinforced by a body of five thousand under Zhou Jing.
The rebels, seeing help coming, at once attacked most fiercely.
The relieving force being comparatively small could not prevail and retired some ten miles, where they made a camp.
“They are many and we but few,” said Liu Bei to his brothers.
“We can only beat them by superior strategy.” So they prepared an ambush. Guan Yu and Zhang Fei, each with a goodly party, went behind the hills, right and left, and there hid.
When the gongs beat they were to move out to support the main army. These preparations made, the drums rolled noisily for Liu Bei to advance. The rebels also came forward. But Liu Bei suddenly retired. Thinking this was their chance, the rebels pressed forward and were led over the hills. Then suddenly the gongs sounded for the ambush. Guan Yu and Zhang Fei poured out from right and left as Liu Bei faced around to meet the rebels.
Under three-side attack, the rebels lost heavily and fled to the walls of Qingzhou City.
But Imperial Protector Gong Jing led out an armed body to attack them, and the rebels were entirely defeated and many slain. Qingzhou was no longer in danger. Though fierce as tigers soldiers be, Battle are won by strategy.
A hero comes; he gains renown, Already destined for a crown.
After the celebrations in honor of victory were over, Commander Zhou Jing proposed to return to Youzhou.
But Liu Bei said, “We are informed that Imperial Commander Lu Zhi has been struggling with a horde of rebels led by Zhang Jue at Guangzong. Lu Zhi was once my teacher, and I want to go to help him.” So Liu Bei and Zhou Jing separated, and the three brothers with their troops made their way of Guangzong.
They found Lu Zhi's camp, were admitted to his presence, and declared the reason of their coming.
The Commander received them with great joy, and they remained with him while he made his plans.
At that time Zhang Jue's one hundred fifty thousand troops and Lu Zhi's fifty thousand troops were facing each other. Neither had had any success. Lu Zhi said to Liu Bei, “I am able to surround these rebels here.
But the other two brothers, Zhang Bao and Zhang Liang, are strongly entrenched opposite Huangfu Song and Zhu Jun at Yingchuan.
I will give you a thousand more troops, and with these you can go to find out what is happening, and we can then settle the moment for concerted attack.” So Liu Bei set off and marched as quickly as possible to Yingchuan.
At that time the imperial troops were attacking with success, and the rebels had retired upon Changshe. They had encamped among the thick grass.
Seeing this, Huangfu Song said to Zhu Jun, “The rebels are camping in the field. We can attack them by fire.” So the Imperial Commanders bade every man cut a bundle of dry grass and laid an ambush.
That night the wind blew a gale, and at the second watch they started a blaze.
At the same time Huangfu Song and Zhu Jun's troops attacked the rebels and set their camp on fire. The flames rose to the very heaven. The rebels were thrown into great confusion. There was no time to saddle horses or don armor; they fled in all directions. The battle continued until dawn.
Zhang Liang and Zhang Bao, with a group of flying rebels, found a way of escape.
But suddenly a troop of soldiers with crimson banners appeared to oppose them.
Their leader was a man of medium stature with small eyes and a long beard. He was Cao Cao, a Beijuo man, holding the rank of General of the Flying Cavalry.
His father was Cao Song, but he was not really a Cao. Cao Song had been born to the Xiahou family, but he had been brought up by Eunuch Cao Teng and had taken this family name.
As a young man Cao Cao had been fond of hunting and delighted in songs and dancing.
He was resourceful and full of guile. An uncle, seeing the young fellow so unsteady, used to get angry with him and told his father of his misdeeds. His father remonstrated with him.
But Cao Cao made equal to the occasion.
One day, seeing his uncle coming, he fell to the ground in a pretended fit.
The uncle alarmed ran to tell his father, who came, and there was the youth in most perfect health.
“But your uncle said you were in a fit; are you better?” said his father.
“I have never suffered from fits or any such illness,” said Cao Cao.
“But I have lost my uncle's affection, and he has deceived you.” Thereafter, whatever the uncle might say of his faults, his father paid no heed.
So the young man grew up licentious and uncontrolled.
A man of the time named Qiao Xuan said to Cao Cao, “Rebellion is at hand, and only a man of the greatest ability can succeed in restoring tranquillity.
That man is yourself.” And Ho Yo of Nanyang said of him, “The dynasty of Han is about to fall.
He who can restore peace is this man and only he.” Cao Cao went to inquire his future of a wise man of Runan named Xu Shao.
“What manner of man am I?” asked Cao Cao.
The seer made no reply, and again and again Cao Cao pressed the question.
Then Xu Shao replied, “In peace you are an able subject; in chaos you are a crafty hero!” Cao Cao greatly rejoiced to hear this.
Cao Cao graduated at twenty and earned a reputation of piety and integrity. He began his career in a county near Capital Luoyang.
In the four gates of the city he ruled, he hung up clubs of various sorts, and he would punish any breach of the law whatever the rank of the offender.
Now an uncle of Eunuch Jian Shuo was found one night in the streets with a sword and was arrested. In due course he was beaten.
Thereafter no one dared to offend again, and Cao Cao's name became heard.
Soon he became a magistrate of Dunqiu. At the outbreak of the Yellow Scarves, Cao Cao held the rank of General and was given command of five thousand horse and foot to help fight at Yingchuan. He just happened to fall in with the newly defeated rebels whom he cut to pieces.
Thousands were slain and endless banners and drums and horses were captured, together with huge sums of money.
However Zhang Bao and Zhang Liang got away; and after an interview with Huangfu Song, Cao Cao went in pursuit of them. Meanwhile Liu Bei and his brothers were hastening toward Yingchuan, when they heard the din of battle and saw flames rising high toward the sky. However, they arrived too late for the fighting.
They saw Huangfu Song and Zhu Jun to whom they told the intentions of Lu Zhi.
“The rebel power is quite broken here,” said the commanders, “but they will surely make for Guangzong to join Zhang Jue. You can do nothing better than hasten back.” The three brothers thus retraced their steps.
Half way along the road they met a party of soldiers escorting a prisoner in a cage-cart. When they drew near, they saw the prisoner was no other than the man they were going to help.
Hastily dismounting, Liu Bei asked what had happened.
Lu Zhi explained, “I had surrounded the rebels and was on the point of smashing them, when Zhang Jue employed some of his supernatural powers and prevented my victory.
The court sent down Eunuch Zhuo Feng to inquire into my failure, and that official demanded a bribe. I told him how hard pressed we were and asked him where, in the circumstances, I could find a gift for him.
He went away in wrath and reported that I was hiding behind my ramparts and would not give battle and that I disheartened my army.
So I was superseded by Dong Zhuo, and I have to go to the capital to answer the charge.” This story put Zhang Fei into a rage.
He was for slaying the escort and setting free Lu Zhi. But Liu Bei checked him.
“The government will take the proper course,” said Liu Bei. “You must not act hastily!” And the escort and the three brothers went two ways.
It was useless to continue on that road to Guangzong, so Guan Yu proposed to go back to Zhuo, and they retook the road.
Two days later they heard the thunder of battle behind some hills. Hastening to the top, they beheld the government soldiers suffering great loss, and they saw the countryside was full of Yellow Scarves. On the rebels' banners were the words “Zhang Jue the Lord of Heaven” written large. “We will attack this Zhang Jue!” said Liu Bei to his brothers, and they galloped out to join in the battle.
Zhang Jue had worsted Dong Zhuo and was following up his advantage. He was in hot pursuit when the three brothers dashed into his army, threw his ranks into confusion, and drove him back fifteen miles. Then the brothers returned with the rescued general to his camp.
“What offices have you?” asked Dong Zhuo, when he had leisure to speak to the brothers. “None,” replied they.
And Dong Zhuo treated them with disrespect. Liu Bei retired calmly, but Zhang Fei was furious.
“We have just rescued this menial in a bloody fight,” cried Zhang Fei, “and now he is rude to us!
Nothing but his death can slake my anger.” Zhang Fei stamped toward Dong Zhuo's tent, holding firmly a sharp sword.
As it was in olden time so it is today, The simple wight may merit well, Officialdom holds sway; Zhang Fei, the blunt and hasty, Where can you find his peer?
But slaying the ungrateful would Mean many deaths a year.
Dong Zhuo's fate will be unrolled in later chapters. CHAPTER 2.
Zhang Fei Whips The Government Officer; He Jin Plots To Kill The Eunuchs. Dong Zhuo was born in the far northwest at Lintao in Longxi. As the governor of Hedong, Dong Zhuo himself was arrogant and overbearing. But the day he had treated Liu Bei with contumely had been his last, had not Liu Bei and Guan Yu restrained their wrathful brother Zhang Fei.
“Remember he has the government commission;” said Liu Bei, “who are we to judge and slay?” “It is bitter to take orders from such a wretch; I would rather slay him!
You may stay here if you wish to, but I will seek some other place,” said Zhang Fei.
“We three are one in life and in death; there is no parting for us.
We will all go hence.” So spoke Liu Bei, and his brother was satisfied.
Wherefore all three set out and lost no time in traveling until they came to Zhu Jun, who received them well and accepted their aid in attacking Zhang Bao.
At this time Cao Cao had joined himself to Huangfu Song, and they were trying to destroy Zhang Liang, and there was a great battle at Quyang.
Zhang Bao was commanding some eighty thousand troops. The rebel had led his army to a strong position in the rear of the hills.
An attack being decided upon, Liu Bei was the van leader.
On the rebel side a general of Zhang Bao, Gao Sheng, came out to offer battle. Liu Bei sent Zhang Fei to smite Gao Sheng.
Out rode Zhang Fei at full speed, his spear ready set. After a few bouts Zhang Fei wounded Gao Sheng, who was unhorsed. At this Liu Bei signaled the main army to advance.
Then Zhang Bao, while still mounted, loosened his hair, grasped his sword, and uttered his incantations.
Thereupon began the wind to howl and the thunder to roll, while a dense black cloud from the heavens settled upon the field. And therein seemed to be horsemen and footmen innumerable, who swept to attack the imperial troops.
Fear came upon them, and Liu Bei led off his troops, but they were in disorder and returned defeated. Zhu Jun and Liu Bei considered the matter.
“Zhang Bao uses magic,” said Zhu Jun.
“Tomorrow, then, will I prepare counter magic in the shape of the blood of slaughtered swine and goats and dogs.
This blood shall be sprinkled upon their hosts from the precipices above by soldiers in ambush.
Thus shall we be able to break the power of their shamanic art.” So it was done. Guan Yu and Zhang Fei took each a thousand troops and hid them on the high cliffs behind the hills, and they had a plentiful supply of the blood of swine and goats and dogs and all manners of filthy things.
And so next day, when the rebels with fluttering banners and rolling drums came out to challenge, Liu Bei rode forth to meet them.
At the same moment that the armies met, again Zhang Bao began his magic and again the elements began to struggle together. Sand flew in clouds, pebbles were swept along the ground, black masses of vapor filled the sky, and rolling masses of foot and horse descended from on high.
Liu Bei turned, as before, to flee and the rebels rushed on.
But as they pressed through the hills, the trumpets blared, and the hidden soldiers exploded bombs, threw down filth and spattered blood.
The masses of soldiers and horses in the air fluttered to the earth as fragments of torn paper, the wind ceased to blow, the thunder subsided, the sand sank, and the pebbles lay still upon the ground.
Zhang Bao quickly saw his magic had been countered and turned to retire. Then he was attacked on the flanks by Guan Yu and Zhang Fei, and in rear by Liu Bei and Zhu Jun. The rebels were routed.
Liu Bei, seeing from afar the banner of “Zhang Bao The Lord of Earth,” galloped toward it but only succeeded in wounding Zhang Bao with an arrow in the left arm.
Wounded though he was, Zhang Bao got away into the city of Yangcheng, where he fortified himself and was besieged by Zhu Jun. Scouts, sent out to get news of Huangfu Song, reported:
“Commander Huangfu Song had been very successful, and Dong Zhuo had suffered many reverses. Therefore the court put Huangfu Song in the latter's place.
Zhang Jue had died before Huangfu Song's arrival.
Zhang Liang had added his brother's army to his own, but no headway could be made against Huangfu Song, whose army gained seven successive victories. And Zhang Liang was slain at Quyang.
Beside this, Zhang Jue's coffin was exhumed, the corpse beheaded, and the head, after exposure, was sent to Capital Luoyang.
The common crowd had surrendered.
For these services Huangfu Song was promoted to General of the Flying Cavalry and the Imperial Protector of Jizhou. “Huangfu Song did not forgotten his friends.
His first act after he had attained to power was to memorialize the Throne concerning the case of Lu Zhi, who was then restored to his former rank for his meritorious conducts.
Cao Cao also received advancement for his services and was preparing to go to Jinan to his new post.” Hearing these things Zhu Jun pressed harder yet upon Yangcheng, and the approaching break-up of the rebellion became evident.
Then one of Zhang Bao's officers, Yan Zheng, killed his leader and brought the head in token of submission.
Thus rebellion in that part of the country was stamped out, and Zhu Jun made his report to the government. However, the embers of the Yellow Scarves still smoldered.
Three other rebels, Zhao Hong, Han Zhong, and Sun Zhong, gathered some thirty thousand rebels and began to murder and rob and burn, calling themselves the avengers of Master Zhang Jue.
The court commanded the successful Zhu Jun to lead his veteran and successful troops to destroy the rebels.
He at once marched toward the city of Wancheng which the rebels were holding. When Zhu Jun arrived, Han Zhong went to oppose him.
Zhu Jun sent Liu Bei and his brothers to attack the southwest corner of the city.
Han Zhong at once led the best of his troops to defend the city.
Meanwhile Zhu Jun himself led two thousand of armored horsemen to attack the opposite corner.
The rebels, thinking the city being lost, abandoned the southwest and turned back into the city to help the defenders.
Liu Bei pressed hotly in their rear, and they were utterly routed.
They took refuge in the city which was then invested. When famine pressed upon the besieged, they sent a messenger to offer to surrender, but Zhu Jun refused the offer.
Said Liu Bei to Zhu Jun, “Seeing that the founder of the Han Dynasty, Liu Bang the Supreme Ancestor, could welcome the submissive and receive the favorable, why reject these?” “The conditions are different,” replied Zhu Jun.
“In those old days disorder was universal and the people had no fixed lord. Wherefore submission was welcomed and support rewarded to encourage people to come over.
Now the empire is united, and the Yellow Scarves are the only malcontents.
To receive their surrender is not to encourage the good.
To allow brigands, when successful, is to give way to every license, and to let them surrender when they fail is to encourage brigandage.
Your plan is not a good one.” Liu Bei replied, “Not to let brigands surrender is well. But the city is surrounded as by an iron barrel.
If the rebels' request be refused, they will be desperate and fight to the death, and we can hardly withstood a myriad of such men.
Moreover, in the city there are many times that number, all doomed to death.
Let us withdraw from one corner and only attack the opposite.
They will all assuredly flee and have no desire to fight. We shall take them.” Zhu Jun saw that the advice was good and followed it. As predicted the rebels ran out, led by Han Zhong.
The besiegers fell upon them as they fled, and Han Zhong was slain. The rebels scattered in all directions.
But the other two rebel chieftains, Zhao Hong and Sun Zhong, came with large reinforcements, and as they appeared very strong, the imperial soldiers retired, and the new body of rebels reentered Wancheng.
Zhu Jun encamped three miles from the city and prepared to attack.
Just then there arrived a body of horse and foot from the east.
At the lead was one general with a broad open face, a body as an alert tiger's, and a torso as a lofty bear's.
His name was Sun Jian. He was a native of Fuchun in the old state of Wu, a descendant of the famous Sun Zi the Strategist.
When he was seventeen, Sun Jian was with his father on the River Qiantang and saw a party of pirates, who had been plundering a merchant, dividing their booty on the river bank.
“We can capture these,” said he to his father.
So, gripping his sword, he ran boldly up the bank and cried out to this side and that as if he was calling his men to come on.
This made the pirates believe the soldiers were on them and they fled, leaving their booty behind them.
He actually killed one of the pirates.
In this way be became known and was recommended for office.
Then, in collaboration with the local officials, he raised a band of one thousand and helped to quell the rebellion of one Xu Chang who called himself the Sun Emperor and had ten thousand supporters. The rebel's son Xu Shao was also slain with his father.
For this Sun Jian was commended by Imperial Protector Zang Min in a memorial to the Throne, and he received further promotion to the post of magistrate of Yandu, then of Xuyi, and then of Xiapi.
When the Yellow Scarves rebellion began, Sun Jian gathered together the youths of his village, some of the merchant class, got a troop of one thousand five hundred of veteran soldiers and took the field. Now he had reached the fighting area.
Zhu Jun welcomed Sun Jian gladly and ordered him to attack the south gate of Wancheng. The north and the west gates were simultaneously attacked by Liu Bei and Zhu Jun, but the east gate was left free to give the rebels a chance of exit.
Sun Jian was the first to mount the wall and cut down more than twenty rebels with his own sword.
The rebels ran, but the leader Zhao Hong rode directly at Sun Jian with his spear ready to thrust.
Sun Jian leaped down from the wall, snatched away the spear and with it knocked Zhao Hong from the horse.
Then Sun Jian, mounting Zhao Hong's horse, rode hither and thither, slaying as he went. The rebels fled north. Meeting Liu Bei, they declined to fight and scattered.
But Liu Bei drew his bow, fitted an arrow, and shot their leader Sun Zhong, who fell to the ground.
The main army of Zhu Jun came up, and after tremendous slaughter, the rebels surrendered.
Thus was peace brought to the ten counties about the Nanyang area.
Zhu Jun returned to Capital Luoyang, was promoted to the General of the Flying Cavalry, and received the governorship of Henan. He did not forget those who had helped him to win victory.
Thus he reported the merits of Liu Bei and Sun Jian to the Throne.
Sun Jian, having influential friends and connections to support him, quickly got an appointment to a post of Commander of Changsha and went to assume the new office.
But Liu Bei, in spite of Zhu Jun's memorial, waited in vain for preferment, and the three brothers became very sad. Walking along one day in the capital, Liu Bei met a court official, Zhang Jun, to whom he related his services and told his sorrows.
Zhang Jun was much surprised at this neglect and one day at court spoke to the Emperor about it. Said he, “The Yellow Scarves rebelled because the eunuchs sold offices and bartered ranks. There was employment only for their friends, punishment only for their enemies. This led to rebellion.
Wherefore it would be well to slay the Ten Eunuchs and expose their heads and proclaim what had been done throughout the whole empire. Then reward the worthy.
Thereby the land would be wholly tranquil.” But the eunuchs fiercely opposed this and said Zhang Jun was insulting the Emperor, and the Emperor bade the guards thrust Zhang Jun out.
However, the eunuchs took counsel together and one said, “Surely some one who rendered some service against rebels resents being passed over.” So they caused a list of unimportant people to be prepared for preferment by and by.
Among them was Liu Bei, who received the post of magistrate of the county of Anxi, to which he proceeded without delay after disbanding his army and sending them home to their villages. He retained two dozens or so as escort.
The three brothers reached Anxi, and soon the administration of the county was so reformed and the rule so wise that in a month there was no law-breaking. The three brothers lived in harmony, eating at the same table and sleeping on the same couch.
But when Liu Bei was in public sessions or in company of others, Guan Yu and Zhang Fei would stand in attendance, were it even a whole day.
Four months after their arrival, there came out a general order for the reduction of the number of military officers holding civil posts, and Liu Bei began to fear that he would be among those thrown out.
In due course the inspecting official, Du Biao by name, arrived and was met at the boundary; but to the polite obeisance of Liu Bei, he made no return, save a wave of his whip as he sat on his horse.
This made Guan Yu and Zhang Fei furious; but worse was to follow.
When the inspector had arrived at his lodging, he took his seat on the dais, leaving Liu Bei standing below.
After a long time he addressed Liu Bei.
“Magistrate, what was your origin?” Liu Bei replied, “I am descended from Prince Faubus of Zhongshan.
Since my first fight with the Yellow Scarves rebels at Zhuo County, I have been in some thirty battles, wherein I gained some trifling merit.
My reward was this office.” “You lie about your descent, and your statement of services is false,” roared the inspector.
“Now the court has ordered the reduction of your sort of low class and corrupt officials.” Liu Bei muttered to himself and withdrew.
On his return to the magistracy, he took council with his secretaries.
“This pompous attitude only means the inspector wants a bribe,” said they.
“I have never wronged the people to the value of a single coin; then where is a bribe to come from?” Next day the inspector had the minor officials before him and forced them to bear witness that their master had oppressed the people.
Liu Bei time after time went to rebut this charge, but the doorkeepers drove him away and he could not enter. Now Zhang Fei had been all day drowning his sorrow in wine and had drunk far too much.
Calling for his horse he rode out past the lodging of the inspector, and at the gate saw a small crowd of white-haired people weeping bitterly. He asked why.
They said, “The inspector has compelled the underlings to bear false witness against our magistrate, with the desire to injure the virtuous Liu Bei.
We came to beg mercy for him but are not permitted to enter. Moreover, we have been beaten by the doorkeepers.” This provoked the irascible and half intoxicated Zhang Fei to fury.
His eyes opened wide until they became circles; he ground his teeth; in a moment he was off his steed, had forced his way past the scared doorkeepers into the building, and was in the rear apartments. There he saw Imperial Inspector Du Biao sitting on high with the official underlings in bonds at his feet.
“Oppressor of the people, robber!” cried Zhang Fei. “Do you know me?” But before the inspector could reply, Zhang Fei had had him by the hair and had dragged him down.
Another moment he was outside and firmly lashed to the hitching post in front of the building.
Then breaking off a switch from a willow tree, Zhang Fei gave his victim a severe thrashing, only staying his hand when the tenth switch was too short to strike with. Liu Bei was sitting alone, communing with his sorrow, when he heard a shouting before his door.
He asked what the matter was. They told him, “General Zhang Fei had bound somebody to a post and was thrashing him.” Hastily going outside, Liu Bei saw who the unhappy victim was and asked Zhang Fei the reason.
“If we do not beat this sort of wretch to death, what may we expect?” said Zhang Fei.
“Noble Sir, save me,” cried the inspector.
Now Liu Bei had always been kindly and gracious, wherefore he bade his brother release the officer and go his way.
Then Guan Yu came up saying, “Brother, after your magnificent services you only got this petty post, and even here you have been insulted by this fellow.
A thorn bush is no place for a phoenix.
Let us slay this fellow, leave here, and go home till we can evolve a bigger scheme.” Liu Bei contented himself with hanging the official seal about the inspector's neck, saying, “If I hear that you injure the people, I will assuredly kill you.
I now spare your life, and I return to you the seal.
We are going.” The inspector went to the governor of Dingzhou and complained, and orders were issued for the arrest of the brothers, but they got away to Daizhou and sought refuge with Liu Hui, who sheltered them because of Liu Bei's noble birth.
By this time the Ten Regular Attendants had everything in their hands, and they put to death all who did not stand in with them.
From every officer who had helped to put down the rebels they demanded presents; and if these were not forthcoming, he was removed from office.
Imperial Commanders Huangfu Song and Zhu Jun both fell victims to these intrigues and were deprived from offices, while on the other hand the eunuchs received the highest honors.
Thirteen eunuchs were ennobled, including Zhao Zhong who was added to the rank of General of the Flying Cavalry.
The government grew worse and worse, and every one was irritated.
Rebellions broke out in Changsha led by Ou Xing, and in Yuyang led by Zhang Ju and Zhang Chun .
Memorials were sent up in number as snow flakes in winter, but the Ten suppressed them all.
One day the Emperor was at a feast in one of the gardens with the Ten, when High Counselor Liu Tao suddenly appeared showing very great distress.
The Emperor asked what the matter was.
“Sire, how can you be feasting with these when the empire is at the last gasp?” said Liu Tao.
“All is well,” said the Emperor.
“Where is anything wrong?” Said Liu Tao, “Robbers swarm on all sides and plunder the cities.
And all is the fault of the Ten Eunuchs who sell offices and injure the people, oppress loyal officials and deceive their superiors.
All virtuous ones have left the services, and misfortune is before our very eyes.” At this the eunuchs pulled off their hats and threw themselves at their master's feet. “If Minister Liu Tao disapproves of us,” they said, “we are in danger.
We pray that our lives be spared and we may go to our farms. We yield our property to help defray military expenses.” And they wept bitterly.
The Emperor turned angrily to Liu Tao, saying, “You also have servants; why can't you bear with mine?” And thereupon the Emperor called to the guards to eject Liu Tao and put him to death.
Liu Tao cried aloud, “My death matters nothing.
The pity is that Han Dynasty, after four centuries of reign, is falling fast.” The guards hustled him away and were just about to carry out the Emperor's order when a minister stopped them, shouting, “Strike not!
Wait till I have spoken with His Majesty.” It was the Minister of the Interior, Chen Dan. He went in to the Emperor, to whom he said, “For what fault is Counselor Liu Tao to be put to death?” “He has vilified my servants; and has insulted me,” said the Emperor.
“All the empire would eat the flesh of the eunuchs if they could, and yet, Sire, you respect them as if they were your parents. They have no merit, but they are created nobles.
Moreover, Feng Xu was in league with the Yellow Scarves. Unless Your Majesty looks to it, the state will crumble!” “There was no proof against Feng Xu,” replied the Emperor.
“About the Ten Eunuchs, are there none faithful among them?” Chen Dan beat his forehead on the steps of the throne and did not desist from remonstrance.
Then the Emperor grew angry and commanded his removal and imprisonment with Liu Tao.
That night Liu Tao and Chen Dan were murdered.
Then the eunuchs sent a forged edict to Sun Jian making him Governor of Changsha, with orders to suppress the rebellion of Ou Xing. In less than two months Sun Jian reported the county all tranquil. For this he was created Lord of Wucheng.
Further, Liu Yu was made Imperial Protector of Youzhou to move against Yuyang and suppress Zhang Ju and Zhang Chun.
Liu Hui of Daizhou recommended Liu Bei to Liu Yu. Liu Yu welcomed Liu Bei and gave him rank of commander and sent him against the rebels. He fought with and worsted them and entirely broke their spirit. Zhang Chun was cruel, and his leaders turned against him.
One of his officers then slew him and brought in his head, after which the others submitted.
The other leader Zhang Ju saw that all was lost and killed himself.
Yuyang being now tranquil, Liu Bei's services were reported to the Throne, and he received full pardon for the insult to the imperial inspector.
He also became Magistrate Deputy of Micheng. Then Gongsun Zan praised Liu Bei's former services, and he was promoted to Magistrate of Pingyuan.
This place was very prosperous, and Liu Bei recovered something of his old manner before the days of adversity.
Liu Yu also received preferment and was promoted to Grand Commander.
In the summer of the six year of Central Stability , Emperor Ling became seriously ill and summoned He Jin into the palace to arrange for the future. He Jin had sprung from a humble family of butchers, but his sister had become a concubine of rank and borne a son to the Emperor, named Bian Liu.
After this she became Empress He, and He Jin became the powerful Imperial Guardian and Regent Marshal.
The Emperor had also greatly loved a beautiful girl, Lady Wang, who had borne him a son named Liu Xian.
Empress He had poisoned Lady Wang from jealousy, and the baby had been given into the care of Empress Dong, who was the mother of Emperor Ling.
Lady Dong was the wife of Liu Chang, Lord of Jiedu.
As time went on and the Emperor Huan had no son of his own, he adopted the son of Liu Chang, who succeeded as the Emperor Ling.
After his accession, Emperor Ling had taken his own mother into the palace to live and had conferred upon her the title of Empress Dowager.
Empress Dong had always tried to persuade her son to name Liu Xian as the Heir Apparent, and in fact the Emperor greatly loved the boy and was disposed to do as his mother desired.
When he fell ill, one of the eunuchs, Jian Shuo, said, “If Liu Xian is to succeed, He Jin must be killed to prevent countermoves.” The Emperor saw this too and commanded Imperial Guardian He Jin to come to him.
But at the very gates of the palace, He Jin was warned of his danger by Commander Pan Yin who said, “This must be a trap of Jian Shuo to destroy you.” He Jin rushed back to his quarters and called many of the ministers to his side, and they met to consider how to put the eunuchs to death.
At this assembly a man spoke against the plot, “The influence of the eunuchs dates back half a century and has spread like a noxious weed in all directions. How can we hope to destroy it?
Above all keep this plot secret or you will be exterminated.” He Jin eyed down and saw General of Military Standards Cao Cao.
He Jin was very angry at this speech and cried, “What do inferiors like you know of the ways of government?” And in the midst of the confusion Pan Yin came to say:
“The Emperor is no more. The eunuchs have decided to keep the death a secret and forge a command to the Imperial Guardian to come into the palace to settle the succession.
Meanwhile to prevent trouble they have inscribed the name of Liu Xian on the roll.” And as Pan Yin finished speaking, the edict arrived.
“The matter for the moment is to set up the rightful heir,” said Cao Cao.
“The other affairs can wait.” “Who dares to join me in supporting the rightful heir—Prince Bian Liu?” asked He Jin, the Imperial Guardian.
At once one stood forward saying, “Give me five thousand veterans, and we will break into the palace, set up the true heir, slay the eunuchs, and sweep clean the government.
Then peace will come to the empire.” The energetic speaker was Yuan Shao, son of the former Minister of the Interior Yuan Feng and nephew of Minister Yuan Wei. Yuan Shao then held the rank of Imperial Commander.
He Jin mustered five thousand royal guards.
Yuan Shao put on complete armor and took command.
He Jin, supported by He Yu, Xun You, Zheng Tai, and more than thirty other ministers and high-rank officials, went into the palace; and in the hall where lay the coffin of the late Emperor they placed Bian Liu on the throne.
After the ceremony was over and all had bowed before the new Emperor, Yuan Shao went in to arrest Eunuch Jian Shuo.
Jian Shuo in terror fled into the palace garden and hid among the shrubs, where he was discovered and murdered by Guo Sheng, one of the Ten Eunuchs.
The guards under Jian Shuo's command all surrendered. Yuan Shao said, “Their gangs have broken; the most opportune moment is now to slay all the eunuchs.” But Zhang Rang and the eunuchs of the Ten scented the danger and rushed to see Empress He.
They said, “The originator of the plan to injure your brother was Jian Shuo; only he was concerned and no other.
Now the Imperial Guardian, on Yuan Shao's advice, wishes to slay every one of us.
We implore your pity, O Your Majesty.” “Fear not,” said Empress He, whose son had just become Emperor, “I will protect you.” She sent for her brother, and said, “You and I are of lowly origin, and we owe our good fortune to the eunuchs.
The misguided Jian Shuo is now dead, and need you really put all the others to death as Yuan Shao advises?” And He Jin obeyed her wish. He explained to his party, saying, “The real offender, Jian Shuo, has met his fate, and his clan will be punished.
But we need not exterminate the whole party nor injure his colleagues.” “Slay them, root and branch,” cried Yuan Shao, “or they will ruin you!” “I have decided;” said He Jin, coldly, “say no more.” Within a few days He Jin became Chair of the Secretariat, and his associates received high offices.
Now Empress Dong summoned the eunuch Zhang Rang and his party to a council. Said she, “It was I who first brought forward the sister of He Jin.
Today her son is on the throne, and all the officials are her friends, and her influence is enormous.
What can we do?” Zhang Rang replied, “Your Highness should administer the state from 'behind the veil.' create the late Emperor's son Liu Xian a prince; give your brother, the Imperial Uncle Dong Chong, a high rank, and place him over the army; and use us.
That will do it.” Empress Dong approved.
Next day she held a court and issued an edict in the sense proposed. She made Liu Xian Prince of Chenliu and Dong Chong General of the Flying Cavalry, and she allowed the eunuchs again to participate state affairs.
When Empress He saw this, she prepared a banquet to which she invited her rival Empress Dong.
In the middle of the feast, when all were well warmed with wine, Empress He rose and offered a cup to her guest saying, “It is not fitting that we two should meddle in state affairs.
In the beginning of the Han Dynasty, when Empress Lu laid hands upon the government, all her clans were put to death.
We ought to remain content, immured in our palaces, and leave state affairs to the state officials.
That would be well for the country, and I trust you will act thus.” But Empress Dong only got angry, saying, “You poisoned Lady Wang out of jealousy.
Now, relying upon the fact that your son sits on the throne and that your brother is powerful, you speak these wild words.
I will command that your brother be beheaded, and that can be done as easily as I turn my hand.” Empress He in her turn waxed wroth and said, “I tried to persuade you with fair words; why get so angry?” “You low born daughter of a butcher, what do you know of offices?” cried Empress Dong. And the quarrel waxed hot. The eunuchs persuaded the ladies to retire.
But in the night Empress He summoned her brother into the palace and told him what had occurred. He went out and took counsel with the principal officers of state.
Next morning a court was held and a memorial was presented, saying:
“Empress Dong, being the foster mother of Liu Xian, Prince of Chenliu, a regional prince—only a collateral—cannot properly occupy any part of the Palace. She is to be removed into her original fief of Hejian and is to depart immediately.” And while they sent an escort to remove Empress Dong, a strong guard was placed about the Imperial Uncle Dong Chong's dwelling.
They took away his seal of office and he, knowing this was the end, killed himself in his private apartments.
His dependents, who wailed his death, were driven off by the guards.
The eunuchs Zhang Rang and Duan Gui, having lost their patroness, sent large gifts to He Jin's younger brother, He Miao, and his mother, Lady Wuyang, and thus got them to put in a good word to Empress He so as to gain her protection. And so they gained favor once more at court.
In the sixth month of that year, the secret emissaries of He Jin poisoned Empress Dong in her residence in the country. Her remains were brought to the capital and buried in Wen Tombs.
He Jin feigned illness and did not attend the funeral.
Commander Yuan Shao went one day to see He Jin, saying, “The two eunuchs, Zhang Rang and Duan Gui, are spreading the report outside that you has caused the death of the late empress and is aiming at the throne.
This is an excuse for you to destroy them.
Do not spare them this time, or you will pay like Dou Wu and Chen Fan, who in the previous reign missed their chance because the secret had not been kept, and they paid by their own deaths.
Now you and your brother have many commanders and officers behind, so that the destruction of the eunuchs can be but an ease.
It is a heaven-sent opportunity.
Delay no further!” But He Jin replied, “Let me think it over.” He Jin's servants overheard the discussion and secretly informed the intended victims, who sent further gifts to the younger brother He Miao.
Corrupted by these, he went in to speak with his sister Empress He and said, “The General is the chief support of the new Emperor, yet he is not gracious and merciful but thinks wholly of slaughter.
If he slays the eunuchs without cause, it may bring about revolution.” Soon after He Jin entered and told her of his design to put the eunuchs to death.
She argued with him, “Those officials look after palace affairs and are old servants.
To kill the old servants just after the death of their master would appear disrespectful to the dynasty's ancestral temple.” And as He Jin was of a vacillating mind, he murmured assent and left her. “What about it?” said Yuan Shao on meeting him.
“She will not consent; what can be done?” “Call up an army and slay them; it is imperative. Never mind her consent.” “That is an excellent plan,” said He Jin.
And he sent orders all round to march soldiers to the capital.
But Counselor Chen Lin objected, “Nay; do not act blindly.
The proverb says 'To cover the eyes and snatch at swallows is to fool oneself.' If in so small a matter you cannot attain your wish with covered eyes, what of great affairs?
Now by virtue of the imperial prestige and with the army under your hand you may do as you please. To use such enormous powers against the eunuchs would resemble lighting up a furnace to burn a hair.
But act promptly; use your powers and smite at once, and all the empire will be with you.
But to summon forces to the capital, to gather many bold persons into one spot, each with one's own schemes, is to turn our weapons against our own person, to place ourselves in the power of another.
Nothing but failure can come of it, nothing but confusion.” “The view of a mere book-worm,” said He Jin with a smile.
Then one of those about He Jin suddenly clapped his hands, laughing, “Solving this issue is as easy as turning over one's hand!
Why so much talk?” The speaker was Cao Cao.
Wouldst thou withdraw wicked people from thy prince's side Then seek counsel of the wise people of the state.
What Cao Cao said will be disclosed in later chapters. CHAPTER 3.
In Wenming Garden, Dong Zhuo Denounces Ding Yuan; With Red-Hare, Li Su Bribes Lu Bu. What Cao Cao said was this:
“The eunuch evil is of very old standing, but the real cause of the present trouble is in the improper influence allowed them by the emperors and the misplaced favoritism they have enjoyed.
But a gaoler would be ample force to employ against this kind of evil, and getting rid of the main culprits is quite enough. Why increase confusion by summoning troops from the regions?
Any desire to slay all of them will speedily become known, and the plan will fail.” “Then, Cao Cao, you have some scheme of your own to further,” said He Jin with a sneer.
Cao Cao left the meeting, proclaiming, “The one throwing the world into chaos is He Jin!” Then He Jin sent swift, secret letters far and wide to several bases. It must be recalled that Dong Zhuo had failed in his attempt to destroy the Yellow Scarves rebellion.
He would have been punished if he had not bribed the Ten Eunuchs heavily for their protection. Later, he obtained the rank of Imperial Protector in the westernmost region of Xizhou and an army of two hundred thousand troops. But Dong Zhuo was treacherous and disloyal at heart.
So when he received the summons to the capital, he rejoiced greatly and lost no time in obeying it.
He left a son-in-law, Commander Niu Fu, to look after the affairs of Xizhou and set out for Luoyang.
Dong Zhuo took with him a huge army and four generals—Li Jue, Guo Si, Zhang Ji, and Fan Chou.
Dong Zhuo's adviser and son-in-law, Li Ru, said, “Though a formal summons has come, there are many obscurities in it.
It would be well to send up a memorial stating plainly our aims and intentions.
Then we can proceed.” So Dong Zhuo composed something like this:
“Thy servant knows that the continual rebellions owe their origin to the eunuchs who act counter to all recognized precepts.
Now to stop the ebullition of a pot the best way is to withdraw the fire; to cut out an abscess, though painful, is better than to nourish the evil.
I have dared to undertake a military advance on the capital, with thy permission, and now pray that Zhang Rang and the other eunuchs be removed for the happiness of the dynasty and of the empire.” He Jin read this memorial and showed it to his partisans.
Then said Minister Zheng Tai, “A fierce wild beast; if he comes, his prey will be humans!” He Jin replied, “You are too timorous; you are unequal to great schemes.” But Lu Zhi also said, “Long have I known this man; in appearance innocent, he is a very wolf at heart.
Let him in, and calamity enters with him.
Stop him, do not let him come, and thus will you avoid chaos.” He Jin was obstinate, and both Zheng Tai and Lu Zhi gave up their posts and retired, as did more than half the ministers of state, while He Jin sent a warm welcome to Dong Zhuo, who soon camped at Shengchi Lake and stationed there without further action.
The eunuchs knew this move was directed against them and recognized that their only chance for safety was to strike the first blow.
So they first hid a band of fifty armed ruffians at the Gate of Grand Virtue in the Palace of Happiness, then they went in to see Empress He. They said, “The General, feigning to act under command, has called up armies to the capital to destroy us.
We pray you, Your Majesty, pity and save us!” “Go to the General and confess your faults,” said the Empress.
“If we did, then should we be cut to mincemeat.
Rather summon the General into your presence and command him to cease.
If he will not, then we pray but die in your presence.” The Empress issued the requisite command, and He Jin was just going to her when Counselor Chen Lin advised him not to enter, saying, “The eunuchs are certainly behind the order and mean your harm.” But He Jin could only see the command of the Empress and was blind to all else.
“Our plot is no longer a secret;” said Yuan Shao, “still you may go if you are ready to fight your way in.” “Get the eunuchs out first,” said Cao Cao. “Silly children!” said He Jin.
“What can they do against the man who holds the forces of the empire in the palm of his hand?” Yuan Shao said, “If you will go, then we will come as a guard, just as a precaution.” Whereupon both Yuan Shao and Cao Cao chose five hundred best men under their command, at whose head they placed a brother of Yuan Shao, named Yuan Shu.
Yuan Shu, clad in mail, drew up his troops outside the palace entrance, while Yuan Shao and Cao Cao, holding swords, went as escort.
When He Jin neared the palace, the eunuchs said, “The orders are to admit the Imperial Guardian and none other.” So the escort was detained outside.
He Jin went in proudly.
At the Gate of Grand Virtue, he was met by Zhang Rang and Duan Gui, and their followers quickly closed in around him. He Jin began to feel alarmed.
Then Zhang Rang in a harsh voice began to revile him. “What crime had Empress Dong committed that she should have been put to death?
And when the Mother of the Country was buried, who feigned sickness and did not attend?
We raised you and your paltry, huckstering family to all the dignity and wealth you have, and this is your gratitude! You would slay us.
You call us sordid and dirty; who is the cleaner?” He Jin was panic stricken and looked about for a way to escape, but the eunuchs closed him in, and then the assassins appeared and cut He Jin into halves.
Closing the days of the Hans, and the years of their rule were near spent, Stupid and tactless was He Jin, yet stood he highest in office; Many were they who advised him, but he was deaf as he heard not; Wherefore fell he a victim under the swords of the eunuchs. So He Jin died. Yuan Shao and Cao Cao waited long.
By and by, impatient at the delay, they called through the gate, “Thy carriage waits, O General!” For reply the head of He Jin was flung over the wall. A decree was proclaimed: “He Jin has contemplated treachery and therefore has been slain.
It pardons his adherents.” Yuan Shao shouted, “The eunuchs have slain the High Minister.
Let those who will slay this wicked party come and help me!” Then one of He Jin's generals, Wu Kuang, set fire to the gate.
Yuan Shu at the head of his guards burst in and fell to slaying the eunuchs without regard to age or rank.
Yuan Shao and Cao Cao broke into the inner part of the palace.
Four of the eunuchs—Zhao Zhong, Cheng Kuang, Xia Yun, and Guo Sheng—fled to the Blue Flower Lodge where they were hacked to pieces.
Fire raged, destroying the buildings.
Four of the Ten Regular Attendants—Zhang Rang, Duan Gui, Cao Jie, and Hou Lan—led by Zhang Rang carried off the Empress, Emperor Bian, and Prince Xian of Chenliu toward the north palace.
Lu Zhi, since he had resigned office, was at home, but hearing of the revolution in the Palace he donned his armor, took his spear, and prepared to fight.
He saw the eunuch Duan Gui hurrying the Empress along and called out, “You rebel, how dare you abduct the Empress?” The eunuch fled.
The Empress leaped out of a window and was taken to a place of safety.
General Wu Kuang burst into one of the inner halls where he found He Miao, sword in hand.
“You also were in the plot to slay your own brother,” cried Wu Kuang.
“You shall die with the others.” “Let us kill the plotter against his elder brother!” cried many.
He Miao looked around; his enemies hemmed him in on every side.
He was hacked to pieces.
Yuan Shu bade his soldiers scatter and seek out all the families of the eunuchs, sparing none. In that slaughter many beardless men were killed in error.
Cao Cao set himself to extinguish the fires. He then begged Empress He to undertake the direction of affairs, and soldiers were sent to pursue Zhang Rang and rescue the young Emperor and the young Prince of Chenliu.
Meanwhile, Zhang Rang and Duan Gui had hustled away the Emperor and the Prince. They burst through the smoke and fire and traveled without stopping till they reached the Beimang Hills. It was then the third watch. They heard a great shouting behind them and saw soldiers in pursuit.
Their leader, Min Gong, a commander in Henan, was shouting “Traitors, stop, stop!” Zhang Rang, seeing that he was lost, jumped into the river, where he was drowned.
The two boys ignorant of the meaning of all this confusion and terrified out of their senses, dared not utter a cry; they crept in among the rank grass on the river bank and hid.
The soldiers scattered in all directions but failed to find them.
So they remained till the fourth watch, shivering with cold from the drenching dew and very hungry.
They lay down in the thick grass and wept in each other's arms, silently, lest any one should discover them.
“This is no a place to stay in;” said Prince Xian, “we must find some way out.” So the two children knotted their clothes together and managed to crawl up the bank.
They were in a thicket of thorn bushes, and it was quite dark. They could not see any path.
They were in despair when, all at once, millions of fireflies sprang up all about them and circled in the air in front of the Emperor.
“God is helping us,” said Prince Xian.
They followed whither the fireflies led and gradually got into a road.
They walked till their feet were too sore to go further, when, seeing a heap of straw near the road, they crept to it and lay down.
This heap of straw was close to a farm house.
In the night, as the farmer was sleeping, he saw in a vision two bright red suns drop behind his dwelling. Alarmed by the portent, he hastily dressed and went forth to look about him. Then he saw a bright light shooting up from a heap of straw. He hastened thither and then saw two youths lying behind it.
“To what household do you belong, young gentlemen?” asked the farmer.
The Emperor was too frightened to reply, but his companion said, “He is the Emperor. There was a revolution in the palace, and we ran away.
I am his brother Prince of Chenliu.” The farmer bowed again and again and said, “My name is Sui Lie. My brother Sui Yi is the former minister of the interior. My brother was disgusted with the behavior of the eunuchs and so resigned and hid away here.” The two lads were taken into the farm, and their host on his knees served them with refreshment.
It has been said that Min Gong had gone in pursuit of Eunuch Duan Gui.
By and by Min Gong overtook Duan Gui and cried, “Where is the Emperor?” “He disappeared.
I do not know where he is.” Min Gong slew Duan Gui and hung the bleeding head on his horse's neck. Then he sent his troops searching in all directions, and he rode off by himself on the same quest. Presently he came to the farm.
Sui Lie, seeing what hung on his horse's neck, questioned him and, satisfied with his story, led him to the Emperor. The meeting was affecting; all were moved to tears.
“The state cannot be without its ruler,” said Min Gong.
“I pray Your Majesty return to the city.” At the farm they had but one sorry nag and this they saddled for the Emperor.
The young Prince was taken on Min Gong's charger. And thus they left the farm.
Not beyond one mile from the farm, they fell in with other officials and several hundred guards and soldiers made up an imposing cavalcade. In the cavalcade were Wang Yun, Minister of the Interior; Yang Biao, Regent Marshal; Chunyu Qiong, Commander of the Left Army; Zhao Meng, Commander of the Right Army; Bao Xin, Commander of the Rear Army; and Yuan Shao, Commander of the Central Army.
Tears were shed freely as the ministers met their Emperor.
A man was sent on in front to the capital there to expose the head of Eunuch Duan Gui. As soon as they could, they placed the Emperor on a better steed and the young Prince had a horse to himself. Thus the Emperor returned to Luoyang, and so it happened after all as the street children's ditty ran:
Though the emperor doesn't rule, though the prince no office fills, Yet a brilliant cavalcade comes along from Beimang Hills.
The cavalcade had not proceeded far when they saw coming towards them a large body of soldiers with fluttering banners hiding the sun and raising a huge cloud of dust.
The officials turned pale, and the Emperor was greatly alarmed. Yuan Shao rode out in advance.
“Who are you?” said Yuan Shao.
From under the shade of an embroidered banner rode out a general, saying, “Do you have the Emperor?” The Emperor was too panic stricken to respond, but the Prince of Chenliu rode to the front and cried, “Who are you?” “Dong Zhuo, Imperial Protector of Xizhou.” “Have you come to protect the Chariot or to steal it?” said Prince Xian.
“I have come to protect,” said Dong Zhuo.
“If that is so, the Emperor is here; why do you not dismount?” Dong Zhuo hastily dismounted and made obeisance on the left of the road. Then Prince Xian spoke graciously to him.
From first to last the Prince had carried himself most perfectly so that Dong Zhuo in his heart admired his behavior, and then arose the first desire to set aside the Emperor in favor of the Prince of Chenliu.
They reached the Palace the same day, and there was an affecting interview with Empress He.
But when they had restored order in the palace, the Imperial Hereditary Seal, the special seal of the Emperor, was missing.
Dong Zhuo camped without the walls, but every day he was to be seen in the streets with an escort of mailed soldiers so that the common people were in a state of constant trepidation.
He also went in and out of the Palace careless of all the rules of propriety.
Imperial Commander Bao Xin spoke of Dong Zhuo's behavior to Yuan Shao, saying, “This man harbors some evil design and should be removed.” “Nothing can he done till the government is more settled,” said Yuan Shao.
Then Bao Xin saw Minister of the Interior Wang Yun and asked what he thought.
“Let us talk it over,” was the reply.
Bao Xin said no more but he left the capital and retired to the Taishan Mountains.
Dong Zhuo induced the soldiers of the two brothers He Jin and He Miao to join his command, and privately spoke to his adviser Li Ru about deposing the Emperor in favor of the Prince of Chenliu. “The government is really without a head; there can be no better time than this to carry out your plan. Delay will spoil all.
Tomorrow assemble the officials in the Wenming Garden and address them on the subject.
Put all opponents to death, and your prestige is settled.” So spoke Li Ru and the words pleased Dong Zhuo mightily.
So the next day Dong Zhuo spread a feast and invited many guests.
As all the officers went in terror of him, no one dared be absent.
Dong Zhuo himself rode up to the garden last of all and took his place with his sword girded on.
When the wine had gone round several times, Dong Zhuo stopped the service and the music and began to speak. “I have something to say; listen quietly all of you.” All turned towards him.
“The emperor is lord of all; and if he lacks dignity and behaves in an unseemly manner, he is no fitting inheritor of the ancestral prerogatives.
He who is now on the throne is a weakling, inferior to the Prince of Chenliu in intelligence and love of learning.
The Prince is in every way fitted for the throne. I desire to depose the Emperor and set up the Prince in his place.
What think you?” The assembly listened in perfect silence, none daring at first to utter a word of dissent.
But one dared; for suddenly a guest stood up in his place, smote the table and cried.
Who are you that you dare utter such bold words?
The Emperor is the son of the lawful consort and has done no wrong. Why then should he be deposed?
Are you a rebel?” The speaker was Ding Yuan, Imperial Protector of Jingzhou.
Dong Zhuo glared at Ding Yuan, roaring, “There is life for those who are with me, death for those against.” Dong Zhuo drew his sword and made for the objector.
But the watchful Li Ru had noticed standing behind Ding Yuan a particularly dangerous looking henchman of his, who was now handling his halberd threateningly, and whose eyes were blazing with anger.
So Li Ru hastily interposed, saying, “But this is the banquet chamber, and state affairs should be left outside.
The matters can be fully discussed tomorrow.” His fellow guests persuaded Ding Yuan to leave, and after his departure Dong Zhuo said, “Is what I said just and reasonable?” “You are mistaken, Illustrious Sir,” said Lu Zhi. “Of old Emperor Tai Jia of the Shang Dynasty was unenlightened.
Wherefore the sage Minister Yi Yin immured him in the Tung Palace till he reformed.
Later Prince Changyi ascended the throne, and in twenty-seven days he committed more than three thousand categorical faults. Wherefore Regent Marshal Huo Guang declared in the ancestral temple that Prince Changyi was deposed.
Our present Emperor is young, but he is intelligent, benevolent, and wise. He has not committed a single fault.
You, Sir, are an imperial protector of a frontier region and not a metropolitan official and have had no experience in state administration.
Neither have you the pure intentions of Yi Yin and Huo Guang which qualified their actions.
Without that justification such an act is presumption.” Dong Zhuo angrily drew his sword to slay the bold Lu Zhi, but two other officials remonstrated.
“Minister Lu Zhi is the cynosure of the whole country, and his violent death would stir the hearts of all humans,” said Court Counselors Cai Yong and Peng Bo.
Dong Zhuo then stayed his hand.
Then said Wang Yun, “A great question like the deposition and substitution of emperors is not one to be decided after a wine party. Let it be put off till another time.” So the guests dispersed.
Dong Zhuo stood at the gate with drawn sword watching them depart. Standing thus, Dong Zhuo noticed a spearman galloping to and fro on a fiery steed and asked Li Ru who that was.
“That is Lu Bu, the adopted son of Ding Yuan.
You must keep out of his way, my lord.” Dong Zhuo went inside the gate so that he could not be seen.
But next day a man reported to him that Ding Yuan had come out of the city with a small army and was challenging to a battle.
Dong Zhuo, with his army, went forth to accept the challenge.
And the two armies were drawn up in proper array. Lu Bu was a conspicuous figure in the forefront. His hair was arranged under a handsome headdress of gold, and he had donned a embroidered thousand-flower fighting robe, a pheasant-tailed helmet, and breast plate, and round his waist was a gleaming jade belt with a lion's head clasp. With spear set he rode close behind his master Ding Yuan. Ding Yuan, riding forth, pointing his finger at Dong Zhuo, began to revile him.
“Unhappy indeed was this state when the eunuchs became so powerful that the people were as if trodden into the mire under their feet. Now you, devoid of the least merit, dare to talk of deposing the rightful emperor and setting up another.
This is to desire rebellion and no less.” Dong Zhuo could not reply for Lu Bu, eager for the fight, rode straight at him.
Dong Zhuo fled and Ding Yuan's army came on.
The battle went in Ding Yuan's favor, and the beaten troops retired ten miles and made another camp. Here Dong Zhuo called his officers to a council.
“This Lu Bu is a marvel,” said Dong Zhuo.
“If he were only on my side, I would defy the whole world.” At this a man advanced saying, “Be content, O my lord!
I am a fellow villager of his and know him well, his bravery, his prowess, his cupidity, and his unscrupulousness.
With this little, blarneying tongue of mine, I can persuade him to put up his hands and come over to your side.” Dong Zhuo was delighted and gazed admiringly at the speaker.
It was Li Su, a general in the Imperial Tiger Army.
“What arguments will you use with him?” asked Dong Zhuo.
“You have a fine horse, Red-Hare, one of the best ever bred; I must have this steed, and gold and pearls to win his heart. Then will I go and persuade him.
He will certainly abandon Ding Yuan's service for yours.” “What think you?” said Dong Zhuo to his adviser Li Ru.
“One cannot grudge a horse to win an empire,” was the reply.
So they grave Li Su what he demanded—a thousand ounces of gold, ten strings of beautiful pearls, a jeweled belt, and Red-Hare—and these accompanied Li Su on his visit to his fellow villager.
Li Su reached the camp and said to the guard, “Please tell General Lu Bu that a very old friend has come to visit him.” He was admitted forthwith.
“Worthy brother, have you been well since we last met?” greeted Li Su while bowing.
“How long it is since we last saw each other!” replied Lu Bu, bowing in return.
“And where are you now?” “I am a general in the Imperial Tiger Army.
When I learned you were a strong supporter of the Throne, I could not say how I rejoiced.
I have come now to present to you a really fine horse, a five-hundred-mile-a-day horse, one that crosses rivers and goes up mountains as if they were the level plain. Its name is Red-Hare.
It will be a fitting aid to your valor.” Lu Bu bade his guards lead out the horse.
It was of a uniform color like glowing sun red; not a hair of another color.
It measured ten spans from head to tail and from hoof to neck eight spans.
When it neighed, the sound filled the empyrean and shook the ocean.
Mark ye the steed swift and tireless, see the dust, spurned by his hoofs, rising in clouds; Now it swims the river, anon climbs the hill, rending the purple mist asunder; Scornful it breaks the rein, shakes from its head the jeweled bridle; It is as a fiery dragon descending from the highest heaven.
Lu Bu was delighted with the horse and said, “What return can I hope to make for such a creature?” “What return can I hope for?
I came to you out of a sense of what is right,” replied Li Su.
Wine was brought in and they drank.
“We have seen very little of each other, but I am constantly meeting your honorable father,” said Li Su.
“You are drunk,” said Lu Bu.
“My father has been dead for years.” “Not so; I spoke of Ding Yuan, the man of the day.” Lu Bu started.
“Yes, I am with him but only because I can do no better.” “Sir, your talent is higher than the heavens, deeper than the seas. Who in all the world does not bow before your name?
Fame and riches and honors are yours for the taking.
And you say you can do no better than remain a subordinate!” “If I could only find a master to serve!” said Lu Bu.
“The clever bird chooses the branch whereon to perch; the wise servant selects the master to serve.
Seize the chance when it comes, for repentance ever comes too late.” “Now you are in the government.
Who think you is really the bravest of all?”, asked Lu Bu.
“I despise the whole lot except Dong Zhuo. He is one who respects wisdom and reveres scholarship; he is discriminating in his rewards and punishments.
Surely he is destined to be a really great man.” Lu Bu said, “I wish that I could serve him, but there is no way, I fear.” Then Li Su produced his pearls and gold and the jeweled belt and laid them out before his host.
“What is this? What does it mean?” said Lu Bu. “Send away the attendants,” requested Li Su.
And he went on, “Dong Zhuo has long respected your valor and sent these by my hand.
Red-Hare was also from him.” “But, if he loves me like this, what can I do in return?” Li Su said, “If a stupid fellow like me can be a general in the Imperial Tiger Army, it is impossible to say what honors await you.” “I am sorry I can offer him no service worth mentioning.” Li Su said, “There is one service you can do, and an extremely easy one to perform; but you would not render that.” Lu Bu pondered long in silence, then he said, “I might slay Ding Yuan and bring over his soldiers to Dong Zhuo's side; what think you of that?” “If you would do that, there could be no greater service.
But such a thing must be done quickly.” And Lu Bu promised his friend that he would do the deed and come over on the morrow. So Li Su took his leave.
That very night, at the second watch, Lu Bu entered, sword in hand, into his master's tent. He found Ding Yuan reading by the light of a solitary candle.
Seeing who came in, Ding Yuan said, “My son, what is afoot?” “I am a bold hero,” said Lu Bu.
“Don't you think I am willing to be a son of yours.” “Why this change, Lu Bu?” As a reply Lu Bu made one cut, and Ding Yuan's head fell to the earth.
Then Lu Bu called the attendants and said, “He was an unjust man and I have slain him.
Let those who back me stay; the others may depart.” Most ran away.
Next day, with the head of the murdered man as his gift, Lu Bu betook himself to Li Su, who led him to Dong Zhuo.
Dong Zhuo received him with a warm welcome and had wine set before him.
“Your coming is welcome as the gentle dew to the parched grass,” said Dong Zhuo.
Lu Bu made Dong Zhuo seat himself and then made an obeisance, saying, “Pray let me bow to you as my adopted father.” Dong Zhuo gave his newly won ally gold and armor and silken robes and spread the feast of welcome. They then separated.
Thence Dong Zhuo's power and influence increased rapidly. He gave the lordship of Hu  and the rank Commander of the Left Army to his brother Dong Min. He appointed Lu Bu Lord of Luoyang, Commander of Capital District, and Commander of the Right Army. Dong Zhuo made himself Commander of the Central Army.
The adviser Li Ru never ceased from urging him to carry out the design of deposing the young Emperor.
The now all-powerful Dong Zhuo prepared a banquet in the capital at which all the officers of state were guests. He also bade Lu Bu post a company of armed men right and left ready for action. The feast began and several courses were served with nothing to distinguish that banquet from any other.
Then suddenly the host arose and drew his sword, saying, “He who is above us being weak and irresolute is unfit for the duties of his high place.
Wherefore I, as of old did Yi Yin and Huo Guang, will set aside this Emperor giving him the title of Prince of Hongnong, and I will place on the throne the present Prince of Chenliu. And those who do not support me will suffer death.” Fear seized them in its grip and they were silent, all but Yuan Shao who said, “The Emperor was innocent of any fault, and to set him aside in favor of a commoner was rebellion and nothing else.” “The empire is in my hands;” cried Dong Zhuo, “and when I choose to do this thing, who will dare say nay? Think you my sword lacks an edge?” “If your sword is sharp, mine is never blunt,” said Yuan Shao as his sword flashed out of the sheath.
The two men stood face to face amid the feasters.
When Ding Yuan by treacherous murder died, The loss was great to Yuan Shao's side.
The fate of Yuan Shao will be disclosed in later chapters. CHAPTER 4. The Deposition Of The Emperor: Prince Of Chenliu Becomes Emperor; Schemes Against Dong Zhuo: Cao Cao Presents A Sword.
Dong Zhuo was on the point of slaying Yuan Shao, but Li Ru checked him, saying, “You must not kill rashly while the business hangs in the balance.” Yuan Shao, his sword still unsheathed, left the assembly.
He hung up the seals of his office at the east gate and went to Jizhou Region.
Dong Zhuo said to Imperial Guardian Yuan Wei, “Your nephew behaved improperly, but I pardon him for your sake; what think you of my scheme?” “What you think is right,” was the reply.
“If any one opposes the great scheme, he will be dealt with by military law,” said Dong Zhuo.
The ministers, thoroughly dreaded, promised obedience, and the feast came to an end.
Dong Zhuo asked Counselor Zhou Bi and Commandant Wu Qiong what they thought of the flight of Yuan Shao.
Zhou Bi said, “He left in a state of great anger.
In such a state of excitement much harm may ensue to the present state of affairs, especially as the Yuan family have been noted for their high offices for four generations, and their proteges and dependents are everywhere.
If they assemble bold spirits and call up their clients, all the valiant warriors will be in arms, and the east region of the Huashang Mountains will be lost. You would better pardon Yuan Shao and give him a post.
He will be glad at being forgiven and will do no harm.” Wu Qiong said, “Yuan Shao is fond of scheming, but he fails in decision and so is not to be feared.
But it would be well to give him rank and thus win popular favor.” Dong Zhuo followed this advice and thereupon sent a messenger to offer Yuan Shao the governorship of Bohai.
On the first day of the ninth month, the Emperor was invited to proceed to the Hall of Virtue where was a great assembly of officials.
There Dong Zhuo, sword in hand, faced the gathering and said, “The Emperor is a weakling unequal to the burden of ruling this land.
Now listen ye to the document I have prepared.” And Li Ru read as follows:
“The dutiful Emperor Ling too soon left his people.
The emperor is the cynosure of all the people of this land.
Upon the present Emperor Bian, the Heaven has conferred but small gifts: in dignity and deportment he is deficient, and in mourning he is remiss. Only the most complete virtue can grace imperial dignity.
Empress He has trained him improperly, and the whole state administration has fallen into confusion.
Empress Dong died suddenly and no one knew why.
The doctrine of the three bonds—Heaven, Earth, and Human—and the continuity of Heaven and Earth interdependence have both been injured. “But Liu Xian, Prince of Chenliu, is sage and virtuous beside being of handsome exterior. He conforms to all the rules of propriety:
his mourning is sincere and his speech is always correct.
Eulogies of him fill the empire.
He is well fitted for the great duty of consolidating the rule of Han. “Now therefore the Emperor is deposed and created Prince of Hongnong, and Empress He retires from the administration. “I pray the Prince of Chenliu to accept the throne in conformity with the decrees of Heaven and Earth, the desires of people, and the fulfillment of the hopes of humankind.” This having been read, Dong Zhuo bade the attendants lead the Emperor down from the throne, remove his seal, and cause him to kneel facing the north, styling himself faithful servant of the Throne and requesting commands.
Moreover Dong Zhuo bade Empress He strip off her royal dress of ceremony and await the imperial command.
Both victims of this oppression wept bitterly, and every minister present was deeply affected.
One minister put his discontent into words, crying, “The false Dong Zhuo is the author of this insult, which I will risk my life to wipe away.” And with this he rushed at Dong Zhuo threatening with his ivory baton of office.
It was Secretary Ding Guan.
Dong Zhuo had Ding Guan removed and summarily put to death.
Before his death, Ding Guan ceased not to rail at the oppressor, nor was he frightened at death.
The rebel Dong Zhuo conceived the foul design To thrust the King aside and wrong his line. With folded arms the courtiers stood, save one Ding Guan, who dared to cry that wrong was done.
Then the Emperor designate, Prince of Chenliu, went to the upper part of the hall to receive congratulations.
After this the late Emperor—now Prince of Hongnong—, his mother, and the Imperial Consort, Lady Tang, were removed to the Palace of Forever Calm. The entrance gates were locked against all comers. It was pitiful!
There was the young emperor, after reigning less than half a year, deposed and another put in his place.
The new Emperor was Liu Xian, the second son of the late Emperor Ling.
He was nine years of age, five years younger than his deposed brother.
The new reign-style was changed to Inauguration of Tranquillity, the first year .
Becoming the Prime Minister, Dong Zhuo was most powerful and arrogant. When he bowed before the Throne, he did not declare his name; in going to court he did not hasten. Booted and armed he entered the reception halls. He amassed a wealth exceeding any other's.
His adviser, Li Ru, impressed upon Dong Zhuo constantly to employ people of reputation so that he should gain public esteem.
So when they told him Cai Yong was a man of talent, Dong Zhuo summoned him. But Cai Yong would not go.
Dong Zhuo sent a message to him that if he did not come, he and his whole clan should be exterminated.
Then Cai Yong gave in and appeared.
Dong Zhuo was very gracious to him and promoted him thrice in a month. Cai Yong became High Minister. Such was the generosity of the tyrant.
Meanwhile the deposed ruler, his mother, and his consort were immured in the Palace of Forever Calm and found their daily supplies gradually diminishing.
The deposed Emperor wept incessantly.
One day a pair of wallows gliding to and fro moved him to verse: Spring and the green of the tender grass, Flushes with joy as the swallows pass; The wayfarers pause by the rippling stream, And their eyes will new born gladness gleam; With lingering gaze the roofs I see Of the palace that one time sheltered me. But those whom I sheltered in all righteousness, Let's not stay in silence when the days pass useless?
The messenger, sent by Dong Zhuo from time to time to the palace for news of the prisoners, got hold of this poem and showed it to his master. “So he shows his resentment by writing poems, eh!
A fair excuse to put them all out of the way,” said Dong Zhuo.
Li Ru was sent with ten men into the palace to consummate the deed. The three were in one of the upper rooms when Li Ru arrived. The Emperor shuddered when the maid announced the visitor's name. Presently Li Ru entered and offered a cup of poisoned wine to the Emperor.
The Emperor asked what this meant.
“Spring is the season of blending and harmonious interchange, and the Prime Minister sends a cup of the wine of longevity,” said Li Ru.
“If it be the wine of longevity, you may share it too,” said Empress He. Then Li Ru became brutally frank.
“You will not drink?” asked he.
He called the men with daggers and cords and bade the Emperor look at them.
“The cup, or these?” said he. Then said Lady Tang, “Let the handmaiden drink in place of her lord. Spare the mother and her son, I pray.” “And who may you be to die for a prince?” said Li Ru.
Then he presented the cup to the Empress once more and bade her drink. She railed against her brother, the feckless He Jin, the author of all this trouble. She would not drink.
Next Li Ru approached the Emperor.
“Let me say farewell to my mother,” begged he, and he did so in these lines: “The heaven and earth are changed; Alas! the sun and the moon leave their courses, I, once the center of all eyes, am driven to the farthest confines.
Oppressed by an arrogant minister my life nears its end, Everything fails me and vain are my falling tears.” Lady Tang sang:
“Heaven is to be rent asunder, Earth to fall away; I, handmaid of an Emperor, would grieve if I followed him not.
We have come to the parting of ways, the quick and the dead walk not together; Alas!
I am left alone with the grief in my heart.” When they had sung these lines, they fell weeping into each others' arms. “The Prime Minister is awaiting my report,” said Li Ru, “and you delay too long.
Think you that there is any hope of succor?” The Empress broke into another fit of railing, “The rebel forces us to death, mother and son, and Heaven has abandoned us.
But you, the tool of his crime, will assuredly perish.” Thereupon Li Ru grew more angry, laid hands on the Empress and threw her out of the window.
Then he bade the soldiers strangle Lady Tang and forced the lad to swallow the wine of death.
Li Ru reported the achievement to his master who bade them bury the victims without the city. After this Dong Zhuo's behavior was more atrocious than before.
He spent his nights in the Palace, defiled the imperial concubines there, and even slept on the Dragon Couch.
Once he led his soldiers out of the city to Yangcheng when the villagers, men and women, were assembled from all sides for the annual spring festival. His troops surrounded the place and plundered it.
They took away booty by the cart load, and women prisoners and more than one thousand severed heads. The procession returned to Capital Luoyang and published a story that they had obtained a great victory over some rebels.
They burned the heads beneath the walls, and the women and jewelry were shared out among the soldiers.
A general named Wu Fu was disgusted at this ferocity and sought a chance to slay Dong Zhuo. Wu Fu constantly wore a breastplate underneath his court dress and carried in conceal a sharp dagger.
One day when Dong Zhuo came to court, Wu Fu met him on the steps and tried to stab him. But Dong Zhuo was a very powerful man and held Wu Fu off till Lu Bu came to his help.
Lu Bu struck down the assailant.
“Who told you to rebel?” said Dong Zhuo.
Wu Fu glared at him and cried, “You are not my prince, I am not your minister: where is the rebellion?
Your crimes fill the heavens, and every man would slay you.
I am sorry I cannot tear you asunder with chariots to appease the wrath of the world!” Dong Zhuo bade the guards take him out and hack him to pieces.
Wu Fu only ceased railing as he ceased to live.
That loyal servant of the latter days of Han.
His valor was high as the Heavens, in all ages unequaled; In the court itself would he slay the rebel, great is his fame! Throughout all time will people call him a hero.
Thereafter Dong Zhuo always went well guarded.
At Bohai, Yuan Shao heard of Dong Zhuo's misuse of power and sent a secret letter to Minister of the Interior Wang Yun:
“That rebel Dong Zhuo outrages Heaven and has deposed his ruler.
Common people dare not speak of him; that is understandable. Yet you suffer his aggressions as if you knew naught of them. How then are you a dutiful and loyal minister?
I have assembled an army and desire to sweep clean the royal habitation, but I dare not lightly begin the task.
If you are willing, then find an opportunity to plot against this man.
If you would use force, I am at your command.” The letter arrived but Wang Yun could see no chance to plot against Dong Zhuo.
One day while among the throng in attendance, mostly people of long service, Wang Yun said to his colleagues, “This is my birthday, I pray you come to a little party in my humble cot this evening.” “We certainly will,” they cried, “and wish you long life.” That night the tables were spread in an inner room, and his friends gathered there.
When the wine had made a few rounds, the host suddenly covered his face and began to weep.
The guests were aghast. “Sir, on your birthday too, why do you weep?” said they. “It is not my birthday,” replied Wang Yun.
“But I wished to call you together and I feared lest Dong Zhuo should suspect, so I made that the excuse.
This man insults the Emperor and does as he wishes so that the imperial prerogatives are in imminent peril.
I think of the days when our illustrious founder destroyed the Qin, annihilated Chu, and obtained the empire.
Who could have foreseen this day when that Dong Zhuo has subjugated all to his will?
That is why I weep.” Then they all wept with him.
Seated among the guests, however, was Cao Cao, who did not join in the weeping but clapped his hands and laughed aloud. “If all the officers of the government weep till dawn, and from dawn weep till dark, will that slay Dong Zhuo?” said Cao Cao. Wang Yun turned on him angrily.
“Your forbears ate the bounty of the Hans; do you feel no gratitude?
You can laugh?” “I laughed at the absurdity of an assembly like this being unable to compass the death of one man.
Foolish and incapable as I am, I will cut off his head and hang it at the gate as an offering to the people.” Wang Yun left his seat and went over to Cao Cao.
“These later days,” Cao Cao continued, “I have bowed my head to Dong Zhuo with the sole desire of finding a chance to destroy him.
Now he begins to trust me and so I can approach him sometimes.
You have a sword with seven precious jewels which I would borrow, and I will go into his palace and kill him.
I care not if I die for it.” “What good fortune for the world that this is so!” said Wang Yun.
With this Wang Yun himself poured out a goblet for Cao Cao who drained it and swore an oath.
After this the treasured sword was brought out and given to Cao Cao who hid it under his dress. He finished his wine, took leave of the guests, and left the hall. Before long the others dispersed.
The next day Cao Cao, with this short sword girded on, came to the palace of the Prime Minister. “Where is the Prime Minister?” asked he.
“In the small guest room,” replied the attendants.
So Cao Cao went in and found his host seated on a couch; Lu Bu was at his side.
“Why so late, Cao Cao?” said Dong Zhuo.
“My horse is out of condition and slow,” replied Cao Cao. Dong Zhuo turned to his henchman Lu Bu.
“Some good horses have come in from the west.
You go and pick out a good one as a present for him.” And Lu Bu left.
“This traitor is doomed,” thought Cao Cao.
He ought to have struck then, but Cao Cao knew Dong Zhuo was very powerful, and he was afraid to act; he wanted to make sure of his blow.
Now Dong Zhuo's corpulence was such that he could not remain long sitting, so he rolled over couch and lay face inwards.
“Now is the time,” thought the assassin, and he gripped the good sword firmly.
But just as Cao Cao was going to strike, Dong Zhuo happened to look up and in a mirror he saw the reflection of Cao Cao behind him with a sword in the hand. “What are you doing, Cao Cao?” said Dong Zhuo turning suddenly.
And at that moment Lu Bu came along leading a horse.
Cao Cao in a flurry dropped on his knees and said, “I have a precious sword here which I wish to present to Your Benevolence.” Dong Zhuo took it.
It was a fine blade, over a foot in length, inlaid with the seven precious signs and very keen—a fine sword in very truth.
Dong Zhuo handed the weapon to Lu Bu while Cao Cao took off the sheath which he also gave to Lu Bu.
Then they went out to look at the horse. Cao Cao was profuse in his thanks and said he would like to try the horse. So Dong Zhuo bade the guards bring saddle and bridle.
Cao Cao led the creature outside, leapt into the saddle, laid on his whip vigorously, and galloped away eastward.
Lu Bu said, “Just as I was coming up, it seemed to me as if that fellow was going to stab you, only a sudden panic seized him and he presented the weapon instead.” “I suspected him too,” said Dong Zhuo.
Just then Li Ru came in and they told him.
“Cao Cao has no family here in the capital but lodges quite alone and not far away,” said Li Ru.
“Send for him. If he comes forthwith, the sword was meant as a gift; but if he makes any excuses, he had bad intentions.
And you can arrest him.” They sent four prison warders to call Cao Cao.
They were absent a long time and then came back, saying, “Cao Cao had not returned to his lodging but rode in hot haste out of the eastern gate.
To the gate commander's questions he replied that he was on a special message for the Prime Minister.
He went off at full speed.” “His conscience pricked him and so he fled; there is no doubt that he meant assassination,” said Li Ru.
“And I trusted him so well!” said Dong Zhuo in a rage. “There must be a conspiracy afoot.
When we catch him, we shall know all about it,” said Li Ru.
Letters and pictures of the fugitive Cao Cao were sent everywhere with orders to catch him.
A large reward in money was offered and a patent of nobility, while those who sheltered him would be held to share his guilt.
Cao Cao traveled in hot haste toward Qiao, his home county.
On the road at Zhongmou, he was recognized by the guards at the gate and made prisoner. They took him to the Magistrate.
Cao Cao declared he was a merchant, named Huang Fu.
The Magistrate scanned his face most closely and remained in deep thought. Presently the Magistrate said, “When I was at the capital seeking a post, I knew you as Cao Cao.
Why do you try to conceal your identity?” The Magistrate ordered Cao Cao to the prison till the morrow when he could send Cao Cao to the capital and claim the reward.
He gave the soldiers wine and food as a reward.
About midnight the Magistrate sent a trusty servant to bring the prisoner into his private rooms for interrogation.
“They say the Prime Minister treated you well; why did you try to harm him?” said Magistrate.
“How can swallows and sparrows understand the flight of the crane and the wild goose?
I am your prisoner and to be sent to the capital for a reward.
Why so many questions?” The Magistrate sent away the attendants and turning to the prisoner said, “Do not despise me.
I am no mere hireling, only I have not yet found the lord to serve.” Said Cao Cao, “My ancestors enjoyed the bounty of Han, and should I differ from a bird or a beast if I did not desire to repay them with gratitude?
I have bowed the knee to Dong Zhuo that thereby I might find an opportunity against him, and so remove this evil from the state.
I have failed for this time.
Such is the will of heaven.” “And where are you going?” “Home to my county.
Thence I shall issue a summons calling all the bold spirits to come with forces to kill the tyrant.
This is my desire.” Thereupon the Magistrate himself loosened the bonds of the prisoner, led him to the upper seat, and bowed, saying, “I am called Chen Gong.
My aged mother and family are in the east county of Dongjun.
I am deeply affected by your loyalty and uprightness, and I will abandon my office and follow you.” Cao Cao was delighted with this turn of affairs.
Chen Gong at once collected some money for the expenses of their journey and gave Cao Cao a different dress. Then each took a sword and rode away toward Qiao.
Three days later at eventide they reached Chenggao.
Cao Cao pointed with his whip to a hamlet deep in the woods and said, “There lives my uncle, Lu Boshe, a sworn-brother of my father.
Suppose we go and ask news of my family and seek shelter for the night?” “Excellent!” said his companion Chen Gong, and they rode over, dismounted at the farm gate and entered.
Lu Boshe greeted them and said to Cao Cao, “I hear the government has sent stringent orders on all sides to arrest you. Your father has gone into hiding to Chenliu.
How has this all come about?” Cao Cao told him and said, “Had it not been for this man here with me, I should have been already hacked to pieces.” Lu Boshe bowed low to Chen Gong, saying, “You are the salvation of the Cao family.
But be at ease and rest, I will find you a bed in my humble cottage.” Lu Boshe then rose and went into the inner chamber where he stayed a long time.
When he came out, he said, “There is no good wine in the house.
I am going over to the village to get some for you.” And he hastily mounted his donkey and rode away.
The two travelers sat a long time. Suddenly they heard at the back of the house the sound of sharpening a knife.
Cao Cao said to Chen Gong, “He is not my real uncle; I am beginning to doubt the meaning of his going off. Let us listen.” So they silently stepped out into a straw hut at the back.
Presently some one said, “Bind before killing, eh?” “As I thought;” said Cao Cao, “now unless we strike first, we shall be taken.” Suddenly Cao Cao and Chen Gong dashed in, sword in hand, and slew the whole household male and female, in all eight persons.
After this they searched the house. In the kitchen they found a pig bound ready to kill. “You have made a huge mistake,” said Chen Gong, “and we have slain honest folks.” Cao Cao and Chen Gong at once mounted and rode away.
Soon they met their host Lu Boshe coming home, and over the saddle in front of him they saw two vessels of wine. In his hands he carried fruit and vegetables. “Why are you going, Sirs?” Lu Boshe called to them.
“Accused people dare not linger,” said Cao Cao. “But I have bidden them kill a pig! Why do you refuse my poor hospitality?
I pray you ride back with me.” Cao Cao paid no heed, urging his horse forward. But he suddenly drew his sword and rode back after Lu Boshe. “Who is that coming along?” called Cao Cao.
Lu Boshe turned and looked back, and Cao Cao at the same instant cut Lu Boshe down. Chen Gong was frightened. “You were wrong enough before,” cried Chen Gong.
“What now is this?” “When he got home and saw his family killed, think you he would bear it patiently?
If he had raised an alarm and followed us, we should have been killed.” “To kill deliberately is very wrong,” said Chen Gong.
“I would rather betray the world than let the world betray me!” was the reply.
Chen Gong only thought.
They rode on some distance by moonlight and presently knocked up an inn for shelter.
Having first fed their horses, Cao Cao was soon asleep, but Chen Gong lay thinking.
“I took him for a true man and left all to follow him, but he is as cruel as a wolf. If I spare him, he will do more harm later,” thought Chen Gong.
And Chen Gong rose intending to kill his companion.
In his heart lie cruelty and venom, he is no true man; In nought does he differ from his enemy Dong Zhuo.
The further fortunes of Cao Cao will be told in later chapters.
CHAPTER 5. Cao Cao Appeals To The Powerful Lords; The Three Brothers Fight Against Lu Bu. At the close of the last chapter, Chen Gong was about to slay Cao Cao. But Chen Gong reflected, “I joined him to do righteous things. Now if I killed him, I would only do unrighteousness and the people would condemn me.
I rather leave in silence.” Rising from his bed before the sunrise, Chen Gong mounted his horse and rode away eastward to his home county of Dongjun. Cao Cao awoke with the day and missed his companion.
Thought he, “Chen Gong thinks me brutal because of a couple of egoistic phrases I used, and so he has gone.
I ought to push on too and not linger here.” So Cao Cao traveled as quickly as possible toward Qiao.
When he saw his father, he related what had happened and said he wanted to dispose of all the family property and enlist soldiers with the money.
“Our possessions are but small,” said his father, “and not enough to do anything with.
However, there is a graduate here, one Wei Hong, careless of wealth but careful of virtue, whose family is very rich. With his help we might hope for success.” A feast was prepared and Wei Hong was invited. Cao Cao made him a speech: “The Hans have lost their lordship, and Dong Zhuo is really a tyrant. He flouts his prince and is cruel to the people, who gnash their teeth with rage.
I would restore the Hans, but my means are insufficient.
Sir, I appeal to your loyalty and public spirit.” Wei Hong replied, “I have long desired this but, so far, have not found a person fit to undertake the task. Since you, Cao Cao, have so noble a desire, I willingly devote all my property to the cause.” This was joyful news, and the call to arms was forthwith prepared and sent far and near.
So they established a corps of volunteers and set up a large white recruiting banner with the words “Loyalty and Honor" inscribed thereon.
The response was rapid, and volunteers came in like rain drops in number.
One day came a certain Yue Jin from Yangping and another Li Dian from Julu. These two were appointed to Cao Cao's personal staff.
Another was one Xiahou Dun from Qiao. He was descended from Xiahou Ying of old.
Xiahou Dun had been trained from his early boyhood to use the spear and the club.
When only fourteen he had been attached to a certain master-in-arms. One day one person spoke disrespectfully of his master, and Xiahou Dun killed that person. For this deed, however, he had to flee and had been an exile for some time.
Now he came to offer his services, accompanied by his cousin Xiahou Yuan. Each brought a thousand trained soldiers.
Really these two were brothers of Cao Cao by birth, since Cao Cao's father was originally of the Xiahou family, and had only been adopted into the Cao family.
A few days later came Cao Cao's two cousins, Cao Ren and Cao Hong, each with one thousand followers.
These two were accomplished horsemen and trained in the use of arms.
Then drill began, and Wei Hong spent his treasure freely in buying clothing, armor, flags, and banners.
From all sides poured in gifts of grain.
When Yuan Shao received Cao Cao's call to arms, he collected all those under his command to the number of thirty thousand.
Then he marched from Bohai to Qiao to take the oath to Cao Cao. Next a manifesto was issued:
“Cao Cao and his associates, moved by a sense of duty, now make this proclamation. Dong Zhuo defies Heaven and Earth. He is destroying the state and injuring his prince.
He pollutes the Palace and oppresses the people.
He is vicious and cruel. His crimes are heaped up.
Now we have received a secret command to call up soldiers, and we are pledged to cleanse the empire and destroy the evil-doers.
We will raise a volunteer army and exert all our efforts to maintain the dynasty and succor the people.
Respond to this, O Nobles, by mustering your soldiers.” Many from every side answered the summons as the following list shows: Governor of Nanyang—Yuan Shu; .2.
Imperial Protector of Jizhou Region—Han Fu; .3.
Imperial Protector of Yuzhou Region—Kong Zhou; .4.
Imperial Protector of Yanzhou Region—Liu Dai; .5.
Governor of Henei—Wang Kuang; .6.
Governor of Chenliu—Zhang Miao; .7.
Governor of Dongjun—Qiao Mao; .8.
Governor of Shanyang—Yuan Yi; .9. Lord of Jibei—Bao Xin; .10.
Governor of Beihai—Kong Rong; .11.
Governor of Guangling —Zhang Chao; .12.
Imperial Protector of Xuzhou Region—Tao Qian; .13.
Governor of Xiliang—Ma Teng; .14. Governor of Beiping—Gongsun Zan; .15.
Governor of Shangdang—Zhang Yang; .16.
Governor of Changsha—Sun Jian; .17.
Governor of Bohai—Yuan Shao.
These contingents varied in size, from ten thousand to thirty thousand, but each was complete in itself with its officers, civil and military, and battleleaders. They were heading for Capital Luoyang.
The Governor of Beiping, Gongsun Zan, while on his way with his force of fifteen thousand, passed through the county of Pingyuan.
There he saw among the mulberry trees a yellow flag under which marched a small company.
When they drew nearer he saw the leader was Liu Bei.
“Good brother, what do you here?” asked Gongsun Zan.
“You were kind to me once, and on your recommendation I was made the magistrate of this county. I heard you were passing through and came to salute you. May I pray you, my elder brother, enter into the city and rest your steed?” “Who are these two?” said Gongsun Zan, pointing to Liu Bei's brothers.
“These are Guan Yu and Zhang Fei, my sworn brothers.” “Were they fighting with you against the Yellow Scarves rebels?” asked Gongsun Zan. “All my success was due to their efforts,” said Liu Bei.
“And what offices do they fill?” “Guan Yu is a mounted archer; Zhang Fei is a foot archer.” “Thus are able humans buried!” said Gongsun Zan, sighing. Then he continued.
“All the highest in the land are now going to destroy the rebellious Dong Zhuo.
My brother, you would do better to abandon this petty place and join us in restoring the House of Han. Why not?” “I should like to go,” said Liu Bei.
“If you had let me kill him that other time, you would not have this trouble today,” said Zhang Fei to Liu Bei and Guan Yu.
“Since things are so, let us pack and go,” said Guan Yu. So without more ado, the three brothers, with a few horsemen, joined Gongsun Zan and marched with him to join the great army.
One after another the feudal lords came up and encamped. Their camps extended over seventy miles and more.
When all had arrived, Cao Cao, as the head, prepared sacrificial bullocks and horses and called all the lords to a great assembly to decide upon their plan of attack.
Then spoke the Governor of Henei, Wang Kuang, “We have been moved by a noble sense of right to assemble here.
Now must we first choose a chief and bind ourselves to obedience.” Then said Cao Cao, “For four generations the highest offices of state have been filled by members of the Yuan family, and its clients and supporters are everywhere. As a descendant of ancient ministers of Han, Yuan Shao is a suitable man to be our chief lord.” Yuan Shao again and again declined this honor.
But they all said, “It must be he; there is no other!” And then he agreed.
So the next day a three-story altar was built, and they planted about it the banners of all parties in five directions of space. And they set up white yaks' tails and golden axes and emblems of military authority and the seals of leadership round about.
All being ready, the chief lord was invited to ascend the altar. Clad in ceremonial robes and girded with a sword, Yuan Shao reverently ascended. There he burned incense, made obeisance and recited the oath:
“The House of Han has fallen upon evil days, the bands of imperial authority are loosened.
The rebel minister, Dong Zhuo, takes advantage of the discord to work evil, and calamity falls upon honorable families. Cruelty overwhelms simple folks.
We, Yuan Shao and his confederates, fearing for the safety of the imperial prerogatives, have assembled military forces to rescue the state.
We now pledge ourselves to exert our whole strength and act in concord to the utmost limit of our powers. There must be no disconcerted or selfish action.
Should any depart from this pledge, may he lose his life and leave no posterity.
Almighty Heaven and Universal Earth and the enlightened spirits of our forebears, be ye our witnesses.” The reading finished, Yuan Shao smeared the blood of the sacrifice upon his lips and upon the lips of those who shared the pledge.
All were deeply affected by the ceremony and many shed tears.
This done, the chief lord was supported down from the high place and led to his tent, where he took the highest place and the others arranged themselves according to rank and age. Here wine was served.
Presently Cao Cao said, “It behooves us all to obey the chief we have this day set up, and support the state.
There must be no feeling of rivalry or superiority based upon numbers.” Yuan Shao replied, “Unworthy as I am, yet as elected chief I must impartially reward merit and punish offenses.
Let each see to it that he obeys the national laws and the army precepts.
These must not be broken.” “Only thy commands are to be obeyed!” cried all.
Then Yuan Shao said, “My brother, Yuan Shu, is appointed Chief of the Commissariat. He must see to it that the whole camp is well supplied.
But the need of the moment is a van leader who shall go to River Si Pass and provoke a battle.
The other forces must take up strategic positions in support.” Then the Governor of Changsha, Sun Jian, offered himself for this service.
“You are valiant and fierce, and equal to this service,” said Yuan Shao.
The force under Sun Jian set out and presently came to River Si Pass.
The guard there sent a swift rider to the capital to announce to the Prime Minister the urgency of the situation.
Ever since Dong Zhuo had secured his position, he had given himself up to luxury without stint.
When the urgent news reached the adviser Li Ru, he at once went to his master, who much alarmed called a great council.
Lu Bu stood forth and said, “Do not fear, my father; I look upon all the lords beyond the passes as so much stubble.
And with the warriors of our fierce army, I will put every one of them to death and hang their heads at the gates of the capital.” “With your aid I can sleep secure,” said Dong Zhuo.
But some one behind Lu Bu broke in upon his speech saying, “An oxcleaver to kill a chicken!
There is no need for the General to go; I will cut off their heads as easily as I would take a thing out of my pocket.” Dong Zhuo looked up and his eyes rested on a stalwart man of fierce mien, lithe and supple as a beast.
He had round head like a leopard and shoulders like an ape's.
His name was Hua Xiong of Guanxi.
Dong Zhuo rejoiced at Hua Xiong's bold words and at once appointed him Commander of Royal Cavaliers and gave him fifty thousand of horse and foot. Hua Xiong and three other generals—Li Su, Hu Zhen, and Zhao Cen—hastily moved toward River Si Pass.
Among the feudal lords, Bao Xin, the Lord of Jibei, was jealous lest the chosen Van Leader Sun Jian should win too great honors. Wherefore Bao Xin endeavored to meet the foe first, and so he secretly dispatched his brother, Bao Zhong, with three thousand by a bye road. As soon as this small force reached the Pass, they offered battle.
Fast reacting, Hua Xiong at the head of five hundred armored horsemen swept down from the Pass crying, “Flee not, rebel!” But Bao Zhong was afraid and turned back.
Hua Xiong came on, his arm rose, the sword fell, and Bao Zhong was cut down from his horse. Most of Bao Zhong's company were captured.
Bao Zhong's head was sent to the Prime Minister's palace. Hua Xiong was promoted to Commander in Chief.
Sun Jian presently approached the Pass.
He had four generals:
Cheng Pu of Tuyin whose weapon was an iron-spined lance with snake-headed blade; Huang Gai of Lingling who wielded an iron whip; Han Dang of Lingzhi using a heavy saber; and Zu Mao of Wujun who fought with a pair of swords.
Commander Sun Jian wore a helmet of fine silver wrapped round with a purple turban. He carried across his body his sword of ancient ingot iron and rode a dappled horse with flowing mane. Sun Jian advanced to the Pass and hailed the defenders, crying, “Helpers of a villain!
Be quick to surrender!” Hua Xiong bade Hu Zhen lead five thousand out against Sun Jian.
Cheng Pu with the snaky lance rode out from Sun Jian's side and engaged.
After a very few bouts, Cheng Pu killed Hu Zhen on the spot by a thrust through the throat. Then Sun Jian gave the signal for the main army to advance.
But from the Pass, Hua Xiong's troops rained down showers of stones, which proved too much for the assailants, and they retired into camp at Liangdong.
Sun Jian sent the report of victory to Yuan Shao. Sun Jian also sent an urgent message for supplies to the commissary.
But a counselor said to the Controller Yuan Shu, “This Sun Jian is a very tiger in the east.
Should he take the capital and destroy Dong Zhuo, we should have a tiger in place of a wolf.
Do not send him grain.
Starve his troops and that will decide the fate of that army.” And Yuan Shu gave ears to the detractor and sent no grain or forage. Soon Sun Jian's hungry soldiers showed their disaffection by indiscipline, and the spies bore the news to the defenders of the Pass.
Li Ru made a plot with Hua Xiong, saying, “We will launch tonight a speedy attack against Sun Jian in front and rear so that we can capture him.” Hua Xiong agreed and prepared for the attack.
So the soldiers of the attacking force were told off and given a full meal. At dark they left the Pass and crept by secret paths to the rear of Sun Jian's camp.
The moon was bright and the wind cool.
They arrived about midnight and the drums beat an immediate attack. Sun Jian hastily donned his fighting gear and rode out.
He ran straight into Hua Xiong and the two warriors engaged.
But before they had exchanged many passes, Li Ru's army came up from behind and set fire to whatever would burn.
Sun Jian's army were thrown into confusion and fled in disorder. A general melee ensued, and soon only Zu Mao was left at Sun Jian's side. These two broke through the Pass and fled.
Hua Xiong coming in hot pursuit, Sun Jian took his bow and let fly two arrows in quick succession, but both missed.
He fitted a third arrow to the string, but drew the bow so fiercely that it snapped. He cast the bow to the earth and set off at full gallop.
Then spoke Zu Mao, “My lord's purple turban is a mark that the rebels will too easily recognize.
Give it to me and I will wear it.” So Sun Jian exchanged his silver helmet with the turban for his general's headpiece, and the two men parted, riding different ways.
The pursuers looking only for the purple turban went after its wearer, and Sun Jian escaped along a by-road.
Zu Mao, hotly pursued, then tore off the headdress which he hung on the post of a half-burned house as he passed and dashed into the thick woods.
Hua Xiong's troops seeing the purple turban standing motionless dared not approach, but they surrounded it on every side and shot at it with arrows.
Presently they discovered the trick, went up and seized it. This was the moment that Zu Mao awaited.
At once he rushed forth, his two swords whirling about, and dashed at the leader. But Hua Xiong was too quick.
With a loud yell, Hua Xiong slashed at Zu Mao and cut him down the horse.
Hua Xiong and Li Ru continued the slaughter till the day broke, and they led their troops back to the Pass.
Cheng Pu, Huang Gai, and Han Dang in time found their chief and the soldiers gathered.
Sun Jian was much grieved at the loss of Zu Mao. When news of the disaster reached Yuan Shao, he was greatly chagrined and called all the lords to a council.
They assembled and Gongsun Zan was the last to arrive.
When all were seated in the tent Yuan Shao said, “The brother of General Bao Xin, disobeying the rules we made for our guidance, rashly went to attack the enemy; he was slain and with him many of our soldiers.
Now Sun Jian has been defeated. Thus our fighting spirit has suffered and what is to be done?” Every one was silent.
Lifting his eyes, Yuan Shao looked round from one to another till he came to Gongsun Zan, and then he remarked three men who stood behind Gongsun Zan's seat. They were of striking appearance as they stood there, all three smiling cynically.
“Who are those men behind you?” said Yuan Shao.
Gongsun Zan told Liu Bei to come forward, and said, “This is Liu Bei, Magistrate of Pingyuan and a brother of mine who shared my humble cottage when we were students.” “It must be the Liu Bei who broke up the Yellow Scarves rebellion,” said Cao Cao.
“It is he,” said Gongsun Zan, and he ordered Liu Bei to make his obeisance to the assembly, to whom Liu Bei then related his services and his origin, all in full detail.
“Since he is of the Han line, he should be seated,” said Yuan Shao, and he bade Liu Bei sit.
Liu Bei modestly thanked him, declining.
Said Yuan Shao, “This consideration is not for your fame and office; I respect you as a scion of the imperial family.” So Liu Bei took his seat in the lowest place of the long line of lords. And his two brothers with folded arms took their stations behind him.
Even as they were at this meeting came in a scout to say that Hua Xiong with a company of mail-clad horsemen was coming down from the Pass. They were flaunting Sun Jian's captured purple turban on the end of a bamboo pole. The enemy was soon hurling insults at those within the stockade and challenging them to fight.
“Who dares go out to give battle?” said Yuan Shao.
“I will go,” said Yu She, a renown general of Yuan Shu, stepping forward.
So Yu She went, and almost immediately one came back to say that Yu She had fallen in the third bout of Hua Xiong. Fear began to lay its cold hand on the assembly.
Then Imperial Protector Han Fu said, “I have a brave warrior among my army. Pan Feng is his name, and he could slay this Hua Xiong.” So Pan Feng was ordered out to meet the foe.
With his great battle-ax in his hand, Pan Feng mounted and rode forth.
But soon came the direful tidings that General Pan Feng too had fallen.
The faces of the gathering paled at this.
“What a pity my two able generals, Yan Liang and Wen Chou, are not here!
Then should we have some one who would not fear this Hua Xiong,” said Yuan Shao.
He had not finished when from the lower end a voice tolled, “I will go, take Hua Xiong's head, and lay it before you here.” All turned to look at the speaker. He was tall and had a long beard. His eyes were those of a phoenix and his eyebrows thick and bushy like silkworms. His face was a swarthy red and his voice deep as the sound of a great bell.
“Who is he?” asked Yuan Shao.
Gongsun Zan told them it was Guan Yu, brother of Liu Bei.
“And what is he?” asked Yuan Shao.
“He is in the train of Liu Bei as a mounted archer.” “What! An insult to us all!” roared Yuan Shu from his place. “Have we no leader?
How dare an archer speak thus before us?
Let us beat him forth!” But Cao Cao intervened. “Peace, O Yuan Shu!
Since this man speaks great words, he is certainly valiant. Let him try.
If he fails, then we may reproach him.” “Hua Xiong will laugh at us if we send a mere archer to fight him,” said Yuan Shao.
“This man looks no common person. And how can the enemy know he is but a bowman?” said Cao Cao.
“If I fail, then can you take my head,” spoke Guan Yu.
Cao Cao bade them heat some wine and offered a cup to Guan Yu as he went out. “Pour it out,” said Guan Yu.
“I shall return in a little space.” Guan Yu went with his weapon in his hand and vaulted into the saddle.
Those in the tent heard the fierce roll of the drums and then a mighty sound as if skies were falling and earth rising, hills trembling and mountains tearing asunder. And they were sore afraid. And while they were listening with ears intent, lo!
the gentle tinkle of horse bells, and Guan Yu returned, throwing at their feet the head of the slain leader, their enemy Hua Xiong.
The wine was still warm! This doughty deed has been celebrated in verse:
The power of the man stands first in all the world; At the gate of the camp was heard the rolling of the battle drums; Then Guan Yu set aside the wine cup till he should have displayed his valor, And the wine was still warm when Hua Xiong had been slain.
Cao Cao was greatly excited at this success.
But Zhang Fei's voice was heard, shouting, “My brother has slain Hua Xiong. What are we waiting for? Why not break through the Pass and seize Dong Zhuo?
Could there have been a better time?” Again arose the angry voice of Yuan Shu, “We high officials are too meek and yielding. Here is the petty follower of a small magistrate daring to flaunt his prowess before us!
Expel him from the tent, I say.” But again Cao Cao interposed, “Shall we consider the station of him who has done a great service?” “If you hold a mere magistrate in such honor, then I simply withdraw,” said Yuan Shu.
“Is a word enough to defeat a grand enterprise?” said Cao Cao.
Then he told Gongsun Zan to lead the three brothers back to their own camp, and the other chiefs then dispersed.
That night Cao Cao secretly sent presents of meat and wine to soothe the three after this adventure.
When Hua Xiong's troops straggled back and told the story of defeat and death, Li Ru was greatly distressed. He wrote urgent letters to his master who called in his trusted advisers to a council.
Li Ru summed up the situation, saying, “We have lost our best leader, and the rebel power has thereby become very great.
Yuan Shao is at the head of this confederacy, and his uncle, Yuan Wei, is holder of the office of Imperial Guardianship. If those in the capital combine with those in the country, we may suffer.
Therefore we must remove them.
So I request you, Sir Prime Minister, to place yourself at the head of your army and break this confederation.” Dong Zhuo agreed and at once ordered his two generals, Li Jue and Guo Si, to take five hundred troops and surround the residence of Imperial Guardian Yuan Wei, slay every soul regardless of age, and hang the head of Yuan Wei outside the gate as trophy.
And Dong Zhuo commanded two hundred thousand troops to advance in two armies. The first fifty thousand were under Li Jue and Guo Si, and they were to hold River Si Pass. They should not necessarily fight.
The other one hundred fifty thousand under Dong Zhuo himself went to Tiger Trap Pass. His counselors and commanders —Li Ru, Lu Bu, Fan Chou, Zhang Ji, and others—marched with the main army.
Tiger Trap Pass is fifteen miles from Capital Luoyang.
As soon as they arrived, Dong Zhuo bade Lu Bu take thirty thousand soldiers and make a strong stockade on the outside of the Pass.
The main body with Dong Zhuo would occupy the Pass.
News of this movement reaching the confederate lords.
Yuan Shao summoned a council.
Said Cao Cao, “The occupation of the Pass would cut our armies in two; therefore, must we oppose Dong Zhuo's army on the way.” So eight of the commanders—Wang Kuang, Qiao Mao, Bao Xin, Yuan Yi, Kong Rong, Zhang Yang, Tao Qian, and Gongsun Zan—were ordered to go in the direction of the Tiger Trap Pass to oppose their enemy.
Cao Cao and his troops moved among them as reserve to render help where needed.
Of the eight, Wang Kuang, the Governor of Henei, was the first to arrive, and Lu Bu went to give battle with three thousand armored horsemen.
When Wang Kuang had ordered his army, horse and foot, in battle array, he took his station under the great banner and looked over at his foe. Lu Bu was a conspicuous figure in front of the line. On his head was a triple curved headdress of ruddy gold with pheasant tails. He wore a warring velvet-red robe of Xichuan silk embroidered with thousand flowers, which was overlapped by golden mail adorned with a gaping animal's head, joined by rings at the sides and girt to his waist with a belt fastened by a beautiful lion-head clasp.
His bow and arrows were slung on his shoulders, and he carried a long heavy trident halberd. He was seated on his snorting steed Red-Hare. Indeed Lu Bu was the man among humans, as Red-Hare was the horse among horses.
“Who dares go out to fight him?” asked Wang Kuang turning to those behind him.
In response a valiant general from Henei named Fang Yue spurred to the front, his spear set ready for battle. Lu Bu and Fang Yue met:
before the fifth bout Fang Yue fell under a thrust of the trident halberd, and Lu Bu dashed forward.
Wang Kuang's troops could not stand and scattered in all directions.
Lu Bu went to and fro slaying all he met. He was irresistible.
Luckily, two other troops led by Qiao Mao and Yuan Yi came up and rescued the wounded Wang Kuang, and Lu Bu pulled back.
The three, having lost many troops, withdrew ten miles and made a stockade. And before long the remaining five commanders came up and joined them.
They held a council and agreed Lu Bu was a hero no one could match.
And while they sat there anxious and uncertain, it was announced that Lu Bu had returned to challenge them.
They mounted their horses and placed themselves at the heads of eight forces, each body in its station on the high ground.
Around them was the opposing army in formation, commanded by Lu Bu, innumerable horse and foot, with splendid embroidered banners waving in the breeze. They attacked Lu Bu.
Mu Shun, a general of Governor Zhang Yang, rode out with his spear set, but soon fell at the first encounter with Lu Bu.
This frightened the others. Then galloped forth Wu Anguo, a general under Governor Kong Rong.
Wu Anguo raised his iron mace ready at his rival.
Lu Bu whirling his halberd and urging on his steed came to meet Wu Anguo.
The two fought, well matched for ten bouts, when a blow from the trident halberd broke Wu Anguo's wrist. Letting his mace fall to the ground he fled.
Then all eight of the lords led forth their armies to his rescue, and Lu Bu retired to his line.
The fighting then ceased, and after their return to camp another council met.
Cao Cao said, “No one can stand against the prowess of Lu Bu. Let us call up all the lords and evolve some good plan.
If only Lu Bu were taken, Dong Zhuo could easily be killed.” While the council was in progress again came Lu Bu to challenge them, and again the commanders moved out against him.
This time Gongsun Zan, flourishing his spear, went to meet the enemy.
After a very few bouts Gongsun Zan turned and fled; Lu Bu following at the topmost speed of RedHare.
Red-Hare was a five-hundred-mile-a-day horse, swift as the wind.
The lords watched Red-Hare gained rapidly upon the flying horseman, and Lu Bu's halberd was poised ready to strike Gongsun Zan just behind the heart.
Just then dashed in a third rider with round glaring eyes and a bristling mustache, and armed with a ten-foot octane-serpent halberd.
“Stay, O twice bastard!” roared he, “I, Zhang Fei of Yan, await you.”  Seeing this opponent, Lu Bu left the pursuit of Gongsun Zan and engaged the new adversary. Zhang Fei was elated, and he rode forth with all his energies.
They two were worthily matched, and they exchanged half a hundred bouts with no advantage to either side.
Then Guan Yu, impatient, rode out with his huge and weighty green-dragon saber and attacked Lu Bu on the other flank.
The three steeds formed a triangle and their riders battered away at each other for thirty bouts, yet still Lu Bu stood firm.
Then Liu Bei rode out to his brothers' aid, his double swords raised ready to strike. The steed with the flowing mane was urged in at an angle, and now Lu Bu had to contend with three surrounding warriors at whom he struck one after another, and they at him, the flashing of the warriors' weapons looking like the revolving lamps suspended at the new year.
And the warriors of the eight armies gazed rapt with amazement at such a battle. But Lu Bu's guard began to weaken and fatigue seized him.
Looking hard in the face of Liu Bei, Lu Bu feigned a fierce thrust thus making Liu Bei suddenly draw back.
Then, lowering his halberd, Lu Bu dashed through the angle thus opened and got away. But was it likely they would allow him to escape?
They whipped their steeds and followed hard.
The soldiers of the eight armies cracked their throats with thunderous cheers and all dashed forward, pressing after Lu Bu as he made for the shelter of the Tiger Trap Pass. And first among his pursuers were the three brothers. An ancient poet has told of this famous fight in these lines: The fateful day of Han came in the reigns of Huan and Ling, Their glory declined as the sun sinks at the close of day.
Dong Zhuo, infamous minister of state, pulled down the youthful Bian. It is true the new Xian was a weakling, too timid for his times.
Then Cao Cao proclaimed abroad these wicked deeds, And the great lords, moved with anger, assembled their forces.
In council met they and chose as their oath-chief Yuan Shao, Pledged themselves to maintain the ruling house and tranquillity.
Of the warriors of that time matchless Lu Bu was the boldest. His valor and prowess are sung by all within the four seas.
He clothed his body in silver armor like the scales of a dragon, On his head was a golden headdress with pheasant tails, About his waist a shaggy belt, the clasp, two wild beasts' heads with gripping jaws, His flowing, embroidered robe fluttered about his form, His swift courser bounded over the plain, a mighty wind following, His terrible trident halberd flashed in the sunlight, bright as a placid lake.
Who dared face him as he rode forth to challenge?
The bowels of the confederate lords were torn with fear and their hearts trembled.
Then leaped forth Zhang Fei, the valiant warrior of the north, Gripped in his mighty hand the long octane-serpent halberd, His mustache bristled with anger, standing stiff like wire.
His round eyes glared, lightning flashes darted from them. Neither quailed in the fight, but the issue was undecided.
Guan Yu stood out in front, his soul vexed within him, His green-dragon saber shone white as frost in the sunlight, His bright colored fighting robe fluttered like butterfly wings, Demons and angels shrieked at the thunder of his horse hoofs, In his eyes was fierce anger, a fire to be quenched only in blood.
Next Liu Bei joined the battle, gripping his twin sword blades, The heavens themselves trembled at the majesty of his wrath.
These three closely beset Lu Bu and long drawn out was the battle, Always he warded their blows, never faltering a moment.
The noise of their shouting rose to the sky, and the earth reechoed it, The heat of battle ranged to the frozen pole star.
Worn out, feeling his strength fast ebbing, Lu Bu thought to flee, He glanced at the hills around and thither would fly for shelter, Then, reversing his halberd and lowering its lofty point, Hastily he fled, loosing himself from the battle; With head low bent, he gave the rein to his courser, Turned his face away and fled to Tiger Trap Pass.
The three brothers maintained the pursuit to the Pass. Looking up they saw an immense umbrella of black gauze fluttering in the west wind.
“Certainly there is Dong Zhuo,” cried Zhang Fei.
“What is the use of pursuing Lu Bu?
Better far seize the chiefest rebel and so pluck up the evil by the roots.” And he whipped up his steed toward the Pass.
To quell rebellion seize the leader if you can; If you need a wondrous service then first find a wondrous man.
The following chapters will unfold the result of the battle.
CHAPTER 6. Burning The Capital, Dong Zhuo Commits An Atrocity; Hiding The Imperial Hereditary Seal, Sun Jian Breaks Faith. Zhang Fei rode hard up to the Pass, but the defenders sent down stones and arrows like rain so that he could not enter, and he returned. The eight lords all joined in felicitations to the three brothers for their services, and the story of victory was sent to Yuan Shao, who ordered Sun Jian to make an immediate advance.
Thereupon Sun Jian with two trusty generals, Cheng Pu and Huang Gai, went over to the camp of Yuan Shu.
Tracing figures on the ground with his staff, Sun Jian said, “Dong Zhuo and I had no personal quarrel.
Yet now I have thrown myself into the battle regardless of consequences, exposed my person to the risk of wounds and fought bloody battles to their bitter end. And why? That I might be the means of ridding my country of a rebel and— for the private advantage of your family.
Yet you, heeding the slanderous tongue of certain counselor, formerly withheld the supplies absolutely necessary to me, and so I suffered defeat. How can you explain, General?” Yuan Shu, confused and frightened, had no word to reply.
He ordered the death of the slanderer to placate Sun Jian.
Then suddenly they told Sun Jian, “Some officer has come riding down from the Pass to see you, General; he is in the camp.” Sun Jian therefore took his leave and returned to his own camp, where he found the visitor was Li Jue, one of the much trusted commanders of Dong Zhuo.
“Wherefore come you?” said Sun Jian.
Li Jue replied, “You are the one person for whom my master has respect and admiration, and he sends me to arrange a matrimonial alliance between the two families.
He wishes that his daughter may become the wife of your son.” “What! Dong Zhuo, that rebel and renegade, that subverter of the throne! I wish I could destroy his nine generations as a thank-offering to the empire! Think you I would be willing to have an alliance with such a family?
I will not slay you as I ought, but go, and go quickly! Yield the Pass and I may spare your lives.
If you delay, I will grind your bones to powder and make mincemeat of your flesh.” Li Jue threw his arms over his head and ran out. He returned to his master and told him what a rude reception he had met with.
Dong Zhuo asked his adviser Li Ru how to reply to this.
Li Ru said, “Lu Bu's late defeat had somewhat blunted the edge of our army's desire for battle.
It would be well to return to the capital and remove the Emperor to Changan, as the street children had been lately singing:
“A Han on the west, a Han on the east.
The deer  will be safe in Changan.” Li Ru continued, “If you think out this couplet, it applies to the present juncture.
Half the first line refers to the founder of the dynasty, Liu Bang the Supreme Ancestor, who became ruler in the western city of Changan, which was the capital during twelve reigns.
The other half corresponds to Liu Xiu the Latter Han Founder who ruled from Luoyang, the eastern capital during twelve latter reigns.
The revolution of the heavens brings us back to this starting moment.
Thus if you remove to Changan, there will be no need for anxiety.” Dong Zhuo was exceedingly pleased and said, “Had you not spoken thus, I should not have understood!” Then taking Lu Bu with him, Dong Zhuo started at once for Capital Luoyang.
Here he called all the officials to a great council in the palace and addressed them, “After two centuries of rule here the royal fortune has been exhausted, and I perceive that the aura of rule has migrated to Changan, whither I now desire to move the court.
All you would better pack up for the journey.” Yang Biao, Minister of the Interior, said, “I pray you reflect. Within that city all is destruction.
There is no reason to renounce the ancestral temples and abandon the imperial tombs here. I fear the people will be alarmed.
It is easy to alarm them but difficult to pacify them.” “Do you oppose the state plans?” said Dong Zhuo angrily.
Another official, Grand Commander Huang Wan, supported his colleague, “In the era of Recommencement , Fan Chong of the Red Eyebrows rebels burned Changan to the ground and reduced the place to broken tiles.
The inhabitants scattered all but a few.
It is wrong to abandon these palaces here for a wasteland.” Dong Zhuo replied, “The East of the Pass is full of sedition, and all the empire is in rebellion. The city of Changan is protected by the Yaohan Mountains and the Hangu Pass.
Moreover, it is near Longyou, whence can be easily brought timber, stone, brick, and building materials. In a month or so palaces can be erected.
So an end to your wild words!” Yet Minister of Works Xun Shuang raised another protest against disturbing the people, but Dong Zhuo overbore him also.
“How can I stop to consider a few common people when my scheme affects the empire?” said Dong Zhuo.
That day the three objectors—Yang Biao, Huang Wan, and Xun Shuang —were removed from their offices and reduced to the rank of commoners.
As Dong Zhuo went out to get into his coach, he met two other officers who made obeisance. They were the Secretary General, Zhou Bi, and the Commander of the City Gate, Wu Qiong. Dong Zhuo stopped and asked them what they wanted.
Said Zhou Bi, “We venture to try to dissuade you from moving the capital to Changan.” Dong Zhuo replied, “They used to say you two were supporters of Yuan Shao; now he has already turned traitor and you are of the same party.” And without more ado he bade his guards take both outside the city and put them to death.
The command to remove to the new capital immediately was issued.
Speaking to Dong Zhuo, Li Ru pointed out, “We are short of money and food, and the rich people of Luoyang could be easily plundered.
This is a good occasion to link them to the rebels and to confiscate their properties.” Dong Zhuo sent five thousand troops out to plunder and slay. They captured many thousand wealthy householders and, having stuck flags on their heads saying they were “Traitors and Rebels,” drove them out of the city and put them to death. Their properties were all seized.
The task of driving forth the inhabitants, some millions, was given to two of Dong Zhuo's commanders, Li Jue and Guo Si.
The people were sent off in bands, each band between two parties of soldiers, who drove them forward Changan.
Enormous numbers fell by the road side and died in the ditches, and the escort plundered the fugitives and defiled the women.
A wail of sorrow arose to the very sky.
Dong Zhuo's final orders as he left Capital Luoyang were to burn the whole city; houses, palaces, temples, and everything was devoured by the flames.
The capital became but a patch of scorched earth.
Dong Zhuo sent Lu Bu to desecrate the tombs of the emperors and their consorts for the jewels therein, and the common soldiers took the occasion to dig up the graves of officers and plunder the cemeteries of the wealthy. The spoil of the city, gold and silver, pearls and silks, and beautiful ornaments, filled many carts.
With these and the persons of the Emperor and his household, Dong Zhuo moved off to the new capital in the first year of Inauguration of Tranquillity .
Luoyang being thus abandoned, the general of Dong Zhuo at River Si Pass, Zhao Cen, evacuated that post of vantage, which Sun Jian at once occupied. Liu Bei and his brothers took Tiger Trap Pass and the confederate lords advanced.
Sun Jian hastened to the late capital which was still in flames.
When he arrived, dense smoke hung all over it and spread for miles around. No living thing, not a fowl, or a dog, or a human being, remained.
Sun Jian told off his soldiers to extinguish the fires and set out camping places for the confederate lords.
Cao Cao went to see Yuan Shao and said, “Dong Zhuo has gone west; we ought to follow and attack his rear without loss of time; why do you remain inactive?” “All our colleagues are worn out, and there is nothing to be gained by attack,” said Yuan Shao.
Cao Cao said, “This moment was most propitious in the utter confusion that reigned, palaces burned, the Emperor abducted, the whole world upset, and no one knowing whither to turn. The villain will soon be ended, and a single blow could exterminate Dong Zhuo. Why not pursue?” But all the confederate lords seemed of one mind, and that mind was to postpone action. So they did nothing.
“Those unworthy ones cannot discuss worthy thing,” cried Cao Cao.
Then, he and his six generals—Xiahou Dun, Xiahou Yuan, Cao Ren, Cao Hong, Li Dian, and Yue Jin—and ten thousand troops started in pursuit. The road to the new capital led through Yingyang.
When Dong Zhuo reached it, Governor Xu Rong went to welcome the cavalcade.
Li Ru said, “As there is some danger of pursuit, it would be well to order the Governor of this place to lay an ambush outside the city.
He is to let the pursuers pass and be ready to cut off their retreat, when our army beats them off.
That will teach any others not to follow.” Then Dong Zhuo ordered Lu Bu to command the rear guard.
Very soon they saw Cao Cao coming up, and Lu Bu laughed at his colleague's foresight.
He set out his troops in fighting order.
Cao Cao rode forward, crying, “Rebels, abductors, drovers of the people, where are you going?” Lu Bu replied, “Treacherous simpleton, what mad words are these?” Then from Cao Cao army rode forth Xiahou Dun with his spear set, and Lu Bu and Xiahou Dun engaged.
The combat had hardly begun when Li Ru with a cohort came in from the left.
Cao Cao bade Xiahou Yuan meet this onslaught. However, on the other side appeared Guo Si and his company. Cao Cao sent Cao Ren against Guo Si.
The onrush on three sides was too much to withstand, and Lu Bu's army was overwhelming, so Xiahou Dun had to retire to the main line.
Thereupon Lu Bu's armored troops attacked and completed the defeat. The beaten army of Cao Cao turned toward Yingyang.
They got as far as the foot of a hill in the evening about the second watch, and the moon made it as light as day. Here they halted to reform.
Just as they were burying the boilers to prepare a meal, there arose a great noise of shouting on all sides and out came the troops of Governor Xu Rong from the ambush fresh to attack.
Cao Cao, thrown into a flurry, mounted and fled. He ran right in the way of the waiting Xu Rong.
Then he dashed off in another direction, but Xu Rong shot an arrow after him which struck him in the shoulder.
The arrow still in the wound, Cao Cao fled for his life.
As he went over the hill, two soldiers lying in wait among the grass suddenly dashed out and wounded his horse, which fell and rolled over.
And as he slipped from the saddle, he was seized and made prisoner.
Just then a horseman came, riding at full speed and whirling his sword up, cut down both the captors, and rescued Cao Cao.
It was Cao Hong. Cao Cao said, “I am doomed, Good Brother; go and save yourself!” “My lord, mount my horse quickly; I will go afoot,” said Cao Hong.
“If those wretches come up, what then?” said Cao Cao.
“The world can do without Cao Hong, but not without you, my lord!” “If I live, I shall owe you my life,” said Cao Cao. So he mounted.
Cao Hong tore off his own breastplate, gripped his sword and went on foot after the horse.
Thus they proceeded till the fourth watch when they saw before them a broad stream, and behind they still heard the shouts of pursuers drawing nearer and nearer. “This is my fate;” said Cao Cao, “I am really doomed.” Cao Hong helped Cao Cao down from his horse.
Then taking off his fighting robe and helmet, Cao Hong took the wounded man on his back and waded into the stream.
When they reached the further side, the pursuers had already gained the bank whence they shot arrows. Cao Cao all wet pushed on.
Dawn was near. They went on another ten miles and then sat down to rest under a precipice.
Suddenly loud shouting was heard and a party of horse appeared. It was Governor Xu Rong who had forded the river higher up.
Just at this moment Xiahou Dun and Xiahou Yuan, with several dozens men, came along.
“Hurt not my lord!” cried Xiahou Dun to Xu Rong, who at once rushed at him. But the combat was short.
Xu Rong speedily fell under a spear thrust of Xiahou Dun, and his troops were driven off. Before long Cao Cao's other generals arrived. Sadness and joy mingled in the greetings.
They gathered together the few hundreds of soldiers left and then returned to Luoyang.
When the confederate lords entered Luoyang, Sun Jian, after extinguishing the fires, camped within the walls, his own tent being set up near the Dynastic Temple.
His people cleared away the debris and closed the rifted tombs.
The gates were barred.
On the site of the Dynastic Temple he put up a mat shed containing three apartments, and here he begged the lords to meet and replace the sacred tablets, with solemn sacrifices and prayers.
This ceremony over, the others left and Sun Jian returned to his camp. That night the stars and moon vied with each other in brightness. As Sun Jian sat in the open air looking up at the heavens, he noticed a mist spreading over the stars of the Constellation Draco. “The Emperor's star is dulled,” said Sun Jian with a sigh.
“No wonder a rebellious minister disturbs the state, the people sit in dust and ashes, and the capital is a waste.” And his tears began to fall.
Then a soldier pointing to the south said, “There is a beam of colored light rising from a well.” Sun Jian bade his people light torches and descend into the well.
Soon they brought up the corpse of a woman, not in the least decayed although it had been there many days. She was dressed in palace clothing and from her neck hung an embroidered bag.
Opening this a red box was found, with a golden lock, and when the box was opened, they saw a jade seal, square in shape, an inch each way. On it were delicately engraved five dragons intertwined.
One corner had been broken off and repaired with gold.
There were eight characters in the seal style of engraving which interpreted read, “I have received the command from Heaven:
may my time be always long and prosperous.” Sun Jian showed this to his adviser, General Cheng Pu, who at once recognized it as the Imperial Hereditary Seal of the Emperor.
Cheng Pu said, “This seal has a history.
In olden days Bian He saw a phoenix sitting on a certain stone at the foot of the Jing Mountains. He offered the stone at court. The king of Chu split open the stone and found a piece of jade.
In the twenty-sixth year of Qin Dynasty , a jade cutter made a seal from it, and Li Si, the First Emperor's Prime Minister, engraved the characters.
Two years later, while the First Emperor was sailing in the Dongting Lake, a terrific storm arrived.
The Emperor threw the seal to the water as a propitiatory offering, and the storm immediately ceased.
Ten years later again, when the First Emperor was making a progress and had reached Huaying, an old man by the road side handed a seal to one of the attendants saying, 'This is now restored to the ancestral dragon,' and had then disappeared.
Thus the jewel returned to Qin.
“The next year the First Emperor died.
Later Zi Ying, the grandson of the First Emperor, presented the seal to Liu Bang the Supreme Ancestor, the founder of the Han Dynasty.
Two hundred years later, in Wang Mang's rebellion, the Emperor's mother, Lady Yuan, struck two of the rebels, Wang Xun and Su Xian, with the seal and broke off a corner, which was repaired with gold.
Liu Xiu the Latter Han Founder got possession of it at Yiyang, and it has been regularly bequeathed hereafter.
“I heard this treasured seal had been lost during the trouble in the Palace when the Ten Regular Attendants hurried off the Emperor. It was missed on His Majesty's return.
Now my lord has it and certainly will come to the imperial dignity. But you must not remain here in the north.
Quickly go home —Changsha, south of the Great River —where you can lay plans for the accomplishment of the great design.” “Your words exactly accord with my thoughts,” said Sun Jian.
“Tomorrow I will make an excuse that I am unwell and get away.” The soldiers were told to keep the discovery a secret. But one among them was a compatriot of the elected chief of the confederacy—Yuan Shao. He thought this might be of great advantage to him, so he stole away out of the camp and betrayed his master.
He went to Yuan Shao's camp, informed the secret, and received a liberal reward. Yuan Shao kept the informant in his own camp.
Next morning Sun Jian came to take leave, saying , “I am rather unwell and wish to return to Changsha.” Yuan Shao laughed, saying, “I know what you are suffering from; it is called the Imperial Hereditary Seal!” This was a shock to Sun Jian, and he paled but said, “Whence these words?” Yuan Shao said, “The armies were raised for the good of the state and to relieve it from oppression.
The seal is state property; and since you have got hold of it, you should publicly hand it over to me as chief. When Dong Zhuo has been slain, it must go back to the government.
What do you mean by concealing it and going away'“ “How could the seal get into my hands?” said Sun Jian.
“Where is the article out of the well?” “I have it not; why harass me thus?” “Quickly produce it, or it will be the worst for you.” Sun Jian pointing toward the heavens as an oath said, “If I have this jewel and am hiding it myself, may my end be unhappy and my death violent!” The lords all said, “After an oath like this we think he cannot have it.” Then Yuan Shao called out his informant.
“When you pulled that thing out of the well, was this man there?” asked he of Sun Jian.
Sun Jian's anger burst forth, and he sprang forward to kill the man.
Yuan Shao also drew his sword, saying, “You touch that soldier and it is an insult to me.” Behind Sun Jian, Generals Cheng Pu, Huang Gai, and Han Dang stepped forth; behind Yuan Shao, Generals Yan Liang and Wen Chou were ready to act. In a moment on all sides swords flew from their scabbards.
But the confusion was stayed by the efforts of the others, and Sun Jian left the assembly.
Soon he broke up his camp and marched to his own place. Yuan Shao was not satisfied.
He wrote to Jingzhou and sent the letter by a trusty hand to tell Imperial Protector Liu Biao to stop Sun Jian and take away the seal.
Just after this came the news of the defeat and misfortune of Cao Cao, and when he was coming home, Yuan Shao sent out to welcome him and conduct him into camp. They also prepared a feast to console him.
During the feast Cao Cao said sadly, “My object was for the public good, and all you gentlemen nobly supported me.
My plan was to get Yuan Shao with his Henei troops to approach Mengching; and my force at Qiao to keep Chenggao; while the others of you to hold Suanzao, to close the passes of Huanyuan and Daigu, and to take possession of the granaries, to control the points of vantage, and thus to secure the Capital District.
I planned for Yuan Shu with his Nanyang army to occupy the counties of Danshi and Xilin and go into Wu Pass to help the three supports.
All were to fortify their positions and not fight. Advantage lay in an uncertain military force showing the empire's possibilities of dealing with the rebellion.
Victory would have been ours at once.
But then came delays and doubts and inaction, and the confidence of the people was lost, and I am ashamed.” No reply was possible and the guests dispersed.
Cao Cao saw that the others mistrusted him and in his heart knew that nothing could be accomplished. So he led off his force to Yanzhou.
Then Gongsun Zan said to Liu Bei, “This Yuan Shao is an incapable, and things will turns chaotic.
We would better go too.” So he broke camp and went north.
At Pingyuan he left Liu Bei in command and went to strengthen his own position and refresh his troops.
The Imperial Protector of Yanzhou, Liu Dai, wished to borrow grain of the Governor of Dongjun, Qiao Mao.
Being denied, Liu Dai attacked the camp, killed Qiao Mao and took over all his army.
Yuan Shao seeing the confederacy breaking up also marched away and went east. On the way home, Sun Jian was passing through Jingzhou.
The Imperial Protector of Jingzhou, Liu Biao, was a scion of the imperial house and a native of Shanyang.
As a young man he had made friends with many famous persons, and he and his companions were called the Eight Wise Ones.
The other seven were: Chen Xiang from Runan; .2.
Fan Pang from Runan; .3.
Kong Yu from Luting; .4.
Fan Kang from Bohai; .5.
Tan Fu from Shanyang; .6. Zhang Jian from Shanyang; .7. Cen Zhi from Nanyang.
Liu Biao was friends with all these. He had three famous persons who helped him in the government of his region.
They were Kuai Liang and Kuai Yue from Yanping, and Cai Mao from Xiangyang.
When Yuan Shao's letter detailing the fault of Sun Jian arrived, Liu Biao ordered Kuai Yue and Cai Mao with ten thousand soldiers to bar the way.
When Sun Jian drew near, the force was arranged in fighting order and the leaders were in the front.
“Why are you thus barring the road with armed troops?” asked Sun Jian.
“Why do you, a servant of Han, secrete the Emperor's special seal? Leave it with me at once and you go free,” said Kuai Yue.
Sun Jian angrily ordered out General Huang Gai.
On the other side Cai Mao rode forth with his sword set to strike.
But after a few bouts Huang Gai dealt Cai Mao a blow with the iron whip on the armor just over the heart.
Cai Mao turned his steed and fled, and Sun Jian got through with a sudden rush.
However, there arose the sound of gongs and drums on the hills behind, and there was Liu Biao in person with a large army.
Sun Jian rode straight up to him and bowing low spoke, “Why did you, on the faith of a letter from Yuan Shao, try to coerce the chief of a neighboring region?” “You have concealed the state jewel, and I want you to restore it,” was Liu Biao's reply.
“If I have this thing, may I die a violent death!” “If you want me to believe you, let me search your baggage.” “What force have you that you dare come to flout me thus?” And only Liu Biao's prompt retirement prevented a battle. Sun Jian proceeded on his way.
But from the rear of the second hill an ambush suddenly discovered itself, and Kuai Yue and Cai Mao were still pursuing. Sun Jian seemed entirely hemmed in.
What does a man to hold the state jewel for, If its possession lead to strife?
How Sun Jian got clear of the difficulty will presently be told. CHAPTER 7.
Yuan Shao Fights Gongsun Zan At The River Pan; Sun Jian Attacks Liu Biao Across The Great River. At the close of the last chapter Sun Jian was surrounded. However, aided by Cheng Pu, Huang Gai, and Han Dang, he eventually fought his way through, though with the loss of more than half his troops. Sun Jian he returned to the South Land, southeast of the Great River .
Henceforward Sun Jian and Liu Biao were open enemies.
Yuan Shao was in Henei.
Being short of supplies, he sent to borrow from the Imperial Protector of Jizhou, Han Fu, whence he obtained the wherewithal to support his army.
Then one of Yuan Shao's advisers, Peng Ji, said to him, “You are really the strongest power here about; why then depend upon another for food?
Jizhou is rich and wide; why not seize it?” “I have no good plan,” replied Yuan Shao.
“You could secretly send a letter to Gongsun Zan, asking him to attack, promising him your support.
Imperial Protector Han Fu of Jizhou, being incapable, must ask you to take over his region, and you will get it without lifting a finger.” So the letter was sent.
When Gongsun Zan saw therein the proposal to make a joint attack and divide the territory, he agreed to give his help.
In the meantime Yuan Shao had sent to warn Han Fu of Gongsun Zan's threat.
Han Fu sought advice from Advisers Xun Chang and Xin Ping. Xun Chang said, “Governor Gongsun Zan of Beiping is commanding a huge and strong army.
If he came to attack us, we could not stand against him, especially if he had the help of Liu Bei and his brothers.
At present, Yuan Shao is bolder than most, and he has many able and famous leaders under him. You cannot do better than ask him to assist in administering this region.
Yuan Shao will certainly treat you with generosity, and you need have no fear from Gongsun Zan.” Han Fu agreed and sent a message to Yuan Shao by the hand of Guan Chun.
But the commander of the palace, Geng Wu, remonstrated with his master, saying, “Yuan Shao is a needy man with a hungry army and as dependent on us for existence as an infant in arms on its mother. Stop the flow of milk and the infant dies.
Why should you hand the region over to him?
It is nothing less than letting a tiger into the sheepfold.” Han Fu replied, “I am one of the clients of the Yuan family, and I know the abilities of Yuan Shao, which is far better than mine.
Why are you all so jealous?
The ancients counseled yielding to the sage.” Geng Wu sighed, “Jizhou is lost!” When the news got abroad, more than thirty officers of Jizhou left their employment and the city.
However, Geng Wu and Guan Chun hid in the suburbs to await the arrival of Yuan Shao. They had not long to wait.
Some days later, Yuan Shao with his soldiers came, and Geng Wu and Guan Chun tried to assassinate him with knives. This attempt failed.
Yuan Shao's generals, Yan Liang and Wen Chou, beheaded Geng Wu and Guan Chun instantly. Thus both of them died, and the object of their hatred entered Jizhou City.
Yuan Shao's first act was to confer on Han Fu a high sounding title— General Who Demonstrates Grand and Vigor Courage in Arms—, but the administration was entrusted to four of Yuan Shao's confidants—Tian Feng, Ju Shou, Xu You, and Peng Ji—who speedily deprived the Imperial Protector of all power.
Full of chagrin, Han Fu soon abandoned all, even his family, and rode alone to take refuge with the Governor of Chenliu, Zhang Miao.
Hearing of Yuan Shao's invasion, Gongsun Zan sent his brother, Gongsun Yue, to see the usurper and demand his share of the region. “I want to see your elder brother himself.
He and I have things to discuss,” said Yuan Shao.
Thus Gongsun Yue was sent back.
But after traveling some fifteen miles on the homeward road, Gongsun Yue saw a group of soldiers appear. “We are guards of Prime Minister Dong Zhuo,” cried the soldiers.
Instantly, Gongsun Yue was killed by a flight of arrows.
Those of Gongsun Yue's followers who escaped carried the news to their late master's brother.
Gongsun Zan was very angry and said, “Yuan Shao prevailed on me to attack, and now he has taken possession.
Also he pretends the murderers of my brother were not his people. Shall I not avenge my brother's injury?” Gongsun Zan brought up all his force to the attack.
Learning the movement, Yuan Shao sent out his army, and they met at River Pan. They halted on opposite sides of the river, over which was a bridge.
Gongsun Zan took his station on the bridge and cried to his enemy, “Renegade, how dared you mislead me?” Yuan Shao rode to the other end of the bridge and, pointing at Gongsun Zan, replied, “Han Fu yielded place to me because he was unequal to the rule.
What concern is it of yours?” Gongsun Zan replied, “Formerly you were regarded as loyal and public spirited, and we chose you chief of the confederacy.
Now your deeds prove you cruel and base and wolf-hearted in behavior.
How can you look the world in the face?” “Who will capture him?” cried Yuan Shao in a rage.
At once Wen Chou rode out with his spear set.
Gongsun Zan rode down the bridge to the enemy's side, where the two engaged.
Ten bouts showed Gongsun Zan the terrible power of Wen Chou, and so he drew off.
The enemy came on.
Gongsun Zan took refuge within his formation, but Wen Chou cut his way in and rode this way and that, slaying right and left.
The four best of Gongsun Zan's generals offered joint battle, but one fell under the first stroke of the doughty warrior, and the other three fled.
Wen Chou followed clearing through to the rear of the army. Gongsun Zan made for the mountains. Wen Chou forced his horse to its utmost pace, crying hoarsely, “Down! Dismount and surrender.” Gongsun Zan fled for life.
His bow and quiver dropped from his shoulders, his helmet fell off, and his hair streamed straight behind him as he rode in and out between the sloping hills.
Then his steed stumbled and he was thrown, rolling over and over to the foot of the slope.
Wen Chou was now very near and poising his spear for the thrust.
Then suddenly came out from the shelter of a grassy mound on the left a general of youthful mien, but sitting his steed bravely and holding a sturdy spear. He rode directly at Wen Chou, and Gongsun Zan crawled up the slope to look on. The new warrior was of middle height with bushy eyebrows and large eyes, a broad face and a heavy jowl, a youth of commanding presence. The two exchanged some fifty bouts and yet neither had the advantage.
Then Gongsun Zan's rescue force came along, and Wen Chou turned and rode away.
The youth did not pursue.
Gongsun Zan hurried down the hill and asked the young fellow who he was.
He bowed low and replied, “My name is Zhao Yun from Changshan.
I first served Yuan Shao; but when I saw that he was disloyal to his prince and careless of the welfare of the people, I left him and I was on my way to offer service to you.
This meeting in this place is most unexpected.” Gongsun Zan was very pleased, and the two went together to the camp, where they at once busied themselves with preparations for a new battle.
Next day Gongsun Zan prepared for fight by dividing his army into two wings.
He had five thousand cavalry in the center, all mounted on white horses.
Gongsun Zan had formerly seen service against the frontier tribes, the Qiang Peoples, where he always placed his white horses in the van of his army, and thus he had won the sobriquet of General Who Commands White Horses.
The tribes held him so much in fear that they always fled as soon as the white horses, their sacred creatures, appeared.
On Yuan Shao's side Yan Liang and Wen Chou were Leaders of the Van. Each had one thousand of archers and crossbowmen.
They were set out half on either side, those on the left to shoot at Gongsun Zan's right and those on the right to shoot at his left.
In the center was Qu Yi with eight hundred bowmen and ten thousand of foot and horse. Yuan Shao took command of the reserve force in the rear.
In this fight Gongsun Zan employed his new adherent Zhao Yun for the first time and, as Gongsun Zan did not feel assured of Zhao Yun's good faith, put him in command of a company at the rear.
The Van Leader was Yan Guang, and Gongsun Zan himself commanded the center.
He took his place on horseback on the bridge beside an enormous red standard on which was displayed the word “Commanding General” in gold embroidery.
From sunrise to noon the drums rolled for the attack, but Yuan Shao's army made no move.
Qu Yi made his bowmen hide under their shields.
They heard the roar of explosions, the whistling of arrows, and the rattle of the drums, as Yan Guang approached from the other side, but Qu Yi and his men lay closer than ever and never stirred.
They waited till Yan Guang had got close on them and then, as the sound of a bomb rent the air, the whole eight hundred men let fly their arrows in a cloud.
Yan Guang was quite taken aback and would have retired, but Qu Yi rode furiously toward him, whirled up his sword and cut him down. So Gongsun Zan's army lost that battle.
The two wings that should have come to the rescue were kept back by the bowmen under Yan Liang and Wen Chou.
Yuan Shao's troops advanced right up to the bridge.
Then Qu Yi rode forward, slew the standard bearer, and hacked through the staff of the embroidered banner.
Seeing this, Gongsun Zan turned his steed and galloped away. Qu Yi followed.
But just as he caught up the fugitive, there came prancing forth Zhao Yun, who rode directly at him with spear ready to strike.
After a few bouts Qu Yi was laid in the dust.
Then Zhao Yun attacked the soldiers and turned the tide. Plunging forward on this side, dashing in on that, he went through as if there were no antagonists and, seeing this, Gongsun Zan turned and came again into the fight. The final victory was on his side.
From the scouts sent to find out how the battle went, Yuan Shao heard the good news of Qu Yi's success in slaying the standard bearer, capturing the flag, and his pursuit.
So Yuan Shao took no further care but rode out with his General Tian Feng and a few guards to look on at the enemy and enjoy his victory. “Ha ha!” Yuan Shao laughed.
“Gongsun Zan is an incapable.” But even as Yuan Shao spoke, he saw in front the redoubtable Zhao Yun.
His guards hastened to prepare their bows, but before they could shoot, Zhao Yun was in their midst, and men were falling before him wherever he went. The others fled.
Gongsun Zan's army then gathered round and hemmed in Yuan Shao.
Tian Feng then said to his master, “Sir, take refuge in this empty building here.” But Yuan Shao dashed his helmet to the ground, crying “The brave man rather faces death in the battle than seeks safety behind a wall!” This bold speech gave new courage to his soldiers who now fought fiercely and with such success that Zhao Yun could nowhere force his way in. Yuan Shao was soon reinforced by the arrival of his main body and Yan Liang, and the two armies pressed forward.
Zhao Yun could only just get Gongsun Zan safe out of the press. Then they fought their way back to the bridge.
But Yuan Shao's troops still came on and fought their way across the bridge, forcing multitudes of their adversaries into the water, where many were drowned. Yuan Shao was leading in person and his troops still advanced.
But not more than two miles, for soon a great shouting was heard behind some hills, whence suddenly burst out a body of troops led by Liu Bei, Guan Yu, and Zhang Fei.
At Pingyuan they had heard of the struggle between their protector and his enemy, Yuan Shao, and had at once set out to help.
Now the three riders, each with his peculiar weapon, flew straight at Yuan Shao, who was so frightened that his soul seemed to leave his body and fly beyond the confines of heaven. His sword fell from his hand and he fled for his life.
He was chased across the bridge when Gongsun Zan called in his army and they returned to camp.
After the usual greetings Gongsun Zan said, “If you had not come to our help, we should have been in very bad case.” Liu Bei and Zhao Yun were made acquainted with each other, and a warm affection sprang up from the very first so that they were always together.
Yuan Shao had lost that battle, and Gongsun Zan would not risk another. They strengthened their defenses, and the armies lay inactive for over a month.
In the meantime news of the fighting had reached Capital Changan, and Dong Zhuo was told.
His adviser, Li Ru, went to see his master and said, “The two active leaders of today are Yuan Shao and Gongsun Zan, who are at grips at River Pan.
Pretend you have an imperial command to make peace between them, and both will support you out of gratitude for your intervention.” “Good!” said Dong Zhuo.
So he sent the Imperial Guardian, Ma Midi, and the Minister of the Palace Bureau, Zhao Qi, on the mission.
When these men were arriving the North of Yellow River, Yuan Shao sent out to welcome them thirty miles from his headquarters and received the imperial command with the greatest respect.
Then the two officers went to Gongsun Zan and made known their errand. Gongsun Zan sent letters to his adversary proposing friendship.
The two emissaries returned to report their task accomplished. Gongsun Zan drew off his army.
He also sent up a memorial eulogizing Liu Bei, who was raised to the rank of Governor of Pingyuan.
The farewell between Liu Bei and Zhao Yun was affecting. They held each other's hands a long time, their eyes streaming with tears, and could not tear themselves apart.
Zhao Yun said with a sob, “I used to think Gongsun Zan a true hero, but 1 see now that he is no different from Yuan Shao.
They are both alike.” “But you are now in his service; we shall surely meet again,” said Liu Bei.
Both men wept freely as they separated.
Now Yuan Shu in Nanyang, hearing that his brother had come into Jizhou, sent to beg a thousand horses.
The request was refused and enmity sprang up between the brothers.
Yuan Shu also sent to Jingzhou to borrow grain, which Imperial Protector Liu Biao would not send.
In his resentment, Yuan Shu wrote to Sun Jian trying to get him to attack Liu Biao. The letter ran like this:
“When Liu Biao stopped you on your way home, it was at the instigation of my brother.
Now the same two have planned to fall upon your territories southeast of the Great River, wherefore you should at once strike at Liu Biao.
I will capture my brother for you and both resentments will be appeased.
You will get Jingzhou, and I shall have Jizhou.” “I cannot bear Liu Biao,” said Sun Jian as he finished reading this letter.
“He certainly did bar my way home, and I may wait many years for my revenge if I let slip this chance.” He called a council.
“You may not trust Yuan Shu; he is very deceitful,” said Cheng Pu.
“I want revenge on my own part; what care I for his help?” said Sun Jian.
He dispatched Huang Gai to prepare a river fleet, arm and provision them. Big warships were to take horses on board. The force soon set out.
News of these preparations came to Liu Biao, and he hastily summoned his advisers and warriors.
Kuai Liang told him to be free from anxiety, and said, “Put General Huang Zu at the head of the Jiangxia army to make the first attack and you, Sir, support him with the forces from Xiangyang.
Let Sun Jian come riding the rivers and straddling the lakes; what strength will he have left after arriving here?” So Liu Biao bade Huang Zu prepare to march, and a great army was assembled.
Here it may be said that Sun Jian had four sons, all the issue of his wife who was of the Wu family.
Their names in order were Sun Ce, Sun Quan, Sun Yi, and Sun Kuang.
Sun Jian had a second wife who was the sister of his first wife. And the second wife bore him a son and a daughter, the former called Sun Lang, the latter Sun Ren.
Sun Jian had also adopted a son from the Yu family named Sun Shao.
And he had a younger brother named Sun Jing. As Sun Jian was leaving on this expedition, his brother Sun Jing with all his six sons stood in front of Sun Jian's steed and dissuaded him, saying, “Dong Zhuo is the real ruler of the state, for the Emperor is a weakling. The whole country is in rebellion, every one is scrambling for territory.
Our area is comparatively peaceful, and it is wrong to begin a war merely for the sake of a little resentment.
I pray you, Brother, think before you start.” Sun Jian replied, “Brother, say no more.
I desire to make my strength felt throughout the empire, and shall I not avenge my injuries?” “Then father, if you must go, let me accompany you,” said the eldest son Sun Ce.
This request was granted, and father and son embarked to go to ravage the city of Fankou.
Now Huang Zu had placed archers and crossbowmen along the river bank. When the ships approached, a flight of arrows met them.
Sun Jian ordered his troops to remain under cover in the ships, which then sailed to and fro, drawing the fire for three days.
Several times the ships pretended to land, and this drew showers of arrows from the bank.
At last the arrows of the defenders were all shot away and Sun Jian, who collected them, found he had many myriads.
Then with a fair wind Sun Jian's troops shot them back to the enemy.
Those on the bank were thrown into great disorder and retired.
The army then landed. Two divisions led by Cheng Pu and Huang Gai set out for Huang Zu's camp along different roads, and between them marched Han Dang.
Under this triple attack Huang Zu was worsted. He left Fankou and hastened to Dengcheng.
Leaving the ships under the command of Huang Gai, Sun Jian led the pursuing force.
Huang Zu came out of his city and drew up for battle in the open country.
When Sun Jian had disposed his army, he rode out to the standard.
Sun Ce, clad in armor, placed himself beside his father.
Huang Zu rode out with two generals—Zhang Hu from Jiangxia and Chen Sheng from Xiangyang.
Flourishing his whip, Huang Zu abused his enemy, “You swarm of rebels from Changsha!
Why do you invade the land of a scion of the ruling house?” Zhang Hu challenged to combat, and Han Dang went out to accept.
The two champions fought thirty bouts, and then Chen Sheng, seeing his fellow general becoming exhausted, rode to his aid.
Sun Jian saw Chen Sheng coming, laid aside his spear, reached for his bow, and shot an arrow wounding Chen Sheng in the face. He fell from his horse. Panic seized upon Zhang Hu at the fall of his comrade, and he could no longer defend himself.
Then Han Dang with a slash of his sword clove Zhang Hu's skull in twain.
Both having fallen, Cheng Pu galloped up to make prisoner of Huang Zu, who threw off his helmet, slipped from his steed, and mingled for safety among his troops.
Sun Jian led on the attack and drove the enemy to the Han River where he ordered Huang Gai to move the fleet upriver and moor there.
Huang Zu led his defeated troops back and told Liu Biao, saying, “Sun Jian was too strong for my army.” Kuai Liang was called in to advise and he said, “Our newly defeated soldiers have no heart for fighting now.
Therefore we must fortify our position, while we seek help from Yuan Shao.
Then we can extricate ourselves.” “A stupid move,” said Cai Mao.
“The enemy is at the city gates; shall we fold our hands and wait to be slain?
Give me troops and I will go out and fight to the finish.” So Cai Mao was placed in command of ten thousand troops and went out to the Xian Hills where he drew up his battle line.
Sun Jian led the invaders, now flushed with success.
When Cai Mao approached, Sun Jian looked at him and said, “He is brother-in-law to Liu Biao; who will capture him?” Cheng Pu set his iron-spined lance and rode out.
After a few bouts Cai Mao turned and fled.
Sun Jian's army rode in and slaughtered till corpses filled the countryside, and Cai Mao took refuge in Xiangyang.
Kuai Liang said, “Cai Mao ought to be put to death by military law.
This defeat was due to his obstinacy.” But Liu Biao was unwilling to punish the brother of his newly wedded wife.
Sun Jian surrounded Xiangyang and assailed the walls daily.
One day a fierce gale sprang up and the pole bearing his standard was broken. “Very inauspicious!” said Han Dang.
“We ought to go back.” Sun Jian said, “I have won every battle and the city is on the point of falling.
Shall I return because the wind breaks a flagstaff?” He flouted the advice and attacked the walls still more vigorously. Within the city the defenders had seen an omen.
Kuai Liang told Liu Biao, “Last night I saw that a great star fall into the sky corresponding to Sun Jian's territory.
I calculated that it inferred the fall of Sun Jian.” Then Kuai Liang advised Liu Biao to seek help from Yuan Shao as quickly as possible.
So Liu Biao wrote. Then he asked who would undertake to fight his way through the blockade with the letter.
One Lu Gong, a warrior of great strength, offered himself for this service.
Kuai Liang said, “If you undertake this service, listen to my advice. You will have five hundred soldiers; choose good bowmen. Dash through the enemy's formation and make for Xian Hills.
You will be pursued; but send a hundred soldiers up the hill to prepare large stones, and place a hundred archers in ambush in the woods.
These are not to flee from the pursuers but to beguile them along devious ways round to the place where the boulders have been prepared. There stones will be rolled down and arrows shot.
If you succeed, fire off a series of bombs as a signal, and the armies in the city will come out to help.
If you are not pursued, get away as fast as possible.
Tonight will be suitable as there is very little moon. Start at dusk.” Lu Gong having received these directions, prepared his force to carry them out.
As soon as day began to close in, he went quietly out at the east gate.
Sun Jian was in his tent when he heard shouting and a soldier came to report: “There was a group of horsemen going out from the city.” Sun Jian at once mounted and rode out with thirty horsemen to discover the cause.
Lu Gong's troops had already hidden themselves in the thick woods.
Sun Jian rode ahead of his escort, and soon he found himself alone and close to the enemy.
He called out to them to halt.
Lu Gong at once turned back and came as if to fight.
But they had only exchanged a single pass when Lu Gong again fled, taking the road among the hills.
Sun Jian followed but soon lost sight of his foe.
Sun Jian turned up the hill. Then the gongs clanged and down the hills fell showers of stones, while from among the trees the arrows flew in clouds. Sun Jian was hit by several arrows and a huge stone crushed in his head. Both he and his steed were killed.
Sun Jian was only thirty-seven years old at his death.
His escort was overpowered and every man of them slain. Then Lu Gong let off a series of bombs, the sign of success, as agreed.
At this signal Huang Zu, Kuai Yue, and Cai Mao led three armies out of the city and fell upon the Changsha troops, throwing them into the utmost confusion.
When Huang Gai heard the sound of battle, he led up the troops from the ships.
He met Huang Zu and took Huang Zu prisoner after a brief fight.
Cheng Pu set out to bear the sad news to Sun Ce. While he was seeking a way out, he came across Lu Gong.
Cheng Pu at once put his horse at full speed and engaged Lu Gong. After a few bouts Lu Gong went down under a spear thrust.
The battle became general and continued till daylight broke, when each drew off his army.
Liu Biao withdrew into the city.
When Sun Ce returned to the river, he heard that his father had perished in the fight, and his body had been carried within the enemy's walls.
He uttered a great cry, and the army joined him with wailing and tears.
“How can I return home leaving my father's corpse with them?” cried Sun Ce.
Huang Gai said, “We have Huang Zu as our prisoner.
Let one enter the city and discuss peace, giving up our prisoner for our lord's body.” He had barely finished speaking when an officer in the army, Huan Jie, offered himself as messenger, saying, “I am an old friend of Liu Biao.
I volunteer to take the mission.” Sun Ce agreed. So Huan Jie went and peace was discussed.
Liu Biao told Huan Jie, saying, “The body is already laid in a coffin and ready to be delivered as soon as Huang Zu returned.
Let us both cease fighting and never again invade each other's territories.” Huan Jie thanked him and took his leave.
But as Huan Jie went down the steps, Kuai Liang suddenly broke in, saying, “No, no!
Let me speak and I will see to it that not a single enemy can survive.
I pray you first put this person to death and then to employ my means.” Pursuing his enemy, Sun Jian dies; On a peaceful mission, Huan Jie is threatened.
The fate of the ambassador will be disclosed in a later chapter. CHAPTER 8. Wang Yun Prepares The Chaining Scheme; Dong Zhuo Rages At Phoenix Pavilion.
This is what Kuai Liang said, “Sun Jian is now gone and his sons are but youths.
Seize this moment of weakness to break into Changsha, and it is yours in one beat of the drum.
If you return the corpse and make peace, you give them time to grow powerful, and evil will ensue to Jingzhou.” “How can I leave Huang Zu in their hands?” said Liu Biao.
“Why not sacrifice this blundering warrior for a region?” “But he is my dear friend and to abandon him is wrong.” So Huan Jie was allowed to return to his own side with the understanding that Sun Jian's dead body should be given in exchange. Sun Ce freed his prisoner, brought away his father's coffin, and the fighting ceased.
Sun Jian was interred in the plains of Que.
When the ceremonies were over, Sun Ce led his army home again.
In Changsha, the southern territory of the Great River , Sun Ce set himself to the task of ruling well.
Being humble and generous, he invited to his side humans of wisdom and valor and so bore himself that all the best and bravest of the country gathered about him.
Meanwhile, Dong Zhuo at Capital Changan, when he heard of the death of the turbulent Sun Jian, said, “An evil that pressed hard upon my heart has been removed!” He asked what children Sun Jian had left, and when they told him the eldest was but seventeen, he dismissed all anxiety from his thoughts.
From this time forward his arrogance and domineering spirit waxed worse and worse. He styled himself “Imperial Rector,” a name full of honor, and in all his behavior aped imperial state.
He created his younger brother, Dong Min, Lord of Huazhou and made him Commander of the Left Army.
A nephew, Dong Huang, was made Court Counselor and placed in command of the Palace Guard, and everyone of his clan, young or old, was ennobled.
Eighty miles from the capital Dong Zhuo laid out a city called Meiwo, an exact replica of Changan, with its palaces, granaries, treasuries, and magazines, and employed a quarter of a million people to build it. Here he accumulated supplies sufficient for twenty years.
He selected eight hundred of the most beautiful maidens and sent them to dwell in his new city. The stores of wealth in every form were incalculable.
All his family and retainers found quarters in this new city.
Dong Zhuo visited his city at intervals of a month or so, and every visit was like an imperial progress, with booths by the roadside to refresh the officials and courtiers who attended him to the northwest Royal Gate and saw him start.
On one occasion Dong Zhuo spread a great feast for all those assembled to witness his departure; and while it was in progress, there arrived a large number of rebels from the north who had voluntarily surrendered.
The tyrant had them brought before him as he sat at table and meted out to them wanton cruelties. The hands of this one were lopped off, the feet of that; one had his eyes gouged out; another lost his tongue. Some were boiled to death.
Shrieks of agony arose to the very heavens, and the courtiers were faint with terror. But the author of the misery ate and drank, chatted and smiled as if nothing was going on.
Another day Dong Zhuo was presiding at a great gathering of officers who were seated in two long rows.
After the wine had gone up and down several times, Lu Bu entered and whispered a few words in his master's ear. Dong Zhuo smiled and said, “He was always so. Take Minister Zhang Wen outside.” The others all turned pale.
In a little time a serving man brought the head of their fellow guest on a red dish and showed it to their host. They nearly died with fright.
“Do not fear,” said Dong Zhuo smiling.
“Minister Zhang Wen was in league with Yuan Shu to assassinate me. A letter he wrote fell by mistake into the hands of my son so I have had him put to death.
You gentlemen, who have no reason, need have no fear.” The officials hastened to disperse.
One of them, Minister of the Interior Wang Yun, who had witnessed all this, returned to his palace very pensive and much distressed.
The same evening, a bright moonlight night, he took his staff and went strolling in his private garden. Standing near one of the creeper trellises, he gazed up at the sky and the tears rolled down his cheeks.
Suddenly he heard a rustle in the Peony Pavilion and someone sighing deeply.
Stealthily creeping near, he saw there one of the household singing girls named Diao Chan.
This maiden had been brought up in his palace, where she had been taught to sing and dance. At twenty-one, she was then just bursting into womanhood, a pretty and clever girl whom Wang Yun regarded more as a daughter than a dependant.
After listening for some time, Wang Yun suddenly called out, “What mischief are you up to there, you naughty girl?” The maiden dropped on her knees in terror, saying, “Would thy unworthy handmaid dare to do anything wrong?” “Then what are you sighing about out here in the darkness?” “May thy handmaid speak from the bottom of her heart?” “Tell me the whole truth; do not conceal anything.” And the girl said, “Thy handmaid has been the recipient of bountiful kindness.
She has been taught to sing and dance and been treated so kindly that were she torn in pieces for her lord's sake, it would not repay a thousandth part.
She has noticed lately that her lord's brows have been knit in distress and knows it is on account of the state troubles. But she has not dared to ask.
This evening he seemed more sad than ever, and she was miserable on her lord's account. But she did not know she would be seen.
Could she be of any use she would not shrink from a myriad deaths.” A sudden idea came to Wang Yun, and he stuck the ground with his staff.
And he said, “Who would think that the fate of Han lay on your palm?
Come with me!” The girl followed him into the house.
Then he dismissed all the waiting attendants, placed Diao Chan on a chair and bowed before her. She was frightened and threw herself on the ground, asking in terror what it all meant.
Said Wang Yun, “You can sympathize with the people of Han,” and the fount of his tears opened afresh.
“My lord, as thy handmaid said just now, use her in any way; thy handmaid will never shrink,” said the girl.
Wang Yun knelt, saying, “The people are on the brink of destruction, the prince and his officers are in jeopardy, and you, you are the only savior.
That wretch Dong Zhuo wants to depose the Emperor and not a person among us can find means to stop him. Now he has a son, a bold warrior it is true, but both father and son have a weakness for beauty, and I am going to use what I may call the 'chaining' plan.
I shall first propose you in marriage to Lu Bu and then, after you are betrothed, I shall present you to Dong Zhuo, and you will take every opportunity to force them asunder and turn sway their countenances from each other, cause the son to kill his adopted father and so put an end to the great evil.
Thus you may restore the altars of the land that it may live again.
All this lies within your power; will you do it?” “Thy handmaid has promised not to recoil from death itself.
You may use my poor self in any way, and I must do my best.” “But if this gets abroad then we are all lost!” “Fear not;” said she, “if thy handmaid does not show gratitude, may she perish beneath a myriad swords!” “Thank you, thank you!” said Wang Yun.
Then Wang Yun took from the family treasury many pearls and bade a cunning jeweler make therewith a fine golden headdress, which was sent as a present to Lu Bu.
He was delighted and came to thank the donor.
When Lu Bu arrived, he was met at the gate by Wang Yun himself and within found a table full of dainties for his delectation. He was conducted into the private apartments and placed in the seat of honor.
Lu Bu said, “I am but a simple officer in the palace of a minister; you are an exalted officer of state; why am I treated thus?” “Because in the whole land there is no hero your equal.
Poor Wang Yun bows not to an officer's rank; poor Wang Yun bows to his ability “ This gratified Lu Bu mightily, and his host continued to praise and flatter and ply him with wine and to talk of the virtues of the Prime Minister and his henchman.
Lu Bu laughed and drank huge goblets.
Presently most of the attendants were sent away, only a few kept to press the guest to drink.
When the guest was very mellow, Wang Yun suddenly said, “Let the child come in!” Soon appeared two attendants, dressed in white, leading between them the exquisite and fascinating Diao Chan.
“Who is this?” said Lu Bu startled into sobriety.
“This is my little girl, Diao Chan. You will not be annoyed at my familiarity, will you?
But you have been so very friendly, I thought you would like to see her.” Wang Yun bade Diao Chan present a goblet of wine, and her eyes met those of the warrior.
Wang Yun feigning intoxication said, “My little child begs you, General, to take a cup or two.
We all depend upon you, all our house.” Lu Bu begged Diao Chan to sit down. She pretended to wish to retire.
Her master pressed her to remain, saying that she might do so since the guest was a dear friend.
So she took a seat modestly near her master.
Lu Bu kept his gaze fixed upon the maid, while he swallowed cup after cup of wine. “I should like to present her to you as a handmaid; would you accept?” said Wang Yun. The guest started up.
“If that is so, you may rely upon my abject gratitude,” said Lu Bu.
“We will choose a propitious day ere long and send her to the palace.” Lu Bu was overjoyed.
He could not keep his eyes off Diao Chan, and loving glances flashed from her liquid eyes.
However the time came for the guest to leave, and Wang Yun said, “I would ask you to remain the night, but the Prime Minister might suspect something.” Lu Bu thanked him again and again and departed.
Some few days later when Wang Yun was at court and Lu Bu was absent, Wang Yun bowed low before Dong Zhuo and said, “I wish that you would deign to come to dine at my lowly cottage; could your noble thought bend that way?” “Should you invite me, I would certainly hasten,” was the reply.
Wang Yun thanked him. Then Wang Yun went home and prepared in the reception hall a feast in which figured every delicacy from land and sea. Beautiful embroideries surrounded the chief seat in the center, and elegant curtains were hung within and without.
At noon next day, when the Prime Minister arrived, Wang Yun met him at the gate in full court costume.
Wang Yun stood by while Dong Zhuo stepped out of his chariot, and Dong Zhuo and a host of one hundred armed guards crowded into the hall.
Dong Zhuo took his seat at the top, his suite fell into two lines right and left; while Wang Yun stood humbly at the lower end. Dong Zhuo bade his people conduct Wang Yun to a place beside himself.
Said Wang Yun, “The great Prime Minister's abundant virtue is as the high mountains; neither the ancient sages—Yi Yin and Duke Zhou—could attain thereto.” Dong Zhuo smiled.
They bore in the dishes and the wine, and the music began. Wang Yun plied his guest with assiduous flattery and studied deference.
When it grew late and the wine had done its work, Dong Zhuo was invited to the inner chamber.
So he sent away his guards and went.
Here the host raised a goblet and drank to his guest, saying, “From my youth up I have understood something of astrology and have been studying the aspect of the heavens.
I read that the days of Han are numbered, and that the great Prime Minister's merits command the regard of all the world, as when King Shun succeeded King Yao, and King Yu continued the work of King Shun, all by the strength of their own merits, conforming to the mind of Heaven and the desire of people.” “How dare I expect this?” said Dong Zhuo.
“From the days of old, those who walk in the way have replaced those who deviate therefrom; those who lack virtue have fallen before those who possess it.
Can one escape fate?” “If indeed the decree of Heaven devolves on me; you shall be held the first in merit!” said Dong Zhuo. Wang Yun bowed.
Then lights were brought in and all the attendants were dismissed, save the serving maids to hand the wine. So the evening went on.
Presently Wang Yun said, “The music of these everyday musicians is too commonplace for your ear, but there happens to be in the house a little maid that might please you.” “Excellent!” said the guest.
Then a curtain was lowered.
The shrill tones of reed instruments rang through the room, and presently some attendants led forward Diao Chan, who then danced on the outside of the curtain. A poem praises her:
For a palace this maiden was born, So timid, so graceful, so slender, Like a tiny bird flitting at morn Over the dew-laden lily buds tender. Were this exquisite maid only mine, For never a mansion I'd pine. Another poem runs thus:
The music falls; the dancer comes, a swallow gliding in, A dainty little damsel, soft as silk; Her beauty captivates the guest yet saddens him within, For he must soon depart and leave her there.
She smiles; no gold could buy that smile, no other smiled so, No need to deck her form with jewels rare.
But when the dance is over and coy glances come and go, Then who shall be the chosen of the fair?
The dance ended.
Dong Zhuo bade them lead the maiden in, and she came, bowing low as she approached him. He was much taken with her beauty and modest grace.
“Who is she?” said Dong Zhuo.
“A singing girl; her name is Diao Chan.” “Then can she sing?” The master bade her sing, and she did so to the accompaniment of castanets. There is a measure describing her youthful beauty:
You stand, a dainty maiden, Your cherry lips so bright, Your teeth so pearly white, Your fragrant breath love-laden; Yet is your tongue a sword; Cold death is the reward Of loving thee, O maiden.
Dong Zhuo was delighted and praised her warmly.
She was told to present a goblet of wine to the guest which he took from her hands and then asked her age.
She replied, “Thy unworthy handmaid is twenty-one.” “A perfect little fairy!” said Dong Zhuo.
Then Wang Yun rose and said, “If the Prime Minister would not mind, I should like to offer him this little maid.” “How could I be grateful enough for such a kindness!” “She would be most fortunate if she could be your servant,” said Wang Yun.
Dong Zhuo thanked his host warmly.
Then the orders were given to prepare a closed carriage and convey Diao Chan to the Prime Minister's palace.
Soon after Dong Zhuo took his leave, and Wang Yun accompanied him the whole way.
After he had taken leave, Wang Yun mounted to ride homeward. Half way he met two lines of guards with red lamps who were escorting Lu Bu who was on horseback and armed with his trident halberd. Seeing Wang Yun, Lu Bu at once reined in, stopped, seized him by the sleeve, and said angrily, “You promised Diao Chan to me and now you have given her to the Prime Minister:
what foolery is this?” Wang Yun checked him, saying, “This is no place to talk; I pray you come to my house.” So they went together, and Wang Yun led Lu Bu into a private room.
After the usual exchange of polite greetings, Wang Yun said, “Why do you find fault with me, General?” “Somebody told me that you had sent Diao Chan to the Prime Minister's palace in a covered carriage: what does it mean?” “Of course you do not understand.
Yesterday when I was at court, the Prime Minister told me he had something to talk to me about in my own house.
So naturally I prepared for his coming, and while we were at dinner he said, 'I have heard something of a girl named Diao Chan whom you have promised to my son Lu Bu.
I thought it was mere rumor so I wanted to ask if it was true.
Beside I should like to see her.' I could not say no, so she came in and made her bow to the lord of lords.
Then he said that it was a lucky day and he would take her away with him and betroth her to you. Just think, Sir:
when the Prime Minister had come himself, could I stop him?” “You were not so very wrong;” said Lu Bu, “but for a time I had misunderstood you.
I owe you an apology.” “The girl has a small trousseau, which I will send as soon as she has gone over to your dwelling.” Lu Bu thanked him and went away.
Next day he went into the Palace to find out the truth, but could hear nothing.
Then he made his way into the private quarters and questioned the maids.
Presently one told him that the Prime Minister had brought home a new bedfellow the night before and was not up yet.
Lu Bu was very angry. Next he crept round behind his master's sleeping apartment.
By this time Diao Chan had risen and was dressing her hair at the window. Looking out she saw a long shadow fall across the little lake.
She recognized the headdress, and peeping around she saw it was indeed no other than Lu Bu.
Thereupon she contracted her eyebrows, simulating the deepest grief, and with her dainty handkerchief she wiped her eyes again and again.
Lu Bu stood watching her a long time.
Soon after he went in to give morning greeting.
Dong Zhuo was sitting in the reception room. Seeing his henchman, Dong Zhuo asked if there was anything new. “Nothing,” was the reply. Lu Bu waited while Dong Zhuo took his morning meal.
As he stood beside his master, he glanced over at the curtain and saw a woman there behind the screen showing a half face from time to time and throwing amorous glances at him. He felt it was his beloved and his thoughts flew to her.
Presently Dong Zhuo noticed his expression and began to feel suspicious. “If there is nothing, you may go,” said Dong Zhuo.
Lu Bu sulkily withdrew.
Dong Zhuo now thought of nothing but his new mistress and for more than a month neglected all affairs, devoting himself entirely to pleasure.
Once he was a little indisposed, and Diao Chan was constantly at his side, never even undressing to show her solicitude. She gratified his every whim. Dong Zhuo grew more and more fond of her.
One day Lu Bu went to inquire after his father's health.
Dong Zhuo was asleep, and Diao Chan was sitting at the head of his couch. Leaning forward she gazed at the visitor, with one hand pointed to her heart, the other at Dong Zhuo asleep, and her tears fell.
Lu Bu felt heartbroken.
Dong Zhuo drowsily opened his eyes; and seeing his son's gaze fixed on something behind him, he turned over and saw who it was.
He angrily rebuked his son, saying, “Dare you make love to my beauty?” He told the servants to turn Lu Bu out, shouting, “Never let him enter here again!” Lu Bu went off home very wrath.
Meeting Li Ru, he told Li Ru the cause of his anger.
The adviser hastened to see his master and said, “Sir, you aspire to be ruler of the empire, why then for a small fault do you blame the General?
If he turns against you, it is all over.” “Then what can I do?” said Dong Zhuo.
“Recall him tomorrow; treat him well; overwhelm him with gifts and fair words; and all will be well.” So Dong Zhuo did so.
He sent for Lu Bu and was very gracious and said, “I was irritable and hasty yesterday owing to my illness and I wronged you, I know.
Forget it.” He gave Lu Bu three hundred ounces of gold and twenty rolls of brocade. And so the quarrel was made up.
But though Lu Bu's body was with his adopted father Dong Zhuo, his heart was with his promised bride Diao Chan.
Dong Zhuo having quite recovered went to court again, and Lu Bu followed him as usual.
Seeing Dong Zhuo deep in conversation with the Emperor, Lu Bu, armed as he was, went out of the Palace and rode off to his chief's residence.
He tied up his steed at the entrance and, halberd in hand, went to the private apartment to seek his love.
He found Diao Chan, and she told him to go out into the garden where she would join him soon.
He went, taking his halberd with him, and he leaned against the rail of the Phoenix Pavilion to wait for Diao Chan.
After a long time she appeared, swaying gracefully as she made her way under the drooping willows and parting the flowers as she passed. She was exquisite, a perfect little fairy from the Palace of the Moon. Tears were in her eyes as she came up and said, “Though I am not the Minister's real daughter, yet he treated me as his own child.
The desire of my life was fulfilled when he plighted me to you. But oh!
to think of the wickedness of the Prime Minister, stealing my poor self as he did. I suffered so much. I longed to die, only that I had not told you the real truth.
So I lived on, bearing my shame as best as I could but feeling it mean still to live.
Now that I have seen you, I can end it all.
My poor sullied body is no longer fit to serve a hero.
I can die before your eyes and so prove how true I am!” Thus speaking she seized the curving rail and started into the lily pond.
Lu Bu caught her in his strong arms and wept as he held her close. “I knew it; I always knew your heart,” he sobbed.
“Only we never had a chance to speak.” She threw her arms about Lu Bu.
“If I cannot be your wife in this life, I will in the ages to come,” she whispered.
“If I do not marry you in this life, I am no hero,” said he.
“Every day is a year long. O pity me! Rescue me!
My lord!” “I have only stolen away for a brief moment, and I am afraid that old rebel will suspect something, so I must not stay too long,” said Lu Bu.
Diao Chan clung to his robe, saying, “If you fear the old thief so much, I shall never see another sunrise.” Lu Bu stopped.
“Give me a little time to think,” said he. And he picked up his halberd to go.
“In the deep seclusion of the harem, I heard the stories of your prowess; you were the one man who excelled all others.
Little did I think that you of all heroes would rest content under the dominion of another.” And tears rained again!
A wave of shame flooded his face. Leaning his halberd against the railing, he turned and clasped the girl to his breast, soothing her with fond words.
The lovers held each other close, swaying to and fro with emotion. How could they bring themselves to say farewell?
In the meantime Dong Zhuo missed his henchman, and doubt filled his heart. Hastily taking leave of the Emperor, he mounted his chariot and returned to his palace. There at the gate stood Lu Bu's well known steed RedHare, riderless.
Dong Zhuo questioned the doorkeepers, and they told him the General was within. He sent away his attendants and went alone to the private apartments. Lu Bu was not there.
He called Diao Chan, but there was no reply.
He asked where she was, and the waiting maids told him she was in the garden among the flowers.
So Dong Zhuo went into the garden, and there he saw the lovers in the pavilion in most tender talk. Lu Bu's trident halberd was leaning on the railing beside him.
A howl of rage escaped Dong Zhuo and startled the lovers.
Lu Bu turned, saw who it was, and ran away.
Dong Zhuo caught up the halberd and ran in pursuit.
But Lu Bu was fleet of foot while his master was very stout. Seeing no hope of catching the runaway, Dong Zhuo hurled the halberd.
Lu Bu fended it off and it fell to the ground. Dong Zhuo picked it up and ran on.
But by this time Lu Bu was far ahead.
Just as Dong Zhuo was running out at the garden gate, he dashed full tilt against another man running in, and down he went.
Surged up his wrath within him as the billows heavenward leap. Crashed his unwieldy body to earth in a shapeless heap.
We shall presently see who the other runner was. CHAPTER 9.
Lu Bu Kills Dong Zhuo For Wang Yun; Li Jue Attacks The Capital On Jia Xu's Advice. The person who collided with the irate Dong Zhuo was his most trusty adviser Li Ru.
Li Ru had not fallen in spite of the shock and at once scrambled to help Dong Zhuo to regain his feet and led him inside to the library, where they sat down. “What were you coming about?” said Dong Zhuo.
“Happening to be passing your gates, I heard that you had gone into your private garden to look for your adopted son.
Then came Lu Bu running and crying out that you wanted to kill him, and I was coming in as fast as I could to intercede for him when I accidentally collided with you.
I am very sorry.
I deserve death.” “The wretch!
How could I bear to see him toying with my fair one?
I will be the death of his yet.” “Your Graciousness is making a mistake. It is the 'plucked tassel' story over again. But if you remember the banquet of old time where all guests were to tear the tassels of their hats.
In that banquet, King Zhuang of Chu made no fuss about the liberties taken with his queen, although the hat-tassel in her hand betrayed the culprit Jiang Xiong. His restraint stood him good stead, for the same Jiang Xiong saved his life when he was hemmed in by the soldiers of Qin.
After all Diao Chan is only a handmaid, but Lu Bu is your trustiest friend and most dreaded commander.
If you took this chance of making the girl over to him, your kindness would win his undying gratitude.
I beg you, Sir, to think over it well.” Dong Zhuo hesitated a long time; he sat murmuring to himself. Presently he said, “What you say is right. I must think over it.” Li Ru felt satisfied.
He took leave of his master and went away.
Dong Zhuo went to his private rooms and called Diao Chan. “What were you doing there with Lu Bu?” said he.
She began to weep, saying, “Thy handmaid was in the garden among the flowers, when he rushed in on me. I was frightened and ran away.
He asked why I ran away from a son of the family and pursued me right to the pavilion, where you saw us. He had that halberd in his hand all the time.
I felt he was a vicious man and would force me to his will, so I tried to throw myself into the lily pond, but he caught me in his arms and held me so that I was helpless.
Luckily just at that moment you came and saved my life.” “Suppose I send you to him,” said Dong Zhuo.
Stunned, she said in tears, “What have thy handmaid done? The honor of serving only Your Highness could not stand being given to a mere underling!
I would rather die.” And with this she snatched down a dagger hanging on the wall to kill herself.
Dong Zhuo plucked it from her hand and, throwing his arms about her, and cried, “I was only joking.” She lay back on his breast hiding her face and sobbing bitterly.
“This is the doing of that Li Ru,” said she.
“He is much too thick with Lu Bu. He suggested that, I know.
Little he cares for the Imperial Rector's reputation or my life.
I could eat him alive.” “Do you think I could bear to lose you?” said Dong Zhuo.
“Though you love me yet I must not stay here. That Lu Bu will try to ruin me if I do.
I fear him.” “We will go to Meiwo tomorrow, you and I, and we will be happy together and have no cares.” She dried her tears and thanked him.
Next day Li Ru came again to persuade Dong Zhuo to send the damsel to Lu Bu. “This is a propitious day,” said Li Ru.
“He and I standing in the relation of father and son. I cannot very well do that,” said Dong Zhuo.
“But I will say no more about his fault.
You may tell him so and soothe him as well as you can.” “You are not being beguiled by the woman, are you?” said Li Ru.
Dong Zhuo colored, saying, “Would you like to give your wife to some body else?
Do not talk about this any further.
It would be better not to.” Li Ru left the chamber. When he got outside, he cast his eyes up to heaven, saying, “We are dead people, slain by the hand of this girl!” When a scholar of history reached this episode he wrote a verse or two: Just introduce a woman, Conspiracies succeed; Of soldiers, or their weapons, There really is no need. They fought their bloody battles, And doughty deeds were done; But in a garden summer house The victory was won.
The order was given to journey to Meiwo, and the whole body of officers assembled to add luster to the start.
Diao Chan, from her carriage, saw Lu Bu among the crowd.
She at once dropped her eyes and assumed an appearance of deepest melancholy.
After the cavalcade started and when her carriage had almost disappeared in the distance, the disappointed lover reined in his steed on a mount whence he could watch the dust that rose around it. Unutterable sadness filled his heart.
Suddenly a voice said, “Why do you not accompany the Prime Minister, General, instead of standing here and sighing?” It was Wang Yun.
“I have been confined to the house by illness these few days,” continued he, “so I have not seen you.
But I had to struggle out today to see the Prime Minister set off. This meeting is most fortunate.
But why were you sighing?” “Just on account of that daughter of yours,” said Lu Bu.
Feigning great astonishment Wang Yun said, “So long a time and yet not given to you!” “The old ruffian has fallen in love with her himself.” “Surely this cannot be true.” Lu Bu related the whole story while Wang Yun listened, silent, but stamping on the ground as with irritation and perplexity.
After a long time Wang Yun said, “I did not think he was such a beast.” Taking Lu Bu by the hand, Wang Yun said, “Come to my house, and we will talk it over.” So they went away together to the house and retired to a secret room.
After some refreshments, Lu Bu told the whole story of the episode in Phoenix Pavilion just as it happened.
Wang Yun said, “He seems to have corrupted my little girl and has stolen your wife. He will be an object of shame and ridicule to the whole world.
And those who do not laugh at him will laugh at you and me.
I am old and powerless and can do nothing. More pitied than blamed!
But you, General, you are a warrior, the greatest hero in the world. Yet you have been put to this shame and exposed to this contempt.” A wave of fierce wrath rolled up in Lu Bu.
Banging the table he shouted and roared.
His host ostentatiously tried to calm him, saying, “I forgot myself. I should not have spoken like that.
Do not be so angry, I pray.” “I will kill the wretch, I swear it. In no other way can I wash away my shame.” “No, no!
Do not say such a thing,” said Wang Yun, putting his hand over the other's mouth.
“You will bring trouble on poor me and my family.” “When one is born great, one cannot be patient for long under another person's domination,” said Lu Bu.
“It needs some one greater than the Prime Minister to limit the scope of such talents as yours.” Lu Bu said, “I would not mind killing the old wretch were it not for the relation in which we stand.
I fear to provoke the hostile criticism of posterity.” Wang Yun smiled, saying, “Your name is Lu Bu; his is Dong Zhuo.
Where was the paternal feeling when he threw the halberd at you?” “I had been misled if you had not said that,” said Lu Bu hotly.
Wang Yun saw the effect of his words and continued, “It would be a loyal deed to restore the House of Han, and history would hand down your name to posterity perpetually fragrant.
If you lend your aid to Dong Zhuo, you will be a traitor and your name will be tainted through all ages.” Lu Bu rose from his place and bowed to Wang Yun. “I have decided,” said he.
“You need not fear, Sir.” “But yet you may fail and bring upon yourself misfortune,” said Wang Yun.
Lu Bu drew his dagger, pricking his arm, and swearing by the blood that flowed. Wang Yun fell on his knees and thanked him.
“Then the Han sacrifices will not be cut off, and you will be their savior.
But this must remain a secret, and I will tell you how the plot shall be worked out.” Lu Bu took leave with great emotion.
Wang Yun took into his confidence two colleagues, Minister Shisun Rui and Imperial Commander Huang Wan.
Shisun Rui said, “The moment is favorable. The Emperor has just recovered from his illness, and we can dispatch an able talker to Meiwo to persuade Dong Zhuo to come here to discuss affairs.
Meanwhile we will obtain a secret decree as authority for Lu Bu to lay an ambush just inside the palace gates to kill Dong Zhuo as he enters.
This is the best plan to adopt.” “But who would dare to go?” said Huang Wan.
“Li Su, General of the Imperial Tiger Army, would go. He belongs to the same region as Lu Bu and is very angry with the Prime Minister for not advancing him.
His going would assure us the plan would be completed.” “Good,” said Wang Yun.
“Let us see what Lu Bu thinks of it.” When Lu Bu was consulted, he told them that this Li Su's persuasion had led him to kill Ding Yuan, his former benefactor.
“If Li Su refuses this mission, I will kill him,” said Lu Bu. So they sent for Li Su.
When Li Su arrived, Lu Bu said, “Formerly you talked me into killing Ding Yuan and going over to Dong Zhuo.
Now we find Dong Zhuo means evil for the Emperor and is an oppressor of the people. His iniquities are many, and he is hated by gods and humans.
You go to Meiwo, say you have a command from the Emperor to summon the Prime Minister to the Palace. He will come, and he will be put to death. You will have the credit of being loyal and restoring the Hans. Will you undertake this?” “I also wish to slay him,” was the reply. “But I could not find anyone to assist me.
How can I hesitate?
Your intervention is directly from Heaven.” And Li Su snapped an arrow in twain as register of his oath.
“If this succeeds, what glorious rank will be yours!” said Wang Yun.
Next day Li Su, with a small escort, set out for Meiwo and announced himself as bearer of a decree. He was conducted into Dong Zhuo's presence.
After he had made his obeisance, Dong Zhuo asked what the decree was.
“His Majesty has recovered and wishes his ministers to meet him in the Palace to consider the question of his abdication in your favor.
That is what this summons means.” “What does Wang Yun think of the scheme?” “Wang Yun has already begun the construction of the Terrace of Abdication and only awaits my lord's arrival.” “Last night I dreamed a dragon coiled round my body,” said Dong Zhuo greatly pleased, “and now I get this happy tidings!
I must not neglect the opportunity.” So Dong Zhuo gave instructions to his four trusted generals for the safekeeping of his city. Li Jue, Guo Si, Fan Chou, and Zhang Ji were to guard Meiwo with three thousand troops of the Flying Bear Army. Then Dong Zhuo announced his intention of starting on the morrow.
“When I am Emperor, you shall be Commander of the Capital District,” said he.
“Your minister thanks you,” said Li Su.
Dong Zhuo went to bid farewell to his ninety-year-old mother. “Whither are you going, my son?” asked she.
“I go to receive the abdication of Han; and soon you will be the Empress.” “I have been feeling nervous and creepy these few days.
It is a bad sign.” “Any one about to become the Mother of the State must have premonitions,” said her son.
He left her with these words.
Just before starting, he said to Diao Chan, “When I am Emperor, you shall be Lady of the Palace.” She bowed low thanking him, but she knew and inwardly rejoiced.
Dong Zhuo went out, mounted his carriage, and began his journey to Capital Changan with an imposing escort.
Less than ten miles the wheel of his carriage broke. He left it and mounted a horse.
Another ten miles the horse snorted and neighed, threw up his head and snapped the reins. Dong Zhuo turned to Li Su and asked what these things portended.
“It means that you are going to receive the abdication of the Hans, which is to renew all things, to mount the jeweled chariot and sit in the golden saddle.” And Dong Zhuo was pleased and convinced with this answer.
During the second day's journey a violent gale sprang up, and the sky became covered with a thick mist. “What does this mean?” said Dong Zhuo.
The wily Li Su had an interpretation for this also, saying, “You are ascending to the place of the dragon; there must be bright light and lurid vapor to dignify your majestic approach.” Dong Zhuo had no more doubts.
He presently arrived and found many officials waiting without the city gate to receive him, all but Li Ru who was ill and unable to leave his chamber.
He entered and proceeded to his own palace, where Lu Bu came to congratulate him.
“When I sit on the throne, you shall command the whole armies of the empire, horse and foot,” said Dong Zhuo. That night Dong Zhuo slept in the midst of his escort.
In the suburbs that evening some children at play were singing a little ditty, and the words drifted into the bedchamber on the wind.
“The grass in the meadow looks fresh now and green, Yet wait but ten days, not a blade will be seen.” The song sounded ominous but Li Su was again prepared with a happy interpretation:
“It only means that the Lius are about to disappear, and the Dongs to be exalted.” Next morning at the first streak of dawn, Dong Zhuo prepared for his appearance at court.
On the way he saw a Taoist, dressed in a black robe and wearing a white turban, who carried in his hand a tall staff with a long strip of white cloth attached. At each end of the cloth was drawn a mouth.
“What is the meaning of this?” said Dong Zhuo.
“He is a madman,” said Li Su, and he told the guards to drive the fellow away.
Dong Zhuo went in and found all the officials in court dress lining the road.
Li Su walked beside his carriage, a sword in his hand.
When Li Su reached the north gate of the Palace, he found the soldiers of Dong Zhuo drawn up outside and only the pushers of the palace carriage, a twenty or so, were allowed to proceed further.
When Dong Zhuo arrived near the Reception Hall, he saw that Wang Yun and all the other officials standing at the door were armed. “Why are they all armed?” said Dong Zhuo to Li Su.
Li Su was silent as he helped push the carriage forward swiftly to the entrance.
Suddenly Wang Yun shouted, “The rebel is here!
Where are the executioners?” At this call sprang from both sides soldiers armed with halberds and spears who attacked Dong Zhuo. He had not put on the breastplate he usually wore, and a spear pierced his breast.
He sank down in the carriage calling loudly for his son, “Where is Lu Bu?” “Here, and with a decree to deal with a rebel,” said Lu Bu, as he appeared in front of his “father.” Thereupon he thrust his trident halberd through the victim's throat.
Then Li Su hacked off the head and held it up.
Lu Bu, his left hand holding his halberd, thrust his right hand into his bosom whence he drew the decree, crying, “The decree was to slay the rebel Dong Zhuo; no other.” The whole assembly shouted, “Live forever! O Emperor.” A sympathetic poet has written a few lines in pity: Await the time, O noble, and be king, Or failing, reap the solace riches bring; Heaven never is partial, but severely just, Meiwo stood strong, yet now it lies in dust.
The lust of blood awakened, Lu Bu urged the slaughter of Li Ru, who had been the confidant of the murdered Prime Minister, and Li Su volunteered to go in search of him.
But just then a shouting was heard at the gates, and it was told them that a household servant had brought Li Ru in bonds.
Wang Yun ordered his immediate execution in the market place.
Dong Zhuo's head was exposed in a crowded thoroughfare.
He was very fat, and the guards made torches by sticking splints into the body, spilling the corpse's grease over the ground.
The passers-by pelted the head and spurned the body with their feet.
Wang Yun ordered a force of fifty thousand under Lu Bu, Huangfu Song, and Li Su to destroy Meiwo.
Learning the news of their master, Li Jue, Guo Si, Fan Chou, and Zhang Ji fled west swiftly through the night with their Flying Bear Army to Liangzhou.
When arriving Meiwo, Lu Bu's first deed was to take Diao Chan into his charge.
Then they slew every member of the Dong family, sparing none, not even Dong Zhuo's aged mother.
The heads of Dong Zhuo's brother Dong Min and his nephew Dong Huang were publicly displayed in the market place. In Meiwo were hidden many young ladies of good family. These were set free. All properties were confiscated.
The wealth was enormous—several hundred thousand ounces of gold, millions of silver coins, pearls, gems, silks, velvets, furs, grain stores.
When they returned to report success, Wang Yun rewarded and feasted the soldiers. Banquets were held in the Ministry Hall to which all the officials were invited. They drank and congratulated each other.
While the feasting was in progress it was announced that some one had come and was wailing over Dong Zhuo's corpse exposed in the market place.
“Dong Zhuo has been put to death,” said Wang Yun, angrily. “Every body is glad to be rid of him, and yet one is found to lament over him.
Who is this?” So Wang Yun gave orders to arrest the mourner and bring him in. Soon he was brought in, and when they saw him all were startled. For he was no other than Imperial Historian Cai Yong.
Wang Yun spoke to Cai Yong angrily, “Dong Zhuo has been put to death as a rebel, and all the land rejoices.
You, a Han minister, instead of rejoicing, weep for him.
Why?” Cai Yong confessed his fault, saying, “I am without talent, yet know what is right. I am the man to turn my back on my country and toward Dong Zhuo.
Yet once I experienced his kindness, and I could not help mourning for him. I know my fault is grave, but I pray you regard the reasons.
If you will leave my head and only cut off my feet, you may use me to continue the History of Han, whereby I may have the good fortune to be allowed to expiate my fault.” All were sorry for Cai Yong, for he was a man of great talents, and they begged that he might be spared.
The Imperial Guardian, Ma Midi, secretly interceded for him, saying, “Cai Yong is famous as a scholar, and he can write glorious history, and it is inadvisable to put to death a man renowned for rectitude without consideration.” But in vain, for the High Minister was now strong and obdurate.
Wang Yun said, “Centuries ago, Emperor Wu spared Sima Qian and employed him on the annals, with the result that many slanderous stories have been handed down to us.
This is a trying period of great perplexity, and we dare not let a specious fellow like this wield his pen in criticism of those about the court of a youthful prince and abuse us as he will.” Remonstrance and appeal being vain, Ma Midi retired.
But he said to his colleagues, “Is Wang Yun then careless of the future?
Worthy people are the mainstay of the state; laws are the canons of action. To destroy the mainstay and nullify the laws is to hasten destruction.” As was just said Wang Yun was obdurate.
Cai Yong whose offense was an expression of gratitude was thrown into prison and there strangled.
The people of that day wept for Cai Yong, for they refused to see any offense in what he had done, and death was a harsh punishment.
Dong Zhuo, the dictator, Tyrannized the state, Fell and his sole mourner Shared his direful fate.
Zhuge Liang in seclusion Was content to dream, Felt his worth and never Helped a traitor's scheme.
Those generals—Li Jue, Guo Si, Fan Chou, and Zhang Ji—whom Dong Zhuo had left to guard Meiwo fled when their master was slain and went into the county of Shanxi in Liangzhou Region. Thence they sent in a memorial entreating amnesty. But Wang Yun would not hear of it.
“Four of them were the chief instruments of Dong Zhuo's aggressions. Now though a general amnesty were proclaimed, these men should be excluded from its benefit,” said Wang Yun.
The messenger returned and told the four there was no hope of pardon and they could only flee.
Then their adviser, Jia Xu, said, “If we throw away our arms and flee singly, then we shall fall easy victims to any village beadle who may seize us.
Rather let us cajole the Shanxi people to throw in their lot with us and make a sudden onslaught on the capital and so avenge Dong Zhuo.
If we succeed, we control the court and the empire.
There will be enough time to run away if we fail.” The plan was adopted, and they spread abroad the story that Wang Yun intended to massacre the county.
Having thus thrown the people into a state of terror, they went a step farther and said, “There is no advantage in dying for nothing.
Revolt and join us!” So they cajoled the people into joining them and gathered a host equal to one hundred thousand. This horde was divided into four parts, and they all set out to raid Capital Changan.
On the way they fell in with a son-in-law of their late chief, Imperial Commander Niu Fu, who marched five thousand troop from Xiliang. Niu Fu had set out to avenge his father-in-law, and he became the van leader of the horde.
As they advanced, the news came to Wang Yun, and he consulted Lu Bu.
“They are a lot of rats,” said Lu Bu. “Never mind how many there are of them.
Be not in the least anxious.” So Lu Bu and Li Su went to oppose them.
The latter was in advance and met Niu Fu.
They fought; Niu Fu was outmatched and retired after suffering a slaughter.
But unexpectedly Niu Fu returned in a night attack, found Li Su quite unprepared and drove Li Su's force some ten miles, slaying many.
Li Su reported the defeat, and Lu Bu raged at him, saying, “You have sullied my reputation as a warrior and destroyed our fighting spirit.” And Lu Bu put Li Su to death, exposing his head at the camp gate.
Next day Lu Bu advanced his own force and engaged Niu Fu.
He overwhelmed Niu Fu and drove him off.
That night Niu Fu called in his most trusted man, Hu Chier, to advise him. Hu Chier said, “Lu Bu is too doughty a fighter for us to hope to overcome him. Our case is hopeless.
Our best course is to desert these four generals, secrete their valuables, and leave the army with just a few of our followers.” The plan of Hu Chier was adopted, and the two traitors and some others that very night packed up and made their way out of camp. They were only half a dozen.
They came to a river and, while crossing, Hu Chier, tempted by the lust of wealth, slew his companion. Then he went to offer the head of Niu Fu to Lu Bu.
Lu Bu inquired into the matter, and when a follower told him the truth, he put the double traitor Hu Chier to death.
Then Lu Bu advanced against the rebels and fell in with Li Jue's force.
Without giving them time to form in battle, Lu Bu attacked. Horses curvetting and spears set, the army dashed in irresistibly, and Li Jue, making no stand, fell back a long way. Li Jue took up a position under a hill fifteen miles away and thence sent to call his fellows to council. Li Jue said, “Lu Bu though brave in battle is no strategist and so not really formidable.
I will lead my troops to hold the mouth of the gorge, and every day I will incite him to attack; and when he comes toward me, General Guo Si can smite his rear, after the manner of Peng Yue when he fought against Chu.
While thus I am alternating attack and retreat, Generals Fan Chou and Zhang Ji will march off in different directions toward Changan. Such an attack at two points must end both Wang Yun and Lu Bu.” They set themselves to carry out this scheme.
As soon as Lu Bu reached the hills, a force of Li Jue came out to attack him.
Lu Bu made an angry dash toward the enemy who retired up the hills, whence they shot arrows and hurled stones like rain. Lu Bu's troops halted.
At this moment the report came that the rear was being attacked and there appeared Guo Si.
At once Lu Bu wheeled toward the new enemy, but immediately the rolling drums gave the signal to retire, and Lu Bu could not come to blows with them.
As he called in his army, the gongs clanged on the other side and his former opponent Li Jue came to attack his front.
But before Lu Bu could join battle, his rear was again assaulted by Guo Si, who in his turn drew off immediately.
Thus Lu Bu was baited till his bosom was near bursting with rage.
The same tactics continued for several days. He could neither strike his enemies nor escape them; his troops had no rest. In the midst of these distracting maneuver, a messenger rode up in hot haste to report:
“The capital is in imminent danger from a double attack of Fan Chou and Zhang Ji.” Lu Bu at once ordered a march to save the capital, which became a rout when both his opponents Li Jue and Guo Si came in pursuit. His loss was heavy.
He soon reached Changan and found the rebels there in enormous numbers and the city quite surrounded.
Lu Bu's attack had but little effect, and as his temper became more savage under defeat, many of his soldiers went over to the rebels. He fell into deep melancholy.
Then a remnant of Dong Zhuo's adherents still in the city, led by Li Meng and Wang Fang, began to lend aid to the attackers; and by and by they secretly opened the city gate and the besiegers poured in. Lu Bu exerted himself to the utmost but could not stem the tide.
At the head of some hundred horse, he dashed over to the Black Lock Gate and called out to Wang Yun, who was on the other side. “The case is desperate now.
Ride with me to a place of safety.” Wang Yun replied, “If I am gifted with the holy spirit of the state, I shall succeed in restoring the tranquillity which I desire; but if I have it not, then I offer my body a sacrifice.
I will not quail before dangers.
Thank the noble supporters beyond the Pass for their efforts, and bid them remember their country.” Lu Bu urged Wang Yun again and again, but Wang Yun would not leave.
Soon flames started up ail over the city, and Lu Bu had to leave, abandoning his family to their fate. He fled to seek refuge with Yuan Shu.
Li Jue, Guo Si, and his fellow leaders gave full license to their ruffians, who robbed and murdered their fill.
Many high officers perished. Ministers Chong Fu, Lu Kui, and Zhou Huan, Imperial Commanders Cui Lie and Wang Qi all died in the fighting.
In time the rebels penetrated to the inner palace, and the courtiers begged the Emperor to proceed to the Gate of Pervading Peace to try to quell the rioting.
At sight of the yellow umbrella, Li Jue and Fan Chou checked their armies, and they all shouted, “Long life O Emperor!” The Emperor stood by the tower and addressed them, “Nobles, what means it that you enter the capital in this unruly manner and without my summons?” The two leaders looked up and said, “Dong Zhuo, Your Majesty's Prime Minister, has been slain by Wang Yun, and we are here to avenge him. We are no rebels, Sire.
Let us only have Wang Yun, and we draw off our troops.” Wang Yun was actually among the courtiers and at the Emperor's side.
Hearing this demand he said, “The plan was made for the benefit of the Throne; but as this evil has grown therefrom, Your Majesty will not grudge losing me.
I have brought about evil, and I will go down to these rebels.” The Emperor was torn with sorrow and wavered.
But the faithful minister leaped from the wall, crying, “Wang Yun is here.” The two leaders drew their swords, crying, “For what crime was our master slain?” “His crimes filled the heavens and covered the earth; no tongue can tell them.
The day he died was a day of rejoicing in the whole city as you well know,” said Wang Yun.
“And if he was guilty of some crime, what had we done not to be forgiven?” “Seditious rebels, why bandy words?
I am ready to die.” And Wang Yun was slain at the foot of the tower.
Moved by the people's sufferings, Vexed at his prince's grief, Wang Yun compassed the traitor's death, That they might find relief.
Every one knows him a hero, Leal to the state always:
Living he guarded the princely towers, His soul keeps guard today. Having done the loyal minister to death at the Emperor's feet, they proceeded to exterminate also his whole family.
Every one mourned.
Then said the ruffians to each other, “Having gone so far what could be better than to make away with the Emperor and complete our scheme?” The traitor condoned his crime, Rebellion ought to cease; But his licentious followers Disturb the empire's peace.
The fate of the Emperor will be disclosed in the next chapter.
CHAPTER 10. Gathering Arms, Ma Teng Moves To Rescue The Emperor; Commanding An Army, Cao Cao Marches to Avenges His Father. In the last chapter the two arch rebels, Li Jue and Guo Si, proposed to murder Emperor Xian, but their followers Zhang Ji and Fan Chou opposed this. “No; the people will not approve of his death now. Restore him to power, and get the leaguers inside Changan's control. Remove his supporters, and then we can compass his death. And the empire shall be in our hands.” So they ceased the attack.
The Emperor again spoke from the tower, saying, “Why do you still remain?
You have slain Wang Yun; now withdraw these soldiers.” Then Li Jue and Guo Si replied, “Your servants desire rank us a reward for their good service to your dynasty.” “And what rank, Sirs?” All four wrote their wishes and handed them up to the Emperor who had no choice but to accede to the request, and they were created:
Li Jue was appointed General of the Flying Cavalry, Lord of Chiyang, Commander of Capital District, Court Administrator, and granted Military Insignia. Guo Si was appointed General of the Rear Army, Lord of Meiyang, Court Administrator, and granted Military Insignia.
Fan Chou was appointed General of the Right Army and Lord of Wanian. Zhang Ji was appointed General of the Flying Cavalry and Lord of Pingyan.
Li Meng and Wang Fang, for opening the city gates, were appointed Imperial Commander.
After receiving ranks of nobility, Li Jue and Guo Si thanked the Emperor, and went away to camp at Xunung, the suburb of Changan. The inferior rebel leaders also were gratified with ranks. And once more the capital was free of troops. Dong Zhuo's followers, having so far succeeded, did not forget their late leader.
They sought his corpse for burial, but only a few fragments were discoverable. Then they had sculptors engrave a statue of fragrant wood in his likeness, laid that out in proper form, and instituted a noble's sacrifices and prayers. The remains were dressed in the robes of a prince, laid in a princely coffin for burial. They selected Meiwo for his tomb and having found an auspicious day conveyed the coffin thither.
But a terrific thunder storm came on at the time of inhumation, and the ground was flooded. The coffin was rived asunder and the poor remains knocked out by thunders.
A second time they buried the coffin, but a similar thing happened in the night.
And yet a third time in another place but the earth rejected the remains. Meanwhile the thunder-fire had entirely consumed them.
So it may be said justly that Heaven was exceedingly angry with Dong Zhuo.
So now Li Jue and Guo Si wielded the real power of the scepter, and they were hard upon the people.
They also removed the attendants from the Palace and replaced them by their own creatures, who maintained a most perfect watch over every movement of the Emperor so that he was greatly hampered and embarrassed.
All appointments and demotions were made by the two rebels.
For the sake of popularity they especially summoned Zhu Jun to court, made him Minister of the Palace Bureau and associated him with the government.
One day came a report that the Governor of Xiliang, Ma Teng, and the Imperial Protector of Bingzhou, Han Sui, with one hundred thousand troops, are rapidly approaching the capital with the intention of attacking the rebels in the name of the Emperor.
Now these leaders from the west had laid careful plans. Ma Teng and Han Sui had sent trusty friends to the capital to find out who would support them. They had conspired with three officials—Court Counselors Ma Yu and Chong Shao, and Imperial Commander Liu Fan—to be their inside allies and plot against the rebels.
These three obtained from the Throne two secret edicts conferring the ranks of Commander Who Conquers the West on Ma Teng and Commander Who Guards the West on Han Sui. With these powers the two commanders joined forces and began their march.
The four leaders of the party in power—Li Jue, Guo Si, Fan Chou, and Zhang Ji—held a consultation with their generals as to how to meet the attack.
Adviser Jia Xu said, “Since the attackers are coming from a distance, our plan is to fortify and wait till shortage of food shall work for us.
In a hundred days their supplies will be consumed, and they must retire.
We can pursue and we shall capture them.” Li Meng and Wang Fang rose and said, “This plan is bad.
Give us ten thousand troops, and we will put an end to both of them and offer their heads before your ensign.” “To fight forthwith means defeat,” said Jia Xu.
Li Meng and Wang Fang cried with one voice, “If we fail, we are willing to lose our heads; but if we win, then your head is forfeit.” Jia Xu then suggested to Li Jue and Guo Si, saying, “Seventy miles west of the capital stand the Zhouzhi Hills. The passes are narrow and difficult.
Send Generals Zhang Ji and Fan Chou to occupy this point of vantage and fortify themselves so that they may support Li Meng and Wang Fang.” Li Jue and Guo Si accepted this advice.
They told off fifteen thousand horse and foot, and Li Meng and Wang Fang left in high spirit.
They made a camp ninety miles from Changan.
The force from the west arrived; Ma Teng and Han Sui led out their troops to the attack.
They found their opponents Li Meng and Wang Fang in battle array. Ma Teng and Han Sui rode to the front side by side.
Pointing to the rebel leaders, the commanders abused them, crying, “Those are traitors; who will capture them?” Hardly were the words spoken when there came out a youth general with a clear, white complexion as jade, eyes like shooting stars, lithe of body and strong of limb.
He was armed with a long spear and bestrode an excellent steed.
This young leader was Ma Chao, son of Ma Teng, then seventeen years of age. Though young he was a supreme valiance.
Wang Fang, despising him on account of his youth, galloped forth to fight him.
Before they had exchanged many passes Wang Fang was disabled and fell to a thrust of the young Ma Chao's spear.
The victor turned to retire into the formation, but Li Meng rode after Ma Chao to avenge his fallen colleague.
Ma Chao did not see Li Meng, but his father called out “You are followed!” Hardly had Ma Teng spoken when he saw that the pursuer was a prisoner seated on his son's steed.
Now Ma Chao had known he was followed, but pretended not to see, waiting till his enemy should have come close and lifted his spear to strike.
Then Ma Chao suddenly wheeled about. The spear thrust met only empty air; and as the horses passed, Ma Chao's powerful arm shot out and pulled Li Meng from the saddle.
Thus Li Meng and Wang Fang's soldiers were left leaderless and fled in all directions.
The army of Ma Teng and Han Sui dashed in pursuit, and a complete victory was scored. They pressed into one of the passes and made a camp. Then they decapitated Li Meng and exposed his head.
When Li Jue and Guo Si heard that both the boastful generals had fallen under the hand of one young man, they knew that Jia Xu had given good advice and was gifted with clear prescience. So they valued his plans the more highly and decided to act on the defensive. They refused all challenges to combat.
Surely enough after a couple of months the supplies of the Xiliang force were all exhausted and the leaders began to consider retreat. Just at this juncture a household servant of Ma Yu's family betrayed his master and told of the conspiracy of the three court officials to assist the attackers.
The two chiefs Li Jue and Guo Si in revenge seized the three conspirators—Ma Yu, Chong Shao, and Liu Fan—, with every member of their households, and beheaded them in the market place. The heads of the three were exposed at the front gate of the capital.
Being short of food and hearing of the destruction of their three adherents in the city, the only course for Ma Teng and Han Sui was to retreat.
At once Zhang Ji went in pursuit of Ma Teng, and Fan Chou followed Han Sui.
The retreating army under Ma Teng was beaten, and only by Ma Chao's desperate efforts were the pursuers driven off.
Fan Chou pursued the other army; and when he had come close, Han Sui rode boldly up and addressed him, saying, “You and I, Sir, are fellow villagers.
Why then behave so unfriendly?” Fan Chou replied, “I must obey the commands of my chief.” “I am here for the service of the state; why do you press me so hard?” said Han Sui.
At this Fan Chou turned his horse, called in his troops, and left Han Sui in peace.
Unwittingly a nephew of Li Jue had been a witness of this scene; and when he saw the enemy allowed to go free, he returned and told his uncle.
Angry that his enemy had escaped, Li Jue would have sent an army to wreak vengeance on his general, but his adviser Jia Xu again came in, saying, “The people are yet unsettled, it was dangerous to provoke another war.
Instead, invite Fan Chou to a banquet and, while the feast was in progress, executing him for dereliction of duty.” This seemed good to Li Jue, so the banquet was prepared.
Zhang Ji and Fan Chou accepted their invitations and went cheerfully.
Toward the latter part of the entertainment a sudden change came over their host Li Jue, and he suddenly asked Fan Chou, “Why have you been intriguing with Han Sui?
You are turning traitor, eh?” The unhappy guest was taken aback; and before he could frame his words to reply, he saw the assassins rush out with swords and axes. In a moment all was over, and Fan Chou's head lay beneath the table.
Scared beyond measure, his fellow-guest Zhang Ji groveled on the floor.
“Fan Chou was a traitor,” said the host, raising Zhang Ji by the arm, “and he has his deserts; you are my friend and need not fear.” Li Jue gave Zhang Ji command of Fan Chou's army with which Zhang Ji returned to his headquarters garrison in Hongnong.
No one of the leaders among the leaguers dared attempt an attack on the party newly risen from Dong Zhuo's disaffection, while on the other hand Jia Xu never ceased to urge his masters to exert themselves for the welfare of the people and thus to tempt wise people to join them.
And by these means the government began to prosper and the court to reassert its authority.
However, a new trouble arose in the shape of a resurgence of Yellow Scarves in Qingzhou. They came, under numerous chieftains, in the number of hundreds of thousand and plundered any place they reached.
Minister Zhu Jun said he knew of one who could destroy this sedition, and when asked who was the man he proposed, Zhu Jun said, “You want to destroy this horde of rebels; you will fail unless you get the services of Cao Cao.” “And where is he?” asked Li Jue. “He is Governor of Dongjun.
He has a large army, and you have only to order him to act; the rising will be broken.” A messenger went post haste with a command for Cao Cao and Bao Xin, Lord of Jibei, to act together in quelling the rebellion.
As soon as Cao Cao received the court command, he arranged with his colleague first to attack the rebels at Shouyang.
Bao Xin made a dash right into their midst and inflicting damage wherever he could, but he was killed in a battle.
Cao Cao pursued the rebels as they fled. Ten thousand surrendered.
Then Cao Cao put his quondam enemies in the van; and when his army reached any place, many more surrendered and joined him.
After three months of these tactics, he had won over many thousands, both of soldiers and ordinary folks.
Of these new adherents the strongest and boldest were made the Qingzhou Army, and the others were sent home to their fields.
In consequence of these successes Cao Cao's prestige and fame became very great and increased daily.
He reported his success to Capital Changan and was rewarded with the title of General Who Guards the East.
At his headquarters in Yanzhou, Cao Cao welcomed wise counselors and bold warriors, and many gathered around him.
Two clever persons, uncle and nephew, came at the same time, both from Yanzhou, named Xun Yu and Xun You.
The uncle had once been in the service of Yuan Shao. Cao Cao rejoiced when he had won the elder Xun to his side, saying, “Xun Yu is my Zhang Liang.” He made Xun Yu a Marching General. The nephew Xun You was famed for his ability and had been in the court service when it was in Luoyang, but he had abandoned that career and retired to his village.
Cao Cao made him a Military Instructor.
Xun Yu said to Cao Cao, “There is a certain wise person of Yanzhou somewhere, but I do not know in whose service he is.” “Who is he?” “Cheng Yu; he belongs to the eastern region of Yanzhou.” “Yes; I have heard of him,” said Cao Cao.
So a messenger was sent to his native place to inquire.
Cheng Yu was away in the hills engaged in study, but he came at Cao Cao's invitation.
“I shall prove unworthy of your recommendation,” said Cheng Yu to his friend Xun Yu, “for I am rough and ignorant.
But have you forgotten a fellow villager of yours, Guo Jia? He is really able. Why not spread the net to catch him?” “I had nearly forgotten,” said Xun Yu suddenly. So he told Cao Cao of this man, who was at once invited.
Guo Jia, discussing the world at large with Cao Cao, recommended Liu Ye from Henan, who was a descendant of Liu Xiu the Founder of Latter Han.
When Liu Ye had arrived, he was the means of inviting two more:
Man Chong from Shanyang, and Lu Qian from Wucheng, who were already known to Cao Cao by reputation. These two brought to their new master's notice the name of Mao Jie from Chenliu, who also came and was given office.
Then a famous leader, with his troop of some hundreds, arrived to offer service.
This was Yu Jin of Taishan, an expert horseman and archer, and skilled beyond his fellows in every form of military exercise. He was made an army inspector.
Then another day Xiahou Dun brought a fellow to present to Cao Cao. “Who is he?” asked Cao Cao. “He is from Chenliu and is named Dian Wei. He is the boldest of the bold, the strongest of the strong.
He was one of Zhang Miao's people, but quarreled with his tent companions and killed some dozens of them with his fists. Then he fled to the mountains where I found him.
I was out shooting and saw him follow a tiger across a stream. I persuaded him to join my troop and I recommend him.” “I see he is no ordinary man,” said Cao Cao.
“He is fine and straight and looks very powerful and bold.” “He is.
He killed a man once to avenge a friend and carried his head through the whole market place. Hundreds saw him, but dared not come near.
The weapon he uses now is a couple of spears, each weighs a hundred and twenty pounds, and he vaults into the saddle with these under his arm.” Cao Cao bade the man give proof of his skill.
So Dian Wei galloped to and fro carrying the spears.
Then he saw away among the tents a huge banner swaying dangerously with the force of the wind and on the point of falling. A crowd of soldiers were vainly struggling to keep it steady.
Down he leaped, shouted to the men to clear out and held the staff quite steady with one hand, keeping it perfectly upright in spite of the strong wind.
“This is old E Lai again,” said Cao Cao.
He gave Dian Wei a post in the headquarters and besides made Dian Wei presents of an embroidered robe he was wearing and a swift steed with a handsome saddle.
Cao Cao encouraged able people to assist him, and he had advisers on the civil side and valiant generals in the army. He became famous throughout the East of the Pass. Now Cao Cao's father, Cao Song, was living at Langye, whither he had gone as a place free from the turmoil of the partisan struggles.
Now Cao Cao wished to be united with him. As a dutiful son, Cao Cao sent the Governor of Taishan, Ying Shao, to escort his father to Yanzhou. Old Cao Song read the letter with joy, and the family prepared to move.
They were some forty in all, with a train of a hundred servants and many carts.
Their road led through Xuzhou where the Imperial Protector, Tao Qian, was a sincere and upright man who had long wished to get on good terms with Cao Cao but, hitherto, had found no means of effecting a bond of union.
Hearing that the family of the great man was passing through his region, Tao Qian went to welcome them, treated them with great cordiality, feasting and entertaining them for two days; and when they left, he escorted them to his boundary.
Further he sent with them one General Zhang Kai with a special escort of five hundred.
The whole party reached the county of Huafei. It was the end of summer, just turning into autumn, and at this place they were stopped by a tremendous storm of rain. The only shelter was an old temple and thither they went. The family occupied the main rooms and the escort the two side wings.
The men of the escort were drenched, angry, and discontented.
Then Zhang Kai called some of his petty officers to a secret spot and said, “We are old Yellow Scarves and only submitted to Tao Qian because there was no other choice. We have never got much out of it.
Now here is the Cao family with no end of gear, and we can be rich very easily. We will make a sudden onslaught tonight at the third watch and slay the whole lot. Then we shall have plenty of treasure, and we will get away to the mountains.” They all agreed.
The storm continued into the night and as Cao Song sat waiting anxiously for signs of clearing, he suddenly heard a hubbub at the west end of the temple.
His brother, Cao De, drawing his sword, went out to see what it was about, and Cao De was at once cut down.
Cao Song seized one of the concubines by the hand, rushed with her through the passage toward the back of the temple so that they might escape.
But the lady was stout and could not get through the narrow doors, so the two hid in one of the small outhouses at the side. However, they were seen and slain.
The unhappy Governor Ying Shao fled for his life to Yuan Shao.
The murderers fled into the South of River Huai with their plunder after having set fire to the old temple.
Cao Cao, whom the ages praise, Slew his hosts on his former flight; Nemesis never turns aside, Murdered too his family died.
Some of the escort escaped and took the evil tidings to Cao Cao.
When he heard it he fell to the earth with a great cry. They raised him.
With set teeth he muttered, “Tao Qian's people have slain my father: no longer can the same sky cover us.
I will sweep Xuzhou off the face of the earth.
Only thus can I satisfy my vengeance.” Cao Cao left one small army of thirty thousand under Xun Yu and Cheng Yu to guard the east headquarters and the three counties of Juancheng, Fanxia, and Dongjun. Then he set forth with all the remainder to destroy Xuzhou and avenge his father.
Xiahou Dun, Yu Jin, and Dian Wei were Van Leaders with Cao Cao's orders to slaughter all the inhabitants of each captured city. Now the Governor of Jiujiang, Bian Rang, was a close friend of Tao Qian.
Hearing Xuzhou was threatened, Bian Rang set out with five thousand troops to his friend's aid.
Angered by this move, Cao Cao sent Xiahou Dun to stop and kill Bian Rang while still on the march.
At this time Chen Gong was in office in Dongjun, and he was also on friendly terms with Tao Qian.
Hearing of Cao Cao's design to destroy the whole population, Chen Gong came in haste to see his former companion.
Cao Cao knowing Chen Gong's errand put him off at first and would not see him. But then Cao Cao could not forget the kindness he had formerly received from Chen Gong, and presently the visitor was called to his tent.
Chen Gong said, “They say you go to avenge your father's death on Xuzhou, to destroy its people. I have come to say a word.
Imperial Protector Tao Qian is humane and a good man. He is not looking out for his own advantage, careless of the means and of others.
Your worthy father met his unhappy death at the hands of Zhang Kai. Tao Qian is guiltless.
Still more innocent are the people, and to slay them would be an evil.
I pray you think over it.” Cao Cao retorted angrily, “You once abandoned me and now you have the impudence to come to see me!
Tao Qian slew my whole family, and I will tear his heart out in revenge. I swear it. You may speak for your friend and say what you will.
I shall be as if I heard not.” Intercession had failed.
Chen Gong sighed and took his leave. He said, “Alas!
I cannot go to Tao Qian and look upon his face.” So Chen Gong rode off to the county of Chenliu to give service to Governor Zhang Miao.
Cao Cao's army of revenge laid waste whatever place it passed through, slaying the people and desecrating their cemeteries. When Tao Qian heard the terrible tidings, he looked up to heaven, saying, “I must be guilty of some fault before Heaven to have brought this evil upon my people.” He called together his officials to consult.
One of them, Cao Bao, said, “Now the enemy is upon us; we cannot sit and await death with folded hands.
I for one will help you to make a fight.” Tao Qian reluctantly sent the army out.
From a distance he saw Cao Cao's army spread abroad like frost and rushed far and wide like snow. In their midst was a large white flag and on both sides was written “Vengeance” .
When he had ranged his troops, Cao Cao rode out dressed in mourning white and abused Tao Qian.
But Tao Qian advanced, and from beneath his ensign he bowed low and said, “I wished to make friends with you, Illustrious Sir, and so I sent Zhang Kai to escort your family.
I knew not that his rebel heart was still unchanged.
The fault does not lie at my door as you must see.” “You old wretch, you killed my father and now you dare to mumble this nonsense,” said Cao Cao.
And he asked who would go out and seize Tao Qian.
Xiahou Dun undertook this service and rode out.
Tao Qian fled to the inner portion of his array; and as Xiahou Dun came on, Cao Bao went to meet him.
But just as the two horses met, a hurricane burst over the spot, and the flying dust and pebbles threw both sides into the utmost confusion. Both drew off. Tao Qian retired into the city and called his officers to council. “The force against us is too strong,” said he. “I will give myself up as a prisoner and let him wreak his vengeance on me.
I may save the people.” But a voice was heard saying, “You have long ruled here and the people love you.
Strong as the enemy are, they are not necessarily able to break down our walls, especially when defended by you and your people.
I have a scheme to suggest that I think will make Cao Cao die in a place where he will not find burial.” These bold words startled the assembly, and they eagerly asked what the scheme was.
Making overtures for friendship, Tao Qian encountered deadly hate. But, where danger seemed most threatening, he discovered safety's gate.
The next chapter will disclose who the speaker was. CHAPTER 11.
Liu Bei Rescues Kong Rong At Beihai; Lu Bu Defeats Cao Cao Near Puyang. It was one Mi Zhu who said he knew how to defeat Cao Cao utterly.
Mi Zhu came of a wealthy family of merchants in Donghai and trading in Luoyang. One day traveling homeward from that city in a carriage, he met an exquisitely beautiful lady trudging along the road, who asked him to let her ride. He stopped and yielded his place to her. She invited him to share the seat with her.
He mounted, but sat rigidly upright, never even glancing in her direction. They traveled thus for some miles when she thanked him and alighted.
Just as she left she said, “I am the Goddess of Fire from the Southern Land. I am on my way to execute a decree of the Supreme God to burn your dwelling, but your extreme courtesy has so deeply touched me that I now warn you.
Hasten homeward, remove your valuables, for I must arrive tonight.” Thereupon she disappeared.
Mi Zhu hastily finished his journey and, as soon as he arrived, moved everything out of his house.
Sure enough that night a fire started in the kitchen and involved the whole house.
After this he devoted his wealth to relieving the poor and comforting the afflicted.
Tao Qian gave him the magistracy office he then held. The plan Mi Zhu proposed was this: “I will go to Beihai and beg Governor Kong Rong to help.
Another should go to Qingzhou on a similar mission to get the help from Imperial Protector Tien Kai.
If the armies of these two places march on Cao Cao, he will certainly retire.” Tao Qian accepted the plan and wrote two letters.
He asked for a volunteer to go to Qingzhou, and a certain Chen Deng offered himself and, after he had left, Mi Zhu was formally entrusted with the mission to the north. Meanwhile Tao Qian and his generals would hold the city as they could.
Kong Rong was a native of Qufu in the old state of Lu. He was one of the twentieth generation in descent from the great Teacher Confucius.
Kong Rong had been noted as a very intelligent lad, somewhat precocious. When ten years old he had gone to see Li Ying, the Governor of Henan, but the doorkeeper demurred to letting him in. But when Kong Rong said, “I am Minister Li Ying's intimate friend,” he was admitted. Li Ying asked Kong Rong what relations had existed between their families that might justify the term intimate.
The boy replied, “Of old my ancestor Confucius questioned your ancestor, the Taoist sage Laozi, concerning ceremonies. So our families have known each other for many generations.” Li Ying was astonished at the boy's ready wit.
Presently High Minister Chen Wei visited, to whom Li Ying told the story of his youthful guest.
“He is a wonder, this boy,” said Li Ying, pointing to Kong Rong.
Chen Wei replied, “It does not follow that a clever boy grows up into a clever man.” The lad took him up at once saying, “By what you say, Sir, you were certainly one of the clever boys.” The minister adviser and the governor all laughed, saying, “The boy is going to be a noble vessel.” Thus from boyhood Kong Rong was famous.
As a man he rose to be an Imperial Commander and was sent as Governor to Beihai, where he was renowned for hospitality. He used to quote the lines:
“Let the rooms be full of friends, And the cups be full of wine.
That is what I like.” After six years at Beihai the people were devoted to him.
The day that Mi Zhu arrived, Kong Rong was, as usual, seated among his guests, and the messenger was ushered in without delay.
In reply to a question about the reason of the visit, Mi Zhu presented Tao Qian's letter which said that Cao Cao was pressing on Xuzhou City and the Imperial Protector prayed for help.
Then said Kong Rong, “Your master and I are good friends, and your presence here constrains me to go to his aid.
However, I have no quarrel with Cao Cao either, so I will first write to him to try to make peace.
If he refuses my offer, then I must set the army in motion.” “Cao Cao will not listen to proposals of peace; he is too certain of his strength,” said Mi Zhu.
Kong Rong wrote his letter and also gave orders to muster his troops.
Just at this moment happened another rising of the Yellow Scarves, ten thousand of them, and the ruffians began to rob and murder at Beihai.
It was necessary to deal with them first, and Kong Rong led his army outside the city.
The rebel leader, Guan Hai, rode out to the front, saying, “I know this county is fruitful and can well spare ten thousand carts of grain.
Give me that and we retire; refuse, and we will batter down the city walls and destroy every soul.” Kong Rong shouted back, “I am a servant of the great Hans, entrusted with the safety of their land.
Think you I will feed rebels ?” Guan Hai whipped his steed, whirled his sword around his head and rode forward.
Zong Bao, one of Kong Rong's generals, set his spear and rode out to give battle, but after a very few bouts Zong Bao was cut down.
Soon the soldiers fell into panic and rushed pell-mell into the city for protection.
The rebels then laid siege to the city on all sides.
Kong Rong was very downhearted; and Mi Zhu, who now saw no hope for the success of his mission, was grieved beyond words.
The sight from the city wall was exceeding sad, for the rebels were there in enormous numbers. One day standing on the wall, Kong Rong saw afar a man armed with a spear riding hard in among the Yellow Scarves and scattering them before him like chaff before the wind.
Before long the man had reached the foot of the wall and called out, “Open the gate!” But the defenders would not open to an unknown man, and in the delay a crowd of rebels gathered round the rider along the edge of the moat.
Suddenly wheeling about, the warrior dashed in among them and bowled over a dozen at which the others fell back. At this Kong Rong ordered the wardens to open the gates and let the stranger enter.
As soon as he was inside, he dismounted, laid aside his spear, ascended the wall, and made humble obeisance to the Governor.
“My name is Taishi Ci, and I am from the county of Laihuang.
I only returned home yesterday from the north to see my mother, and then I heard that your city was in danger from a rebel attack.
My mother said you had been very kind to her and told me I should try to help.
So I set out all alone and here I am.” This was cheering.
Kong Rong already knew Taishi Ci by reputation as a valiant fighting man, although they two had never met.
The son being far away from his home, Kong Rong had taken his mother, who dwelt a few miles from the city, under his especial protection and saw that she did not suffer from want.
This had won the old lady's heart and she had sent her son to show her gratitude.
Kong Rong showed his appreciation by treating his guest with the greatest respect, making him presents of clothing and armor, saddles and horses.
Presently said Taishi Ci, “Give me a thousand soldiers, and I will go out and drive off these fellows.” “You are a bold warrior, but these are very numerous.
It is a serious matter to go out among them,” said Kong Rong. “My mother sent me because of your goodness to her.
How shall I be able to look her in the face if I do not raise the siege?
I would prefer to conquer or perish.” “I have heard Liu Bei is one of the heroes in the world; and if we could get his help, there would be no doubt of the result.
But there is no one to send.” “I will go as soon as I have received your letter.” So Kong Rong wrote letters and gave them to his helper.
Taishi Ci put on his armor, mounted his steed, attached his bow and quiver to his girdle, took his spear in his hand, tied his packed haversack firmly to his saddle bow, and rode out at the city gate. He went quite alone.
Along the moat a large party of the besiegers were gathered, and they came to intercept the solitary rider.
But Taishi Ci dashed in among them and cut down several and so finally fought his way through.
Guan Hai, hearing that a rider had left the city, guessed what his errand would be and followed Taishi Ci with a party of horsemen. Guan Hai spread them out so that the messenger rider was entirely surrounded.
Then Taishi Ci laid aside his spear, took his bow, adjusted his arrows one by one and shot all round him. And as a rider fell from his steed with every twang of Taishi Ci's bowstring, the pursuers dared not close in.
Thus he got clear away and rode in hot haste to Liu Bei.
Taishi Ci reached Pingyuan, and after greeting his host in proper form he told how Kong Rong was surrounded and had sent him for help. Then he presented the letter which Liu Bei read.
“And who are you?” asked Liu Bei.
“I am Taishi Ci, a fellow from Laihuang.
I am not related by ties of kin to Kong Rong, nor even by ties of neighborhood, but I am by the bonds of sentiment and I share his sorrows and misfortunes.
The Yellow Scarves have invested his city, and he is distressed with none to turn to, and destruction is very near.
You are known as humane, righteous, and eager to help the distressed. Therefore at his command I have braved all dangers and fought my way through his enemies to pray you save him.” Liu Bei smiled, saying, “And does he know there is a Liu Bei in this world?” So Liu Bei, together with Guan Yu and Zhang Fei, told off three thousand troops and set out to help raise the siege.
When the rebel leader Guan Hai saw these new forces arriving; he led out his army to fight them, thinking he could easily dispose of so small a force. The brothers and Taishi Ci with them sat on their horses in the forefront of their array. Guan Hai hastened forward.
Taishi Ci was ready to fight, but Guan Yu had opened the combat.
He rode forth and the two steeds met. The soldiers set up a great shout, for how could there be any doubt of the result?
After a few bouts Guan Yu's green-dragon saber rose and fell, and with the stroke fell the rebel leader. This was the signal for Zhang Fei and Taishi Ci to take a share, and they advanced side by side. With their spears ready they dashed in, and Liu Bei urged forward his force.
The besieged Governor saw his doughty rescuers laying low the rebels as tigers among a flock of sheep. None could withstand them, and he then sent out his own troops to join in the battle so that the rebels were between two armies.
The rebels' force was completely broken and many troops surrendered, while the remainder scattered in all directions.
The victors were welcomed into the city, and as soon as possible a banquet was prepared in their honor. Mi Zhu was presented to Liu Bei.
Mi Zhu related the story of the murder of Cao Song by Zhang Kai, Cao Cao's vengeful attack on Xuzhou, and his coming to beg for assistance.
Liu Bei said, “Imperial Protector Tao Qian is a kindly man of high character, and it is a pity that he should suffer this wrong for no fault of his own.” “You are a scion of the imperial family,” said Governor Kong Rong, “and this Cao Cao is injuring the people, a strong man abusing his strength.
Why not go with me to rescue the sufferers?” “I dare not refuse, but my force is weak and I must act cautiously,” said Liu Bei.
“Though my desire to help arises from an old friendship, yet it is a righteous act as well. I do not think your heart is not inclined toward the right,” said Kong Rong.
Liu Bei said, “This being so, you go first and give me time to see Gongsun Zan from whom I may borrow more troops and horses.
I will come anon.” “You surely will not break your promise?” said the Governor.
“What manner of man think you that I am?” said Liu Bei.
“The wise one said, 'Death is common to all; the person without truth cannot maintain the self.' Whether I get the troops or not, certainly I shall myself come.” So the plan was agreed to.
Mi Zhu set out to return forthwith while Kong Rong prepared for his expedition.
Taishi Ci took his leave, saying, “My mother bade me come to your aid, and now happily you are safe.
Letters have come from my fellow townsman, Liu Yao, Imperial Protector of Yangzhou, calling me thither and I must go.
I will see you again.” Kong Rong pressed rewards upon Taishi Ci, but he would accept nothing and departed.
When his mother saw him, she was pleased at his success saying she rejoiced that he had been able to prove his gratitude, and after this he departed for Yangzhou.
Liu Bei went away to his friend Gongsun Zan and laid before Gongsun Zan his design to help Xuzhou.
“Cao Cao and you are not enemies; why do you spend yourself for the sake of another?” said Gongsun Zan.
“I have promised,” Liu Bei replied, “and dare not break faith.” “I will lend you two thousand horse and foot,” said Gongsun Zan.
“Also I wish to have the services of Zhao Yun,” said Liu Bei.
Gongsun Zan agreed to this also. They marched away, Liu Bei's own troops being in the front, and Zhao Yun, with the borrowed troops, being in rear.
In due course Mi Zhu returned saying that Kong Rong had also obtained the services of Liu Bei.
The other messenger, Chen Deng, came back and reported that Tien Kai would also bring help. Then was Tao Qian's heart set at ease.
But both the leaders, though they had promised aid, greatly dreaded their antagonist and camped among the hills at a great distance, fearful of coming to close quarters.
Cao Cao knew of their coming and divided his army into parts to meet them, so postponing the attack on the city itself.
Presently Liu Bei came up and went to see Kong Rong, who said, “The enemy is very powerful, and Cao Cao handles his army skillfully. We must be cautious.
Let us make most careful observations before we strike a blow.” “What I fear is famine in the city,” said Liu Bei. “They cannot hold out very long.
I will put my troops with yours under your command, while I with Zhang Fei make a dash through to see Tao Qian and consult with him.” Kong Rong approved of this, so he and Tien Kai took up positions on the ox-horn formation, with Guan Yu and Zhao Yun on either side to support them.
When Liu Bei and Zhang Fei leading one thousand troops made their dash to get through Cao Cao's army, they got as far as the flank of his camp when there arose a great beating of drums, and horse and foot rolled out like billows on the ocean. The leader was Yu Jin.
He checked his steed and called out, “You mad men from somewhere, where are you going?” Zhang Fei heard Yu Jin but deigned no reply.
He only rode straight to attack the speaker.
After they had fought a few bouts, Liu Bei waved his double swords as signal for his troops to come on, and they drove Yu Jin before them.
Zhang Fei led the pursuit and in this way they reached the city wall.
From the city wall the besieged saw a huge banner embroidered in white “Liu Bei of Pingyuan,” and the Imperial Protector bade them open the gate for the rescuers to enter.
Liu Bei was made very welcome, conducted to the residency, and a banquet prepared in his honor. The soldiers also were feasted.
Tao Qian was delighted with Liu Bei, admiring his high-spirited appearance and clear speech. Tao Qian bade Mi Zhu offer Liu Bei the seal and insignia of the protectorship office. But Liu Bei shrank back startled.
“What does this mean?” said Liu Bei.
Tao Qian said, “There is trouble on every side, and the kingly rule is no longer maintained.
You, Sir, are a member of the family and eminently fitted to support them and their prerogatives.
I am verging on senility, and I wish to retire in your favor.
I pray you not to decline, and I will report my action to the court.” Liu Bei started up from his seat and bowed before his host saying, “Scion of the family I may be, but my merit is small and my virtue meager.
I doubt my fitness even for my present post, and only a feeling of doing right sent me to your assistance. To hear such speech makes me doubt.
Surely you think I came with greed in my heart.
May God help me no more if I cherished such a thought.” “It is a poor old man's real sentiment,” said Tao Qian. Time after time Tao Qian renewed his offer to entrust the region of Xuzhou to Liu Bei, but Liu Bei kept refusing.
In the midst of this came Mi Zhu, saying, “The enemies had reached the wall, and something must be done to drive them off.
The present matter could await a more tranquil time.” Said Liu Bei, “I ought to write to Cao Cao to press him to raise the siege.
If he refuses, we will attack forthwith.” Orders were sent to the three camps outside to remain quiescent till the letter could reach Cao Cao.
It happened that Cao Cao was holding a council when a messenger with a war letter was announced.
The letter was brought in and handed to him and, when he had opened and looked at it, he found it was from Liu Bei. This is the letter, very nearly:
“Since meeting you outside the pass, fate has assigned us to different quarters of the world, and I have not been able to pay my respects to you.
Touching the death of your noble father, it was owing to the vicious nature of Zhang Kai and due to no fault of Tao Qian.
Now while the remnant of the Yellow Scarves is disturbing the lands, and Dong Zhuo's partisans have the upper hand in the capital, I wish that you, Illustrious Sir, would regard the critical position of the court rather than your personal grievances, and so divert your forces from the attack on Xuzhou to the rescue of the state.
Such would be for the happiness of that city and the whole world.” Cao Cao gave vent to a torrent of abuse:
“Who is this Liu Bei that he dares write and exhort me?
Beside, he means to be satirical.” Cao Cao issued orders to put the bearer of the letter to death and to press on the siege.
But Guo Jia remonstrated, saying, “Liu Bei has come from afar to help Tao Qian, and he is trying the effect of politeness before resorting to arms. I pray you, my lord, reply with fair words that his heart may be lulled with a feeling of safety.
Then attack with vigor and the city will fall.” Cao Cao found this advice good, so he spared the messenger, telling him to wait to carry back his reply.
While this was going on, a horseman came with news of misfortune:
“Lu Bu has invaded Yanzhou, now holding Puyang. The three counties left—Juancheng, Fanxia, and Dongjun—are under severe attacks.” When Li Jue and Guo Si, the two partisans of Dong Zhuo, succeeded in their attack on the capital, Lu Bu had fled to Yuan Shu.
However, Yuan Shu looked askance at him for his instability and refused to receive him. Then Lu Bu went to try Yuan Shao, who was a brother of Yuan Shu.
Yuan Shao accepted the warrior and made use of him in an attack upon Zhang Yan in Changshan.
But his success filled him with pride, and his arrogant demeanor so annoyed the other commanders that Yuan Shao was on the point of putting him to death.
To escape this Lu Bu had gone away to Zhang Yang, Governor of Shangdang, who accepted his services.
About this time Pang Shu, who had been hiding and protecting Lu Bu's family in Changan since his disappearance, restored them to him.
This deed angered Li Jue and Guo Si so that they put Pang Shu to death and wrote to Lu Bu's protector to serve him the same. To escape this Lu Bu once again had to flee and this time joined himself to Zhang Miao.
Lu Bu arrived just as Zhang Miao's brother, Zhang Chao, was introducing Chen Gong.
Chen Gong said to Zhang Miao, “The rupture of the empire has begun, and warriors are seizing what they can.
It is strange that you, with all the advantages of population and provisions you enjoy, do not strike for independence.
Cao Cao has gone on an expedition against the east, leaving his own territory defenseless.
Lu Bu is one of the fighting people of the day. If you and he together attacked and got Yanzhou, you could then proceed to the dominion.” Zhang Miao was pleased and resolved to try.
He ordered an attack, and soon Lu Bu was in possession of Yanzhou and its neighborhood, all but three small counties of Juancheng, Fanxia, and Dongjun, which were vigorously and desperately defended by Xun Yu and Cheng Yu in concert.
Cao Cao's cousin, Cao Ren, had fought many battles but was repeatedly defeated, and the messenger with the evil tidings had come from him asking prompt help.
Cao Cao was greatly disturbed by this and said, “If my own region be lost, I have no home to return to.
I must do something at once.” “The best thing would be to become friends with Liu Bei at any cost and return to Yanzhou,” said Guo Jia.
Then Cao Cao wrote to Liu Bei, gave the letter to the waiting messenger and broke camp.
The news that the enemy had left was very gratifying to Tao Qian, who then invited his various defenders into Xuzhou City and prepared banquets and feasts in token of his gratitude. At one of these, when the feasting was over, he proceeded with his wish of retirement in favor of Liu Bei.
Placing Liu Bei in the seat of highest honor, Tao Qian bowed before him and then addressed the assembly, “I am old and feeble, and my two sons lack the ability to hold so important an office as this.
The noble Liu Bei is a descendant of the imperial house. He is of lofty virtue and great talent.
Let him then take over the rule of this region, and only too willingly I shall retire to have leisure to nurse my health.” Liu Bei replied, “I came at the request of Governor Kong Rong, because it was the right thing to do.
Xuzhou is saved; but if I take it, surely the world will say I am a wicked man.” Mi Zhu said, “You may not refuse.
The House of Han is falling; their realm is crumbling, and now is the time for doughty deeds and signal services.
This is a fertile region, well populated and rich, and you are the man to rule over it.” “But I cannot accept,” said Liu Bei.
“Imperial Protector Tao Qian is a great sufferer,” said Chen Deng, “and cannot see to matters.
You may not decline, Sir.” Said Liu Bei, “Yuan Shu belongs to a family of rulers, who have held the highest offices of state four times in three generations. The multitude people respects him.
Why not invite him to this task?” “Because Yuan Shu is a drying skeleton in a dark tomb; not worth talking about.
This opportunity is a gift from Heaven, and you will never cease to regret its loss,” said Kong Rong. So spoke Kong Rong, but still Liu Bei obstinately refused.
Tao Qian besought him with tears, saying, “I shall die if you leave me, and there will be none to close my eyes.” “Brother, you should accept the offer thus made,” said Guan Yu. “Why so much fuss?” said Zhang Fei.
“We have not taken the place; it is he who wishes to give it you.” “You all persuade me to do what is wrong,” said Liu Bei.
Seeing he could not persuade Liu Bei, Tao Qian then said, “As you are set in determination, perhaps you will consent to encamp at Xiaopei.
It is only a little town, but thence you can keep watch and ward over the region.” They all with one voice prayed Liu Bei to consent, so he gave in. The feast of victory being now ended, the time came to say farewell.
When Zhao Yun took his leave, Liu Bei held his hands alternately while dashing away the falling tears. Kong Rong and Tien Kai went home to their own places. When Liu Bei and his brothers took up their abode in Xiaopei, they first repaired the defenses, and then they put out proclamations in order to calm the inhabitants. In the meantime Cao Cao had marched toward his own region.
Cao Ren met and told him, “Lu Bu is very powerful, and he has Chen Gong as adviser. Yanzhou is as good as lost, with the exception of three counties which have been vigorously and desperately defended by Xun Yu and Cheng Yu.” Cao Cao said, “I own that Lu Bu is a bold fighter but nothing more; he has no craft.
So we need not fear him seriously.” Then he gave orders to make a strong camp till they could think out some victorious plan.
Lu Bu, knowing of Cao Cao's return, called two of his subordinate generals, Xue Lan and Li Feng, to him and assigned to them the task of holding the city of Yanzhou, saying, “I have long waited for opportunity to employ your skill; now I give you ten thousand soldiers, and you are to hold the city while I go forth to attack Cao Cao.” They accepted.
But Chen Gong, the strategist, came in hastily, saying, “General, you are going away; whither?” “I am going to camp my troops at Puyang, that vantage point.” “You are making a mistake,” said Chen Gong. “The two you have chosen to defend this city are unequal to the task.
For this expedition remember that about sixty miles due south, on the treacherous road to the Taishan Mountains, is a very advantageous position where you should place your best men in ambush.
Cao Cao will hasten homeward by double marches when he hears what has happened; and if you strike when half his troops have gone past this point, you may seize him.” Said Lu Bu, “I am going to occupy Puyang and see what develops.
How can you guess my big plan?” So Lu Bu left Xue Lan in command at Yanzhou and went away.
Now when Cao Cao approached the dangerous part of the road near the Taishan Mountains, Guo Jia warned him to take care as there was doubtless an ambush. But Cao Cao laughed, saying, “We know all Lu Bu's dispositions. Xue Lan is keeping the city. Do you think Lu Bu has laid an ambush?
I shall tell Cao Ren to besiege Yanzhou, and I shall go to Puyang.” In Puyang, when Chen Gong heard of the enemy's approach he spoke, saying, “The enemy will be fatigued with long marches so attack quickly before they have time to recover.” Lu Bu replied, “I, a single horseman, am afraid of none. I go and come as I will. Think you I fear this Cao Cao?
Let him settle his camp; I will take him after that.” Now Cao Cao neared Puyang, and he made a camp.
The next day he led out his commanders, and they arrayed their armies in open country.
Cao Cao took up his station on horseback between the two standards, watching while his opponents arrived and formed up in a circular area.
Lu Bu was in front, followed by eight of his generals, all strong men: Zhang Liao of Mayi, backed by Hao Meng, Cao Xing, and Cheng Lian; Zang Ba of Huaying, backed by Wei Xu, Song Xian, and Hou Cheng.
They led an army of fifty thousand in total.
The drums began their thunderous roll; and Cao Cao, pointing to his opponent, said, “You and I had no quarrel, why then did you invade my land?” “The empire of Han is the possession of all; what is your special claim?” said Lu Bu.
So saying, Lu Bu ordered Zang Ba to ride forth and challenge.
From Cao Cao's side the challenge was accepted by Yue Jin.
The two steeds approached each other; two spears were lifted both together, and they exchanged near thirty blows with no advantage to either.
Then Xiahou Dun rode out to help his colleague and, in reply, out went Zhang Liao from Lu Bu's side. And they four fought.
Then fierce anger seized upon Lu Bu. Setting his trident halberd, he urged his Red-Hare forward to where the fight was waging.
Seeing him approach, Xiahou Dun and Yue Jin both fled, but Lu Bu pressed on after them, and Cao Cao's army lost the day. Retiring ten miles, they made a new camp.
Lu Bu called in and mustered his troops.
The day having gone against him, Cao Cao called a council, and Yu Jin said, “From the hill tops today I saw a camp of our enemies on the west of Puyang.
They were but few men therein, and tonight after today's victory, it will not be defended.
Let us attack; and if we can take the camp, we shall strike fear into the heart of Lu Bu.
This is our best plan.” Cao Cao thought so too. He and six of his generals—Cao Hong, Li Dian, Mao Jie, Lu Qian, Yu Jin, and Dian Wei—and twenty thousand horse and foot left that night by a secret road for the camp.
In his camp Lu Bu was rejoicing for that day's victory, when Chen Gong reminded him, saying, “The western camp is importance point, and it might be attacked.” But Lu Bu replied, “The enemy will not dare approach after today's defeat.” “Cao Cao is a very able commander,” replied Chen Gong.
“You must keep a good lookout for him lest he attack our weak spot.” So arrangements were made for defense.
Generals Gao Shun, Wei Xu, and Hou Cheng were ordered to march there.
At dusk Cao Cao reached the camp and began an immediate attack on all four sides.
The defenders could not hold him off. They ran in all directions, and the camp was captured.
Near the fourth watch, when the defending party came, Cao Cao sallied forth to meet them and met Gao Shun. Another battle then began and waged till dawn. About that time a rolling of drums was heard in the west, and they told Cao Cao that Lu Bu himself was at hand.
Thereupon Cao Cao abandoned the attack and fled.
Gao Shun, Wei Xu, and Hou Cheng pursued him, Lu Bu taking the lead.
Cao Cao's two generals, Yu Jin and Yue Jin, attacked the pursuers but could not check them. Cao Cao went away north.
But from behind some hills came out Zhang Liao and Zang Ba to attack.
Lu Qian and Cao Hong were sent to stop the attackers, but Lu Qian and Cao Hong were both defeated.
Cao Cao sought safety in the west.
Here again his retreat was met by Lu Bu's four generals, Hao Meng, Cao Xing, Cheng Lian, and Song Xian.
The fight became desperate. Cao Cao dashed at the enemy's array. The din was terrible.
Arrows fell like pelting rain upon them, and they could make no headway.
Cao Cao was desperate and cried out in fear, “Who can save me?” Then from the crush dashed out Dian Wei with his double spears, crying, “Fear not, my master.” Dian Wei leapt from his steed, leaned his double spears against a wall and laid hold of a handful of battle-axes.
Turning to his followers he said, “When the ruffians are at ten paces, call out to me.” Then he set off with mighty strides, plunging forward, careless of the flying arrows.
Lu Bu's horsemen followed, and when they got near, Dian Wei's followers shouted, “Ten paces!” “Five, then call!” shouted back Dian Wei, and went on.
Presently, “Five paces!” Then Dian Wei spun round and flung the battle-axes. With every fling a man fell from the saddle and never a battle-ax missed.
Having thus slain ten or so the remainder fled, and Dian Wei quickly remounted his steed, set his twin spears and rushed again into the fight with a vigor that none could withstand. One by one his opponents yielded, and he was able to lead Cao Cao safely out of the press of battle.
Cao Cao and his commanders went to their camp.
But as evening fell, the noise of pursuit fell on their ears, and soon appeared Lu Bu himself. “Cao Cao, you rebel, do not flee!” shouted Lu Bu as he approached with his halberd ready for a thrust. All stopped and looked in each others' faces: the soldiers were weary, their steeds spent. Fear smote them, and they looked around for some place of refuge.
You may lead your lord safely out of the press, But what if the enemy follow?
We cannot say here what Cao Cao's fate was, but the next chapter will relate. CHAPTER 12.
Tao Qian Thrice Offers Xuzhou To Liu Bei; Cao Cao Retakes Yanzhou From Lu Bu In Battles. The last chapter closed with Cao Cao in great danger. However, help came. Xiahou Dun with a body of soldiers found his chief, checked the pursuit, and fought with Lu Bu till dusk.
Rain fell in torrents swamping everything; and as the daylight waned, they drew off and Cao Cao reached camp.
He rewarded Dian Wei generously and advanced him in rank.
When Lu Bu reached his camp, he called in his adviser Chen Gong. Then Chen Gong proposed a new stratagem.
He said, “In Puyang there is a rich, leading family, Tian by name, who number thousands, enough to populate a whole county in themselves.
Make one of these people go to Cao Cao's camp with a pretended secret letter about Lu Bu's ferocity, and the hatred of the people, and their desire to be rid of him.
End by saying that only Gao Shun is left to guard the city, and they would help any one who would come to save them.
Thus our enemy Cao Cao will be inveigled into the city, and we will destroy him either by fire or ambush.
His skill may be equal to encompassing the universe, but he will not escape.” Lu Bu thought this trick might be tried, and they arranged for the Tian family letter to be sent.
Coming soon after the defeat, when Cao Cao felt uncertain what step to take next, the secret letter was read with joy.
It promised interior help and said the sign should be a white flag with the word “Rectitude” written thereon.
“Heaven is going to give me Puyang,” said Cao Cao joyfully.
So he rewarded the messenger very liberally and began to prepare for the expedition.
Then came Liu Ye, saying, “Lu Bu is no strategist, but Chen Gong is full of guile; I fear treachery in this letter, and you must be careful.
If you will go, then enter with only one third your army, leaving the others outside the city as a reserve.” Cao Cao agreed to take this precaution.
He went to Puyang, which he found gay with fluttering flags. Looking carefully he saw among them, at the west gate, the white flag with the looked-for inscription. His heart rejoiced.
That day, just about noon, the city gates opened, and two bodies of soldiers appeared as if to fight. Gao Shun was the front commander, and Hou Cheng the rear commander.
Cao Cao told off his general, Dian Wei, to oppose them.
Neither body, however, came on to full engagement but fell back into the city.
By this move Dian Wei and his troops had been drawn close up to the drawbridge.
From within the city several soldiers were seen taking any chance of confusion to escape and come outside. To Cao Cao they said, “We are clients of the Tian family,” and they gave him secret letters stating:
“The signal will be given about the first watch setting by beating a gong. That will be the time to attack.
The gates will be opened.” So Cao Cao ordered Xiahou Dun to march to the left and Cao Hong to the right.
Cao Cao led the main army—together with Xiahou Yuan, Li Dian, and Yue Jin—into the city.
Li Dian pressed upon his master the precaution, saying, “My lord should stay outside the city; let us go in first.” But Cao Cao bade him be silent, saying, “If I do not go, who will advance?” And so at the first watch Cao Cao led the way.
The moon had not yet arisen.
As he drew near the west gate, they heard a crackling sound, then a loud shouting, and then torches moved hither and thither.
Next the gates were thrown wide open, and Cao Cao, whipping up his steed, galloped in.
But when he reached the state residence, he noticed the streets were quite deserted, and then he knew he had been tricked. Wheeling round his horse, he shouted to his followers to retire. This was the signal for another move.
An explosion of a signal bomb was heard close at hand, and it was echoed from every side in a deafening roar.
Gongs and drums beat all around with a roar like rivers rushing backward to their source, and the ocean boiling up from its depths. From two sides east and west came bodies of soldiers eager to attack, led by Lu Bu's generals Zhang Liao and Zang Ba.
Cao Cao dashed off toward the north only to find his way barred by Hao Meng and Cao Xing.
Cao Cao tried for the south gate, but met enemies led by Gao Shun and Hou Cheng.
Cao Cao's trusty commander Dian Wei, with fierce eyes and gritting teeth, at last burst through and got out, with the enemy close after him. But when Dian Wei reached the drawbridge, he glanced behind him and missed his master. Immediately Dian Wei turned back and cut an arterial alley inside. Just within he met Li Dian.
“Where is our lord?” cried Dian Wei.
“I am looking for him,” said Li Dian. “Quick! Get help from outside,” shouted Dian Wei. “I will seek him.” So Li Dian hastened for aid, and Dian Wei slashed his way in, looking on every side for Cao Cao. He was not to be found.
Dashing out of the city, Dian Wei ran up against Yue Jin, who asked where their lord was.
“I have entered the city twice in search of him, but cannot find him,” said Dian Wei. “Let us go in together,” said Yue Jin. They rode up to the gate.
But the noise of bombs from the gate tower frightened Yue Jin's horse so that it refused to pass.
Wherefore Dian Wei alone went in, butting through the smoke and dashing through the flames. But he got in and searched on every side.
When Cao Cao saw his sturdy protector Dian Wei cut his way out and disappear leaving him surrounded, he again made an attempt to reach the north gate.
On the way, sharply outlined against the glow, he saw the figure of Lu Bu coming toward him with his trident halberd ready to kill.
Cao Cao covered his face with his hand, whipped up his steed and galloped past.
But Lu Bu came galloping up behind him and tapping him on the helmet with the halberd cried, “Where is Cao Cao?” Cao Cao turned and, pointing to a dun horse well ahead, cried, “There; on that dun!
That's he.” Hearing this Lu Bu left pursuing Cao Cao to gallop after the rider of the dun.
Thus relieved Cao Cao set off for the east gate.
Then he fell in with Dian Wei, who took him under his protection and fought through the press, leaving a trail of death behind till they reached the gate. Here the fire was raging fiercely, and burning beams were falling on all sides. The earth element seemed to have interchanged with the fire element. Dian Wei warded off the burning pieces of wood with his lance and rode into the smoke making a way for his lord.
Just as they were passing through the gate a flaming beam fell from the gate tower. Cao Cao just warded it off with his arm, but it struck his steed on the quarters and knocked the steed down.
Cao Cao's hand and arm were badly burned and his hair and beard singed.
Dian Wei turned back to his rescue. Luckily Xiahou Yuan came along just then, and the two raised Cao Cao and set him on Xiahou Yuan's horse.
And thus they got him out of the burning city.
But they had to go through heavy fighting till daybreak. Cao Cao returned to his camp.
His officers crowded about his tent, anxious for news of his health. He soon recovered and laughed when he thought of his escape. “I blundered into that fool's trap, but I will have my revenge,” said he.
“Let us have a new plan soon,” said Guo Jia. “I will turn his trick to my own use.
I will spread the false report that I was burned in the fire, and that I died at the fifth watch.
He will come to attack as soon as the news gets abroad, and I will have an ambush ready for him in Maling Hills.
I will get him this time.” “Really a fine stratagem!” said Guo Jia.
So the soldiers were put into mourning, and the report went everywhere that Cao Cao was dead.
And soon Lu Bu heard it, and he assembled his army at once to make a surprise attack, taking the road by the Maling Hills to his enemy's camp.
As he was passing the hills, he heard the drums beating for an advance, and the ambushing soldiers leapt out all round him.
Only by desperate fighting did he get out of the melee and with a sadly diminished force returned to his camp at Puyang. There he strengthened the fortifications and could not be tempted forth to battle.
This year locusts suddenly appeared, and they consumed every green blade.
There was a famine, and in the northeast grain rose to fifty “strings” of cash a cart. People even took to cannibalism.
Cao Cao's army suffered from want, and he marched them to Juancheng.
Lu Bu took his troops to Shanyang.
Perforce therefore the fighting ceased.
In Xuzhou. Imperial Protector Tao Qian, over sixty years of age, suddenly fell seriously ill, and he summoned his confident, Mi Zhu, to his chamber to make arrangements for the future.
As to the situation the adviser said, “Cao Cao abandoned his attack on this place because of his enemy's seizure of Yanzhou; and now they are both keeping the peace solely because of the famine.
But Cao Cao will surely renew the attack in the spring. When Liu Bei refused to allow you to vacate office in his favor, you were in full vigor.
Now you are ill and weak, and you can make this a reason for retirement.
He will not refuse again.” So a message was sent to the little garrison town Xiaopei calling Liu Bei to a counsel on military affairs. This brought him with his brothers and a slender escort. He was at once called in to the sick man's chamber. Quickly disposing of the inquiries about his health, Tao Qian soon came to the real object of his call for Liu Bei.
“Sir, I asked you to come for the sole reason that I am dangerously ill and likely to die at any time.
I look to you, Illustrious Sir, to consider the Hans and their empire as more important than anything else, and so to take over the symbols of office of this region, the commission and the seal, that I may close my eyes in peace.” “You have two sons, why not depute them to relieve you?” said Liu Bei. “Both lack the requisite talents.
I trust you will instruct them after I have gone, but do not let them have the guidance of affairs.” “But I am unequal to so great a charge.” “I will recommend to you one who could assist you.
He is Sun Qian from Beihai who could be appointed to some post.” Turning to Mi Zhu, Tao Qian said, “The noble Liu Bei here is the most prominent man of the time, and you should serve him well.” Still would Liu Bei have put from him such a post, but just then the Imperial Protector, pointing to his heart to indicate his sincerity, passed away.
When the ceremonial wailing of the officials was over, the insignia of office were brought to Liu Bei. But he would have none of them.
The following days the inhabitants of the town and country around crowded into the state residence, bowing and with tears, calling upon Liu Bei to receive the charge. “If you do not, we cannot live in pence,” said they.
To these requests his brothers added their persuasion, till at length he consented to assume the administrative duties.
He forthwith appointed Sun Qian and Mi Zhu as his official advisers, and Chen Deng his secretary.
He moved his army from Xiaopei to Xuzhou City, and he put forth proclamations to reassure the people.
He also attended to the burial ceremonies; he and all his army dressing in mourning.
After the fullest sacrifices and ceremonies, a burial place for the late Imperial Protector was found close to the source of the Yellow River.
The dead man's testament was forwarded to court. The news of the events in Xuzhou duly reached the ears of Cao Cao, then in Juancheng. Said he, angrily, “I have missed my revenge. This Liu Bei has simply stepped into command of the region without expending half an arrow; he sat still and attained his desire.
But I will put him to death and then dig up Tao Qian's corpse in revenge for the death of my noble father.” Orders were issued for the army to prepare for a new campaign against Xuzhou.
But Adviser Xun Yu remonstrated with Cao Cao, saying, “The Supreme Ancestor secured the Land Within the Pass  and his illustrious successor on the throne, Liu Xiu, took Henei. They both first consolidated their position whereby they could command the whole empire. Their whole progress was from success to success. Hence they accomplished their great designs in spite of difficulties.
“Illustrious Sir, your Land Within the Pass and your Henei are Yanzhou and the Yellow River, which you had first, and which is of the utmost strategic point of the empire.
If you undertake this expedition against Xuzhou leaving many troops here for defense, you will not accomplish your design; if you leave too few, Lu Bu will fall upon us.
And finally if you lose this and fail to gain Xuzhou, whither will you retire? That region is not vacant.
Although Tao Qian has gone, Liu Bei holds it; and since the people support him, they will fight to the death for him.
To abandon this place for that is to exchange the great for the small, to barter the trunk for the branches, to leave safety and run into danger.
I would implore you to reflect well.” Cao Cao replied, “It is not a good plan to keep soldiers idle here during such scarcity.” “If that is so, it would be more advantageous to attack the eastern counties of Chencheng, Yingchuan, and Runan, and feed your army on their supplies.
The remnants of the Yellow Scarves, He Yi and Huang Shao, are there with stores and treasures of all kinds that they have amassed by plundering wherever they could. Rebels of their stamp are easily broken. Break them, and you can feed your army with their grain. Moreover, both the court and the common people will join in blessing you.” This new design appealed strongly to Cao Cao, and he quickly began his preparations to carry it out.
He left Xiahou Dun and Cao Ren to guard Juancheng, while his main body, under his own command, marched to seize Chencheng. This done they went to Runan and Yingchuan.
Now when the Yellow Scarves leaders, He Yi and Huang Shao, knew that Cao Cao was approaching; they came out in a great body to oppose him. They met at Goat Hill.
Though the rebels were numerous, they were a poor lot, a mere pack of beasts without organization and lacking discipline.
Cao Cao ordered his strong archers and vigorous crossbowmen to keep them in check. Dian Wei was sent out to challenge.
The rebel leaders chose a second-rate champion for their side, who rode out and was vanquished in the third bout.
Then Cao Cao's army pushed forward, and they made a camp at Goat Hill.
The following day the rebel Huang Shao himself led forth his army and made his battle array along a circle.
A leader advanced on foot to offer combat. He wore a yellow turban on his head and a green robe. His weapon was an iron mace. He shouted, “I am He Man, the devil who shoots across the sky; who dare fight with me?” Cao Hong uttered a great shout and jumped from the saddle to accept the challenge.
Sword in hand he advanced on foot and the two engaged in fierce combat in the face of both armies. They exchanged some fifty blows, neither gaining the advantage.
Then Cao Hong feigned defeat and ran away. He Man went after him.
Just as he closed, Cao Hong tried a feint and then suddenly wheeling about, wounded his adversary. Another slash, and He Man lay dead.
At once Li Dian dashed forward into the midst of the Yellow Scarves and laid hands on the rebel chief Huang Shao whom he carried off captive.
Cao Cao's troops then set on and scattered the rebels. The spoil of treasure and food was immense.
The other rebel leader, He Yi, fled with a few hundred horsemen toward Kobei Hills.
But while on their road thither there suddenly appeared a force led by a certain swashbuckler who shall be nameless for the moment.
This bravo was a well-built man, thickset and stout. With a waist ten span in girth. He used a long sword. He barred the way of retreat.
He Yi set his spear and rode toward him. But at the first encounter the bravo caught He Yi under his arm and bore He Yi off a prisoner.
All the rebels were terror-stricken, dropped from their horses and allowed themselves to be bound. Then the victor drove them like cattle into an enclosure with high banks.
Presently Dian Wei, still pursuing the rebels, reached Kobei Hills. The swashbuckler went out to meet him.
“Are you also a Yellow Scarf?” said Dian Wei.
“I have some hundreds of them prisoners in an enclosure here.” “Why not bring them out?” said Dian Wei.
“I will if you win this sword from my hand.” This annoyed Dian Wei who attacked him.
They engaged and the combat lasted for two long hours and then was still undecided. Both rested a while. The swashbuckler was the first to recover and renewed the challenge.
They fought till dusk and then, as their horses were quite spent, the combat was once more suspended.
In the meantime some of Dian Wei's men had run off to tell the story of this wondrous fight to Cao Cao who hastened in amazement, followed by many officers to watch it and see the result.
Next day the unknown warrior rode out again, and Cao Cao saw him.
In Cao Cao's heart he rejoiced to see such a doughty hero and desired to gain his services.
So Cao Cao bade Dian Wei feign defeat.
Dian Wei rode out in answer to the challenge, and some thirty bouts were fought. Then Dian Wei turned and fled toward his own side. The bravo followed and came quite close. But a flight of arrows drove him away.
Cao Cao hastily drew off his men for one and a half miles and then secretly sent a certain number to dig a pitfall and sent troops armed with hooks to lie in ambush.
The following day Dian Wei was sent out with one hundred horse. His adversary nothing loath came to meet Dian Wei.
“Why does the defeated leader venture forth again?” cried he laughing.
The swashbuckler spurred forward to join battle, but Dian Wei, after a faint show of fighting, turned his horse and rode away.
His adversary intent upon capture, took no care, and he and his horse all blundered into the pitfall. The hookmen took him captive, bound him, and carried him before Cao Cao.
As soon as he saw the prisoner, Cao Cao advanced from his tent, sent away the soldiers, and with his own hands loosened the leader's bonds. Then he brought out clothing and dressed him, bade him be seated and asked who he was and whence he came. “I am named Xu Chu.
I am from Qiao.
When the rebellion broke out, I and my relations of some hundreds built a stronghold within a rampart for protection.
One day the robbers came, but I had stones ready for them. I told my relatives to keep on bringing them up to me and I threw them, hitting somebody every time I threw.
This drove off the robbers. Another day they came and we were short of grain. So I agreed with them to an exchange of plow oxen against grain.
They delivered the grain and were driving away the oxen when the beasts took fright and tore off to their pens. I seized two of oxen by the tail, one with each hand, and hauled them backwards a hundred or so paces.
The robbers were so amazed that they thought no more about oxen but went their way.
So they never troubled us again.” “I have heard of your mighty exploits,” said Cao Cao. “Will you join my army?” “That is my strongest desire,” said Xu Chu.
So Xu Chu called up his clan, some hundreds in all, and they formally submitted to Cao Cao.
Xu Chu received the rank of general and received ample rewards.
The two rebel leaders, He Yi and Huang Shao, were executed.
Runan and Yingchuan were now perfectly pacified. Cao Cao withdrew his army and went back to Juancheng.
Xiahou Dun and Cao Ren came out to welcome him, and they told him that spies had reported Yanzhou City to be left defenseless. Lu Bu's generals, Xue Lan and Li Feng, had given up all its garrison to plundering the surrounding country. They wanted him to go against it without loss of time. “With our soldiers fresh from victory the city will fall at a tap of the drum,” said they.
So Cao Cao marched the army straight to the city.
An attack was quite unexpected but the two leaders, Xue Lan and Li Feng, hurried out their few soldiers to fight.
Xu Chu, the latest recruit, said he wished to capture these two and he would make of them an introductory gift. The task was given him and he rode forth.
Li Feng with his halberd advanced to meet Xu Chu.
The combat was brief as Li Feng fell in the second bout.
His colleague Xue Lan retired with his troops. But he found the drawbridge had been seized by Li Dian, so that he could not get shelter within the city.
Xue Lan led his men toward Juye.
But Lu Qian pursued and killed him with an arrow. His soldiers scattered to the four winds.
And thus Yanzhou was recaptured. Next Cheng Yu proposed an expedition to take Puyang. Cao Cao marched his army out in perfect order.
The van leaders were Dian Wei and Xu Chu; Xiahou Dun and Xiahou Yuan led the left wing; Li Dian and Yue Jin led the right wing; Yu Jin and Lu Qian guarded the rear. Cao Cao himself commanded the center.
When they approached Puyang, Lu Bu wished to go out in person and alone to attack, but his adviser Chen Gong protested, saying, “General, you should not go out until the arrival of the other officers.” “Whom do I fear?” said Lu Bu.
So he threw caution to the winds and went out of the city. He met his foes and he began to revile them.
The redoubtable Xu Chu went to fight with him, but after twenty bouts neither combatant was any the worse.
“He is not the sort that one man can overcome,” said Cao Cao.
And he sent Dian Wei to attack Lu Bu from another direction.
Lu Bu stood the double onslaught. Soon after the flank commanders joined in— Xiahou Dun and Xiahou Yuan attacking the left; Li Dian and Yue Jin surrounding the right. Lu Bu had six opponents.
These proved really too many for him so he turned his horse and rode back to the city.
But when the members of the Tian family saw him coming back beaten, they raised the drawbridge.
Lu Bu shouted, “Open the gates!
Let me in!” But the Tians said, “We have gone over to Cao Cao.” This was hard to hear and the beaten man abused them roundly before he left.
Chen Gong got away through the east gate taking with him the general's family.
Thus Puyang came into Cao Cao's hands, and for their present services the Tian family were pardoned their previous fault.
However, Liu Ye said, “Lu Bu is a savage beast. If let alive, he will be a great danger.
Hunt him down!” Liu Ye was ordered to keep Puyang. Wherefore Cao Cao determined to follow Lu Bu to Dingtao whither he had gone for refuge.
Lu Bu, Zhang Miao, and Zhang Chao were assembled in the city. Gao Shun and other generals were out foraging.
Cao Cao army arrived but did not attack for many days, and presently he withdrew fifteen miles and made a stockade.
It was the time of harvest, and he set his soldiers to cut the wheat for food.
The spies reported this to Lu Bu who came over to see.
But when he saw that Cao Cao's stockade lay near a thick wood, he feared an ambush and retired. Cao Cao heard that Lu Bu had come and gone and guessed the reason. “He fears an ambush in the wood,” said Cao Cao. “We will set up flags there and deceive him.
There is a long embankment near the camp but behind it there is no water.
There we will lay an ambush to fall upon Lu Bu when he comes to burn the wood.” So Cao Cao hid all his soldiers behind the embankment except half a hundred drummers, and he got together many peasants to loiter within the stockade as though it was not empty.
Lu Bu rode back and told Chen Gong what he had seen.
“This Cao Cao is very crafty and full of wiles,” said the adviser.
“Do not act.” “I will use fire this time and burn out his ambush,” said Lu Bu.
Next morning Lu Bu rode out, and there he saw flags flying everywhere in the wood. He ordered his troops forward to set fire on all sides. But to his surprise no one rushed out to make for the stockade.
Still he heard the beating of drums and doubt filled his mind. Suddenly he saw a party of soldiers move out from the shelter of the stockade. He galloped over to see what it meant.
Then the signal-bombs exploded; out rushed the troops and all their leaders dashed forward. Xiahou Dun, Xiahou Yuan, Xu Chu, Dian Wei, Li Dian, and Yue Jin all attacked at once.
Lu Bu was at a loss and fled into the open country.
One of his generals, Cheng Lian, was killed by an arrow of Yue Jin.
Two thirds of his troops were lost, and the beaten remainder went to tell Chen Gong what had come to pass. “We would better leave,” said Chen Gong.
“An empty city cannot be held.” So Chen Gong and Gao Shun, taking their chief's family with them, abandoned Dingtao.
When Cao Cao's soldiers got into the city, they met with no resistance. Zhang Chao committed suicide by burning himself.
Zhang Miao fled to Yuan Shu.
Thus the whole northeast fell under the power of Cao Cao.
He immediately tranquilized the people and rebuilt the cities and their defenses. Lu Bu in his retreat fell in with his generals, and Chen Gong also rejoined him, so that he was by no means broken.
“I have but small army,” said Lu Bu, “but still enough to break Cao Cao.” And so he retook the backward road. Indeed:
Thus does fortune alternate, victory, defeat, The happy conqueror today, tomorrow, must retreat?
What was the fate of Lu Bu will appear later.
CHAPTER 13. Li Jue and Guo Si Duel In Changan; The Emperor Establishes Anyi The New Capital. The last chapter told of the defeat of Lu Bu, and his gathering the remnant of his army at Dingtao. When all his generals had joined him, he began to feel strong enough to try conclusions with Cao Cao once again. Said Chen Gong, who was opposed to this course, “Cao Cao is too strong right now; seek some place where we can rest a time before trying.” “Suppose I went to Yuan Shao,” said Lu Bu. “Send first to make inquiries.” Lu Bu agreed.
The news of the fighting between Cao Cao and Lu Bu had reached Jizhou, and one of Yuan Shao's advisers, Shen Pei, warned him, saying, “Lu Bu is a savage beast.
If he gets possession of Yanzhou, he will certainly attempt to add this region to it.
For your own safety you should help to crush him.” Wherefore Yuan Shao sent Yan Liang with fifty thousand troops to destroy Lu Bu.
The spies heard this and at once told Lu Bu, who was greatly disturbed and called in Chen Gong.
“Go over to Liu Bei, who has lately succeeded to Xuzhou.” Hence Lu Bu went thither.
Hearing this, Liu Bei said, “Lu Bu is a hero, and we will receive him with honor.” But Mi Zhu was strongly against receiving him, saying, “He was a cruel, bloodthirsty beast.” But Liu Bei replied, “How would misfortune have been averted from Xuzhou if he had not attacked Yanzhou?
He cannot be our enemy now that he comes seeking an asylum.” “Brother, your heart is really too good.
Although it may be as you say, yet it would be well to prepare,” said Zhang Fei.
The new Imperial Protector with a great following met Lu Bu ten miles outside the city gates, and the two chiefs rode in side by side.
They proceeded to the residence and there, after the elaborate ceremonies of reception were over, they sat down to converse.
Said Lu Bu, “After Wang Yun and I plotted to slay Dong Zhuo and my misfortune in the Li Jue and Guo Si's sedition, I drifted about from one place to another, and none of the nobles east of the Huashang Mountains seemed willing to receive me.
When Cao Cao with wicked ambition invaded this region and you, Sir, came to its rescue, I aided you by attacking Yanzhou and thus diverting a portion of his force.
I did not think then that I should be the victim of a vile plot and lose my leaders and my soldiers.
But now if you will, I offer myself to you that we may together accomplish great designs.” Liu Bei replied, “When the late Tao Qian died, there was no one to administer Xuzhou, and so I assumed that task for a time.
Now since you are here, General, it is most suitable that I step down in your favor.” Whereupon Liu Bei handed the insignia and the seal of authority to Lu Bu.
Lu Bu was on the point of accepting them, when he saw Guan Yu and Zhang Fei, who stood behind the Imperial Protector, glaring at him with angry eyes.
So Lu Bu put on a smile and said, “I may be something of a fighting man, but I could not rule a great region like this.” Liu Bei repeated his offer.
But Chen Gong said, “The strong guest does not oppress his host. You need not fear, Lord Liu Bei.” Then Liu Bei desisted.
Banquets were held and dwelling places prepared for the guest and his retinue.
As soon as convenient, Lu Bu returned the feast. Liu Bei went with his two brothers.
Half through the banquet Lu Bu requested Liu Bei to retire to one of the inner private rooms, whither Guan Yu and Zhang Fei followed him.
There Lu Bu bade his wife and daughter bow as to their benefactor.
Here also Liu Bei showed excessive modesty.
Lu Bu said, “Good Younger Brother, you need not be so very modest.” Zhang Fei heard what Lu Bu said, and his eyes glared, crying, “What sort of a man are you that dares call our brother 'younger brother'? He is one of the ruling family—a jade leaf on a golden branch.
Come out, and I will fight you three hundred bouts for the insult.” Liu Bei hastily checked the impulsive one, and Guan Yu persuaded him to go away.
Then Liu Bei apologized, saying, “My poor brother talks wildly after he has been drinking. I hope you will not blame him.” Lu Bu nodded, but said nothing.
Soon after the guests departed.
But as the host escorted Liu Bei to his carriage, he saw Zhang Fei galloping up armed as for a fray.
“Lu Bu, you and I will fight that duel of three hundred bouts!” shouted Zhang Fei. Liu Bei bade Guan Yu check him.
Next day Lu Bu came to take leave of his host. “You, O Lord, kindly received me, but I fear your brothers and I cannot agree.
So I will seek some other asylum.” “General, if you go, the blame is mine.
My rude brother has offended and must eventually apologize.
In the meantime what think you of a temporary sojourn at the town where I was encamped for some time, Xiaopei?
The place is small and mean, but it is near, and I will see to it that you are supplied with all you need.” Lu Bu thanked him and accepted this offer. He led his troops there and took up residence.
After he had gone, Liu Bei buried his annoyance, and Zhang Fei did not again refer to the matter.
That Cao Cao had subdued the east of the Huashang Mountains has been stated before. He memorialized the Throne and was rewarded with the title of General Who Exhibits Firm Virtue and Lord of Feiting.
At this time the rebellious Li Jue was commanding the court, and he had made himself Regent Marshal, and his colleague Guo Si styled himself Grand Commander. Their conduct was abominable but no one dared to criticize them.
Imperial Guardian Yang Biao and Minister Zhu Jun privately talked with Emperor Xian and said, “Cao Cao has two hundred thousand troops and many capable advisers and leaders; it would be well for the empire if he would lend his support to the imperial family and help to rid the government of this evil party.” His Majesty wept, “I am weary of the insults and contempt of these wretches and should be very glad to have them removed.” “I have thought of a plan to estrange Li Jue and Guo Si and so make them destroy each other. Then Cao Cao could come and cleanse the court,” said Yang Biao.
“How will you manage it?” asked the Emperor.
“Guo Si's wife, Lady Qiong, is very jealous, and we can take advantage of her weakness to bring about a quarrel.” So Yang Biao received instruction to act, with a secret edict to support him.
Yang Biao's wife, Lady Kai, made an excuse to visit Lady Qiong at her palace and, in the course of conversation, said “There is talk of secret liaison between the General, your husband, and the wife of Minister Li Jue.
It is a great secret, but if Minister Li Jue knew it, he might try to harm your husband.
I think you ought to have very little to do with that family.” Lady Qiong was surprised but said, “I have wondered why he has been sleeping away from home lately, but I did not think there was anything shameful connected with it.
I should never have known if you had not spoken.
I must put a stop to it.” By and by, when Lady Kai took her leave; Lady Qiong thanked her warmly for the information she had given.
Some days passed, and Guo Si was going over to the dwelling of Li Jue to a dinner. Lady Qiong did not wish him to go and she said, “This Li Jue is very deep, and one cannot fathom his designs.
You two are not of equal rank, and if he made away with you, what would become of your poor handmaid?” Guo Si paid no attention, and his wife could not prevail on him to stay at home.
Late in the afternoon some presents arrived from Li Jue's palace, and Lady Qiong secretly put poison into the delicacies before she set them before her lord.
Guo Si was going to taste at once but she said, “It is unwise to consume things that come from outside.
Let us try on a dog first.” They did and the dog died.
This incident made Guo Si doubt the kindly intentions of his colleague.
One day, at the close of business at court, Li Jue invited Guo Si to his palace.
After Guo Si arrived home in the evening, rather the worse for too much wine, he was seized with a colic.
His wife said she suspected poison and hastily administered an emetic, which relieved the pain.
Guo Si began to feel angry, saying, “We did everything together and helped each other always. Now he wants to injure me. If I do not get in the first blow, I shall suffer some injury.” So Guo Si began to prepare his guards for any sudden emergency.
This was told to Li Jue, and he in turn grew angry, saying, “So Guo Si is doing so and so.” Then Li Jue got his guards under way and came to attack Guo Si.
Both houses had ten thousand, and the quarrel became so serious that they fought a pitched battle under the city walls. When that was over both sides turned to plunder the people.
Then a nephew of Li Jue, Li Xian, suddenly surrounded the Palace, put the Emperor and Empress in two carriages, and assigned Jia Xu and Zuo Ling to carry them off.
The palace attendants were made to follow on foot.
As they went out of the rear gate, they met Guo Si's army who began to shoot at the cavalcade with arrows. They killed many attendants before Li Jue's army came up and forced them to retire.
The carriages were got out of the Palace and eventually reached Li Jue's camp, while Guo Si's soldiers plundered the Palace and carried off all the women left there to their camp. Then the Palace was set on fire.
As soon as Guo Si heard of the whereabouts of the Emperor, he came over to attack the camp of Li Jue.
The Emperor between these two opposing factions was greatly alarmed. Indeed:
Slowly the Hans had declined but renewed their vigor with Liu Xiu, Twelve were the rulers before him, followed him also twelve others.
Foolish were two of the latest, dangers surrounded the altars, These were degenerate days, with authority given to eunuchs.
Then did He Jin the simple, the inept, who commanded the army, Warriors call to the capital, wishing to drive out the vermin; Though they drove out the leopards, tigers and wolves quickly entered. All kinds of evil were wrought by a low class creature from Xizhou.
Wang Yun, honest of heart, beguiled this wretch with a woman, Much desired of his henchman, thus sowing seeds of dissension. Strife resulted, and peace no longer dwelt in the empire.
No one suspected that Li Jue and Guo Si would continue the evil, Much to the sorrow of the Middle Empire; yet they stove for a trifle.
Famine stalked in the Palace, grief for the clashing of weapons; Why did the warriors strive? Why was the land thus partitioned?
They had turned aside from the way appointed of Heaven.
Kings must ponder these things; heavy the burden lies on them, Chiefest in all the realm theirs is no common appointment, Should the King falter or fail, calamities fall on the multitude people, The empire is drenched with their blood, grisly ruin surrounds them.
Steeped in sorrow and sad, read you the ancient records; Long is the tale of years; the tale of sorrow is longer.
Wherefore one who would rule, chiefly must exercise forethought. This and a keen-edged blade, these must suffice to maintain one.
Guo Si's army arrived, and Li Jue went out to give battle.
Guo Si's troops had no success and retired.
Then Li Jue removed the imperial captives to Meiwo with his nephew Li Xian as gaoler.
Supplies were reduced, and famine showed itself on the faces of the eunuchs. The Emperor sent to Li Jue to request five carts of rice and five sets of bullock bones for his attendants.
Li Jue angrily replied, “The court gets food morning and evening; why do they ask for more?” He sent putrid meat and rotten grain, and the Emperor was very vexed at the new insult.
Imperial Counselor Yang Qi counseled patience, saying, “Li Jue is a base creature but, under the present circumstances, Your Majesty must put up with it.
You may not provoke him.” The Emperor bowed and was silent, but the tears fell on his garments.
Suddenly some one came in with the tidings that a force of cavalry, their sabers glittering in the sun, was approaching to rescue them. Then they heard the gongs beat and the roll of the drums.
The Emperor sent to find out who it was.
But it was Guo Si, and the sadness fell again. Presently arose a great din. For Li Jue had gone out to do battle with Guo Si, whom he abused by name. “I treated you well and why did you try to kill me?” said Li Jue.
“You are a rebel, why should I not slay you?” cried Guo Si.
“You call me rebel when I am guarding the Emperor?” “You have abducted him; do you call that guarding?” “Why so many words?
Let us forgo a battle and settle the matter in single combat, the winner to take the Emperor and go.” The two generals fought in front of their armies, but neither could prevail over the other.
Then they saw Yang Biao come riding up to them, crying, “Rest a while, O Commanders!
For I have invited a party of officers to arrange a peace.” Wherefore the two leaders retired to their camps.
Soon Yang Biao, Zhu Jun, and sixty other officials came up and went to Guo Si's camp. They were all thrown into confinement.
“We came with good intentions,” they moaned, “and we are treated like this.” “Li Jue has run off with the Emperor; I have to have the officers,” said Guo Si.
“What does it mean? One has the Emperor, the other his officers. What do you want?” said Yang Biao.
Guo Si lost patience and drew his sword, but Commander Yang Mi persuaded him not to slay the speaker.
Then Guo Si released Yang Biao and Zhu Jun but kept the others in the camp.
“Here are we two officers of the Throne, and we cannot help our lord. We have been born in vain,” said Yang Biao to Zhu Jun.
Throwing their arms about each other, they wept and fell swooning to the earth.
Zhu Jun went home, fell seriously ill and died. Thereafter the two adversaries fought every day for nearly three months each losing many soldiers.
Now Li Jue was irreligious and practiced magic. He often called witches to beat drums and summon spirits, even when in camp.
Jia Xu used to remonstrate with him, but quite uselessly.
Yang Qi said to the Emperor, “That Jia Xu, although a friend of Li Jue, never seems to have lost the sense of loyalty to Your Majesty.” Soon after Jia Xu himself arrived.
The Emperor sent away his attendants and said to Jia Xu, weeping the while, “Can you not pity the Hans and help me?” Jia Xu prostrated himself, saying, “That is my dearest wish.
But, Sire, say no more; let thy servant work out a plan.” The Emperor dried his tears, and soon Li Jue came in.
He wore a sword by his side and strode straight up to the Emperor, whose face became the color of clay.
Then Li Jue spoke, “Guo Si has failed in his duty and imprisoned the court officers.
He wished to slay Your Majesty, and you would have been captured but for me.” The Emperor joined his hands together in salute and thanked Li Jue.
Li Jue went away. Before long Huangfu Li entered; and the Emperor, knowing him as a man of persuasive tongue and that he came from the same county as Li Jue, bade him go to both factions to try to arrange peace.
Huangfu Li accepted the mission and first went to Guo Si, who said, “I would release the officers if Li Jue would restore the Emperor to full liberty.” Huangfu Li then went to the other side.
To Li Jue he said, “Since I am a Xiliang man, the Emperor and the officers have selected me to make peace between you and your adversary.
Guo Si has consented to cease the quarrel; will you agree to peace?” “I overthrew Lu Bu; I have upheld the government for four years and have many great services to my credit as all the world knows.
That other fellow, that horse-thief, has dared to seize the officers of state and to set himself up against me. I have sworn to slay him. Look around you.
Do you not think my army large enough to break him?” “It does not follow,” said Huangfu Li.
“In ancient days in Youqiong, Hou Yi, proud of and confident in his archer's skill, gave no thought to others and governed alone, and he so perished.
Lately you yourself have seen the powerful Dong Zhuo betrayed by Lu Bu, who had received many benefits at his hands. In no time Dong Zhuo's head was hanging over the gate.
So you see mere force is not enough to ensure safety.
Now you are a general, with the axes and whips and all the symbols of rank and high office; your descendants and all your clan occupy distinguished positions. You must confess that the state has rewarded you liberally.
True, Guo Si has seized the officers of state, but you have done the same to the 'Most Revered.' Who is worse than the other?” Li Jue angrily drew his sword and shouted, “Did the Son of Heaven send you to mock and shame me?” But his commander, Yang Feng, checked him.
“Guo Si is still alive,” said Yang Feng, “and to slay the imperial messenger would be giving him a popular excuse to raise an army against you.
And all the nobles would join him.” Jia Xu also persuaded Li Jue, and gradually his wrath cooled down.
Huangfu Li was urged to go away. But Huangfu Li would not be satisfied with failure.
As he went out of the camp, he cried loudly, “Li Jue will not obey the Emperor's command.
He will kill his prince to set up himself.” Counselor Hu Miao tried to shut Huangfu Li's mouth, saying, “Do not utter such words.
You will only bring hurt upon yourself.” But Huangfu Li shrieked at him also, saying, “You also are an officer of state, and yet you even back up the rebel. When the prince is put to shame, the minister dies. That is our code.
If it be my lot to suffer death at the hands of Li Jue, so be it!” And Huangfu Li maintained a torrent of abuse.
The Emperor heard of the incident, called in Huangfu Li and sent him away to his own country Xiliang.
Now more than half Li Jue's troops were from Xiliang, and he had also the assistance of the Qiangs, the tribespeople beyond the border.
When Huangfu Li spread that Li Jue was a rebel and so were those who helped him, and that there would be a day of heavy reckoning, those stories disturbed the soldiers.
Li Jue sent one of his officers, General Wang Chang of the Tiger Army, to arrest Huangfu Li; but Wang Chang had a sense of right and esteemed Huangfu Li as an honorable man.
Instead of carrying out the orders, Wang Chang returned to say he could not be found.
Jia Xu tried to work on the feelings of the barbarian tribes. He said to them, “The Son of Heaven knows you are loyal to him and have bravely fought and suffered.
He has issued a secret command for you to go home, and then he will reward you.” The tribesmen had a grievance against Li Jue for not paying them, so they listened readily to the insidious persuasions of Jia Xu and deserted.
Then Jia Xu advised the Emperor, “Li Jue is covetous in nature.
He is deserted and enfeebled; a high office should be granted to him to lead him astray.” So the Emperor officially appointed Li Jue Regent Marshal.
This delighted him greatly, and he ascribed his promotion to the potency of his wise witches' prayers and incantations. He rewarded those people most liberally. But his army was forgotten.
Wherefore his commander, Yang Feng, was angry; and he said to General Song Guo, “We have taken all the risks and exposed ourselves to stones and arrows in his service, yet instead of giving us any reward he ascribes all the credit to those witches of his.” “Let us put him out of the way and rescue the Emperor,” said Song Guo.
“You explode a bomb within as signal and I will attack from outside.” So the two agreed to act together that very night in the second watch.
But they had been overheard, and the eavesdropper told Li Jue.
Song Guo was seized and put to death.
That night Yang Feng waited outside for the signal and while waiting, out came Li Jue himself. Then a melee began, which lasted till the fourth watch.
But Yang Feng got away and fled to Xian.
But from this time Li Jue's army began to fall away, and he felt more than ever the losses caused by Guo Si's frequent attacks.
Then came news that Zhang Ji, at the head of a large army, was coming down from Shanxi to make peace between the two factions.
Zhang Ji vowed he would attack the one who was recalcitrant.
Li Jue tried to gain favor by hastening to send to tell Zhang Ji he was ready to make peace.
So did Guo Si. So the strife of the rival factions ended at last, and Zhang Ji memorialized asking the Emperor to go to Hongnong near Luoyang.
The Emperor was delighted, saying, “I have longed to go back to the east.” Zhang Ji was rewarded with the title of Commander of the Flying Cavalry and was highly honored.
Zhang Ji saw to it that the Emperor and the court had good supplies of necessaries.
Guo Si set free all his captive officers, and Li Jue prepared transport for the court to move to the east.
Li Jue told off companies of his Royal Guard to escort the cavalcade. The progress had been without incident as far as Xinfeng.
Near Baling Bridge the west wind of autumn came on to blow with great violence, but soon above the howling of the gale was heard the trampling of a large body of force.
They stopped at a bridge and barred the way. “Who comes?” cried a voice. “The Imperial Chariot is passing, and who dares stop it?” said Yang Qi, riding forward.
Two leaders of the barring party advanced to Yang Qi, saying, “General Guo Si has ordered us to guard the bridge and stop all spies.
You say the Emperor is here; we must see him, and then we will let you pass.” So the pearl curtain was raised and the Emperor said, “I, the Emperor, am here.
Why do you not retire to let me pass, Gentlemen?” They all shouted, “Long Life!
Long Life!” and fell away to allow the cortege through. But when they reported what they had done, Guo Si was very angry, saying, “I meant to outwit Zhang Ji, seize the Emperor, and hold him in Meiwo.
Why have you let him get away?” He put the two officers to death, set out to pursue the cavalcade, and overtook it just at the county of Huaying.
The noise of a great shouting arose behind the travelers, and a loud voice commanded, “Stop the train!” The Emperor burst into tears.
“Out of the wolf's den into the tiger's mouth!” said he. No one knew what to do; they were all too frightened.
But when the rebel army was just upon them, they heard the beating of drums and from behind some hills came into the open a cohort of one thousand soldiers preceded by a great flag bearing the name “Han General Yang Feng”.
Having defeated by Li Jue, Yang Feng fled to the foothills of the Xian; and he came up to offer his services as soon as he heard the Emperor's journey.
Seeing it was necessary to fight now, he drew up his line of battle.
Guo Si's general, Cui Yong, rode out and began a volley of abuse.
Yang Feng turned and said, “Where is Xu Huang?” In response out came a valiant warrior gripping a heavy battle-ax.
He galloped up on his fleet bay, making directly for Cui Yong, whom he felled at the first blow. At this the whole force dashed forward and routed Guo Si.
The defeated army went back some seven miles, while Yang Feng rode forward to see the Emperor who graciously said, “It is a great service you have rendered; you have saved my life.” Yang Feng bowed and thanked him, and the Emperor asked to see the actual slayer of the rebel leader.
So Xu Huang was led to the chariot where he bowed and was presented as “Xu Huang of Hedong.” The Emperor recognized the achievement of the warrior.
Then the cavalcade went forward, Yang Feng acting as escort as far as the city of Huaying, the halting place for the night.
The Commander of the place, Duan Wei, supplied them with clothing and food.
And the Emperor passed the night in Yang Feng's camp.
Next day Guo Si, having mustered his troops, appeared in front of the camp, and Xu Huang rode out to engage.
But Guo Si threw his army out so that they entirely surrounded the camp, and the Emperor was in the middle.
The position was very critical, when help appeared in the person of a galloping general from the southeast, and the rebels fell away at his assault.
Then Xu Huang smote them and so scored a victory.
When they had time to see their helper, they found him to be Dong Cheng, the uncle of the Emperor or the “State Uncle.” The Emperor wept as he related his sorrows and dangers.
Said Dong Cheng, “Be of good courage, Sire.
General Yang Feng and I have pledged ourselves to kill both the rebels Li Jue and Guo Si and so purify the world.” The Emperor bade them travel east as soon as possible, and so they went on night and day till they reached their destination Hongnong. Guo Si led his defeated army back. Meeting Li Jue, he told Li Jue of the rescue of the Emperor and whither they was going.
“If they reach the Huashang Mountains and get settled in the east, they will send out proclamations to the whole country, calling up the nobles to attack us and we and our families will be in danger,” said Guo Si.
“Zhang Ji is holding Changan, and we must be careful.
There is nothing to prevent a joint attack on Hongnong, when we can kill the Emperor and divide the empire between us,” said Li Jue.
Guo Si found this a suitable scheme, so their armies came together again in one place and united in plundering the countryside. As they proceeded to Hongnong, they left destruction behind them.
Yang Feng and Dong Cheng heard of the rebels' approach when they were yet a long way off, so Yang Feng and Dong Cheng turned back and decided to meet them at Dongjian.
Li Jue and Guo Si had previously made their plan. Since the loyal troops were few as compared with their own horde, they would overwhelm the loyal troops like a flood. So when the day of battle came, they poured out covering the hills and filling the plains.
Yang Feng and Dong Cheng devoted themselves solely to the protection of the Emperor and Empress.
The officials, the attendants, the archives and records, and all the paraphernalia of the court were left to care for themselves.
The rebels ravaged Hongnong, but the two protectors got the Emperor safely away into Shanbei.
When the rebel generals showed signs of pursuit, Yang Feng and Dong Cheng had to play a double-edged sword.
They sent to offer to discuss terms of peace with Li Jue and Guo Si; at the same time they sent a secret edict to enlist the help from the leaders of the old White Wave rebels —Han Xian, Li Yue, and Hu Cai.
Li Yue was actually a brigand and had inspired rebels throughout the country, but the need for help was so desperate.
These three, being promised pardon for their faults and crimes and a grant of official rank, naturally responded to the call, and thus the loyal side was strengthened so that Hongnong was recaptured.
But meanwhile Li Jue and Guo Si laid waste whatever place they reached, slaying the aged and weakly, forcing the strong to join their ranks.
When going into a fight they forced these people-soldiers to the front, and they called them the “Dare-toDie” soldiers. Li Jue and Guo Si's force was overwhelming.
When Li Yue, the White Wave leader, approached with his army, Guo Si bade his soldiers scatter clothing and valuables along the road. The late robbers could not resist the temptation, so a scramble began.
Then Guo Si's soldiers fell upon the disordered ranks and did much damage.
Yang Feng and Dong Cheng had to take the Emperor away to the north. Li Jue and Guo Si pursued.
Li Yue said, “The danger is grave.
I pray Your Majesty mount a horse and go in advance.” The Emperor replied, “I cannot bear to abandon my officers.” They wept and struggled on as best they could.
The White Wave leader Hu Cai was killed in one attack.
The enemy came very near, and the Emperor left his carriage and went on foot. Yang Feng and Dong Cheng escorted him to the bank of the Yellow River.
Li Yue sought a boat to ferry him to the other side.
The weather was very cold and the Emperor and Empress cuddled up close to each other shivering. They reached the river but the banks were too high, and they could not get down into the boat.
So Yang Feng proposed to fasten together the horses' bridles and lower down the Emperor slung by the waist.
However, the Empress' brother, Fu De, found some rolls of white silk from dead soldiers; and they rolled up the two imperial personages in the silk, and thus they lowered them down near the boat.
Then Li Yue took up his position in the prow leaning on his sword.
Fu De carried the Empress on his back into the boat.
The boat was too small to carry everybody, and those unable to get on board clung to the cable, but Li Yue cut them down, and they fell into the water.
They ferried over the Emperor and then sent back the boat for the others.
There was a great scramble to get on board, and they had to chop off the fingers and hands of those who persisted in clinging to the boat. The lamentation rose to the heavens.
When they mustered on the farther bank, many were missing, only a dozen of the Emperor's suite were left.
Yang Feng found a bullock cart and transported the Emperor and Empress to Dayang.
They had no food and at night sought shelter in a poor, tile-roofed house. The cottagers gave them some boiled millet but it was too coarse to be swallowed.
Next day the Emperor conferred titles on those who had protected him. Li Yue was made General Who Conquers the North, and Han Xian was appointed General Who Conquers the East. The flight continued.
Soon two officers of rank came up with the cortege, and they bowed before His Majesty with many tears. They were Regent Marshal Yang Biao and Minister Han Rong.
The Emperor and Empress lifted up their voices and wept with them.
Said Han Rong to his colleague, “The rebels have confidence in my words.
You stay as guard of the Emperor, and I will take my life in my hands and try to bring about peace.” After Han Rong had gone, the Emperor rested for a time in Yang Feng's camp.
But Yang Biao requested the Emperor to head for Anyi and make the capital there.
When the train reached the town, they found it containing not a single lofty building, and the court lived in grass huts devoid even of doors.
They surrounded these with a fence of thorns as a protection, and within this the Emperor held counsel with his ministers. The soldiers camped round the fence.
Now Li Yue and his fellow ruffians showed their true colors. They wielded the powers of the Emperor as they wished, and officials who offended them were beaten or abused even in the presence of the Emperor.
They purposely provided thick wine and coarse food for the Emperor's consumption. He struggled to swallow what they sent.
Li Yue and Han Xian joined in recommending to the Throne the names of convicts, common soldiers, sorcerers, leeches, and such people who thus obtained official ranks. There were more than two hundred of such people.
As seals could not be engraved, pieces of metal were hammered into some sort of a shape.
Now Han Rong went to see Li Jue and Guo Si.
After listening to his vigorous persuasions, the two rebel generals agreed to set free the officials and palace people.
A famine occurred that same year and people were reduced to eating grass from the roadside. Starving, they wandered hither and thither.
But food and clothing were sent to the Emperor from the governor of Henei, Zhang Yang, and the governor of Hedong, Wang Yi, and the court began to enjoy a little repose.
Dong Cheng and Yang Feng sent laborers to restore the palaces in Luoyang with the intention of moving the court thither.
Li Yue was opposed to this.
Dong Cheng argued, “Luoyang is the original capital as opposed to the paltry town of Anyi.
Removal would be but reasonable.” Li Yue wound up by saying, “You may get the court to remove, but I shall remain here.” But when the consent of the Emperor had been given and a start made, Li Yue secretly sent to arrange with Li Jue and Guo Si to capture the Emperor. However, this plot leaked out and the escort so arranged as to prevent such a thing, and they pressed on to the pass at Zhiguan Hills as rapidly as possible.
Li Yue heard this, and without waiting for his rebel colleagues to join him set out to act alone.
About the fourth watch, just as the cavalcade was passing Zhiguan Hills, a voice was heard shouting, “Stop those carriages!
Li Jue and Guo Si are here.” This frightened the Emperor greatly, and his terror increased when he saw the whole mountain side suddenly light up. Indeed:
The rebel party, erstwhile split in twain, To work their wicked will now join three again.
How the Son of Heaven escaped this peril will be told in the next chapter. CHAPTER 14.
Cao Cao Moves The Court To Xuchang; Lu Bu Night-Raids Xuzhou. The last chapter closed with the arrival of Li Yue who shouted out falsely that the army was that of the two arch rebels Li Jue and Guo Si come to capture the imperial cavalcade. But Yang Feng recognized the voice of Li Yue and bade Xu Huang go out to fight him.
Xu Huang went and in the first bout the traitor fell.
The White Wave rebels scattered, and the travelers got safely through Zhiguan Hills. Here the Governor of Henei, Zhang Yang, supplied them plentifully with food and other necessaries and escorted the Emperor to Zhidao.
For his timely help, the Emperor conferred upon Zhang Yang the rank of a Grand Commander.
Yang Feng moved his army to the northeast of Luoyang and camped at Yewang.
Capital Luoyang was presently entered. Within the walls all was destruction. The palaces and halls had been burned, the streets were overgrown with grass and brambles and obstructed by heaps of ruins. The palaces and courts were represented by broken roofs and toppling walls.
A small “palace” however was soon built, and therein the officers of court presented their congratulations, standing in the open air among thorn hushes and brambles.
The reign style was changed from Prosperous Stability to Rebuilt Tranquillity, the first year .
The year was a year of grievous famine.
The Luoyang people, even reduced in numbers as they were to a few hundreds, had not enough to eat and they prowled about stripping the bark off trees and grubbing up the roots of plants to satisfy their starving hunger. Officers of the government of all but the highest ranks went out into the country to gather fuel.
Many people were crushed by the falling walls of burned houses.
At no time during the decadence of Han did misery press harder than at this period. A poem written in pity for the sufferings of that time says:
Mortally wounded, the white serpent poured forth its life blood at Mangdang Hills; Blood-red pennons of war waved then in every quarter, Chieftain with chieftain strove and raided each other's borders, Midst the turmoil and strife the Kingship even was threatened.
Wickedness stalks in a country when the King is a weakling, Brigandage always is rife, when a dynasty's failing, Had one a heart of iron, wholly devoid of feeling, Yet would one surely grieve at the sight of such desolation.
Regent Marshal Yang Biao memorialized the Throne, saying, “The decree issued to me some time ago has never been acted upon.
Now Cao Cao is very strong in the east of Huashang Mountains, and it would be well to associate him in the government that he might support the ruling house.” The Emperor replied, “There was no need to refer to the matter again.
Send a messenger when you will.” So the decree went forth and a messenger bore it into the East of Huashang.
Now when Cao Cao had heard that the court had returned to Capital Luoyang, he called together his advisers to consult. Xun Yu laid the matter before Cao Cao and the council thus: “Eight hundred years ago, Lord Wen of Yin supported Prince Xiang of the declining Shang Dynasty, and all the feudal lords backed Lord Wen.
The Founder of the Hans, Liu Bang, won the popular favor by wearing mourning for Emperor Yi of Qin.
Now Emperor Xian has been a fugitive on the dusty roads. To take the lead in offering an army to restore him to honor is to have an unrivaled opportunity to win universal regard.
But you must act quickly or some one will get in before you.” Cao Cao understood and at once prepared his army to move.
Just at this moment an imperial messenger was announced with the very command Cao Cao wanted, and Cao Cao immediately set out. At Luoyang everything was desolate.
The walls had fallen, and there were no means of rebuilding them, while rumors and reports of the coming of Li Jue and Guo Si kept up a state of constant anxiety.
The frightened Emperor spoke with Yang Feng, saying, “What can be done?
There is no answer from the East of Huashang, and our enemies are near.” Then Yang Feng and Han Xian said, “We, your ministers, will fight to the death for you.” But Dong Cheng said, “The fortifications are weak and our military resources small, so that we cannot hope for victory, and what does defeat mean?
I see nothing better to propose than a move into the east of Huashang Mountains.” The Emperor agreed to this, and the journey began without further preparation.
There being few horses, the officers of the court had to march afoot.
Hardly a bowshot outside the gate they saw a thick cloud of dust out of which came all the clash and clamor of an advancing army.
The Emperor and his Consort were dumb with fear.
Then appeared a horseman; he was the messenger returning from the East of Huashang. He rode up to the chariot, made an obeisance, and said, “General Cao Cao, as commanded, is coming with all the military force of the East of Huashang; but hearing that Li Jue and Guo Si had again approached the capital, he has sent Xiahou Dun in advance.
With Xiahou Dun are many capable leaders and fifty thousand of proved soldiers. They will guard Your Majesty.” All fear was swept away.
Soon after Xiahou Dun and his staff arrived.
Xiahou Dun, Xu Chu, and Dian Wei were presented to the Emperor who graciously addressed them.
Then one came to say a large army was approaching from the east, and at the Emperor's command Xiahou Dun went to ascertain who these were.
He soon returned saying they were Cao Cao's infantry.
In a short time Cao Hong, Li Dian, and Yue Jin came to the imperial chariot and their names having been duly communicated.
Cao Hong said, “When my brother, Cao Cao, heard of the approach of the rebels, he feared that the advance guard he had sent might be too weak, so he sent me to march quickly for reinforcement.” “General Cao Cao is indeed a trusty servant!” said the Emperor.
Orders were given to advance, Cao Hong leading the escort.
By and by scouts came to say that the rebels were coming up very quickly.
The Emperor bade Xiahou Dun divide his force into two parts to oppose them.
Xiahou Dun and Cao Hong's armies threw out two wings with cavalry in front and foot behind.
They attacked with vigor and beat off the Li Jue and Guo Si's rebels with severe loss of ten thousand.
Then Xiahou Dun and Cao Hong begged the Emperor to return to Luoyang, and Xiahou Dun guarded the city.
Next day Cao Cao came with his great army, and having got them duly camped he went into the city to audience.
He knelt at the foot of the steps, but was called up hither to stand beside the Emperor and be thanked.
Cao Cao replied, “Having been the recipient of great bounty, thy servant owes the state much gratitude.
The measure of evil of the two rebels is full, I have two hundred thousand of good soldiers to oppose them, and those soldiers are fully equal to securing the safety of Your Majesty and the Throne.
The preservation of the state sacrifice is the matter of real moment.” High honors were conferred on Cao Cao.
He was appointed Commander of Capital District, Minister of War, and granted Military Insignia.
The two rebels, Li Jue and Guo Si, wished to attack Cao Cao's army while fatigued from its long march.
But their adviser, Jia Xu, opposed this, saying, “There was no hope of victory. He has both strong soldiers and brave leaders.
Submission may bring us amnesty.” Li Jue was angry at the suggestion, crying, “Do you wish to dishearten the army?” And he drew his sword on Jia Xu. But the other officers interceded and saved the adviser.
That same night Jia Xu stole out of the camp and, quite alone, took his way home to his native village.
Soon the rebels decided to offer battle. In reply, Cao Cao sent out Xu Chu, Cao Ren, and Dian Wei with three hundred horse. These three leaders dashed into the rebels army but quickly retired.
This maneuver was repeated, and again repeated before the real battle array was formed. Then Li Xian and Li Bie, nephews of Li Jue, rode out. At once from Cao Cao's side dashed out Xu Chu and cut down Li Xian.
Li Bie was so startled that he fell out of the saddle. He too was slain. The victor Xu Chu rode back to his own side with the two heads.
When he offered them to the chief, Cao Cao patted him on the back, crying, “You are really my Fan Kuai!” 1 Next a general move forward was made, Xiahou Dun and Cao Hong leading the two wings and Cao Cao in the center. They advanced to the roll of the drum.
The rebels fell back before them and presently fled.
They pursued, Cao Cao himself leading, sword in hand. The slaughter went on till night. Ten thousands were killed and many more surrendered.
Li Jue and Guo Si went west, flying in panic like dogs from a falling house.
Having no place of refuge they took to the hills and hid among the brushwood.
Cao Cao's army returned and camped again near the capital.
Then Yang Feng and Han Xian said one to another, “This Cao Cao has done a great service, and he will be the man in power.
There will be no place for us.” So they represented to the Emperor that they wished to pursue the rebels, and under this excuse withdrew their army and camped at Daliang.
One day the Emperor sent to summon Cao Cao to audience. The messenger was called in.
Cao Cao noticed that the messenger looked remarkably well and could not understand it seeing that everyone else looked hungry and famine stricken.
So Cao Cao said, “You look plump and well, Sir, how do you manage it?” “Only this; I have lived meager for thirty years.” Cao Cao nodded, “What office do you hold?” “I am a graduate recommended for filial piety and honesty.
I had offices under Yuan Shao and Zhang Yang, but came here when the Emperor returned. Now I am one of the secretaries.
I am a native of Dingtao, and my name is Dong Zhao.” Cao Cao got up from his place and crossed over, saying, “I have heard of you.
How happy I am to meet you!” Then wine was brought into the tent, and Xun Yu was called in and introduced.
While they were talking, a man came in to report that a party was moving eastward.
Cao Cao ordered to find out whose people these were, but Dong Zhao knew at once.
“They are old leaders under the rebels, Yang Feng and the White Wave General Han Xian.
They are running off because you have come, Illustrious Sir!” “Do they mistrust me?” said Cao Cao. “They are not worthy of your attention.
They are a poor lot.” “What of this departure of Li Jue and Guo Si?” “Tigers without claws, birds without wings—they will not escape you very long.
They are not worth thinking about.” Cao Cao saw that he and his guest had much in common, so he began to talk of affairs of state.
Said Dong Zhao, “You, Illustrious Sir, with your noble army have swept away rebellion and have become the mainstay of the Throne, an achievement worthy of the ancient Five Protectors.
But the officials will look at it in very different ways and not all favorably to you.
I think you would not be wise to remain here, and I advise a change of capital to Xuchang.
However, it must be remembered that the restoration of the capital has been published far and wide and the attention of all the people is concentrated on Luoyang, hoping for a period of rest and tranquillity.
Another move will displease many.
However, the performance of extraordinary deed may mean the acquisition of extraordinary merit. It is for you to decide.” “Exactly my own inclination!” said Cao Cao, seizing his guest's hand. “But are there not dangers? Yang Feng at Daliang and the court officials!” “That is easily managed.
Write to Yang Feng and set his mind at rest.
Then say to the high officials plainly that there is no food in the capital here, and so you are going to another place where there is, and where there is no danger of scarcity.
When they hear it they will approve.” Cao Cao had now decided; and as his guest took leave, Cao Cao seized his hands once more, saying, “I shall need your advice in future affairs.” Dong Zhao thanked and left.
Thereafter Cao Cao and his advisers secretly discussed the change of capital. Now as to that Court Counselor Wang Li, who was an astrologer, said to Liu Ai, Chair of the Imperial Office, “I have been studying the stars. Since last spring Venus has been nearing the Guard star in the neighborhood of the Measure, and the Cowherd  crossing the River of Heaven. Mars has been retrograding and came into conjunction with Venus in the Gate of Heaven, so that Metal  are mingled. Thence must emerge a new ruler.
The aura of the Hans is exhausted, and the ancient states of Jin and Wei must increase.” A secret memorial was presented to the Emperor, saying:
“The Mandate of Heaven has its course and the five elements—metal, wood, water, fire, and earth—are out of proportion.
Earth attacking Fire is Wei attacking Han, and the successor to the empire of Han is in Wei.” Cao Cao heard of these sayings and memorials and sent a man to the astrologer to say, “Your loyalty is well known, but the ways of Heaven are past finding out.
The less said the better.” Then Cao Cao discussed with Xun Yu.
The adviser expounded the meaning thus: “The virtue of Han was fire; your element is earth.
Xuchang is under the influence of earth, and so your fortune depends on getting there.
Fire can overcome earth, as earth can multiply wood. Dong Zhao and Wang Li agree, and you have only to hide your time.” So Cao Cao made up his mind.
Next day at court he said, “The capital is deserted and cannot be restored nor can it be supplied easily with food.
Xuchang is a noble city, resourceful and close to Luyang, a grain basin.
It is everything that a capital should be.
I venture to request that the court move thither.” The Emperor dared not oppose and the officials were too overawed to have any independent opinion, so they chose a day to set out.
Cao Cao commanded the escort, and the officials all followed.
When they had traveled a few stages they saw before them a high mound and from behind this there arose the beating of drums.
Then Yang Feng and Han Xian came out and barred the way.
In front of all stood Xu Huang, who shouted, “Cao Cao is stealing away the Emperor!” Cao Cao rode out and took a good look at this man.
He seemed a fine fellow; and in his secret soul Cao Cao greatly admired him, although he was an enemy.
Then Cao Cao ordered Xu Chu to go and fight Xu Huang.
The combat was battle-ax against broadsword, and the two men fought more than half a hundred bouts without advantage to either side. Cao Cao then beat the gongs and drew off his troops. In the camp a council was called.
Cao Cao said, “The two rebels themselves need not be discussed; but Xu Huang is a fine general, and I was unwilling to use any great force against him.
I want to win him over to our side.” Then stepped out Man Chong, replying, “Do not let that trouble you; I will have a word with him.
I shall disguise myself as a soldier this evening and steal over to the enemy's camp to talk to him.
I shall incline his heart toward you.” That night Man Chong, duly disguised, got over to the other side and made his way to the tent of Xu Huang, who sat there by the light of a candle. Xu Huang was still wearing his coat of mail.
Suddenly Man Chong ran out in front and saluted, saying, “You have been well since we parted, old friend?” Xu Huang jumped up in surprise, gazed into the face of the speaker a long time and presently said, “What! You are Man Chong of Shanyang?
What are you doing here?” “I am an officer in General Cao Cao's army.
Seeing my old friend out in front of the army today, I wanted to say a word to him.
So I took the risk of stealing in this evening and here I am.” Xu Huang invited Man Chong in and they sat down.
Then said Man Chong, “There are very few as bold as you on the earth; why then do you serve such as your present chiefs, Yang Feng and Han Xian?
My master is the most prominent man in the world—a man who delights in wise people and appreciates soldiers as every one knows.
Your valor today won his entire admiration, and so he took care that the attack was not vigorous enough to sacrifice you. Now he has sent me to invite you to join him.
Will you not leave darkness for light and help him in his magnificent task?” Xu Huang sat a long time pondering over the offer.
Then he said, with a sigh, “I know my masters are doomed to failure, but I have followed their fortunes a long time and do not like to leave them.” “But you know the prudent bird selects its tree, and the wise servant chooses his master.
When one meets a worthy master and lets him go, one is very reckless.” “I am willing to do what you say,” said Xu Huang, rising.
“Why not put these two to death as an introductory gift?” said Man Chong.
“It is very wrong for a servant to slay his master.
I will not do that.” “True; you are really a good man.” Then Xu Huang, taking only a few horsemen of his own men with him, left that night and deserted to Cao Cao.
Soon some one took the news to Yang Feng, who at the head of a thousand strong horsemen, set out to capture the deserter. As they drew close, Yang Feng called out, “Betrayer! Stop there!” But Yang Feng fell into an ambush.
Suddenly the whole mountain side was lit up with torches and out sprang Cao Cao's troops, he himself being in command. “I have been waiting here a long time; do not run away,” cried Cao Cao.
Yang Feng was completely surprised and tried to draw off, but was quickly surrounded.
Then Han Xian came to his rescue, and a confused battle began. Yang Feng succeeded in escaping, while Cao Cao kept up the attack on the two disordered armies.
A great number of the rebels gave in, and the leaders found they had too few men left to maintain their independence, so they betook themselves to Yuan Shu.
When Cao Cao returned to camp, the newly surrendered general was presented and well received. Then again the cavalcade set out for the new capital.
In due time they reached Xuchang, and they built palaces and halls, an ancestral temple and an altar, terraces and public offices. The walls were repaired, storehouses built and all put in order. Then came the rewards for Cao Cao's adherents and others.
Dong Cheng and thirteen others were raised to rank of lordship.
All good service was rewarded; certain others again, who deserved it, were punished, all according to Cao Cao's sole decision. He himself was made Prime Minister, Regent Marshal, and Lord of Wuping.
Xun Yu was made Imperial Counselor and Chair of the Secretariat; Xun You, Minister of War; Guo Jia, Minister of Rites and Religion; Liu Ye, Minister of Works; Mao Jie, Minister of Agriculture, and together with Ren Jun, they were put over the military stores. Cheng Yu was appointed Lord of Dongping; Dong Zhao, Magistrate of Luoyang; Man Chong, Magistrate of Xuchang. Xiahou Dun, Xiahou Yuan, Cao Ren, Cao Hong, Lu Qian, Li Dian, Yue Jin, Yu Jin, and Xu Huang were made Commanders; Xu Chu and Dian Wei, Commanders of Capital District. All good service received full recognition. Cao Cao was then the one man of the court.
All memorials went first to him and were then submitted to the Throne. When state matters were in order, Cao Cao gave a great banquet in his private quarters to all his advisers, and affairs outside the capital were the subject of discussion.
Then Cao Cao said, “Liu Bei has his army at Xuzhou, and he carries on the administration of the region.
Lu Bu fled to Liu Bei when defeated, and Liu Bei gave Lu Bu Xiaopei to live in. If these two agreed to join forces and attack, my position would be most serious.
What precautions can be taken?” Then rose Xu Chu, saying, “Give me fifty thousand of picked soldiers, and I will give the Prime Minister both their heads.” Xun Yu said, “O Leader, you are brave, but we must consider the present circumstance.
We cannot start sudden war just as the capital has been changed.
However, there is a certain ruse known as 'Rival Tigers and One Prey.' Liu Bei has no decree authorizing him to govern the region.
You, Sir Prime Minister, can procure one for him, and when sending it, and so conferring upon him right in addition to his might, you can enclose a private note telling him to get rid of Lu Bu.
If he does, then he will have lost a vigorous warrior from his side, and he could be dealt with as occasions serve.
Should he fail, then Lu Bu will slay him. This is 'Rival Tigers and One Prey' ruse; they wrangle and bite each other.” Cao Cao agreed that this was a good plan, so he memorialized for the formal appointment, which he sent to Liu Bei.
Liu Bei was created General Who Conquers the East, Lord of Yicheng, and Imperial Protector of Xuzhou as well.
At the same time a private note was enclosed.
In Xuzhou, when Liu Bei heard of the change of capital, he began to prepare a congratulatory address.
In the midst of this an imperial messenger was announced and was met which all ceremony outside the gate. When the epistle had been reverently received, a banquet was prepared for the messenger.
The messenger said, “This decree was obtained for you by Prime Minister Cao Cao.” Liu Bei thanked him.
Then the messenger drew forth his secret letter. After reading it, Liu Bei said, “This matter can be easily arranged.” The banquet over and the messenger conducted to his lodging to seek repose. Liu Bei, before going to rest, called in his councilors to consider the letter.
“There need be no compunction about putting him to death;” said Zhang Fei, “Lu Bu is a bad man.” “But he came to me for protection in his weakness; how can I put him to death? That would be immoral,” said Liu Bei.
“If he was a good man; it would be difficult,” replied Zhang Fei. Liu Bei would not consent.
Next day, when Lu Bu came to offer congratulations, he was received as usual.
He said, “I have come to felicitate you on the receipt of the imperial bounty.” Liu Bei thanked him in due form.
But then he saw Zhang Fei draw his sword and come up the hall as if to slay Lu Bu. Liu Bei hastily interfered and stopped Zhang Fei.
Lu Bu was surprised and said, “Why do you wish to slay me, Zhang Fei?” “Cao Cao says you are immoral and tells my brother to kill you,” shouted Zhang Fei.
Liu Bei shouted again and again to Zhang Fei to go away, and he led Lu Bu into the private apartments out of the way.
Then he told Lu Bu the whole story and showed him the secret letter.
Lu Bu wept as he finished reading, “This is that miscreant's scheme for sowing discord between us.” “Be not anxious, Elder Brother,” said Liu Bei.
“I pledge myself not to be guilty of such an infamous crime.” Lu Bu again and again expressed his gratitude, and Liu Bei kept him for a time.
They remained talking and drinking wine till late.
Said Guan Yu and Zhang Fei later, “Why not kill him?” Liu Bei said, “Because Cao Cao fears that Lu Bu and I may attack him, he is trying to separate us and get us to swallow each other, while he steps in and takes the advantage. Is there any other reason?” Guan Yu nodded assent, but Zhang Fei said, “I want to get him out of the way lest he trouble us later.” “That is not what a noble man should do,” said his elder brother. Soon the messenger was dismissed and returned to the capital with a the reply from Liu Bei.
The letter only said the instruction would take time to plan and implement.
But the messenger, when he saw Cao Cao, told him the story of Liu Bei's pledge to Lu Bu.
Then said Cao Cao, “The plan has failed; what next?” Xun Yu replied, “I have another trick called 'Tiger against Wolf' in which the tiger is made to gobble up the wolf.” “Let us hear it,” said Cao Cao.
“Send to Yuan Shu to say that Liu Bei has sent up a secret memorial to the Throne that he wishes to subdue the southern regions around the Huai River.
Yuan Shu will be angry and attack him.
Then you will order Liu Bei to dispose of Yuan Shu and so set them destroying each other.
Lu Bu will certainly think that is his chance and turn traitor. This is the 'Tiger against Wolf' trick.” Cao Cao thought this good and sent the messenger and also sent a false edict to Liu Bei.
When this came the messenger was received with all the ceremonies and the edict ordered the capture of Yuan Shu. After the departure of the bearer, Liu Bei called Mi Zhu who pronounced it a ruse.
“It may be,” said Liu Bei, “but the royal command is not to be disobeyed.” So the army was prepared and the day fixed.
Sun Qian said, “A trusty man must be left on guard of the city.” And Liu Bei asked which of his brothers would undertake this task.
“I will guard the city,” said Guan Yu.
“I am constantly in need of your advice, so how can we part?” said Liu Bei.
“I will guard the city,” said Zhang Fei. “You will fail,” said Liu Bei. “After one of your drinking bouts you will get savage and flog the soldiers.
Beside you are rash and will not listen to any one's advice.
I shall be uneasy all the time.” “Henceforth I drink no more wine. I will not beat the soldiers and I will always listen to advice,” said Zhang Fei.
“I fear the mouth does not correspond to the heart,” said Mi Zhu.
“I have followed my elder brother these many years and never broken faith; why should you be contemptuous?” said Zhang Fei.
Liu Bei said, “Though you say this, I do not feel quite satisfied.
I will order Adviser Chen Deng to help you and keep you sober.
Then you will not make any mistake.” Chen Deng was willing to undertake this duty, and the final orders were given. The army of thirty thousand, horse and foot, left Xuzhou and marched toward Nanyang. When Yuan Shu heard that a memorial had been presented proposing to take possession of his territories, he broke out into abuse of Liu Bei. “You weaver of mats! You plaiter of straw shoes! You have been smart enough to get possession of a large region and elbow your way into the ranks of the nobles.
I was just going to attack you, and now you dare to scheme against me!
How I detest you!” So Yuan Shu at once gave orders to prepare an army of one hundred thousand, under Ji Ling, to attack Xuzhou.
The two armies met at Xuyi, where Liu Bei was encamped in a plain with hills behind and a stream on his flank, for his army was small.
Ji Ling was a native of the East of Huashang. He used a very heavy threeedged sword.
After he had made his camp, he rode out and began abusing his opponents, shouting, “Liu Bei, you rustic bumpkin, how dare you invade this land?” “I have a decree ordering me to destroy the Governor who behaves improperly.
If you oppose, you will be assuredly punished,” replied Liu Bei.
Ji Ling angrily rode out brandishing his weapon.
But Guan Yu cried, “Fool, do not attempt to fight!” And Guan Yu rode out to meet him.
Then they two fought and after thirty bouts neither had an advantage.
Then Ji Ling cried out for a rest. So Guan Yu turned his horse away, rode back to his own array and waited for Ji Ling.
When the moment came to renew the combat, Ji Ling sent out one of his officers, Xun Zheng, to take his place.
But Guan Yu said, “Tell Ji Ling to come; I must settle with him who shall be tiger and who shall be deer.” “You, a reputationless leader and unworthy to fight with our general,” replied Xun Zheng.
This reply angered Guan Yu, who made just one attack on Xun Zheng and brought him to the ground. At this success Liu Bei urged on the army, and Ji Ling's troops were defeated.
They retired to the mouth of the River Huaiyin and declined all challenges.
However, many of their troops were sent into Liu Bei's camp for harassment, and many of them were slain.
The two armies thus stood facing each other. In Xuzhou, after Liu Bei had started on his expedition, Zhang Fei placed his colleague and helper, Chen Deng, in charge of the administration of the region, keeping military affairs under his own supervision.
After thinking over the matter or some time, he gave a banquet to all the military officers; and when they were all seated, he made a speech: “Before my brother left, he bade me keep clear of the wine cup for fear of accidents.
Now, gentlemen, you may drink deep today; but from tomorrow wine is forbidden, for we must keep the city safe.
So take your fill.” And with this he and all his guests rose to drink together.
The wine bearer came to Cao Bao who declined it, saying, “I never drink as I am forbidden of heaven.” “What!
A fighting man does not drink wine!” said the host.
“I want you to take just one cup.” Cao Bao was afraid to offend, so he drank.
Now Zhang Fei drank huge goblets with all his guests on every hand and so swallowed a huge quantity of liquor. He became quite intoxicated. Yet he would drink more and insisted on a cup with every guest.
It came to the turn of Cao Bao who declined. “Really, I cannot drink,” said Cao Bao.
“You drank just now; why refuse this time?” Zhang Fei pressed him, but still Cao Bao resisted.
Then Zhang Fei in his drunken madness lost control of his temper and said, “If you disobey the orders of your general, you shall be beaten one hundred strokes.” And he called in his guards. Here Chen Deng interfered reminding him of the strict injunctions of his brother.
“You civilians attend to your civil business and leave us alone,” said Zhang Fei.
The only way of escape for the guest was to beg remission; and Cao Bao did so, “Sir, if you saw my son-in-law's face, you would pardon me.” “Who is your son-in-law?” “Lu Bu.” “I did not mean to have you really beaten; but if you think to frighten me with Lu Bu, I will.
I will beat you as if I was beating him,” said Zhang Fei.
The guests interposed to beg him off, but their drunken host was obdurate, and the unhappy guest received fifty blows. Then at the earnest prayers of the others the remainder of the punishment was remitted.
The banquet came to an end, and the beaten Cao Bao went away burning with resentment. That night he sent a letter to Xiaopei relating the insults he had received from Zhang Fei. The letter told Lu Bu of Liu Bei's absence and proposed that a sudden raid should be made that very night before Zhang Fei had recovered from his drunken fit.
Lu Bu at once summoned Chen Gong and told him.
“Xiaopei is only a place to occupy temporarily,” said Chen Gong.
“If you can seize Xuzhou, do so.
It is a good chance.” Lu Bu got ready at once and soon on the way with five hundred cavalrymen, ordering Chen Gong and Gao Shun to follow him with the main body.
Xiaopei being only about fifteen miles away, Lu Bu was under the walls at the fourth watch. It was clear moonlight. No one on the ramparts saw him.
Lu Bu came up close to the wall and called out, “Liu Bei's secret messenger has arrived.” The guards on the wall were Cao Bao's people, and they called him.
Cao Bao came, and when he saw who was there he ordered the gates to be opened.
Lu Bu gave the secret signal, and the soldiers entered shouting. Zhang Fei was in his apartment sleeping off the fumes of wine. His servants hastened to arouse him and told him an enemy had got the gates open.
They said, “Lu Bu got in, and there is fighting in the city.” Zhang Fei savagely got into his armor and laid hold of his mighty octaneserpent halberd.
But as he was mounting his horse at the gate the attacking soldiers came up.
He rushed at them but being still half intoxicated made but a poor fight.
Lu Bu knowing Zhang Fei's prowess did not press him hard, and Zhang Fei made his way, with eighteen leading Guards of Yan, to the east gate, and there went out, leaving Liu Bei's family to their fate. Cao Bao, seeing Zhang Fei had but a very small force and was still half drunk as well, came in pursuit. Zhang Fei saw who it was and was mad with rage. He galloped toward Cao Bao and drove him off after a few passes. He followed Cao Bao to the moat and wounded him in the back.
Cao Bao's frightened steed carried its master into the moat, and he was drowned.
Once well outside the city Zhang Fei collected his troops, and they rode off toward the south direction.
Lu Bu having surprised the city set himself to restore order. He put a guard over the residence of Liu Bei so that no one should disturb the family. Zhang Fei with his few followers went to his brother's camp and told his story of treachery and surprise.
All were greatly distressed.
“Success is not worth rejoicing over; failure is not worth grieving over,” said Liu Bei with a sigh.
“Where are our sisters?” asked Guan Yu. “They shared the fate of the city.” Liu Bei nodded his head and was silent.
Guan Yu with an effort controlled his reproaches and said, “What did you say when you promised to guard the city and what orders did our brother give you?
Now the city is lost and therewith our sisters-in-law. Have you done well?” Zhang Fei was overwhelmed by remorse. He drew his sword to kill himself.
He raised the cup in pledge, None might say nay; Remorseful, drew the sword, Himself to slay. Zhang Fei's fate will be told in the next chapter.
CHAPTER 15.
Taishi Ci Fights With The Little Prince; Sun Ce Cuts Short The White Tiger King. In the last chapter it was recorded that Zhang Fei was about to end his life with his own weapon in Xuyi. But Liu Bei rushed forward and caught Zhang Fei in his arms, snatched away the sword, and threw it on the earth, saying, “Brothers are as hands and feet; wives and children are as clothing.
You may mend your torn dress, but who can reattach a lost limb?
We three, by the Oath of the Peach Garden, swore to seek the same death day.
The city is lost, it is true, and my wives and little ones, but I could not bear that we should die ere our course be run.
Beside, Xuzhou was not really ours, and Lu Bu will not harm my family but will rather seek to preserve them.
You made a mistake, Worthy Brother, but is it one deserving of death?” And Liu Bei wept.
His brothers were much affected and their tears fell in sympathy.
As soon as the news of Lu Bu's successful seizure of his protector's region reached Yuan Shu, Yuan Shu sent promises of valuable presents to Lu Bu to induce him to join in a further attack on Liu Bei. The presents are said to have been fifty thousand carts of grain, five hundred horses, ten thousand ounces of gold and silver, and a thousand rolls of colored silk.
Lu Bu swallowed the bait and ordered Gao Shun to lead forth fifty thousand troops.
But Liu Bei heard of the threatened attack, so he made inclement weather an excuse to moved his few soldiers out of Xuyi for Guangling, before the attacking force came up.
However, Gao Shun demanded the promised reward through Ji Ling, who put Gao Shun off, saying, “My lord has gone away; I will settle this as soon as I can see him and get his decision.” With this answer Gao Shun returned to Lu Bu, who could not decide what to do.
Then came a letter from Yuan Shu, saying, “Although Gao Shun had gone to attack Liu Bei, yet Liu Bei had not been destroyed and no reward could be given till he was actually taken.” Lu Bu railed at what he called the breach of faith and was inclined to attack Yuan Shu himself. However, his adviser, Chen Gong, opposed this course, saying, “You should not; Yuan Shu is in possession of Shouchun and has a large army, well supplied. You are no match for him.
Rather ask Liu Bei to take up his quarters at Xiaopei as one of your wings and, when the time comes, let him lead the attack, both south and north.
Then Yuan Shu and Yuan Shao will fall before you, and you will be very powerful.” Finding this advice good, Lu Bu sent letters to Liu Bei asking him to return.
After the flight of Liu Bei, Yuan Shu attacked Guangling and reduced Liu Bei's force by half.
When the messenger from Lu Bu came, Liu Bei read the letter. He was quite content with the offer, but his brothers were not inclined to trust Lu Bu.
“Such a dishonorable man must have a motive,” said Guan Yu and Zhang Fei.
“Since he treats me kindly, I cannot but trust him,” replied Liu Bei.
So Liu Bei went back to Xuzhou.
Lu Bu, fearing that Liu Bei might doubt his sincerity, restored Liu Bei's family; and when Lady Gan and Lady Mi saw their lord, they told him that they had been kindly treated and guarded by soldiers against any intrusion, and provisions had never been wanting.
“I knew he would not harm my family,” said Liu Bei to Guan Yu and Zhang Fei. However, Zhang Fei was not pleased and would not accompany his brothers into the city when they went to express their thanks.
He went to escort the two ladies to Xiaopei. At the interview Lu Bu said, “I did not wish to take the city, but your brother behaved very badly, drinking and flogging the soldiers, and I came to guard it lest some evil should befall.” “But I had long wished to yield it to you,” said Liu Bei. Thereupon Lu Bu wished to retire in favor of Liu Bei who, however, would not hear of it.
Liu Bei returned and took up his quarters in Xiaopei, but his two brothers would not take the situation kindly and were very discontented.
Said Liu Bei, “One must bow to one's lot.
It is the will of Heaven, and one cannot struggle against fate.” Lu Bu sent presents of food and stuffs, and peace reigned between the two houses.
In Shouchun, Yuan Shu prepared a great banquet for his soldiers when it was announced that Sun Ce had subdued Lu Kang, the Governor of Lujiang.
Yuan Shu summoned the victor, who made obeisance at the foot of the hall of audience.
Yuan Shu, sitting in state, asked for details of the campaign and then invited Sun Ce to the banquet.
After the unhappy death of his father Sun Jian, Sun Ce had returned to the lower region of the Great River, where he had devoted himself to peaceful ends, inviting to his side good people and able scholars.
Afterwards, when a quarrel broke out between his mother's brother, Governor Wu Jing of Dangyang, and the late Imperial Protector of Xuzhou, Tao Qian, Sun Ce removed his mother with all the family to Que, he himself taking service under Yuan Shu, who admired and loved him greatly.
“If I had a son like Sun Ce,” said Yuan Shu, “I should die without regret.” Yuan Shu appointed Sun Ce Commander and sent him on various expeditions, all of which were successful.
After this banquet to celebrate the victory over Lu Kang, Sun Ce returned to his camp very bitter over the arrogant and patronizing airs of his patron.
Instead of retiring to his tent Sun Ce walked up and down by the light of the moon.
“Here am I, a mere nobody and yet my father was such a hero!” And he cried out and wept in spite of himself.
Then suddenly appeared one who said, laughing loudly, “What is this, Sun Ce?
While your noble father enjoyed the light of the sun, he made free use of me; and if his son has any difficulty to resolve, why does he not refer it to me also instead of weeping here alone?” Looking at the speaker Sun Ce saw it was Zhu Zhi, a native of Dangyang, who had been in Sun Jian's service.
Sun Ce then ceased weeping, and they two sat down. “I was weeping from regret at being unable to continue my father's work,” said Sun Ce. “Why stay here bound to the service of a master? The Governor of Dangyang is in distress.
Why not get command of an army under the pretense of an expedition to relieve Wu Jing?
Escape the shadow of Yuan Shu and take control of Dangyang, then you can accomplish great things.” While these two were talking, another man suddenly entered, saying, “I know what you two are planning, Noble Sirs.
Under my hand is a band of one hundred bold fellows ready to help Sun Ce in whatever he wishes to do.” The speaker was one of Yuan Shu's advisers named Lu Fan, from Runan.
They three then sat and discussed schemes.
“The one fear is that Yuan Shu will refuse to give you the troops,” said Lu Fan.
“I still have the Imperial Hereditary Seal that my father left me; that should be good security.” “Yuan Shu earnestly desires that jewel,” said Zhu Zhi.
“He will certainly lend you troops on that pledge.” The three talked over their plans, gradually settling the details; and not many days after Sun Ce obtained an interview with his patron. Assuming the appearance of deep grief Sun Ce said, “I have been unable to avenge my father.
Now the Imperial Protector of Yangzhou, Liu Yao, is opposing my mother's brother, and my mother and her family are in danger in Que.
Wherefore I would borrow a few thousands of fighting men to rescue them.
As perhaps, Illustrious Sir, you may lack confidence in me, I am willing to deposit the Imperial Hereditary Seal, left me by my late father, as a pledge.” “Let me see it if you have it,” said Yuan Shu.
“I do not want the jewel really, but you may as well leave it with me.
I will lend you three thousand troops and five hundred horses.
Return as soon as peace can be made.
As your rank is hardly sufficient for such powers, I will memorialize to obtain for you higher rank with the title of General Who Exterminates Brigands, and you can soon start.” Sun Ce thanked his patron most humbly and soon put the army in motion, taking with him his two new advisers and his father's generals—Zhu Zhi, Lu Fan, Cheng Pu, Huang Gai, Han Dang, and others.
When Sun Ce reached Linyang, he saw a body of troops in front of him, at their head a dashing leader of handsome and refined mien.
As soon as this commander saw Sun Ce, he dismounted and made obeisance.
It was Zhou Yu from Shucheng.
When Sun Jian was opposing the tyrant Dong Zhuo, he moved his family to Shucheng where the Zhou family had lived.
And as Zhou Yu and Sun Ce were of the same age all but two months, they became exceedingly good friends and sworn brothers, Sun Ce being the elder in virtue of his two months' seniority.
Zhou Yu was on his way to visit Sun Ce's uncle, Governor Wu Jing of Dangyang, when the happy meeting took place.
Naturally Sun Ce confided his projects and inmost ideas to his friend, who at once said, “I shall put my whole life and energy to serve you to reach that grand goal.” “Now that you have come, the design is as good as accomplished,” said Sun Ce.
Zhou Yu was introduced to Zhu Zhi and Lu Fan.
Zhou Yu said, “Do you know of the two Zhangs of Guangling?
They would be most useful people in working out your schemes.” “Who are they, the two Zhangs?” said Sun Ce.
“They are men of transcendent genius who are living near here for the sake of tranquillity in these turbulent times. Their names are Zhang Zhao and Zhang Hong.
Why not invite them to help you, Brother?” Sun Ce lost no time in sending letters and gifts, but they both declined.
Then he visited them in person, was greatly pleased with their speech and by dint of large gifts and much persuasion, got them to promise to join him.
Sun Ce appointed them both Counselors and Generals. The plan of the attack upon Yangzhou was the next matter for discussion.
The Imperial Protector, Liu Yao, was of Donglai, a scion of the imperial family and brother of the Imperial Protector of Yanzhou, Liu Dai.
Liu Yao had long ruled in Yangzhou and headquartered in Shouchun. But Yuan Shu had forced him to flee to the southeast of the Great River. He retired to Que and now was battling with Wu Jing in Linyang.
Hearing of the meditated attack on him, Liu Yao summoned his generals to take counsel.
Said General Zhang Ying, “I will take an army and entrench at Niuzhu.
No army can get past that, whatever its strength.” Zhang Ying was interrupted by another who shouted, “And let me lead the van!” All eyes turned to this man; it was Taishi Ci who, after helping Kong Rong raise the siege of Beihai, had come to serve Liu Yao.
Hearing him offer to undertake the hazardous post of van leader, Liu Yao said, “But you are still young and not yet equal to such a charge.
Rather stay by my side and await my orders.” Taishi Ci withdrew in disappointment.
Soon Zhang Ying led his army to Niuzhu, where the stores of grain located.
When Sun Ce approached, Zhang Ying went to meet him, and the two armies faced each other above the Bullock Rapid.
Zhang Ying roundly abused his opponent, and Huang Gai rode out to attack him.
But before the combat had proceeded far, there arose an alarm of fire in Zhang Ying's camp.
Zhang Ying turned back, and then Sun Ce advanced in full force, compelling the enemy to abandon their possession.
The defeated general fled to the hills.
Now the incendiaries who had brought about this result were two, named Jiang Qin from Shouchun and Zhou Tai from Jiujiang, who in these turbulent times had got together a band of kindred spirits and lived by plundering the country along the Great River.
They knew Sun Ce by reputation as a man who treated able people very liberally and wished to join him. So they came with their band, three hundred strong, and helped him in this way as an introduction.
Sun Ce welcomed them and gave the leaders rank.
After taking possession of the stores of all kinds abandoned by the runaways, and enlisting four thousand of those who surrendered into his own ranks, Sun Ce moved forward to attack Shenting.
After his defeat Zhang Ying returned to his master and told his misfortune.
Liu Yao was going to punish his failure by death, but listened to his advisers, who asked for mercy for the unfortunate man, and sent him to command the garrison in Lingling. Liu Yao himself set out to meet the invaders.
He camped south of the Sacred Hills. Sun Ce camped on the opposite side of the hills.
Sun Ce inquired the natives, “Is there a temple of Liu Xiu the Founder of Latter Hans in the vicinity?” They said, “There is a temple to the south on the summit of the hills.” “I dreamed last night that Liu Xiu called me, so I will go and pray there,” said Sun Ce.
But Counselor Zhang Zhao advised, “My lord, you should not go as the enemy is on the other side, and you may fall into an ambush.” “The spirit will help me; what need I fear?” So Sun Ce put on his armor, took his spear and mounted, taking with him twelve of his commanders as an escort.
They rode up the hills, dismounted, burned incense, and they all bowed in the shrine.
Then Sun Ce knelt and made a vow, saying, “If I, Sun Ce, succeed in my task and restore the authority of my late father, then will I restore this temple and order sacrifices at the four seasons.” When they had remounted, Sun Ce said, “I am going to ride along the ridge and reconnoiter the enemy's position.” His commanders begged him to refrain, but he was obstinate, and they rode there together, noting the villages below.
A soldier of the other side going along a bye road quickly reported the presence of horsemen on the ridge, and Liu Yao said, “It is certainly Sun Ce trying to inveigle us to battle.
But do not go out.” Taishi Ci jumped up, saying, “What better chance to capture him?” So, without orders he armed himself and rode through the camp, crying, “If there be any valiant people among you, follow me!” No one moved save a subaltern who said, “He is a valiant man and I will go with him.” So he also went.
The others only laughed at the pair.
Now having seen all he wished, Sun Ce thought it time to return and wheeled round his horse.
But when he was going over the summit, some one shouted, “Stay, Sun Ce!” Sun Ce turned; two horsemen were coming at full speed down the next hill.
Sun Ce halted and drew up his little escort right and left, he himself with his spear ready.
“Which is Sun Ce?” shouted Taishi Ci.
“Who are you?” was the reply.
“I, Taishi Ci of Laihuang, come to take him prisoner.” “Then I am he,” said Sun Ce, laughing.
“Come both of you together; I am not afraid of you.
If I were, I should not be Sun Ce.” “You and all your crowd come on and I will not blench,” cried Taishi Ci putting his horse at a gallop and setting his spear.
Sun Ce braced himself for the shock and the battle began.
Fifty bouts were fought and still neither combatant had the advantage.
Sun Ce's commanders whispered to each other their admiration and amazement.
Taishi Ci saw that the spearmanship of his opponent showed no weak point whereby he could gain the advantage, so he decided to resort to guile. Feigning defeat he would lead Sun Ce to pursue.
Taishi Ci however did not retire along the road by which he had come, but took a path leading around the hill instead of over it.
His antagonist followed, shouting, “He who retreats is no worthy soldier!” But Taishi Ci thought within himself, “He has twelve others at his back and I only one. If I capture him, the others will retake him.
I will inveigle him into some secret spot and then try.” So flying and fighting by turns he led Sun Ce, an eager pursuer, down to the plain.
Here Taishi Ci suddenly wheeled about and attacked.
Again they exchanged half a hundred bouts, without result.
Then Sun Ce made a fierce thrust, which his opponent evaded by gripping the spear under his arm, while he himself did the same with his opponent's spear.
Neither was wounded but each exerting his utmost strength to pull the other out of the saddle they both came to the ground.
Their steeds galloped off they knew not whither, while the two men, each dropping his spear, began a hand to hand struggle.
Soon their fighting robes were in tatters. Sun Ce gripped the short lance that Taishi Ci carried at his back, while Taishi Ci tore off the Sun Ce's helmet.
Sun Ce tried to stab with the short lance but Taishi Ci fended off the blow with the helmet as a shield.
Then arose a great shouting. Liu Yao had come up with a thousand soldiers. Sun Ce seemed now in sore straits.
His twelve followers came up, and each combatant let go his hold.
Taishi Ci quickly found another steed, seized a spear, and mounted.
Sun Ce, whose horse had been caught by Cheng Pu, also mounted, and a confused battle began between the handful of men on one side and a whole thousand troops on the other. It swayed and drifted down the hill side.
However, soon Zhou Yu leading his troops came to the rescue, and as evening drew on a tempest put an end to the fight. Both sides drew off and returned to camp.
Next day Sun Ce led his army to the front of Liu Yao's camp, and the challenge was accepted. The armies were drawn up.
Sun Ce hung the short lance he had seized from Taishi Ci at the end of his spear and waved it in front of the line of battle and ordered his soldiers to shout, “If the owner of this had not fled, he would have been stabbed to death.” On the other side they hung out Sun Ce's helmet, and the soldiers shouted back, “Sun Ce's head is here already.” Both sides thus yelled defiance at each other, one side boasting, the other bragging.
Then Taishi Ci rode out challenging Sun Ce to a duel to the death, and Sun Ce would have accepted, but Cheng Pu said, “My lord should not trouble himself; I will take him.” And Cheng Pu rode forth.
“You are no antagonist for me,” said Taishi Ci.
“Tell your master to come out.” This incensed Cheng Pu, who rode at his opponent, and they two fought thirty bouts. The duel was stopped by the gongs of Liu Yao. “Why did you sound the retreat?” said Taishi Ci.
“I was just going to capture the wretch.” “Because I have just heard that Que has been captured.
Zhou Yu led a surprise force thither, and Chen Wu was in league with him to betray the city.
We have no home now.
I will hasten to Moling to get the help of Xue Li and Ze Rong to retake the city.” The army retired, Taishi Ci with it, without being pursued.
On the other side Zhang Zhao said to Sun Ce, “Zhou Yu's attack is the cause of this move; they are in no mood to fight.
A night raid on their camp would finish them.” The army was divided into five divisions for the night surprise and hastened toward the camp where they scored a victory. Their opponents scattered in all directions.
Taishi Ci alone made a determined stand, and as he could not withstand a whole army, he fled with ten horsemen to Jingxian. Now Sun Ce acquired a new adherent in the person of Chen Wu. He was a soldier of middle height, sallow of complexion and dark eye, an odd looking man.
But Sun Ce held him in high esteem, appointed him Commander, and put him in the van of the attack on Xue Li.
As Van Leader, Chen Wu and a dozen horsemen made a dash into the enemy's formation, where they slew half a hundred men. So Xue Li would not fight but remained within his defenses.
As Sun Ce was attacking the city, a spy came in with the news that Liu Yao and Ze Rong had gone to attack Niuzhu, which made Sun Ce move thither in haste. His two opponents were ready for battle.
“I am here;” said Sun Ce, “you would better give in.” A general came out from behind Liu Yao to accept the challenge. It was Yu Mi. But in the third bout Sun Ce made him prisoner and carried him off to the other side.
Seeing his colleague thus captured, Fan Neng rode out to the rescue and got quite close.
But just as he was going to thrust, all Sun Ce's soldiers shouted, “There is a man behind you going to strike secretly!” At this Sun Ce turned and shouted so thunderously loud that Fan Neng fell out of his saddle from mere fright. He split his skull and died.
When Sun Ce reached his standard, he threw his prisoner to the ground. And Yu Mi was also dead, crushed to death between the arm and the body of his captor.
So in a few moments Sun Ce had disposed of two enemies, one crushed to death and one frightened to death. Thereafter Sun Ce was called the Little Prince.
Liu Yao had a defeat; the greater portion of his force surrendered, and the number of those slain exceeded ten thousand.
Liu Yao himself fled to Yuzhang and sought safety with Liu Biao, Imperial Protector of Jingzhou. An attack on Moling was the next move.
As soon as Sun Ce arrived at the moat, he summoned Commander Xue Li to surrender.
Some one let fly a furtive arrow from the wall which wounded Sun Ce in the left thigh so severely that he fell from his steed. Hastily his officers picked up their wounded chief and returned to the camp where the arrow was pulled out and the wound dressed with the medicines suitable for injuries by metals.
By Sun Ce's command the story was spread abroad that the hurt had been fatal, and all the soldiers set up cries of lamentation.
The camp was broken up.
Xue Li, Zhang Ying, and Chen Heng made a night sortie but fell into a carefully prepared ambush, and presently Sun Ce himself appeared on horseback shouting:
“Sun Ce is here still!” His sudden appearance created such a panic that the soldiers dropped their weapons and fell on their faces.
Sun Ce gave orders not to kill them. But their leaders fell:
Zhang Ying from Chen Wu's spear thrust as he turned to run away; Chen Heng was killed by Jiang Qin's arrow; and the Commander, Xue Li, was slain in the turbulence. Thus Sun Ce got possession of Moling.
Having calmed the people he sent his soldiers away to Jingxian, where Taishi Ci was in command.
Taishi Ci had assembled two thousand veterans in addition to his own troops for the purpose of avenging his master.
Sun Ce and Zhou Yu on the other hand consulted how to capture him alive.
Zhou Yu planned, “Attack the city on three sides, leaving the east gate free for flight.
Some distance off an ambush shall be prepared, when Taishi Ci, his men fatigued and horses spent, shall fall an easy victim.” The latest recruits under Taishi Ci's banner were mostly hillmen and unaccustomed to discipline.
Beside, the walls of the city were pitiably low.
One night Sun Ce ordered Chen Wu to strip off his long dress, leave his arms save a dagger, clamber up the ramparts, and set fire to the city.
Seeing the flames spreading, Taishi Ci made for the east gate and, as soon as he got outside, Sun Ce followed in pursuit.
The pursuit was maintained for some fifteen miles when the pursuers stopped. Taishi Ci went on as long as possible, finally halting to rest in a spot surrounded by reeds. Suddenly a tremendous shouting arose.
Taishi Ci was just starting when tripping ropes arose all round, his horse was thrown and he found himself a prisoner. Taishi Ci was taken back to camp.
As soon as Sun Ce heard the news, he himself rode out to order the guards to leave the prisoner, whose bonds he loosened with his own hands. Then he took off his own embroidered robe and put it on the captive. They entered the camp together. “I knew you were a real hero,” said Sun Ce.
“That worm of a Liu Yao had no use for such as you and so he got beaten.” Taishi Ci, overcome by this kindness and good treatment, then formally surrendered.
Sun Ce seized his hand and said, laughing, “If you had taken me at that fight we had near the shrine, would you have killed me?” “Who can say?” said Taishi Ci smiling.
Sun Ce laughed also and they entered his tent, where Taishi Ci was placed in the seat of honor at a banquet.
Taishi Ci said, “Can you trust me so far as to let me go to muster as many as I can of the soldiers of my late master.
Under the smart of this defeat they will turn against him, and they would be a great help to you.” “Exactly what I most desire.
I will make an agreement with you that at midday tomorrow you will return.” Taishi Ci agreed and went off.
All the generals said he would never return.
“He is trustworthy and will not break his word,” said the chief. None of the officers believed he would come back.
But the next day they set up a bamboo rod in the gate of the camp, and just as the shadow marked noon Taishi Ci returned, bringing with him about a thousand troops.
Sun Ce was pleased, and his officers had to confess that he had rightly judged his man.
Sun Ce thus marched his army to the South Land, and his enemies fled or surrendered before his force. He had now several legions and the southeast of the Great River was his. He improved the conditions of the people and maintained order so that his adherents and supporters daily increased.
He was called Sun Ce the Bright.
When his army approached, the people used to flee in terror; but when it had arrived and they saw that no one was permitted to loot and not the least attempt was made on their houses, they rejoiced and presented the soldiers with oxen and wine, for which they were in turn duly rewarded. Gladness filled the country side.
The soldiers who had followed Liu Yao were kindly treated. Those who wished to join Sun Ce's army did so; those who preferred not to be soldiers were sent home with presents.
And thus Sun Ce won the respect and praise of every one and became very powerful.
Sun Ce then settled his mother and the remainder of the family in Que, setting his brother, Sun Quan, and Zhou Tai over the city of Xuancheng.
Then he headed an expedition to the south to reduce Wujun.
At that time there was a certain Yan Baihu, or the White Tiger, who styled himself King of Eastern Wu  and ruled over Wujun. His armies stationed at Wucheng and Jiaxing.
Hearing of Sun Ce's approach, Yan Baihu sent his brother, Yan Yu, with an army against Sun Ce, and they met at Juniper Bridge.
Yan Yu, sword in hand, took his stand on the bridge, and this was reported to Sun Ce, who prepared to accept the challenge.
Zhang Hong tried to dissuade him, saying, “For as much as my lord's fate is bound up with that of the army, he should not risk a conflict with a mere robber.
I wish that you should remember your own value.” “Your words, O Wise One, are as gold and precious stones, but I fear that my soldiers will not carry out my commands unless I myself share their dangers.” However, Sun Ce sent forth Han Dang to take up the challenge.
Just as Han Dang reached the bridge, Jiang Qin and Chen Wu, who had dropped down the river in a small boat, passed under the bridge.
Though the arrows fell in clouds on the bank, the two men rushed up and fiercely attacked Yan Yu as he stood on the bridge.
Yan Yu fled and Han Dang went in pursuit.
But Yan Yu smote up to the west gate of the city into which he entered.
Sun Ce laid siege to Wujun both by land and water.
For three days no one came out to offer battle.
Then at the head of his army, Sun Ce came to the west gate and summoned the warden.
An officer of inconsiderable rank came out and stood with one hand resting on a beam while with the other he gave point to his abuse of those below.
Quickly Taishi Ci's hands sought his bow and an arrow was on the string. “See me hit that fellow's hand,” said he, turning to his companions.
Even as the sound of his voice died away, the bowstring twanged, the arrow sped and lodged in the beam, firmly pinning thereto the officer's hand.
Both sides, those on the wall and those below it, marveled and acclaimed at such marksmanship. The wounded man was taken away.
When Yan Baihu the White Tiger heard of the exploit, he said, “How can we hope to withstand an army with such people as this in it?” And his thoughts turned toward a peace.
He sent his brother Yan Yu out to see Sun Ce, who received him civilly, invited him into the tent, and set wine before him.
“And what does your brother propose?” said Sun Ce.
“He is willing to share this region with you,” was the reply.
“The rat! How dare he put himself on a level with me?” cried Sun Ce.
Sun Ce commanded to put the messenger to death.
Yan Yu started up and drew his sword; but out flew Sun Ce's blade, and the unhappy messenger fell to the ground. His head was hacked off and sent into the city to his brother. This had its effect.
Yan Baihu saw resistance was hopeless, so he abandoned Wujun and fled. Sun Ce pressed the attack.
Huang Gai captured Jiaxing, and Taishi Ci took Wucheng. Several other southern cities were fallen. The territory was quickly subdued.
Yan Baihu rushed off toward Yuhang in the east, plundering on all sides, till a band of villagers under the leadership of one Ling Cao checked his career of robbery there. Yan Baihu then fled toward Kuaiji.
Ling Cao and his son then went to meet Sun Ce, who took them into his service, and appointed them Commanders as a reward for their service, and the joint forces crossed the Great River.
The White Tiger, Yan Baihu, gathered his scattered forces and took up a position at Western Ford, but Cheng Pu attacked him there and scattered the defenders, chasing them as far as Kuaiji.
The Governor of the place, Wang Lang, was on Yan Baihu's side and inclined to support him actively. But, when Wang Lang proposed this, one of his officers stood forth, saying, “No!
Sun Ce as a leader is humane and upright, while the White Tiger is a savage ruffian. Rather capture him and offer his person as a peace offering to Sun Ce.” The Governor turned angrily toward the speaker, who was an official named Yu Fan from Kuaiji, and bade him be silent. Yu Fan withdrew sighing deeply.
And the Governor went to the help of the White Tiger with whom he joined forces at Shanyin. Sun Ce came up.
When both sides were arrayed, Sun Ce rode out and addressed Wang Lang, saying, “Mine is an army of good soldiers, and my aim is to restore peace to this region, but you give your support to a rebel!” Wang Lang replied, “Your greed is insatiable.
Having got possession of Wujun, you want also my territory.
I shall revenge for the Yans.” This response greatly angered Sun Ce.
Just as battle was to be joined, Taishi Ci advanced and Wang Lang came toward him waving a sword.
Before they had exchanged many passes, Zhou Xin dashed out to help Wang Lang. Thereupon Huang Gai rode out to make the sides more equal.
These latter two were just engaging when the drums rolled on both sides, and a general battle began.
Suddenly confusion was caused in the rear of Wang Lang's army by the sudden onslaught of a small army.
Wang Lang galloped off to see the attackers were Zhou Yu and Cheng Pu. Then an attack was made on his flank, so that he was in a hopeless position, and he and Yan Baihu and Zhou Xin, fighting desperately to cut an arterial alley, only just managed to reach the shelter of the city. The drawbridges were raised, the gates closed, and preparations made to sustain a siege.
Sun Ce followed right up to the walls and then divided his troops so as to attack all four gates.
Seeing that the city was being fiercely attacked, Wang Lang was for making a sortie, but Yan Baihu opposed this as hopeless against so strong a force outside.
“We can only strengthen our position and remain behind the shelter of the ramparts until hunger forces the besiegers to retire,” said Yan Baihu. Wang Lang agreed and the siege went on.
For several days a vigorous attack was maintained, but with little success.
In a council, Sun Jing, who was the uncle of Sun Ce, said, “Since they are holding the city with such resolution, it will be difficult to dislodge them.
But the bulk of their supplies is stored at Chadu, distant only some ten miles.
Our best plan is to seize this place, thus attacking where the enemy is unprepared, and doing what they do not expect.” Sun Ce approved, saying, “My uncle's plan is admirable and will crush the rebels.” So he issued orders to kindle watch fires at all the gates, and leave the flags standing to maintain the appearance of soldiers in position while the expedition went south.
Zhou Yu came to utter a warning, “When you, my lord, go away, the besieged will surely come out and follow you.
We might prepare a surprise for them.” Sun Ce replied, “My preparations are complete, and the city will be captured tonight.” So the army set out.
Wang Lang heard that the besiegers had gone, and he went up to the tower to reconnoiter.
He saw the fires blazing, the smoke rising, and the pennons fluttering in the breeze as usual and hesitated.
Zhou Xin said, “He has gone and this is only a strategy.
Let us go out and smite them.” Yan Baihu said, “If he has gone, it is to attack Chadu.
Let us pursue.” “The place is our base of supply,” said Wang Lang, “and must be defended.
You two lead the way, and I will follow with reserves.” So Yan Baihu and Zhou Xin went forth with five thousand soldiers and drew near their enemy about the first watch, at seven miles from the city. The road led through dense forest.
Then suddenly the drums beat and lighted torches sprang up on all sides.
Yan Baihu was frightened, turned his horse and started to retreat. At once a leader appeared in front in whom, by the glare of the torches, he recognized Sun Ce.
Zhou Xin made a rush at him but fell under Sun Ce's spear.
The men surrendered.
However, Yan Baihu managed to cut his way out and fled to Yuhang.
Wang Lang soon heard of the loss and, not daring to return to the city, fled in all haste to the coastal regions.
And so Sun Ce got possession of the city of Kuaiji.
Having restored order, a few days later a man came bringing the head of the White Tiger as an offering to Sun Ce. This man was a native of the county.
He was of medium height, with a square face and wide mouth.
He was named Dong Xi.
Sun Ce appointed him Commander.
After this, peace reigned in all the southeast. Sun Ce placed his uncle Sun Jing in command of the city and made Zhu Zhi Governor of Wujun. Then Sun Ce returned to his own place, south of the Great River.
While Sun Ce was absent, a band of brigands suddenly attacked Xuancheng, left in the care of his brother Sun Quan and the leader Zhou Tai.
As the onslaught was made on all sides at once, and in the night, the brigands got the upper hand.
Zhou Tai took the youth in his arms and mounted a horse; but as the robbers came on with swords to attack him he dismounted, and though without mail, met the robbers on foot and slew them as they came up. Then came a horseman armed with a spear, but Zhou Tai laid hold of his spear and pulled him to the earth. Then Zhou Tai mounted the robber's horse and thrusting this way and that with the spear fought his way out. So Sun Quan was preserved, but his savior had received more than a dozen wounds.
However, the bandits went away.
These wounds being due to metal would not heal but swelled enormously, and the brave soldier's life hung in the balance. Sun Ce returned and was deeply grieved.
Then Dong Xi said, “Once in an engagement with some coastal pirates, I received many spear wounds, but a certain wise man named Yu Fan recommended a surgeon who cured me in half a month.” “Surely this must be Yu Fan of Kuaiji,” replied Sun Ce.
“That is he; he is so called.” “Yes, truly a wise man; I would employ him.” So Sun Ce sent two officers to invite Yu Fan, and he came at once.
He was treated in most friendly fashion and appointed an official forthwith. Then the question of treating the wounded man was brought up.
“The surgeon is one Hua Tuo from Qiao, who has perfectly marvelous medicine skill.
I will get him to come,” said Yu Fan.
Shortly the famous Hua Tuo arrived, a man with the complexion of a youth and a snowy beard. He looked more like a saint who had passed the gates of this life.
He was treated very warmly and taken to see the sick general's wounds.
“The case is not difficult,” said the surgeon.
And he prepared certain drugs that healed the wounds within a month. Sun Ce suitably acknowledged his care and skill, and he was allowed to leave with rich rewards.
Next Sun Ce attacked the brigands and destroyed them, so restoring complete tranquillity to the South Land.
After this he set garrisons at all the strategic points in the old state of Wu, and this done, memorialized what he had achieved to the Throne.
He came to an understanding with Cao Cao and sent letters to Yuan Shu demanding the return of the Imperial Hereditary Seal he had left in pledge.
But Yuan Shu, secretly cherishing the most ambitious designs, wrote excuses and did not return the state jewel.
In his own place Yuan Shu hastily summoned about thirty of his officers to a council. Among them were Adviser Yang Dajiang and Generals Zhang Xun, Ji Ling, Qiao Rui, Lei Bo, and Chen Lan. Yuan Shu said, “Sun Ce borrowed an army from me and set out on an expedition which has made him master of the South Land.
Now he says nothing of repayment but demands the token of his pledge. Truly he is a boor, and what steps can I take to destroy him?” Yang Dajiang replied, “You cannot do any thing against him, for he is too strongly placed, the Great River as the shield.
You must first remove Liu Bei in revenge for having attacked you without cause, and then you may think about Sun Ce. I have a scheme to put the former into your hands in a very short time.” Yuan Shu went not to destroy the tiger, but instead Against a dragon forth his army led.
The means Yang Dajiang employed will be made plain in the next chapter.
CHAPTER 16.
In The Camp Gate, Lu Bu Shoots The Halberd; At River Yu, Cao Cao Suffers Defeat. Adviser Yang Dajiang knew how to remove Liu Bei.
“What is your plan of attack on Liu Bei?” said Yuan Shu.
Yang Dajiang replied, “Though Liu Bei, now camped at Xiaopei, could easily be taken, yet Lu Bu is strongly posted at the chief city near.
And I think Lu Bu would help Liu Bei if it was only for the grudge he bears against you for not having given him the gold and studs, grain and horses you promised.
First of all you should send Lu Bu a present whereby to engage his affections and keep him quiet while you deal with Liu Bei.
You can see to Lu Bu after this is done, and Xuzhou is yours.” Thereupon two hundred thousand carts of millet was sent, with letters, by the hand of Han Yin.
The gift pleased Lu Bu greatly; and he treated the messenger with great cordiality.
Feeling sure of no trouble from that quarter, Yuan Shu told off one hundred thousand troops against Xiaopei. The army was led by Ji Ling as commanding general, and Lei Bo and Chen Lan as generals. When Liu Bei heard these things he called his officers to take counsel.
Zhang Fei was for open war forthwith.
But Sun Qian said, “Our resources were too small; therefore, we must lay the position before Lu Bu and ask help.” “Do you think that fellow will do anything?” said Zhang Fei cynically.
Liu Bei decided in favor of Sun Qian's proposal and wrote as follows:
“Humbly I venture to remind you that I am here by your orders and enjoy repose as the result of your kindness, extensive as the heavens.
Now Yuan Shu, moved by a desire for revenge, is sending a force against this place, and its destruction is imminent unless you intervene to save it.
I trust you will send an army quickly to protect the town, and our happiness will be inexpressible.” Receiving this Lu Bu called in Chen Gong to whom he said, “I have just received gifts from Yuan Shu and a letter, with the intent of restraining me from helping Liu Bei.
Now comes a letter from Liu Bei asking help.
It seems to me that Liu Bei where he is can do me no harm; but if Yuan Shu overcomes Liu Bei and comes to an understanding with the leaders around the Huashang Mountains, then the power of the north is so much nearer, and I should be unable to resist the attacks of so many leaders and should never sleep secure.
I will aid Liu Bei; that is the better course for me.” Now Yuan Shu's force sent against Xiaopei went thither as quickly as possible, and soon the country to the southeast fluttered with pennons by day and blazed with watch fires by night, while the rolling of the drums reverberated from heaven to earth.
The five thousand troops at Liu Bei's disposal were led out of the city and arranged to make a brave show, but it was good news to him to hear that Lu Bu had arrived and was quite near.
Lu Bu camped only half a mile away to the southwest.
When Yuan Shu's general, Ji Ling, heard of his arrival, he wrote letters reproaching Lu Bu for his treachery. Lu Bu smiled as he read them. “I know how to make both of them love me,” said Lu Bu.
So he sent invitations to both Liu Bei and Ji Ling to come to a banquet. Liu Bei was for accepting the invitation and going, but his brothers dissuaded him, saying, “There is some treachery in his heart.” “I have treated him too well for him to do me any harm,” said Liu Bei.
So he mounted and rode away, the two brothers following.
They came to the camp.
The host said, “Now by a special effort I have got you out of danger; I hope you will not forget that when you come into your own.” Liu Bei thanked him heartily and was invited to take a seat. Guan Yu and Zhang Fei took up their usual place as guards.
But when Ji Ling was announced, Liu Bei felt a spasm of fear and got up to go away.
“You two are invited for the particular purpose of a discussion,” said the host. “Do not take it amiss.” Liu Bei, being quite ignorant of his intentions, was very uneasy. Presently his fellow guest entered.
Seeing Liu Bei in the tent, and in the seat of honor, Ji Ling was puzzled, hesitated and tried to withdraw.
But the attendants prevented this and Lu Bu, advancing, laid hold of him and drew him into the tent as he had been a child.
“Do you wish to slay me?” asked Ji Ling.
“Not at all,” replied Lu Bu.
“Then you are going to slay Long-Ears?” “No; not that.” “Then what does it mean?” “Liu Bei and I are brothers.
Now, General, you are besieging him, and so I have come to the rescue.” “Then slay me,” said Ji Ling. “There would be no sense in that.
All my life I have disliked fighting and quarrels, but have loved making peace.
And now I want to settle the quarrel between you two.” “May I ask how you think of doing so?” “I have a means and one approved of Heaven itself.” Then Lu Bu drew Ji Ling within the tent and led him up to Liu Bei.
The two men faced each other, full of mutual suspicion, but their host placed himself between them and they took their seats, Liu Bei on the right hand of the host.
The banquet began.
After a number of courses almost in silence, Lu Bu spoke, saying, “I wish you two gentlemen to listen to me and put an end to your strife.” Liu Bei made no reply, but Ji Ling said, “I have come with an army of one hundred thousand at the express bidding of my master to take Liu Bei. How can I cease the strife?
I must fight.” “What!” exclaimed Zhang Fei drawing his sword.
“Few as we are, we regard you no more than a lot of children.
What are you compared with a million Yellow Scarves?
You dare hurt our brother!” Guan Yu urged him to be silent, saying, “Let us see what General Lu Bu has to say first; after that there will be time to go to our tents and fight.” “I beg you both to come to an understanding.
I cannot let you fight,” said Lu Bu.
Now on one side Ji Ling was discontented and angry; on the other Zhang Fei was dying for a fight; and neither of the two chiefly concerned would signify assent.
Then suddenly the host turned to his attendants, saying, “Bring my trident halberd!” They did so, and he sat there gripping that graceful but effective weapon in his right hand. Both guests felt very ill at ease and turned pale.
Lu Bu went on, saying, “I have tried to persuade you to make peace, for that is the command of the Most High.
It shall be put to the test.” He then bade his servants take the halberd outside beyond the gate and set it up.
Then speaking to his two guests, he said, “That gate is one hundred and fifty paces distant. If I can hit that left branch of the halberd-head with an arrow, you will both withdraw your armies. If I miss, you can go away and prepare for immediate battle.
I shall stand against either of you who does not abide by what I say.” Ji Ling thought to himself, “That small mark at that distance! How could any one hit it?” So he assented, thinking he would have plenty of fighting after his host had missed the mark.
Of course Liu Bei was willing.
They all sat down again and wine was served.
When this had been drunk the host called for his bow and arrows. Liu Bei silently prayed that he would hit the mark.
Lu Bu turned back his sleeves, carefully fitted an arrow to the string and pulled the bow to its utmost stretch.
A slight exclamation escaped him as the bow curved like the harvest moon sailing through the sky. “Twang!” went the bowstring, and the arrow sped like a falling star. And it struck the slender tongue of the halberd head full and square.
A roar of acclamation from all sides greeted the exploit. The multitude people often hail their praise: O Lu Bu was a wonderful archer, And the arrow he shot sped straight; By hitting the mark he saved his friend That day at his camp gate.
Hou Yi, the archer of ancient days, Brought down each mocking sun, And the apes that gibbered to fright Yang Youji Were slain by him, one by one.
But we sing of Lu Bu that drew the bow, And his feathered shaft that flew; For one hundred thousand soldiers could doff their mails When he hit the mark so true. Lu Bu laughed loud at the success of his shot. Dropping his bow he seized his guests by the hands, saying, “The command of Heaven indeed!
And now you cease from fighting!” He ordered the soldier attendants to pour out great goblets of wine and each drank. Liu Bei in his inmost heart felt rather lucky; his fellow guest sat silent, nodding his head.
Presently he said, “I cannot disobey your command, General, but let me depart.
What will my master say and will he believe me?” “I will write a letter and confirm it,” said Lu Bu.
After a few more rounds of the wine, Ji Ling asked that he might have the letter and after that departed. When the brothers took their leave, Lu Bu again reminded Liu Bei, saying, “Do not forget I have delivered you today!” Liu Bei thanked him and departed.
Next day the leaders broke camps, and the soldiers were gone.
When Ji Ling had got back to the South of River Huai and told the story of the feat of archery and the peace making that followed, and had presented the letter, his lord was very wroth.
“Lu Bu repays me for all my grain with this bit of play acting!” cried Yuan Shu.
“He has saved Liu Bei, but I will lead a large army myself and settle both Liu Bei and him.” “Be careful, my lord,” said Ji Ling.
“Lu Bu is braver and stronger than most leaders and has wide territory.
He and Liu Bei together make a powerful combination, not easy to break. But there is another course.
I have found out that his wife, Lady Yan, has a daughter just of marriageable age; and as you have a son, you could arrange a marriage alliance with Lu Bu.
If his daughter wedded your son, Lu Bu would certainly slay your enemy for you. This is called 'Relative-above-Stranger' plan.” This scheme appealed to Yuan Shu, who soon set about its accomplishment.
He sent presents by the hand of Han Yin, who was to discuss the question.
When Han Yin saw Lu Bu, he said, “My master has an immense respect for you, Illustrious Sir, and he desires to ensure perpetual alliance between the two families by a marriage, an alliance such as existed between the ancient states of Qin and Jin.” Lu Bu was well disposed toward the scheme, but went in to consult his wife.
Now Lu Bu had two wives and one concubine. He first married a lady of the Yan family, and she was the legal wife.
Then he took Diao Chan as a concubine. And while he was living at Xiaopei, he had married a secondary wife, a daughter of Cao Bao.
Lady Cao had died quite young leaving no issue. Neither had Diao Chan borne any children. So that Lu Bu had but one child, this daughter, of whom he was dotingly fond.
When he broached the subject, his wife said, “The Yuans have dominated the regions around the River Huai these many years. They have a large army and are very prosperous.
One day a Yuan will become emperor, and our daughter may hope to be an empress.
But how many sons has Yuan Shu?” “Only this one.” “Then we should accept the offer.
Even if our daughter does not become an Empress, Xuzhou has a new ally.” Lu Bu decided to accept and so treated the messenger with extreme generosity.
Han Yin went back with a favorable answer.
The wedding gifts were then prepared ready for Han Yin to take to the bride's family.
They were received and banquets and merry-making filled all the time.
Next day Chen Gong went to see the messenger in his lodging, and when the usual ceremonies and greetings had been exchanged, the two men sat down to talk.
When the servants had been sent out of earshot, Chen Gong said, “Who originated this scheme by which Yuan Shu and Lu Bu are to become connections by this marriage so that Liu Bei's head may fall?” Han Yin was terrified.
“I pray you not to let it get abroad,” said he. “I certainly shall keep it secret. But if there be any delay, some other person will find it out and that spells failure,” said Chen Gong.
“What would best be done?” “I will see Lu Bu and get him to send the girl immediately so that the marriage may be concluded quickly.” “If it happened thus, my master would indeed hold you in high respect.” With this Chen Gong took his leave and sought an interview with Lu Bu.
“I hear your daughter is to be married to Yuan Shu's son.
That is capital, but no one knows when.” “That has yet to be considered.” “There were certain fixed rules as to the period between sending presents and consummation of the marriage; emperors, a year; nobles, half a year; high officers, three months; and common people, one month.” Lu Bu replied, “As to Yuan Shu, Heaven has already put into his hands the Imperial Hereditary Seal and he will surely arrive at the dignity one day.
So, I should think the imperial rule would apply.” “No; it will not.” “The nobles' rule, then?” “No; nor that.” “The high officers'?” “Not even that.” Lu Bu laughed, saying, “Then you mean me to go by the rule for common people.” “Nor that either.” “Then what do you mean?” “In the midst of the present troubles, when there is great rivalry among the nobles, do you not see that the others will be exceedingly jealous of your marriage alliance with such a high family as the Yuans?
Suppose you postpone the choice of the day, most likely when your fine morning arrives, the wedding party will fall into an ambush on the road and the bride be carried off. Then what could be done?
My opinion is that you would have done better to refuse.
But since you have consented, then carry out the plan at once before the lords hear of it, and so send the girl over without delay to Shouchun.
You can hire a lodging there till you have selected the wedding day, and the odds are greatly against any failure.” “What you say is quite to the point,” replied Lu Bu. He went into the private apartments to see his wife and told her the bride elect would set out immediately and the trousseau was to be prepared as far as it could be.
On his side he chose some good horses and had a wedding carriage got ready. The escort consisted of Han Yin and two of Lu Bu's generals, Song Xian and Wei Xu.
The procession went out of the city to the sound of music.
Now at this time Chen Gui, father of Chen Deng, was placidly waiting till the evening of his life passed into night. Hearing this burst of music he inquired the occasion, and the servants told him.
“They are working on the 'Relative-above-Stranger' device, then,” said Chen Gui.
“Liu Bei is in danger.” Thereupon in spite of his many infirmities he went to see Lu Bu.
“Noble Sir, what brings you here?” asked Lu Bu.
“I heard you were dead and I came to mourn,” quavered the old man.
“Who said that?” exclaimed his host.
“Once upon a time you received grand presents from Yuan Shu that you might slay Liu Bei, but you got out by that clever shot at your halberd.
Now they suddenly seek a marriage alliance thinking to get hold of your daughter as a pledge. The next move will be an attack on Xiaopei and, that gone, where are you?
Whatever they ask in future, grain or troops or anything else, and you yield, will bring your own end nearer, and make you hated all round.
If you refuse, then you are false to the duties of a relative, and that will be an excuse to attack you openly.
Beside this Yuan Shu intends to call himself emperor, which would be rebellion, and you would be of the rebel's family; something abominable, which the multitude people would not suffer.” Lu Bu was much disturbed to hear this. “I have been misled!” cried he.
So he hurriedly sent Zhang Liao to bring the wedding party, which had been ten miles away, back to the city.
When they had come, Lu Bu threw Han Yin into prison and sent a reply to Yuan Shu saying curtly that the girl's trousseau was not ready and she could not be married till it was.
Chen Gui wanted Han Yin to be sent to the capital, Xuchang.
But Lu Bu was hesitating what course to adopt, when he heard that Liu Bei was enlisting soldiers and buying horses for no apparent reason.
“He is simply doing his duty; there is nothing to be surprised at,” said Lu Bu at first.
Then came two officers, Song Xian and Wei Xu, saying, “As you ordered us, we went into the Huashang Mountains to purchase horses.
We had got three hundred when, on our way back, on the borders of Xiaopei some robbers stole half of them.
We hear that the real robbers were Zhang Fei and his soldiers, who took on the guise of brigands.” Lu Bu was very angry at this and began to prepare an expedition against Xiaopei.
When Liu Bei heard that an attack threatened, he led out his army to oppose it, and the two armies were arrayed.
Liu Bei rode to the front and said, “Elder Brother, why have you brought an army against me?” Lu Bu began abusing him, saying, “That shot of mine at the Archery Feast saved you from grave danger; why then did you steal my horses?” “I wanted horses and I sent out to buy them. Should I dare to take yours?” said Liu Bei.
“You stole a hundred and fifty in the person of your brother Zhang Fei.
You only used another man's hand.” Thereupon Zhang Fei, with his spear set, rode out, saying, “Yes; I stole your good horses, and what more do you expect?” Lu Bu replied, “You goggled-eyed thief! You are always treating me with contempt.” “Yes; I took your horses and you get angry.
You did not say any thing when you stole my brother's Xuzhou.” Lu Bu rode forward to give battle, and Zhang Fei advanced.
A reckless fight began, and the two warriors kept it up for a hundred bouts without a decisive stroke.
Then Liu Bei, fearing some accident to his brother, hastily beat the gongs as a signal to retire and led his army into the city.
Lu Bu then invested it. Liu Bei called his brother and chided him as the cause of all this misfortune.
“Where are the horses?” said Liu Bei.
“In some of the temples and courts,” replied Zhang Fei.
Liu Bei sent a messenger out to speak softly and offer to restore the stolen horses if hostilities were to cease.
Lu Bu was disposed to agree but Chen Gong opposed.
“You will suffer by and by if you do not remove this Liu Bei.” Under Chen Gong's influence the request for peace was rejected, and the attackers on the city pressed harder. Liu Bei called Mi Zhu and Sun Qian to him to ask advice.
Said Sun Qian, “The one person that Cao Cao detests is Lu Bu.
Let us then abandon the city and take refuge with Cao Cao, from whom we may borrow troops to destroy him.” “If we try to get away, who will lead the van?” “I will do my best,” said Zhang Fei. So Zhang Fei led the way; Guan Yu was rearguard; and in the center was Liu Bei with the non-fighting portion.
The cavalcade started and went out at the north gate under the bright moon.
They met opposition from Song Xian and Wei Xu's men, but the soldiers were driven off by Zhang Fei, and the besieging force was passed without difficulty.
Zhang Liao pursued, but was held off by Guan Yu's rearguard. It seemed Lu Bu was not dissatisfied at the flight, for he took no personal trouble to prevent it. He made formal entry into the city, settled local affairs, and appointed Gao Shun as Governor.
Liu Bei approached Xuchang and encamped outside the city, whence he sent Sun Qian to see Cao Cao and relate the events that brought him there.
Cao Cao was very friendly and said, “Liu Bei is as my brother.” Then Cao Cao invited Liu Bei to enter the city. Leaving his brothers at the camp, Liu Bei, with Sun Qian and Mi Zhu, went to Cao Cao, who received him with the greatest respect.
The story of Lu Bu's perfidy was again related. “He has no sense of right,” said Cao Cao.
“You and I, my brother, will attack him together.” Liu Bei was very grateful.
A banquet was then prepared, and it was late evening before the visitor left for his own camp.
Xun Yu then had an interview with his master and said, “If you are not on your guard, Liu Bei will be your undoing.
You ought to destroy him. He is too much of a hero.” Cao Cao made no reply and his adviser retired.
Presently Guo Jia came, and Cao Cao said, “I have been advised to kill Liu Bei; what of such a scheme?” “A bad scheme,” said Guo Jia.
“You are the popular champion, pledged to relieve the people from oppression, and only by truth and rectitude can you secure the support of the noble-minded. Your only fear is lest they stay away. Now Liu Bei is clearly a hero.
He has come to you for help and protection, and to put him to death would be to alienate all good people and put fear into the hearts of all the able advisers.
Hampered by these difficulties, where will you find those whose help you need?
To remove the dangers represented by one man and thereby injure yourself in the eyes of all humankind is a sure means of destruction.
These conditions need careful consideration.” “What you say exactly fits in with what I think,” said Cao Cao, greatly pleased with these remarks.
His next step was to memorialize the Emperor to give Liu Bei the imperial protectorship of Yuzhou.
Again Cheng Yu said, “Liu Bei is certain to rise to the top; he will never remain in a subordinate position. You would better remove him.” Cao Cao answered, “Now is just the time to make use of good people.
I will not forfeit the regard of the world for the sake of removing one individual.
Guo Jia and I both see this in the same light.” Wherefore Cao Cao rejected all persuasion to work against Liu Bei but sent him three thousand soldiers and ten thousand carts of grain, and set him on his way to Yuzhou.
Liu Bei was to march to Xiaopei, occupy it, call together his former soldiers, and attack Lu Bu.
When Liu Bei reached Yuzhou, he sent to inform Cao Cao, who prepared to march an army to subjugate Lu Bu. But just then hasty news came that Zhang Ji, who had gone to the attack of Nanyang, had been wounded by a stray arrow and had died.
His nephew, Zhang Xiu, had succeeded to the command of his army; and with Jia Xu as strategist, Zhang Xiu had joined Liu Biao and camped at Wancheng. They intended to attack the capital and get possession of the Emperor's person.
Cao Cao was placed in a quandary. He would go to attack this combination, but he feared lest Lu Bu would attack the capital if he left it. So he sought the advice of Xun Yu.
Said the Adviser, “Lu Bu has no notion of a policy.
He is led astray by any little advantage that presents itself to his eyes. All you need do is to obtain promotion for him, giving him some additional title, and tell him to make peace with Liu Bei, and he will do it. The south is no threat then.” “Good,” said Cao Cao.
And he acted upon the hint and sent an Imperial Legate, Wang Ze, to Xuzhou with the official announcement and a letter urging peace, while he went on with preparations to meet the other danger from Zhang Xiu.
When ready Cao Cao marched out with one hundred fifty thousand troops in three divisions.
Xiahou Dun was the Van Leader, and they went to River Yu and camped there. Jia Xu succeeded in persuading Zhang Xiu of the hopelessness of resistance.
“You would do well to surrender, since Cao Cao's army is too large for you to oppose,” said Jia Xu.
Seeing the truth of this, Zhang Xiu sent his adviser to propose sub mission.
Cao Cao was greatly pleased with the messenger, admiring his ready and fluent repartee, and tried to win him to his service.
“I was formerly with Li Jue and was guilty with him.
Now I am with Zhang Xiu who esteems my advice, and I should not like to abandon him,” said Jia Xu.
Jia Xu left and next day conducted his master into Cao Cao's presence. Cao Cao was very generous.
Then he entered Wancheng with a small force, the greater part of the army being put in camp outside where the lines extended some three miles.
Great banquets were given every day by Zhang Xiu, and Cao Cao was always being entertained.
One day, when Cao Cao returned to his quarters in a more than usual merry mood, he asked the attendants if there were any singing girls in the city.
His nephew, Cao Amin, heard the question and said, “Peeping through one of the partitions last evening, I saw a perfectly beautiful woman in one of the courts. They told me she was the wife of Zhang Ji, Zhang Xiu's uncle. She is very lovely.” Cao Cao, inflamed by the description given him of the beauty, told his nephew to go and bring her to visit him. Cao Amin did so, supported by an armed escort, and very soon the woman stood before Cao Cao.
She was a beauty indeed, and Cao Cao asked her name.
She replied, “Thy handmaid was wife to Zhang Ji; I was born of the Zhou family.” “Do you know who I am?” “I have known the Prime Minister by reputation a long time.
I am happy to see him and be permitted to bow before him,” said she. “It was for your sake that I allowed Zhang Xiu to submit; otherwise I would have slain him and cut him off root and branch,” said Cao Cao.
“Indeed, then, I owe my very life to you; I am very grateful,” said she.
“To see you is a glimpse of paradise, but there is one thing I should like better.
Stay here and go with me to the capital where I will see that you are properly cared for.
What do you say to that, my lady?” She could but thank him. “But Zhang Xiu will greatly wonder at my prolonged absence, and gossips will begin to talk,” said she.
“If you like, you can leave the city tomorrow.” She did so; but instead of going at once to the capital, she stayed with him among the tents, where Dian Wei was appointed as a special guard over her apartments.
Cao Cao was the only person whom she saw, and he passed the days in idle dalliance with the lady, quite content to let time flow by. But people told Zhang Xiu what had gone amiss, and he was angry at the shame brought upon the family.
He confided his trouble to Jia Xu who said, “Keep this secret, wait till he appears again to carry on business, and then do so and so.” A plan was arranged quite secretly.
Next day Zhang Xiu went into Cao Cao's tent, saying, “Since the surrendered troops are deserting in great number, it would be well to camp them in the center of your camp to prevent this.” Cao Cao gave the permission, and Zhang Xiu moved and placed his army in four camps.
But Dian Wei, the especial guard of Cao Cao's tent, was a man to be feared, being both brave and powerful. It was hard to know how to attack him. So counsel was taken with Hu Juer, the commander of one camp and a man of enormous strength and activity.
He could carry a burden of six hundred pounds and two hundred miles in a day. Hu Juer proposed a plan.
He said, “The fearsome thing about Dian Wei is his double halberds.
But get him to come to a party and make him quite drunk before you send him back.
I will mingle among his escort and so get into his tent and steal away his weapons.
One need not fear him then.” So the necessary arms were prepared and orders given in the various camps.
This done Zhang Xiu gave a banquet, and the intended victim was invited and plied vigorously with wine so that he was quite intoxicated when he left. And, as arranged, Hu Juer mingled with his escort and made away with his weapons.
That night, when Cao Cao was at supper with Lady Zhou, he heard the voices of men and neighing of horses and sent out to ask what it meant.
They told him it was the night patrol going the rounds, and he was satisfied.
Near the second watch of the night again was heard some noise in the rear of his tent, and one of the fodder carts was reported to be burning.
“One of the soldiers has dropped a spark; there is nothing to be alarmed at,” said Cao Cao.
But very soon the fire spread on all sides and became alarming. Cao Cao called Dian Wei.
But he, usually so alert, was lying down quite intoxicated.
However, the beating of gongs and rolling of drums mingling with his dreams awoke Dian Wei, and he jumped up. His trusty halberds had disappeared.
The enemy was near. He hastily snatched up an infantryman's sword and rushed out.
At the gate he saw a crowd of spearmen just bursting in.
Dian Wei rushed at them slashing all around him, and twenty or more fell beneath his blows. The others drew back.
But the spears stood around him like reeds on the river bank. Being totally without mail, he was soon wounded in several places.
He fought desperately till his sword snapped and was no longer of any use. Throwing it aside he seized a couple of soldiers and with their bodies as weapons felled ten of his opponents. The others dared not approach, but they shot arrows at him.
These fell thick as rain, but he still maintained the gate against the assailants.
However, the mutineers got in by the rear of the camp, and they wounded Dian Wei in the back with spear thrusts. Uttering a loud cry he fell. The blood gushed from the wound in torrents, and he died.
Even after he was dead not a man dared to come in by the main gate.
Cao Cao, relying on Dian Wei to hold the main gate, had fled in haste by the rear gate. Cao Amin accompanied him on foot.
Then Cao Cao was wounded by an arrow in the arm, and three arrows struck his horse.
However, fortunately, the horse was a fine Dawan beast full of spirit and, in spite of its wounds, it bore its master swiftly and well as far as the bank of River Yu.
Here some of the pursuers came up, and Cao Amin was hacked to pieces.
Cao Cao dashed into the river and reached the further side, but there an arrow struck his steed in the eye and it fell.
Cao Cao's eldest son, Cao Ang, dismounted and yielded his horse to his father, who galloped on.
Cao Ang was killed by arrows, but Cao Cao himself got away.
Soon after he met several of his officers who had rallied a few troops.
The soldiers of Qingzhou under Xiahou Dun seized the occasion to plunder the people.
Yu Jin took his army, fell upon them, and slew many. Thus he protected and appeased the people. The plunderers, meeting Cao Cao on the road, knelt down howling and said Yu Jin had mutinied and attacked them. Cao Cao was surprised, and he gave order to Xiahou Dun, Xu Chu, Li Dian, and Yue Jin to attack Yu Jin.
Now when Yu Jin saw his master and a great company approaching, he at once stopped the attack and set his troops to make a camp.
An officer asked him, “The Qingzhou soldiers say you have turned traitor; why do you not explain now that the Prime Minister has arrived? Why first make a camp?” Yu Jin replied, “Our enemies are coming up in our rear and are very close. It is necessary to prepare for defense or we shall not withstand them.
Explanation is a small matter, but defense is very important.” Soon after the camp was finished, Zhang Xiu fell upon them. Yu Jin himself rode out to face them. Zhang Xiu drew back.
The other generals of Yu Jin, seeing he advance thus boldly, also attacked, and Zhang Xiu was overcome.
They pursued him a great distance until his force was almost annihilated.
With the miserable remnant he finally fled to Liu Biao. Cao Cao's army reformed, and the commanders mustered.
Then Yu Jin went to see his master and told him of the conduct of the Qingzhou soldiers and their looting and why he had attacked them.
“Why did you not tell me before you made the camp?” Yu Jin related what had occurred.
Said Cao Cao, “When the first thought of a leader in the time of greatest stress is to maintain order and to strengthen his defenses, giving no thought to slander but shouldering his burdens bravely, and when he thereby turns a defeat into a victory, who, even of the ancient leaders, can excel Yu Jin?” Cao Cao rewarded Yu Jin with a golden armor and the lordship of Yishou.
But Cao Cao reprimanded Xiahou Dun for the lack of discipline among his soldiers. Sacrifices in honor of the dead warrior Dian Wei were instituted. Cao Cao himself led the wailing and paid due honors.
Turning to his officers he said, “I have lost my first born son, but I grieve not so heavily for him as for Dian Wei. I weep for him.” All were sad at the loss of this general.
Then orders were issued to return to the capital. When Imperial Legate Wang Ze, bearing the imperial decree, reached Xuzhou, he was met by Lu Bu, who conducted him into the residence where the decree was read. It conferred Lu Bu the title General Who Pacifies the East, and a special seal accompanied the mandate.
The private mediating letter was also handed over and the messenger detailed the high appreciation in which Lu Bu was held by the Chief Minister of State.
Lu Bu was greatly pleased.
Next came news that a messenger from Yuan Shu had arrived.
When he had been introduced, he said, “My master's project of declaring himself emperor is advancing. He has already built a palace and will speedily choose Empress and concubines and would come to the South of River Huai.
He is looking forward to receiving the fiancee of the Heir Apparent.” “Has the rebel gone so far?” cried Lu Bu in a rage.
He put the messenger to death and Han Yin into the cage. He drafted a memorial of thanks and sent it to the capital, at the same time sending, too, Han Yin, the unfortunate agent who had arranged the marriage alliance.
He also replied to Cao Cao's private meditating letter asking to be confirmed in his protectorship of Xuzhou. The letter was sent by the hand of Chen Deng.
Cao Cao was pleased to hear of the rupture of the marriage arrangement between the houses of Yuans and Lus, and forthwith put Han Yin to death in the market place.
However, Chen Deng secretly told Cao Cao, saying, “Lu Bu is cruel, stupid, and facile.
The longer he remains, the worse.” “I know Lu Bu quite well,” replied Cao Cao. “He is a wolf with a savage heart, and it will be hard to feed him for long.
If it had not been for you and your father, I should not have known all the circumstances and you must help me to get rid of him.” “Anything the Prime Minister wishes to do shall have my assistance,” was the reply.
As a reward Cao Cao obtained an annually grant of two thousand carts of grain for Chen Gui and the governorship of Guangling for Chen Deng, who then took his leave.
As he was saying farewell, Cao Cao took him by the hand, saying, “I shall depend upon you in the eastern affairs.” Chen Deng nodded acquiescence.
Then he returned to Lu Bu, who asked him how the visit was.
Chen Deng told him, “My father received a generous annuity, and I was made Governor of Guangling.” Lu Bu enraged, saying, “You did not ask Xuzhou for me, but you got something for yourself.
Your father advised me to help Cao Cao by breaking off the marriage, and now I get nothing at all of what I asked, while you and your father get everything.
I have been victimized by your father.” He threatened Chen Deng with his sword.
Chen Deng only laughed, saying, “O General, how unwary you are!” “I, unwary?” “When I saw Cao Cao, I said that to keep you going was like feeding a tiger. The tiger must be kept fully fed or he would eat humans.
But Cao Cao laughed and replied, 'No; not that. One must treat the Commander like a falcon.
Not feed it till the foxes and hares are done. Hungry, the bird is of use; full fed it flies away.' I asked who were the quarry.
He replied, 'Yuan Shu of the South of River Huai, Sun Ce of the South Land, Yuan Shao of Jizhou, Liu Biao of Jingzhou, Liu Zhang of Yiazhou, and Zhang Lu of Hanzhong; these are the foxes and hares.'“ Lu Bu threw aside his sword and laughed, saying, “Yes; he understands me.” But just about that time came news of the advance of Yuan Shu on Xuzhou, and that frightened Lu Bu.
When discord rose between Qin and Jin, They were attacked by Yue and Wu, And when a promised bride never came, An army marched against army to enforce the claim.
How all this fell out will be shown in the next chapter. CHAPTER 17.
Yuan Shu Marches Out An Army Of Seven Divisions; Cao Cao And Three Generals Join Forces. The south of River Huai was very fruitful, and Yuan Shu, as governor of such a large territory, was very influential. He was not a little puffed up. The possession of the Imperial Hereditary Seal, pledged by Sun Ce, added to his pride. And he seriously thought of assuming the full style. As a preliminary he assembled all his officers and addressed them thus:
“The Supreme Ancestor, the Founder of Han Dynasty, was only a very minor official, and yet he became ruler of the empire.
The dynasty has endured four centuries, and its measure of fortune has run out. It no longer possesses authority; the cauldron is on the point of boiling over.
My family has held the highest offices of state for four generations and is universally respected.
Wherefore I wish, in response to the will of Heaven and the desire of the people, to assume the Imperial Dignity.
What think ye of the proposal, my officers?” Secretary Yan Xiang rose in opposition at once, saying, “You may not do this.
Prince Wen, the Ancestor of the Zhou, was of distinguished virtue and held many offices; till the last years of Shang Dynasty, he had two thirds of the empire. Still he served and was loyal to the ruling house.
Your house is honorable, but it is not so glorious as that of Zhou.
The Hans may be reduced, but they are not so abominably cruel as those of the Shang Dynasty that they are to be overthrown.
Indeed this should not be done.” Yuan Shu did not hear this with pleasure.
Said he, “We Yuans came from the Chen family, the same ancestry with King Shun.
By the rule of interpreting the signs of fate, the day has come when earth .
Beside there is an oracle saying, 'One who replaces the Hans must wade through deep mire.' My name means 'the high road.' It fits exactly.
Further than this, I possess the Imperial Hereditary Seal and must become lord of all or I turn from Heaven's own way.
Finally, I have made up my mind, so if any one says too much, that person will simply suffer death.” Yuan Shu arrogated himself the insignia of royalty and assigned Second Glory the reign title.
He set up officials with titles only given by an emperor, and rode in a chariot decorated with the dragon and phoenix, and offered sacrifices after the manner of an emperor in the north and south suburbs. Also he appointed the daughter of Feng Fang his Empress and his son Heir Apparent, and he pressed for the early wedding of Lu Bu's daughter with his son so that the palace entourage might be complete.
But when Yuan Shu heard of the fate of his marriage ambassador, Han Yin, who was sent to the capital and was executed, Yuan Shu was very angry and began at once to plan for revenge.
He made Zhang Xun his Grand Commander and gave Zhang Xun the command of more than two hundred thousand soldiers with the instruction to invade Xuzhou. The army consisted of seven divisions under seven commanders: Zhang Xun led the Center Army; Qiao Rui, the First Left Army; Lei Bo, the Second Left Army; Han Xian, the Third Left Army; Chen Ji, First Right Army; Chen Lan, Second Right Army; and Yang Feng, the Third Right Army.
Each commander was instructed to make a certain town his objective.
The Imperial Protector of Yangzhou, Jin Shang, was ordered to superintend the commissariat, but he declined the office. And so Yuan Shu put Jin Shang to death.
Ji Ling was in command of the reserves to help wherever he was required.
Yuan Shu led thirty thousand troops, and he appointed three generals, Li Feng, Liang Gang, and Yue Jiu, to go up and down and coordinate the grand march.
Lu Bu found out from his scouts that his own Xuzhou City was the objective of Zhang Xun; the other towns to be first attacked being Xiaopei, Yidu, Langye, Jieshi, Xiapi, and Junshan. The invading armies were marching twenty miles a day, and plundering the countryside as they advanced.
Lu Bu summoned his advisers to a council to which came Chen Gong, Chen Deng, and Chen Gui.
When all had assembled Chen Gong said, “This misfortune that has come to us is due to the two Chens, who fawned upon the central government in order to obtain rank and appointments. Now remove the evil by putting these two to death and sending their heads to Yuan Shu. Then he will retire and leave us in peace.” Lu Bu acquiesced and had the two arrested.
But the son, Chen Deng, only laughed, saying, “What is this anxiety about?
These seven armies are no more to me than so many heaps of rotting straw.
They are not worth thinking about.” “If you can show us how to overcome them, I will spare your life,” said Lu Bu.
“General, if you will listen to poor me, the region will be perfectly safe.” “Let us hear what you have to say.” “Yuan Shu's troops are numerous but they are only a flock of crows; they are not an army under a leader. There is no mutual confidence.
I can keep them at bay with the ordinary guards of the place and could overcome them by some unsuspected stratagem.
If I should fail, I have another plan by which I can not only protect the region but capture our enemy.” “Let us have it.” Chen Deng said, “Han Xian and Yang Feng, two of the leaders of our enemies, are old servants of the Han Dynasty who fled from fear of Cao Cao and, being homeless, sought refuge with Yuan Shu.
He despises them, and they are dissatisfied with his service.
A little letter from the court will secure their help as our allies, and with Liu Bei to help us on the outside, we can certainly overcome Yuan Shu.” “You shall take the letters yourself,” said Lu Bu.
Chen Deng agreed, and a memorial detailing his intentions was sent to the capital, letters to Yuzhou to Liu Bei, and finally Chen Deng was sent, with a small escort, to wait for Han Xian on the road to Xiapi. When Han Xian's army had halted and pitched camp, Chen Deng went to see Han Xian who said, “What are you here for?
You belong to Lu Bu.” “I am a noble of the court of the great Hans. Why do you call me a Lu Bu's man?
If you, General, hitherto a minister of state, now serve a traitor, you will nullify the grand services you rendered in protecting the Emperor in the flight from Changan.
Beside, the suspicious Yuan Shu will assuredly do you some harm, and you will regret not having taken this opportunity to work against him.” Han Xian sighed, saying, “I would return to my allegiance if there should be any opportunity.” Thereupon Chen Deng gave him Lu Bu's letter asking for cooperation.
Han Xian read it and said, “Yes; I know.
You may return to your master and say General Yang Feng and I will turn our weapons and smite Yuan Shu.
Look out for a signal flare, and let your master come to our aid.” As soon as Chen Deng had got back and reported his success, Lu Bu divided his troops into five divisions, each of ten thousand, and sent them to five threatened towns to meet his enemies.
Gao Shun led one army to Xiaopei against Qiao Rui; Chen Gong to Yidu against Chen Ji; Zhang Liao and Zang Ba to Langye against Lei Bo; Song Xian and Wei Xu to Jieshi against Chen Lan.
Lu Bu himself led against the main body under Zhang Xun, leaving a small guard in Xuzhou City.
Lu Bu camped ten miles from the walls.
When the enemy came up, Zhang Xun thought Lu Bu too strong to attack with the force he had, so he retired seven miles to await reinforcements.
That night, in the second watch, Han Xian and Yang Feng arrived, and soon the flare was lighted as arranged. Lu Bu's troops were admitted to the camp and caused great confusion.
Then Lu Bu gave a full attack, and Zhang Xun was routed and fled.
Lu Bu pursued till daylight, when he fell in with one of the other bodies led by Ji Ling.
Both sides faced each other; but at the very beginning of the engagement Yang Feng and Han Xian also attacked, and Ji Ling was forced to fly.
Lu Bu went in pursuit but soon another force came out from the rear of some hills. These looked very imposing. As the ranks opened Lu Bu saw a leader's guard with flags bearing dragons and phoenixes and representations of the sun and moon, the stars in the four groups of the Great Bear Constellation, the five directions of the Earth, golden gourds, silver axes, yellow halberds, white yaks' tails, all imperial emblems. And beneath a yellow silken parasol sat Yuan Shu on horseback, clad in silver mail with a sword handle showing at each wrist.
Standing out in front of the array, Yuan Shu railed at his opponent calling him traitor and bastard.
Lu Bu said nothing but rode forward ready for battle, and Li Feng, one of Yuan Shu's leaders, advanced to take the challenge.
They met, but at the third bout, Li Feng was wounded in the hand, whereupon his spear fell to the ground, and he fled.
Lu Bu waved on the advance and his men prevailed.
The other side fled, leaving much spoil, clothing, mail, and horses.
Yuan Shu's defeated troops had not gone far when a strong army, led by Guan Yu, appeared barring his way. “Traitor!
Why have they not slain you?” cried Guan Yu.
Whereat Yuan Shu fled in great trepidation, and his army melted into fugitives in all directions. The new army fell upon them with great slaughter.
Yuan Shu and the remnant of his army retreated into the below regions of River Huai.
Victory being now secure, Lu Bu, in company with Guan Yu, Yang Feng, and Han Xian returned to Xuzhou, where there were banquets and feasting and rewards for the soldiers and generals of five divisions.
These over, Guan Yu took his leave and returned to Yuzhou, while Han Xian was appointed Governor of Yidu, and Yang Feng Governor of Langye.
There had been a question of keeping these two in Xuzhou City, but Chen Gui opposed it, saying, “Let them hold those places in Huashang Mountains, which will be all yours within a year.” So Han Xian and Yang Feng were sent to these two cities in the meantime to await orders.
“Why not retain them here?” asked Chen Deng secretly of his father.
“They would be a basis for our conspiracy against Lu Bu.” “But if they helped him, on the other hand, we should lengthen the tiger's claws and teeth,” said Chen Gui.
So Chen Deng could only approve of his father's precautions.
Yuan Shu returned home burning to avenge his defeat, so he sent to the South Land to ask a loan of troops from Sun Ce.
But Sun Ce said, “On the strength of holding the State Seal, he secretly calls himself emperor and rebels against the Hans.
I would rather punish such a renegade than help him.” So Sun Ce refused.
The letter refusing help added to Yuan Shu's anger.
“What next from this callow youth?” cried Yuan Shu.
“I will smite him before I deal with the others.” But his adviser, Yang Dajiang, dissuaded him from this course.
Having refused help to his powerful rival, Sun Ce thought it wise to take measures for his own safety. So he stationed an army at Jiangkou.
Soon after came a messenger from Cao Cao bearing Sun Ce's appointment as Governor of Kuaiji with orders to raise an army and reduce Yuan Shu. Sun Ce was inclined to carry out these orders, but he called a council at which Zhang Zhao opposed this course.
Said he, “Although recently defeated, Yuan Shu has large army and ample supplies.
He is not to be attacked lightly. You would better write to Cao Cao persuading him to attack the South of River Huai and we will be auxiliaries. Between the two armies, Yuan Shu must certainly be defeated.
If by the remotest chance we lose, we have Cao Cao to come to our rescue.” This plan was adopted and a messenger was sent to lay it before Cao Cao.
In the meantime, after the defeat at River Yu, Cao Cao had reached Xuchang where his first thought was to institute sacrifices to his beloved lost leader, Dian Wei.
He conferred rank upon his son Dian Man and took him into his own palace to be cared for.
Presently arrived Sun Ce's messenger with letters, and next came a report that Yuan Shu, being short of food, had made a raid on Chenliu.
Cao Cao thought the moment opportune, so he issued orders for the south expedition, leaving Cao Ren to hold the capital.
The army marched, horse and foot, one hundred seventy thousand, with commissariat wagons of food to the number of over a thousand.
Messages were sent to summon Sun Ce, Liu Bei, and Lu Bu.
Liu Bei was the first to welcome the grand army at his Yuzhou borders, and he was called in to the Prime Minister's tent.
After the usual salutations, two human heads were produced by Liu Bei.
“Whose are these?” asked Cao Cao in surprise.
“The heads of Han Xian and Yang Feng.” “Why did this happen?” “They were sent to control Yidu and Langye, but they allowed their soldiers to plunder the people.
Bitter complaints arose, so I invited them to a banquet and my brothers dispatched them when I gave the signal by dropping a cup. Their armies gave in at once.
Now I have to apologize for my fault.” “You have removed an evil, which is a grand service: why talk of a fault?” And Cao Cao praised Liu Bei's action.
When the joint army reached Lu Bu's Xuzhou borders, he came to meet it.
Cao Cao spoke graciously to him and conferred upon him the title of General of the Left Army, promising him an official seal as soon as he returned to the capital.
Lu Bu was very pleased.
Then the three armies were made into one force, Cao Cao being in the center, Lu Bu to the left wing, and Liu Bei to the right wing.
Xiahou Dun and Yu Jin were Leaders of the Van. On Yuan Shu's side, General Qiao Rui with fifty thousand troops was appointed Van Leader.
The armies met on the confines of the city of Shouchun.
Qiao Rui and Xiahou Dun rode out and opened battle.
But Qiao Rui fell in the third bout, and his troops fled into the city.
Then came news that Sun Ce's fleet was near and would attack on the west. The other three land corps took each one face—Cao Cao on the north, Lu Bu on the east, and Liu Bei on the south. The city of Shouchun was in a parlous state. At this juncture Yuan Shu summoned his officers.
Yang Dajiang explained the case, “Shouchun has suffered from drought for several years and the people are on the verge of famine.
Sending an army would add to the distress and anger the people, and victory would be uncertain.
I advise not to send any more soldiers there, but to hold on till the besiegers are conquered by lack of supplies.
Meanwhile, Your Highness, with regiment of guards, will move over to the other side of River Huai, which is quite ready, and we shall also escape the enemy's ferocity.” So due arrangements was made.
One hundred thousand troops under Li Feng, Yue Jiu, Liang Gang, and Chen Ji were appointed to guard Shouchun. Then a general move was made to the other side of the River Huai.
Not only the remained army went over, but all the accumulated wealth of the Yuan family, gold and silver, jewels and precious stones, were moved also.
Cao Cao's army of one hundred seventy thousand needed daily no inconsiderable quantity of food; and as the country around had been faminestricken for several years, nothing could be got there. So he tried to hasten the military operations and capture the city.
On the other hand, the defenders knew the value of delay and simply held on.
After a month's vigorous siege, the fall of Shouchun seemed as far off as it was at first, and supplies were very short. Letters were sent to Sun Ce who sent a hundred thousand carts of grain.
When the usual distribution became impossible, the Chief of the Commissariat, Ren Jun, and the Controller of the Granaries, Wang Hou, presented a statement asking what was to be done.
“Serve out with a smaller measure,” said Cao Cao.
“That will save us for a time.” “But if the soldiers murmur, what then?” “I shall have another device.” As ordered the controller issued grain in a short measure.
Cao Cao sent secretly to find out how the army took this; and when he found that complaints were general and the soldiers were saying that the Prime Minister was fooling them, he sent a secret summons to the controller.
When Wang Hou came, Cao Cao said, “I want to ask you to lend me something to pacify the soldiers with.
You must not refuse.” “What does the Prime Minister wish?” “I want the loan of your head to expose to the soldiery.” “But I have done nothing wrong!” exclaimed the unhappy man.
“I know that, but if I do not put you to death there will be a mutiny.
After you are gone, your wife and children shall be my care. So you need not grieve on their account.” Wang Hou was about to remonstrate further, but Cao Cao gave a signal.
The executioners hustled Wang Hou out, and he was beheaded. His head was exposed on a tall pole, and a notice said, “In accordance with military law, Wang Hou had been put to death for peculation and the use of a short measure in issuing grain.” This appeased the discontent.
Next followed a general order threatening death to all commanders if the city was not taken within three days.
Cao Cao in person went up to the very walls to superintend the work of filling up the moat. The defenders kept up constant showers of stones and arrows.
Two inferior officers, who left their stations in fear, were slain by Cao Cao himself.
Thereafter he went on foot to work with his soldiers and to see that work went on continuously and no one dared be a laggard.
Thus encouraged, the army became invincible, and no defense could withstand their onslaught. In a very short time the walls were scaled, the gates battered in, and the besiegers were in possession.
The officers of the garrison—Li Feng, Yue Jiu, Liang Gang, and Chen Ji—were captured alive and were executed in the market place.
All the paraphernalia of imperial state were burned, and the whole city wrecked.
When the question of crossing the river in pursuit of Yuan Shu came up, Xun Yu opposed it, saying, “The country has suffered from short crops for years, and we should be unable to get grain. An advance would weary the army, harm the people, and possibly end in disaster.
I advise a return to the capital to wait there till the spring wheat shall have been harvested and we have plenty of food.” Cao Cao hesitated; and before he had made up his mind, there came an urgent message: “Zhang Xiu, with the support of Liu Biao, was ravaging the country all round.
There were rebellions in Nanyang and Jiangling, and Cao Hong could not cope with it.
Cao Hong had been worsted already in several engagements and was in sore straits.” Cao Cao at once wrote to Sun Ce to command the Great River so as to prevent any move on the part of Liu Biao, while he prepared his army to go to deal with Zhang Xiu.
Before marching Cao Cao directed Liu Bei to station at Xiaopei, as he and Lu Bu being as brothers, might help each other.
When Lu Bu had left for Xuzhou, Cao Cao said secretly to Liu Bei, “I am leaving you at Xiaopei to dig a 'pitfall for the tiger.' You will only take advice from Chen Deng and Chen Gui, and there can be no mishap.
You will find so and-so your ally when needed.” So Cao Cao marched to Xuchang where he heard that Duan Wei had slain Li Jue and Wu Xi killed Guo Si, and they presented the heads of these two.
Beside the whole clan of Li Jue, more than two hundred, had been arrested and brought to the capital.
They were all put to death at various gates and their heads exposed as warning. The people cheered the end of those two rebels.
In the Emperor's palace a large number of officials were assembled at a peace banquet.
The Emperor rewarded the two successful leaders, Duan Wei with the title of General Who Destroys Rebellion and Wu Xi General Who Wrecks Villainy, and sent to guard Changan.
They came to audience to express their gratitude and marched away.
Then Cao Cao sent in a memorial that Zhang Xiu was in rebellion, and an army must be sent against him.
The Emperor in person arranged the chariot and escorted Cao Cao out of the city when he went to take command of the expedition.
It was the summer, the fourth month of the third year of Rebuilt Tranquillity . Xun Yu was in chief military command in Xuchang. The army marched away.
In the course of the march they passed through a wheat region, and the grain was ready for harvesting but the peasants had fled for fear, and the corn was uncut. Cao Cao sent proclamations to all villages and towns:
“I am sent on the expedition by command of the Emperor to capture a rebel and save the people.
I cannot avoid moving in the harvest season; but if any one trample down the corn, he shall be put to death.
Military law is strict without exception, and the people need fear no damage.” The people were very pleased and lined the road, wishing success to the expedition.
When the soldiers passed wheat fields, they dismounted and pushed aside the stalks so that none were trampled down.
One day, when Cao Cao was riding through the fields, a dove suddenly got up, startling the horse so that it swerved into the standing grain, and a large patch was trampled down.
Cao Cao at once called the Provost Marshal and bade him decree the sentence for the crime of trampling down corn.
“How can I deal with your crime?” asked the Provost Marshal. “I made the rule and I have broken it.
Can I otherwise satisfy public opinion?” Cao Cao laid hold of the sword by his side and made to take his own life.
All hastened to prevent him, and Guo Jia said, “In ancient days, the days of the Spring and Autumn history, the laws were not applied to the persons of the most important.
You are the supreme leader of a mighty army and must not wound yourself.” Cao Cao pondered for a long time.
At last he said, “Since there exists the reason just quoted, I may perhaps escape the death penalty.” Then with his sword he cut off his hair and threw it on the ground, saying, “I cut off the hair as touching the head.” Then he sent messengers to exhibit the hair throughout the whole army, saying, “The Prime Minister, having trodden down some corn, ought to have lost his head by the terms of the order; now here is his hair cut off as an attack on the head.” This deed was a stimulus to discipline all through the army so that not a person dared be disobedient. A poet wrote: A myriad soldiers march along and all are brave and bold, And their myriad inclinations by one leader are controlled.
That crafty leader shore his locks when forfeit was his head, O full of guile were thou, Cao Cao, as every one has said.
On the first news of the approach of Cao Cao with an army, Zhang Xiu wrote to Liu Biao for help.
Then Zhang Xiu led out his troops, with his two generals, Lei Xu and Zhang Xian. When the array was complete Zhang Xiu took his station in front and pointing at Cao Cao railed at him, saying, “O false and pretended supporter of benevolence and justice! O shameless one!
You are just a beast of the forest, and absolutely devoid of humanity.” This annoyed Cao Cao who sent out Xu Chu against the insulter.
Zhang Xian came to meet him and fell in the third bout.
Thence Zhang Xiu's troops fled and were pursued to the very walls of Nanyang, only managing to get within just before the pursuit came up.
The city was then closely besieged. Seeing the moat was so wide and deep that approach to the wall would be difficult, Cao Cao's commanders began to fill up the ditch with earth.
Then with sand bags, brushwood, and bundles of grass they built a great mound near the wall and on this erected steps so that they could look over into the city.
Cao Cao rode round the city closely inspecting the defenses.
Three days later he issued an order to make a mound of earth and brushwood at the northwest corner, as he would mount the walls at that point.
He was observed from within the city by Jia Xu, who went to Zhang Xiu and said, “I know what Cao Cao intends, and I can defeat him by a countermove.” Even amongst the very foremost There is one who leads the way; Some one sees through your devices, Be as crafty as ye may.
What the counter-move was will be told in the next chapter. CHAPTER 18. Giving Counsels, Jia Xu Directs A Great Victory; Braving Battlefield, Xiahou Dun Loses An Eye. Jia Xu, as he had guessed the enemy's intention, had also devised a countermove. So he went to his chief and said, “I saw Cao Cao very carefully reconnoitering round about the city.
He certainly noticed that the southeast corner of the wall had been lately restored with mud bricks of a different kind, and that the fencing barrier is badly out of repair. He will try to effect an entrance there. Wherefore he is making a feint attack at the opposite point. He is piling up straw and making ostentatious preparations whereby to cajole us into withdrawing from the real point of attack to defend the northwest. His troops will scale the walls in the darkness and try to enter at the southeast.” “Supposing your surmise correct, what do you advise?” asked Zhang Xiu.
“The countermove is plain.
You issue an order for our best and bravest soldiers to fill their bellies, to take only the lightest outfit and conceal themselves in the houses near the southeast corner.
Then disguise the townspeople as soldiers and send them to pretend to defend the northwest.
Tonight we will let the enemy climb up the walls and enter the city and, once they are fairly within, give the signal and the concealed soldiers will rush out upon them.
We may even capture Cao Cao himself.” The stratagem was decided upon.
Soon the scouts told Cao Cao: “The defenders of the city have moved to the northwest where noisy preparations for defense are going on. The opposite corner is left undefended.” “They have fallen into my trap!” said Cao Cao gleefully.
He ordered his troops to prepare shovels and hooks and all the gear needed for scaling walls, and all day they kept up the attack on the northwest angle.
But at the second watch they dispatched the veterans to the opposite corner, where they climbed the wall, broke up the fencing barrier, and got into the city apparently without disturbing any of the guards. There was no sign of life anywhere as they entered.
But just as they were leaving the wall, suddenly a bomb exploded and they found themselves in an ambush.
They turned to retire, but Zhang Xiu immediately fell on the rear and began a slaughter.
Cao Cao's troops were totally defeated and fled out of the gate into the country.
Zhang Xiu kept up the pursuit till daybreak, when he retired into the city again.
Cao Cao then rallied his army and mustered his soldiers. He had lost fifty thousand and much baggage, while two of his generals, Lu Qian and Yu Jin were wounded.
Cao Cao being thus worsted, Jia Xu advised Zhang Xiu to write off to Liu Biao to cut off Cao Cao's retreat so that he might be utterly destroyed.
Liu Biao was preparing an army for this purpose when a scout came to say that Sun Ce had encamped in the river at Hukou.
Kuai Liang said, “This move of Sun Ce in the river is part of Cao Cao's strategy, and there will be never-ending regret if Cao Cao is allowed to escape.
An immediate expedition is necessary.” Wherefore Liu Biao moved out with his army to Anzhong to block Cao Cao, leaving Huang Zu to hold Jingzhou's points of vantage.
Zhang Xiu, having been informed of the movement of Liu Biao, went with Jia Xu to smite Cao Cao on the rear.
In the meantime Cao Cao's army, marching very leisurely, had arrived at Xiangyang.
Walking one day beside River Yu, he suddenly uttered a great cry, and when his officers asked the reason thereof he replied, “I remembered that here, only a year ago, I lost my great general: Dian Wei.
Is that not a reason to grieve?” Thereupon Cao Cao gave orders to halt while he should make a great sacrifice and mourn for his lost leader.
At the ceremony he himself burned incense and wailed and prostrated himself. The army was much affected by his devotion.
After the sacrifices to the lost hero, he sacrificed to the names of his nephew Cao Amin and his eldest son Cao Ang, both of whom had died at the same time.
He also sacrificed to his lost soldiers and even to his Dawan steed which had been killed by an arrow.
Next day Xun Yu wrote to tell Cao Cao that Liu Biao had gone to help Zhang Xiu and was camped at Anzhong, thereby cutting his road of retreat.
Cao Cao replied to the letter, saying, “I have been marching only a short distance each day and of course knew of the pursuit.
But my plans are laid and, as I am near Anzhong, my enemy will be broken.
You need not have any fears.” Then Cao Cao hastened his march till he came near where Liu Biao had taken position. Zhang Xiu still shortened the distance.
Cao Cao ordered his men during the night to open a secret way through a pass, where he laid an ambush. With the first light of dawn Liu Biao and Zhang Xiu met. As Cao Cao's force looked small, they thought he had retired so they boldly advanced into the pass to smite him. Then the ambush was opened and both the attackers' forces were cut up.
The fighting ended; Cao Cao's soldiers went outside the pass and encamped. The two leaders on the other side restored order among their beaten troops and then held a conference.
“How could we have foreseen such a wicked ruse?” said Liu Biao.
“Let us try again,” said Zhang Xiu.
Wherefore they joined forces at Anzhong.
But Xun Yu discovered through his spies that Yuan Shao was preparing an attack on Capital Xuchang, so he at once wrote to Cao Cao who, much disturbed by this news, set out homeward right away.
When Zhang Xiu heard this through his scouts, he wished to follow the retreating army.
Jia Xu opposed it and said, “It will lead to a defeat.” However, Liu Biao said, “It is wrong to lose such a chance.” And so finally pursuit was decided upon.
They had not marched more than four miles before they came upon Cao Cao's rearguard, who fought with great vigor and bravery so that the pursuers were beaten off and went home discomfited.
Zhang Xiu said to Jia Xu, “This defeat comes from my not following your advice.” “Now set your army in order and pursue,” said Jia Xu.
“But we have just suffered defeat!” cried both leaders. “Do you now counsel pursuit?” “Yes, and the result will be a great victory if you go now.
I will venture my head on that,” said Jia Xu.
Zhang Xiu had confidence, but Liu Biao was afraid and would not accompany him.
So one army only started in pursuit. However, this was enough.
Cao Cao's rear-guard was thoroughly routed and abandoned their wagons and their baggage in their hasty flight.
Zhang Xiu pursued, but suddenly a troop came out from the shelter of some hills and checked him.
Fearful to try further, he hastened back to Anzhong.
The other general, Liu Biao, asked the adviser to explain his apparent inconsistency, saying, “When our veteran and brave soldiers were going to pursue those who retreated, you said our men would lose the day; and when defeated men pursued the victors, you foretold victory.
You were right in both cases, but we wish you would enlighten us.” “It is easy to explain.
You, Generals, although skilled leaders, are not a match for our enemy.
Though Cao Cao had lost a battle, he had able generals to keep the rear and guard against pursuit.
Our soldiers are good, but not a match for them. That is how I knew.
For as much as Cao Cao's hurried retreat was due to trouble in the capital, and he had beaten off our attack, I knew he would retire at his utmost speed and not take his usual precautions.
I ventured to take advantage of his laxity.” Liu Biao and Zhang Xiu could not but affirm his complete understanding of the conditions.
On the advice of Jia Xu then Liu Biao returned to Jingzhou, while Zhang Xiu took up his position at Xiangyang so that each strengthened the other as the lips protect the teeth from cold.
When Cao Cao, during his retreat, heard that his army was being pursued, he hastily turned back to support the rearguard. Then he saw the pursuing army draw off.
The soldiers of the beaten rearguard said, “Had it not been for the troops that came out of the hills, we should all have been lost.” “What troops?” asked Cao Cao in surprise. The leader of the troops then advanced, slung his spear and, dismounting, made a low obeisance.
He was Li Tong, Imperial Commander, from Jiangxia.
Cao Cao asked him why he had come.
Li Tong replied, “I was in command at Runan when I heard of the struggle going on, so I came to lend you any help I could.” To show his gratitude, Cao Cao conferred upon Li Tong the title Lord Who Renders High Services, and confirmed him in his command as the defense of Runan against Liu Biao and Zhang Xiu.
Then Li Tong expressed his thanks and took his leave.
On his return to the capital, Cao Cao presented a memorial on the good services rendered by Sun Ce, and the Emperor made him Lord of Wu  with the title General Who Destroys Rebels. The messenger bearing the decree bore also the order to repress Liu Biao.
Cao Cao went to his palace and there received the ceremonial calls of congratulation. These finished, Xun Yu asked, saying, “You, Sir, marched very leisurely to Anzhong; how came it that you felt certain of victory?” Cao Cao replied, “My soldiers, who retire and find their retreat cut off, fight vigorously and desperately.
I retired slowly to entice the enemy into following whereby I could do as I wished with them. Basing my movements on these considerations I felt secure.” Xun Yu bowed his head in admiration.
When Guo Jia entered, Cao Cao said, “Why so late, Sir?” The visitor drew a letter from his sleeve, saying to his master, “Yuan Shao sends this expressing he desires to send an army to attack Gongsun Zan and wishes you to lend provisions and troops.” “I heard Yuan Shao was going to attack Xuchang; I suppose my return has made him change his intention,” said Cao Cao.
Then he opened the letter and read it. It was couched in very arrogant terms. “Yuan Shao is so exceedingly rude that I will attack him,” said Cao Cao. “Only I think I am not quite strong enough.
What should be done?” Guo Jia said, “My lord, you know well who lost, and why, in the conflict between Liu Bang, the Supreme Ancestor, and Xiang Yu, his rival; the former won only by superior wisdom.
Xiang Yu was the stronger, but in the end he was overcome.
Your rival has ten weak points whereas you have ten strong ones, and, though his army is large, it is not terrible.” Then Guo Jia continued, “Yuan Shao is overmuch devoted to ceremony and deportment; while you are sympathetic and natural; this is an excellence in conduct.
He is antagonistic and drives; you are conciliatory and lead; so you have the advantage of popular approval.
For many years the government has been lax, and he makes it more so; you strive vigorously after efficiency; this is the excellence of able administration.
He is outwardly liberal but grudging at heart, and too given to nepotism; you appear exacting, but you understand and use people after their ability; this is the advantage of correct appreciation.
He is a visionary but lacking in decision; you are a man of prompt decision and direct action; this is an advantage in policy.
He loves to gather about him people of renown; you treat people as you find them regardless of their reputation; this is where you excel in moral virtue.
He is compassionate to those at hand, but careless about those out of sight; your care is all-embracing; this is where you excel in humanity.
He lends a ready ear to calumny and is misled; you may be flooded with evil counsel, but you preserve independence; this is where you excel in perspicacity.
His sense of right and wrong is confused; your appreciation is accurate and clear; this is where you excel in administrative capacity.
He loves the make-believe force, but is ignorant of military essentials; you would overcome with far inferior numbers as you possess military genius; this is where you excel in war.
With your ten superiorities, you will have no difficulty in overcoming Yuan Shao.” “How can I be worth as much as you say?” said Cao Cao, smiling.
“What Guo Jia has said about the ten points in your favor agrees exactly with what I think,” said Xun Yu.
“Yuan Shao's army is not formidable in spite of its size.” “The real and dangerous enemy is Lu Bu,” said Guo Jia.
“When Yuan Shao has gone north to destroy Gongsun Zan, we ought to sweep away Lu Bu and so clear away our danger from that side; for if this is not done, our attack on Yuan Shao will be the signal for an attempt on the capital.
That would be most serious.” Cao Cao saw things in the same light as his advisers and began to discuss plans for an attack on Lu Bu.
Xun Yu was of opinion that they should first secure the fidelity and aid of Liu Bei.
So letters were written, and they waited his assurance before moving a soldier. Then, in order to reassure Yuan Shao, his emissary was treated with great kindness, and a memorial presented to the Emperor asking extra honors for him. Yuan Shao was made Imperial Protector of the four northern regions—Jizhou, Qingzhou, Youzhou, and Bingzhou.
With all this a private letter was written by Cao Cao urging upon him to attack Gongsun Zan and promising assistance. So Yuan Shao's army started. In the meantime the two Chen Deng and Chen Gui were playing their game.
At every feast and gathering in Xuzhou, they uttered the most fulsome praises of Lu Bu.
Chen Gong was greatly displeased and took an opportunity to talk about them to his master. “They flatter you to your face, but what is in their hearts? You ought to be most carefully on your guard.” “Hold your tongue!” was the angry reply. “You are simply slandering them without the slightest excuse.
You want to harm good people.” “No ears for loyal words;” said Chen Gong, as he went away sad at heart, “and we shall suffer.” He thought seriously of abandoning Lu Bu, but that would be too painful a wrench.
Beside he feared people would laugh at him.
So the days passed sorrowfully for him.
One day, with a few horsemen, he rode out to the country near Xiaopei to hunt. On the high road he saw a messenger galloping along in hot haste and began to wonder what it might mean. He left the hunt, rode across country, and intercepted the rider. “Where are you from? Who sent you?” asked Chen Gong.
The messenger made no reply for he knew to what party his captors belonged.
But they searched him and found a letter, the secret reply to Cao Cao's letter from Liu Bei.
The messenger and the letter were both taken straight to Lu Bu. He questioned the man, who said, “The Prime Minister sent me to bear a letter to Imperial Protector Liu Bei.
I was now taking back the reply.
I know nothing more, and I am ignorant of the contents of the letters.” So Lu Bu tore it open and read:
“I have received your commands concerning the destruction of Lu Bu, and dare I for a moment venture to disregard them?
But my force is weak and I must act with extreme circumspection. If you move your main body, then I will hasten forward, and in the meantime my army shall be got ready and weapons prepared.
I await your command.” Lu Bu was really alarmed.
“The wretches!” cried he, “To dare to act thus!” The unhappy messenger was put to death and countermoves planned.
Chen Gong and Zang Ba went to enlist the help of the Taishan Mountains bandits—Sun Guan, Wu Dun, Yin Li, and Chang Xi—so that they would take Yanzhou in the east of Huashang Mountains.
Gao Shun and Zhang Liao went to attack Liu Bei in Xiaopei.
Song Xian and Wei Xu went west to attack Runan and Yingchuan.
And Lu Bu took command of a large body of troops ready to afford help wherever needed.
The departure of the army under Gao Shun against Xiaopei was reported to Liu Bei who assembled his officers at a council.
Sun Qian advised sending a message to the capital to inform Cao Cao of their danger.
In response to the chief's call, Jian Yong, a fellow townsman of Liu Bei, offered to take the message. Up to that moment Jian Yong had served as a secretary.
So a letter was written, and Jian Yong set out at once on his journey.
Then preparations were made for defense: Liu Bei commanding at the south gate; Sun Qian at the north gate; Guan Yu at the west gate; and Zhang Fei at the east gate. Mi Zhu and his brother Mi Fang commanded the family guard in the center.
The two Mis were put in command of the house guard because they were Liu Bei's brothers-in-law; he had taken a sister of Mi Zhu as a second wife. Hence they were suitable men to guard the family. In due course Gao Shun came to the south gate.
Liu Bei ascended the tower and said, “I have no quarrel with your master, why do you come here with an army?” “You have plotted with Cao Cao to injure my master as we know now; why should I not bind you?” So saying Gao Shun gave the signal to attack.
But Liu Bei did not go out to repulse Gao Shun; he only kept the gate fast closed.
Soon after, Zhang Liao led an attack on the west gate, then kept by Guan Yu, who addressed Zhang Liao from the wall. “You are too good a man to waste yourself on rebels,” said Guan Yu.
Zhang Liao hung his head and made no reply.
Guan Yu knew that Zhang Liao had a sound heart and high principles and said no more, as he was unwilling to wound Zhang Liao. Nor did he go out to attack.
Zhang Liao then drew off and proceeded to the east gate, and Zhang Fei went out to give battle. Soon it was told Guan Yu, who came over quickly.
He saw Zhang Fei going out, but Zhang Liao was already withdrawing. Zhang Fei wished to pursue, but his brother held him back.
“He is afraid and so has gone away; it would be best to pursue,” said Zhang Fei. “No,” said Guan Yu.
“As a warrior he is not inferior to either of us, but I have spoken a few straight words, and he has sunk deep.
He is repentant and that is why he will not meet us.” So Zhang Fei understood, and the gates were shut and orders given for careful defense.
When Jian Yong, Liu Bei's messenger, reached the capital, he saw Cao Cao and told him what had happened. The advisers were called to discuss a plan.
Cao Cao said, “I wish to attack Lu Bu. I fear not Yuan Shao, but Liu Biao and Zhang Xiu may attack me in the rear.” Xun You, the nephew of Xun Yu, replied, “Both these latter have been too recently defeated to do anything so rash.
But Lu Bu is a bold fighting man, and if he joined forces with Yuan Shu and they set themselves to conquer River Huai and River Si, the problem would he difficult.” Then spoke Guo Jia, “Let us take advantage of the moment before they have fully made up their mind.
Smite before they are fully prepared.” And Cao Cao did so. An army of fifty thousand were sent in advance with four commanders—Xiahou Dun, Xiahou Yuan, Lu Qian, and Li Dian. Cao Cao commanded the center army, which marched by divisions, and Jian Yong brought up the rear.
Soon the scouts informed Gao Shun.
He sent flying messengers to Lu Bu, who detached two hundred horse with Hou Cheng, Cao Xing, and He Meng to assist him. Gao Shun posted this reinforcement and his army about ten miles from Xiaopei to meet Cao Cao's army. Lu Bu and the main army also followed close. When Liu Bei saw the enemy retiring from the city, he knew Cao Cao's army was close at hand. So, making arrangements for guarding the city within, he and his two brothers marched their troops out of the city and made a camp, that they might be ready to assist.
Now the division of Cao Cao's army under Xiahou Dun, having marched out in advance, first came into touch with Gao Shun. Xiahou Dun at once rode out with spear set and offered a challenge. It was accepted and the two leaders fought half a hundred bouts. Then Gao Shun began to weaken and had to turn back.
He rode round to the rear of his array.
Xiahou Dun was not the man to quail, so he followed right into the enemy's country.
Then Cao Xing, one of Lu Bu's generals, secretly strung his bow, fitted an arrow and, when Xiahou Dun had come quite near, shot at him. The arrow hit Xiahou Dun full in the left eye.
He shrieked, and putting up his head, pulled out the arrow and with it the eye. “Essence of my father, blood of my mother, I cannot throw this away!” cried Xiahou Dun, and he put the eye into his mouth and swallowed it.
Then resuming his firm grip of his spear, Xiahou Dun went after this new enemy. There was no escape for Cao Xing.
He was overtaken and fell with a fatal spear wound full in the face.
Both sides were stricken dumb with amazement.
Having thus slain the man who had wounded him, Xiahou Dun rode back toward his own side.
Gao Shun went in pursuit and, waving on his army, attacked so vigorously that he won the day.
Xiahou Yuan defended for his elder brother as they fled.
Lu Qian and Li Dian led various divisions back to Jibei and made a camp.
Gao Shun, having scored this victory, returned to attack Liu Bei; and as Lu Bu opportunely arrived with Zhang Liao, these three arranged their forces so that each attacked one of the brothers. Dauntless was Xiahou Dun, that warrior bold, His courage had been proved of old; But smitten sore one hapless day, He might not in the battle stay. The fate of Liu Bei will be told in the next chapter.
CHAPTER 19.
Cao Cao Fights At Xiapi; Lu Bu Perishes At The White Gate Tower. As was stated before, Gao Shun and Zhang Liao together went to smite Guan Yu, while Lu Bu attacked Zhang Fei. Both brothers went out to give battle, while Liu Bei force was held in reserve.
But then Lu Bu attacked both Guan Yu and Zhang Fei from the rear, and the brothers were forced to flee.
Liu Bei with a few score of horsemen rushed back to Xiaopei.
As he approached the gate with Lu Bu pressing him close, he shouted to the soldiers on the wall to lower the drawbridge.
Lu Bu was so close behind that the archers on the wall feared to shoot lest they should wound their lord, and so Lu Bu got into the gate. The gate guards could not force him back so they scattered in all directions.
Lu Bu led his force into the city.
Liu Bei saw the position was too desperate for him to reach his residence, and he must abandon all his family. So he hastened through the city and left by the west gate out at which he and his scanty following fled for very life. When Lu Bu reached the residence, he was met by Mi Zhu who said, “The hero does not destroy a person's family.
Your rival for the empire is Cao Cao, and my master, always mindful of the good turn you did him at the Archery Feast, would not be ungrateful.
But he could not help going to Cao Cao, and I think you will pity him.” Lu Bu replied, “We two are old friends; how could I bear to harm his wives and children?” Whereupon he sent the family to Xuzhou with Mi Zhu to take care of them.
Next Lu Bu led his army into Huashang Mountains to Yanzhou, leaving Gao Shun and Zhang Liao to guard Xiaopei.
During these troubles Sun Qian had also fled out of the city; Guan Yu and Zhang Fei, each with a handful of soldiers, had got away to the hills.
As Liu Bei with his few horsemen was making the best of their way from the scene of his defeat, he heard some one coming up behind him. When he got closer the person proved to be Sun Qian.
I know not the fate of my brothers, whether they be alive or dead, and my wife and children are lost to me! What can I do?” said Liu Bei.
Sun Qian replied, “I see nothing better than getting away to Cao Cao, whence we may be able to plan our future moves.” Liu Bei had no better plan to propose, and the two men directed their way to Xuchang, choosing by-roads rather than highways.
When their small supplies ran out, they entered a village to beg.
But when the people of any place heard that Liu Bei of Yuzhou was the man who needed help, they vied with each other in offering all that was required.
One day they sought shelter at a house whence a youth came out and made a low obeisance. They asked his name and he gave it as Liu An, of a well known family of hunters.
Hearing who the visitor was, the hunter wished to lay before him a dish of game, but though he sought for a long time, nothing could be found for the table. So Liu An came home, killed his wife and prepared a portion for his guest.
While eating Liu Bei asked, “What flesh is it?” Liu An told him:
“Wolf.” Liu Bei knew no better and ate his fill.
Next day at daylight, just as Liu Bei was leaving, he went to the stables in the rear to get his horse and passing through the kitchen; he saw the dead body of a woman lying on the table. The flesh of one arm had been cut away.
Quite startled he asked what this meant, and then he knew what he had eaten the night before.
He was deeply sorry at this proof of his host's regard and the tears rained down as he mounted his steed at the gate.
“I wish I could go with you,” said Liu An, “but as my mother still lives I cannot go so far from home.” Liu Bei thanked him and went his way.
The party took the road by Liangcheng, and as they were going out they saw not far off a thick cloud of dust.
When the troop came nearer, they found the troops were of Cao Cao's army, and with them they traveled to the main camp where they found Cao Cao himself. Cao Cao shed tears at the sad story of Liu Bei's distress, the loss of the city, his brothers and wives and children.
When Liu Bei him of the hunter who had sacrificed his wife to feed them, Cao Cao sent the hunter a present of a hundred ounces of silver as a reward. The march then was continued to Jibei, where Xiahou Yuan welcomed them. They heard that his brother Xiahou Dun was still ill from the wound he had received in the eye.
Cao Cao went to the sick man's bedside to see him and had him removed to Xuchang for skilled treatment.
Presently scouts, sent out particularly for tidings of Lu Bu, returned, saying, “Lu Bu has allied himself with the bandits in the east, and they are attacking Yanzhou.” At this Cao Cao dispatched Cao Ren with three thousand soldiers to take Xiaopei, while he, in conjunction with Liu Bei, moved against Lu Bu.
They went east. As they reached the Mangdang Hills near Xiao Pass, they met the a band of thirty thousand Taishan Mountains brigands barring their road. The chieftains of the bandits were Sun Guan, Wu Dun, Yin Li, and Chang Xi who rode out with their spears set.
However, Xu Chu plunged into the battle and easily beat them back and chased them right up to the pass.
The scouts told Lu Bu, who was then in Xuzhou, whither he had gone to start an expedition to save Xiaopei. He left the protection of Xuzhou to Chen Gui and set out with Chen Deng.
As this latter was starting, Chen Gui said to him, “Remember the words of Cao Cao, that the business of the east is in our hands.
Now is our moment, for Lu Bu is about to suffer defeat.” “Father, I can look after the outside. But when Lu Bu returns beaten, you must arrange with Mi Zhu to keep him out of the city.
I shall find a means of escape,” said Chen Deng. “His family is here, and he has many friends. How about them?” “I also have a scheme to settle them.” Then Chen Deng went to see Lu Bu, to whom he said, “Xuzhou is surrounded, and this city will be fiercely attacked. We ought to provide for possible retreat, and I advise storing grain and money in Xiapi.
We could retreat there if the day went adversely. Why not see about this in good time?” “Your words are indeed wise. I will also send my wives and little ones thither,” said Lu Bu.
The family left under escort of Wei Xu and Song Xian, and with them was sent much grain and treasures and coins. And then the soldiers marched to the relief of the pass.
About half way there Chen Deng said, “Let me go first to reconnoiter so that you, my lord, may advance with confidence.” Thus Chen Deng parted company with his chief and preceded him to the pass where he was received by Chen Gong. Chen Deng said, “The General greatly wonders why you do not advance.
He is going to inquire into it.” “The enemy is in great force, and we cannot be too careful,” said Chen Gong.
“We are holding the pass, and you should persuade our master to take steps to guard Xiaopei.” Chen Deng said, “Your words are true.” That evening he went up to the heights from which he could see Cao Cao's army, which was quite close to the pass.
Then he wrote three notes, tied them to arrows, and shot them into Cao Cao's camp.
Next day he left and hastened back to Lu Bu and said, “Those bandits are about to give up the pass to the enemy, but I have left Chen Gong to hold it.
You would better make an attack tonight and hold him.” “Had it not been for you, the pass would have been lost,” said Lu Bu.
Then he sent Chen Deng back to arrange a fire signal with Chen Gong for simultaneous action.
So Chen Deng returned to Chen Gong to whom he said, “Cao Cao's troops have found a secret way through the pass, and I fear Xuzhou is already lost.
You ought to go back at once.” At this the pass was abandoned, and Chen Gong began to retreat. Then Chen Deng gave the prearranged signal.
Lu Bu saw the fire and advanced in the darkness to the relief of the pass.
Presently he met Chen Gong's army; and as neither recognized the other in the darkness, a fierce battle ensued. Nor was the trick discovered till daylight came. While these things were going on, Cao Cao had noted the signal and advanced as fast as possible.
The bandits, who alone remained to hold the pass, were easily driven out and scattered in all directions.
When daylight came and the trick was discovered, Lu Bu and Chen Gong set off together for Xuzhou.
But when they arrived and summoned the gate, instead of opening the doors, the guards on the wall saluted them with a thick flight of arrows.
At the same time Mi Zhu appeared on the defense tower and shouted, “You stole our master's city, and now we are going to give it back to him.
You will not enter here again.” “Where is Chen Gui?” cried Lu Bu, angrily.
“We have slain him!” was the reply.
“Where is Chen Deng?” said Lu Bu turning to Chen Gong.
“Do you still hold to your delusion, General, that you ask where this specious rogue is?” Lu Bu bade them search through all the ranks, but Chen Deng was not to be found.
Then they decided to go to Xiaopei.
But ere they had got half way there, suddenly appeared the troops under the command of Gao Shun and Zhang Liao.
They said, “Chen Deng came to us saying you, General, was surrounded and wanted help, so we came at once.” “Another trick of that false rogue!” said Lu Bu.
“Surely he shall die for this.” They went with all speed to Xiaopei, only to see as they drew near, the ensigns of the enemy displayed all along the walls, for the city had been taken by Cao Ren.
While Lu Bu stood at the foot of the rampart reviling the traitor, Chen Deng himself appeared on the wall and pointing to Lu Bu cried, “Did you think that I, a minister of the dynasty, would serve a rebel like you?” Lu Bu in his wrath was about to make a desperate attack, but suddenly a great noise was heard and an army came up behind him. It was led by no other than Zhang Fei.
Gao Shun went to engage him, but he had no chance of success.
Lu Bu then joined in the fray.
Then another army appeared, and the leader this time was Cao Cao himself, and his army rushed to the attack.
Seeing that he had no hope of victory, Lu Bu went away toward the east, with Cao Cao in pursuit.
Lu Bu's army marched till they were worn out.
Then appeared a new force under Guan Yu. Holding his sword ready to strike, Guan Yu called out, “Do not flee, O Lu Bu!
Guan Yu is waiting for you.” Lu Bu joined battle; he was flurried and scarcely knew what was happening.
And soon Zhang Fei came up once more.
By desperate efforts Lu Bu and his troops cut an arterial alley through the press and got free.
After this they started for Xiapi as fast as they could travel, and Hou Cheng helped to keep the pursuers at bay and welcomed them into the city. So the two brothers, Guan Yu and Zhang Fei, were together again after their separation.
Both shed tears of joy as they told each other what they had seen and suffered.
“I was on the Haizhou Road when I heard of you,” said Guan Yu.
“I lost no time in starting.” “And I had been camped in the Mangdang Hills for a long time. It is happiness to be together again.” So they talked. Then they marched off together to find their elder brother, and made their salutations with tears. In Liu Bei's heart, sadness and joy intermingled.
Next they were presented to Cao Cao, and with him they went into the captured Xuzhou City.
Mi Zhu soon came with the welcome news of the safety of the family.
And Chen Gui and Chen Deng came to present their salutations.
A grand banquet was prepared for the officers at which Cao Cao presided as host, and Chen Gui and Liu Bei occupied the seats of honor to his right and left.
At the close of the banquet, Cao Cao paid the two Chens the highest compliments on their success and rewarded them with the revenues of ten counties beside giving the son the title of General Who Quells the Waves.
Cao Cao was very pleased with his success and at once began to scheme for the taking of Xiapi, the sole place now left to Lu Bu, where he had taken refuge. Cheng Yu said the course was inadvisable. “If Lu Bu be pressed too hard, he may get clear by a desperate effort and throw himself into the arms of our especial enemy, Yuan Shu.
These two as allies would be difficult to overcome.
Rather send a capable man to guard the South of River Huai, one able to secure you against Lu Bu on one hand and to hold Yuan Shu on the other.
Moreover the bandits are in Huashang Mountains and still our enemies.
They must be watched.” Cao Cao replied, “I can keep the whole of Huashang Mountains, and I will request Liu Bei to take the south.” “Could I dare withstand your command?” said Liu Bei.
So forthwith Liu Bei, leaving Mi Zhu and Jian Yong at Xuzhou, went south, taking in his train Guan Yu, Zhang Fei, and Sun Qian.
And Cao Cao led his army to Xiapi.
Lu Bu felt very secure in his refuge. He had good store of grain, and he had the protection of River Si, so he sat quiet, satisfied that he could maintain his defense. So he allowed Cao Cao's army to approach without molestation.
“You ought to attack Cao Cao's army as they come up, before they have time to make camps and defenses.
They will only have a fatigued army to oppose to your fresh troops, and you will certainly defeat them.” So said Chen Gong, but Lu Bu replied, “I have suffered too many defeats lately to take any risk.
Wait till they actually attack, and you will see them floating away on the waters.” So Lu Bu neglected the confidant's advice and waited till the enemy had settled into their camp.
This done, the attackers advanced against the city. From the foot of the wall, Cao Cao called to Lu Bu to listen while he spoke. Lu Bu ascended to the wall where he stood. Cao Cao addressed him, saying, “When I heard that your family and that of Yuan Shu were likely to be united by marriage, I sent an army against you.
Yuan Shu was guilty of treason, while you had to your credit on the destruction of Dong Zhuo. For what reason have you sacrificed all your merits to throw in your lot with a rebel?
It will be over late to regret when this city shall have fallen.
But if you surrender and help me to support the ruling house, you shall not lose your rank.” Lu Bu replied, “If the Prime Minister will retire, we may be able to discuss the matter.” But Chen Gong, standing near his master, began to rail at Cao Cao for a rebel and shot an arrow that struck his plumed helmet.
“My oath, but I will slay you at least!” cried Cao Cao, pointing his finger at Chen Gong.
Then the attack on the walls began.
“They have come from far and cannot maintain this for long,” said Chen Gong.
“General, go out with your horse and foot and take up a position outside, leaving me to maintain the defense with the remainder of our troops.
If he engages you, I will come out and strike at his rear ranks; if he attacks the city, you can come to our aid.
In ten days their stores will fail, and we can beat them off.
This will place them between the ox-horns.” “The advice seems good,” said Lu Bu.
Lu Bu went back to his palace and prepared his weapons.
As it was the depth of winter, he made his army take plenty of wadded clothing to keep them warm. Lady Yan, his wife, heard of it and came to ask whither he was going.
He told her of Chen Gong's plan.
She said, “My lord, you are leaving an undamaged city, abandoning your wife and little ones, and going with a paltry force.
Should any untoward event happen, will your handmaid and her lord ever meet again?” Lu Bu hesitated and for three days made no move.
Then Chen Gong came to see him again and said, “The enemy are all round the city, and unless you go out soon you will be quite hemmed in.” “I am thinking it would be better to maintain a stubborn defense,” said Lu Bu. “Our enemies are short of food and have sent for supplies to Xuchang.
These will soon arrive, and you should go out with some veterans and intercept the convoy.
That loss would be a heavy blow.” Lu Bu agreed and went in to tell his wife the new plan.
She wept saying, “If you go, do you think Chen Gong and others equal to the defense of the city?
Should anything go wrong, you would be very sorry.
You abandoned me at Changan, and it was only through the fortunate kindness of Pang Shu that I was hidden from our enemies and rejoined you.
Who would have thought you would leave me again?
But go, go your way as far as you wish, and do not mind your wife.” And she wept bitterly.
Lu Bu very sadly went to take leave of Diao Chan who said, “You are my lord and my life; you must not be careless and ride out alone.” “You need not fear; with my mighty trident halberd and Red-Hare, who dare come near me?” He went out.
But when he met Chen Gong, he said, “That story about supplies for Cao Cao is all false, one of his many ruses.
I am not going to stir.” Chen Gong sighed; he felt all was lost.
“We shall die, and no person shall know our burial place,” said he.
Thereupon Lu Bu remained in his own quarters with his ladies, drinking freely to dissipate his sorrows.
Two of his advisers, Xu Si and Wang Kai, went in and proposed, “Yuan Shu in the South of River Huai is very powerful.
Why not write to him to renew the marriage alliance?
Yuan Shu can hardly refuse to rescue the affianced bride of his son.” So Lu Bu wrote and bade these two take the letter.
Xu Si said, “You ought to send a strong escort with us to force a way through.” So Lu Bu told off one thousand troops and two of his generals, Zhang Liao and He Meng, to conduct his messenger beyond the pass.
They started that same night at the second watch, Zhang Liao leading and He Meng bringing up the rear.
They got out of the city, crept past Liu Bei's camp, and got beyond the danger zone.
Then half the escort went on, and Zhang Liao led the remainder back toward the city. At the pass he found Guan Yu waiting.
However, at that moment Gao Shun came to his help, and they all returned and reentered the gates. The two messengers presently reached Shouchun, saw Yuan Shu, and presented the letter. “How is this?” said Yuan Shu.
“Formerly he slew my messenger and repudiated the marriage; now he sends to ask for it.” “It is all due to the vile plans of that monster Cao Cao. If pray you, Illustrious Sir, consider it carefully,” replied Xu Si.
“But if your master was not hemmed in by his enemy and in imminent danger, he would never have thought of renewing this proposal of marriage.” The messengers said, “You may decide not to help him, but the teeth are cold when the lips are gone.
It will not make for your happiness and comfort.” Said Yuan Shu, “Lu Bu is unreliable; tell him that I will send soldiers after the girl has arrived here.” This was final, and the two messengers took leave and headed back to Xiapi.
When the party reached Liu Bei's camp, Xu Si decided, “We must wait the night falls, and Wang Kai and I will try to get through in the darkness; the escort of He Meng remaining behind to protect our rear.” They tried that very night, and the two messengers crept across without discovery.
But the escort found them selves faced by Zhang Fei.
He Meng tried to fight but was captured in the very first bout, and the five hundred troops of his half company were either killed or they fled. The prisoner was taken to Liu Bei, who forwarded him to the main camp.
There he told the story of the marriage and the scheme to save the city. Cao Cao was angry and ordered the execution of He Meng at the main gate.
Then Cao Cao sent orders to each camp to exercise the greatest diligence with threats of rigorous punishment of the officers of any corps that permitted any communication between the besieged and the outer world.
Every soldier felt mightily afraid.
Liu Bei returned to camp and cautioned his brothers, saying, “We are in the most important place with regard to the South of River Huai, and you must be very careful not to allow any breach of this command.” Zhang Fei was inclined to grumble, saying, “We have just captured one of the enemy's leaders, and there is no word of praise or reward for us; nothing but new orders and threats. What do you make of that?” “You are wrong to complain,” said Liu Bei.
“These are orders of the Commander-in-Chief, and what would happen were there no orders?
Do not disobey them, Brother.” They promised obedience and withdrew.
In the meantime Xu Si and Wang Kai had got back to Lu Bu and told him what Yuan Shu had said, that if the girl came the soldiers should go.
“But how can she be sent?” said Lu Bu. Xu Si said, “That is the difficulty. He Meng's capture means that Cao Cao knows the whole plan of getting help from the South of River Huai.
I do not see how any one but you yourself could hope to get through the close siege.” “Suppose we tried, today?” said Lu Bu.
“This is an ill-omened day; you must not try today.
Tomorrow is a very lucky day, especially in the evening, for any military action.” Then Lu Bu ordered Zhang Liao and Gao Shun, “Get ready three thousand troops for the venture, and prepare a light carriage.
I will lead the first seventy miles; thence you can escort the bride-elect the remainder of the way to her new home.” Next evening toward the second watch, Lu Bu wrapped up his daughter in soft wadded garments, bound her about with a mailed coat, and took her on his back. Then with his mighty trident halberd in hand, he mounted RedHare and rode at the head of the cavalcade out of the city gate. Zhang Liao and Gao Shun followed. In this order they approached Liu Bei's camp.
The drums at once beat the alarm, and Guan Yu and Zhang Fei barred the way. “Stop!” they shouted.
Lu Bu had no desire to fight; all he wished was to get through, so he made for a side road. Liu Bei came in pursuit and the two parties engaged.
Brave as he might be, Lu Bu was almost helpless now that he was hampered by a girl on his shoulders, whom he was desperately anxious to preserve from hurt.
Beside other parties came up all shouting and attacking, and he had no alternative but to give up his project and return into the city of Xiapi. He reached his palace very sad at heart.
The besiegers returned to camp well pleased that no one had got beyond their lines.
Lu Bu found consolation in the wine cup.
The siege had gone on for two months, and still the city stood.
Then they heard that Zhang Yang, Governor of Henei, had been inclined to come to the help of Lu Bu.
But one of his subordinates, Yang Chou, had assassinated him and was bringing his head as an offering to Cao Cao, when he also had been slain by Kui Gu, one of the Governor's adherents. Kui Gu had then led the force to Quan.
In the camp of the besiegers, there now arose much murmuring. Cao Cao sent Shi Huan to intercept and kill Kui Gu.
Then he called a counsel, saying, “Though Zhang Yang, who meant to hurt us, is happily no more, yet we are threatened on the north by Yuan Shao, and on the east Liu Biao and Zhang Xiu are a menace. Here we meet with no success against the city of Xiapi. We are for leaving Lu Bu to his fate and returning home. What do you think?” Among them Xun You fought against the idea, saying, “You must not act like this.
Lu Bu has lost much, and his spirit is broken. The spirit of the leader expresses that of his army; and when the leader fails, his soldiers do not fight.
Chen Gong is clever, but nothing is done.
Lu Bu broken, Chen Gong without decision, it only needs a sharp attack, and we shall succeed.” “I have a plan to propose—” said Guo Jia, “a plan to overcome the city at once; it is better than two hundred thousand troops.” “I suppose you mean drowning the city by River Si and River Yi,” said Xun Yu.
“That is it,” said Guo Jia, smiling.
Cao Cao accepted the suggestion with joy and set his troops to cut the banks of River Yi and River Si, and moved his army to the high ground whence they watched the drowning out of Xiapi.
Only the east gate remained clear of water. The besieged soldiers hastened to their leader.
Lu Bu said, “Why should I fear? My good horse can go as well through the water as over the land.” And he again returned to the wine cup for consolation, drinking deeply with his wife and concubine.
The continual drinking bouts told at last, and Lu Bu began to look dissipated.
Seeing himself in a mirror one day, he was startled at the change and said to himself, “I am injuring myself with wine; no more from this day forward.” He then issued an order that no one should drink wine under penalty of death.
Now one of his generals, Hou Cheng, lost fifteen horses, stolen by one of his subordinates, Hou Cao, who intended to resell them to Liu Bei.
Hou Cheng found out where the horses were, went out after them, and recovered them after killing Hou Cao.
And Hou Cheng's colleagues congratulated him on his success.
To celebrate the occasion, Hou Cheng brewed a few barrels of wine to be drunk at the feast, But thinking his chief might find him in fault, Hou Cheng sent the bottles of wine to Lu Bu's palace with a petition explaining, “By your virtue of warlike renown, I have recovered my horses; and as my comrades come with their congratulations, I brew some bottles of wine, first to offer Your Lordship and second to ask your permission to have a little wine at the feast.” Lu Bu took it very angrily, saying, “When I have forbidden all wine, you brew some and begin to give feasts; you are simply defying me!” Whereupon he ordered the officer to instant execution.
However, Song Xian, Wei Xu, and other officers came in and interceded, and after a time Lu Bu softened.
“You ought to lose your head for this disobedience; but for the sake of your colleagues, the punishment shall be reduced to a hundred strokes.” They tried to beg him off this, but only succeeded in reducing the number of blows to one half.
When the sentence had been carried out and Hou Cheng was permitted to return home, his colleagues came sadly to console him. “Had it not been for you I should have been put to death,” said Hou Cheng.
Song Xian replied, “All Lu Bu cares for is his family; there is no pity for any one else.
We are no more than the weeds by the roadside.” Wei Xu said, “The city is besieged; the water is drowning us out. There will not be much more of this, for we may die any day.” “He is a beast, with neither a sense of humanity nor of right. Let us leave him,” said Song Xian. “He is not worth fighting for.
The best we could do would be to seize him and hand him over to Cao Cao,” said Wei Xu.
“I was punished because I got my horses back again, yet all he trusts in is his own Red-Hare.
If you two will betray the gate and seize Lu Bu, I will steal the horse and go out to Cao Cao's camp.” They settled how to carry out the plot, and that very night Hou Cheng sneaked into the stables and got Red-Hare away.
He hastened to the east gate which was opened to let him through. The guard made a pretense of pursuing him but only a pretense.
Hou Cheng reached the besiegers' camp, presented the horse and told Cao Cao what had been arranged. They would show a white flag and open the gates to his army.
Hearing this Cao Cao had a few notifications written out, which were attached to arrows and shot over the walls.
This is one of them: “Regent Marshal Cao Cao has received a command from the Emperor to destroy Lu Bu.
Those who interfere with the operations of his grand army, whatever their rank, shall be put to death in the gate on the day that the city shall be captured.
Should any one capture Lu Bu or bring his head he shall be well rewarded.
Let all take note of this.” Next day at daylight a tremendous hubbub was heard without the city and Lu Bu, halberd in hand, hasted to the wall to see what it meant. As he went from gate to gate inspecting the defenses and guards, he censured Wei Xu for letting Hou Cheng escape and get away with his horse.
Lu Bu threatened to punish Wei Xu.
But just then the besiegers began a fierce attack as the white flag had just appeared, and Lu Bu had to turn all his energies to defense.
The assault lasted till noon, when the attacking force drew off for a time.
Lu Bu was taking a rest in the tower and fell asleep in his chair.
Song Xian sent away Lu Bu's attendants; and when they had gone, he stole Lu Bu's weapon, the trident halberd in which he trusted. Then Song Xian and Wei Xu fell upon Lu Bu together and before he was well awake had bound him with cords, trussing him so that he could not move.
Lu Bu shouted for his guards, but they were driven off by the two traitor generals and could not come near. Then a white flag was shown, and the besiegers again approached the city.
The traitors shouted out, “Lu Bu has been captured alive!” But Xiahou Yuan could hardly believe it till they threw down the famous halberd. The gates were flung open, and the enemy entered the city.
Gao Shun and Zhang Liao, who were at the opposite gate, were surrounded and cut off by the water and helpless.
They were captured. Chen Gong made a dash to the south gate but was also taken by Xu Huang.
Presently Cao Cao entered and at once gave orders to turn the streams back into their usual courses. He put out proclamations soothing the people.
Cao Cao and Liu Bei, with Guan Yu and Zhang Fei behind, seated themselves side by side in the White Gate Tower.
The captives, to the number of a thousand, were brought before them. Lu Bu looked a pitiable object.
Although a very tall man, he was tied up in a veritable ball.
“The bonds are very tight,” cried he, “I beseech you to loosen them!” “Bindings a tiger must binding tight, of course,” replied Cao Cao.
Seeing Hou Cheng, Song Xian, and Wei Xu standing there looking pleased at their success, Lu Bu said, “I treated you all well enough; how could you turn against me?” Said Song Xian, “You listened to the words of your women, but rejected the advice of your generals.
Was not that mean?” Lu Bu was silent.
Then Gao Shun was brought forward.
“What have you to say?” asked Cao Cao.
Gao Shun sulkily held his tongue and was ordered out to execution.
Next Chen Gong was led in. “I hope you have been well since we last saw each other, Chen Gong?” said Cao Cao.
“Your ways were crooked, and so I left you,” said Chen Gong.
“You say I was crooked; and what of your serving Lu Bu?” “Though he was a fool, he did not resemble you in deceit and wickedness.” “You say you are able enough and clever, but what about your position today?” Turning toward Lu Bu, Chen Gong said, “This man would not follow my advice.
Had he done so, he would not now be a captive.” “What think you ought to be done about this day's work?” said Cao Cao.
“There is death for me today, and that is the end!” said Chen Gong undauntedly.
“Very well for you; but what of your mother and wife and children?” “It is said that one who rules with due regard to filial piety does not harm a person's family; one who would show benevolence does not cut off the sacrifices at a person's tomb. My mother and wife and children are in your hands.
But since I am your prisoner, I pray you slay me quickly and not to try to harrow my feelings.” Cao Cao's heart still leaned toward mercy, but Chen Gong turned and walked away, repulsing the attendants who would stop him.
Cao Cao rose from his place and walked with Chen Gong, the tears falling from his eyes.
Chen Gong never looked at him.
Turning to his guards Cao Cao said, “Let his mother and family be taken to Xuchang and looked after immediately.
Any postponement will be punished!” The condemned man heard him but uttered no word. He stretched out his neck for the blow.
Tears sprang to the eyes of all present.
His remains were honorably coffined and buried in Xuchang. A poem pitying Chen Gong's fate says: Neither hope of life nor fear of death moved him. How brave was he, a hero indeed! But his lord heeded not his words, Wherefore in vain possessed he great talents.
Nevertheless, in that he stood by his master.
To parting with wife and mother, He merits our pity and profound respect.
Who would resemble Chen Gong That day he died at the White Gate Tower?
While Cao Cao sadly escorted Chen Gong on the way to death, Lu Bu appealed to Liu Bei, “Noble Sir, you sit there an honored guest while poor I lie bound at your feet. Will you not utter one word to alleviate my lot?” Liu Bei nodded.
As Cao Cao returned to his place, Lu Bu called out, “Your only trouble, Illustrious Sir, is myself, and I am on your side now.
You take the lead, I will help you, and together the world is at our feet.” “What do you think?” said Cao Cao turning to Liu Bei. “You are willing to forget the episodes of Ding Yuan and Dong Zhuo?” “Truly the lout is not to be trusted!” said Lu Bu, looking at Liu Bei.
“Strangle and expose!” said Cao Cao.
As he was led away, Lu Bu turned once more to Liu Bei, “You long-eared lout, you forget now the service I rendered you that day at my camp gate, when my arrow hit the mark!” Just then some one shouted, “Lu Bu, O fool!
Death is but death, and why are you scared at it?” Every one turned to look; the guards were hustling Zhang Liao to the place of judgment.
Cao Cao ordered Lu Bu's execution. A poet has written upon the death of Lu Bu: The flood spreads wide, the city drowns, Its lord is captive. Nought avails His courser's speed or halberd's thrust.
The tiger erstwhile fierce, now whines For mercy. Cao Cao had meted him Full well, a falcon flown at will And hungry kept. Poor fool!
He let Chen Gong's advice be overborne By harem tattle; vainly now He rails against the Long-Ears' faith. And another poem says:
Round is the hungry tiger, eater of men, for whom is no pity, Since the blood of his victims is fresh and not yet dry. Liu Bei spoke no word in favor of Lu Bu, To whom even a father's life was not sacred.
It was recorded earlier that the executioners were hustling Zhang Liao forward.
Pointing to him from above, Cao Cao said, “He has a familiar face.” “You were not likely to forget me; you saw me before in Puyang,” said Zhang Liao.
“O, so you remember me, eh?” “Yes; more is the pity.” “Pity for what?” “That the fire that day was not fierce enough to burn you up, rebel that you are.” Cao Cao began to get angry.
“How dare you insult me?” cried he and lifted his sword to kill the bold speaker.
The undaunted Zhang Liao never changed color, but stretched out his neck for the blow.
Then a man behind Cao Cao caught his arm, and in front of him another dropped on his knees, saying, “O Prime Minister, I pray thee stay thy hand!” Lu Bu whining was not spared, Railing Zhang Liao far better fared.
Who was it that saved Zhang Liao? The next chapter will show. CHAPTER 20.
Cao Cao Organizes A Hunting Expedition In Xutian; Dong Cheng Receives A Secret Command In The Palace. The last chapter said that Cao Cao was checked in his angry attack upon Zhang Liao. They were Liu Bei who held his arm and Guan Yu who knelt before him.
“A man as generous-hearted as he is should be saved,” said Liu Bei.
Guan Yu said, “I know him well as loyal and righteous. I will vouch for him with my own life!” Cao Cao threw aside his sword and smiled.
“I also know Zhang Liao to be loyal and good; I was just testing him,” said he.
Cao Cao loosed the prisoner's bonds with his own hands, had a change of dress brought in, and clothed him therewith.
Then he was led to a seat of honor. This kindly treatment sank deep into Zhang Liao's heart, and he hastened to declare formally that he yielded. And then he was given the rank of Imperial Commander and the title of Lordship.
Zhang Liao was sent on a mission to win over the bandit leader Zang Ba, who hearing what had happened, came forthwith and gave in his submission.
He was graciously received, and his former colleagues—Sun Guan, Wu Dun, and Yin Li—also yielded, with the exception of Chang Xi, who remained obdurate. All these former enemies who came over were kindly treated and given posts of responsibility wherein they might prove the reality of their conversion.
Lu Bu's family were sent to the capital.
After the soldiers had been rewarded with feasting, the camp was broken up and the army moved away to Xuchang.
Passing through Xuzhou the people lined the roads and burned incense in honor of the victors. They also petitioned that Liu Bei should be their protector.
Cao Cao replied, “Liu Bei has rendered great services. You must wait till he has been received in audience and obtained his reward.
After that he shall be sent here.” The people bowed low to the ground to express their thanks.
Che Zhou, General of the Flying Cavalry, was given command of Xuzhou for the moment. After the army had arrived at the capital, rewards were granted to all the officers who had been in the expedition. Liu Bei was retained in the capital, lodging in an annex to the Prime Minister's palace.
Next day a court was held, and Cao Cao memorialized the services of Liu Bei who was presented to Emperor Xian.
Dressed in court robes, Liu Bei bowed at the lower end of the audience arena.
The Emperor called him to the Hall and asked his ancestry.
Liu Bei replied, “Thy servant is the son of Liu Hong, grandson of Liu Xiong, who was a direct descendant of Prince Faubus of Zhongshan, who was the son of His Majesty the Emperor Myers .” The Emperor bade them bring forth the Books of the Genealogies, and therefrom a secretary read:
“Liu Jing the Filial Emperor begot fourteen sons of whom the seventh was Liu Sheng, Prince of Zhongshan; Sheng begot Liu Zhen, Lord of Luchang; Zhen begot Liu Ang, Lord of Pei ; Lu begot Liu Lian, Lord of Yishui; Lian begot Liu Ying, Lord of Qinyang; Ying begot Liu Jian, Lord of Anguo; Jian begot Liu Ai, Lord of Guangling; Ai begot Liu Xian, Lord of Jiaoshui; Xian begot Liu Shu, Lord of Zuyi; Shu begot Liu Ziyang, Lord of Qiyang; Ziyang begot Liu Bi, Lord of Yuanze; Bi begot Liu Da, Lord of Yingchuan; Da begot Liu Buyi, Lord of Fengling; Buyi begot Liu Hui, Lord of Jichuan; Hui begot Liu Xiong, Governor of Zhuo; Xiong begot Liu Hong, who held no office or rank; and Liu Bei is his son.” The Emperor compared this with the registers of the Imperial House and found by them that Liu Bei was his uncle by descent.
The Emperor seemed greatly pleased and requested Liu Bei to go into one of the side chambers where he might perform the ceremonial obeisance prescribed for a nephew to his uncle.
In his heart he rejoiced to have this heroic warrior uncle as a powerful supporter against Cao Cao who really held all the power in his own hands.
The Emperor knew himself to be a mere puppet. He conferred upon his uncle the rank of General of the Left Army and the title of Lord of Yicheng.
When the banquet was concluded, Liu Bei thanked the Emperor and went out of the palace.
And from this time he was very generally styled the “Imperial Uncle.” When Cao Cao returned to his palace, Xun Yu and his fellow advisers went in to see him.
Xun Yu said, “It is no advantage to you, Illustrious Sir, that the Emperor recognizes Liu Bei as an uncle.” “Liu Bei may be recognized as uncle, but he is under my orders since I control the decrees of the Throne. He will be all the more ready to obey.
Beside I will keep him here under the pretense of having him near his sovereign, and he will be entirely in my hands.
I have nothing to fear. The man I fear is Yang Biao, who is a relative of the two Yuan brothers. Should Yang Biao conspire with them, he is an enemy within and might do much harm.
He will have to be removed.” Hence Cao Cao sent a secret emissary to say that Yang Biao was intriguing with Yuan Shu, and on this charge Yang Biao was arrested and imprisoned. And his death would have been compassed had his enemy dared.
But just then the Governor of Beihai, Kong Rong, was at the capital, and he remonstrated with Cao Cao, saying, “Yang Biao comes from a family famed for virtue for at least four generations; you cannot trump up so foolish a charge as that against him.” “It is the wish of His Majesty,” retorted Cao Cao.
“If the child Emperor Cheng of Zhou Dynasty had put Duke Chao to death, could the people have believed Duke Zhou, the Regent Marshal, had nothing to do with it?
1” So Cao Cao had to relinquish the attempt, but he took away Yang Biao's offices and banished him to his family estate in the country.
Court Counselor Zhao Yan, an opponent of the Prime Minister, sent up a memorial impeaching Cao Cao for having removed a minister of state from office without a decree.
Cao Cao's reply to this was the arrest of Zhao Yan and his execution, a bold stroke which terrified the bulk of officers and reduced them to silence.
Cheng Yu advised Cao Cao to assume a more definite position. He said, “Illustrious Sir, your prestige grows daily; why not seize the opportunity to take the position of Chief of the Feudatory Princes?” “There are still too many supporters of the court,” was the reply.
“I must be careful.
I am going to propose a royal hunt to try to find out the best line to follow.” This expedition being decided upon they got together fleet horses, famous falcons, and pedigree hounds, and prepared bows and arrows in readiness. They mustered a strong force of guards outside the city.
When the Prime Minister proposed the hunting expedition, the Emperor said he feared it was an improper thing to do.
Cao Cao replied, “In ancient times rulers made four expeditions yearly at each of the four seasons in order to show their strength. They were called Sou, Miao, Xien, and Shou, in the order of spring, summer, autumn, and winter.
Now that the whole country is in confusion, it would be wise to inaugurate a hunt in order to train the army.
I am sure Your Majesty will approve.” So the Emperor with the full paraphernalia for an imperial hunt joined the expedition. He rode a saddled horse, carried an inlaid bow, and his quiver was filled with gold-tipped arrows. His chariot followed behind. Liu Bei and his brothers were in the imperial train, each with his bow and quiver. Each party member wore a breastplate under the outer robe and held his especial weapon, while their escort followed them.
Cao Cao rode a dun horse called “Flying-Lightning,” and the army was one hundred thousand strong.
The hunt took place in Xutian, and the legions spread out as guards round the hunting arena which extended over some one hundred square miles.
Cao Cao rode even with the Emperor, the horses' heads alternating in the lead.
The imperial attendants immediately following were all in Cao Cao's confidence.
The other officers, civil and military, lagged behind, for they dared not press forward into the midst of Cao Cao's partisans.
One day the Emperor was riding toward the hunting grounds and noticed his newly found uncle respectfully standing by the roadside.
“I should like to see my uncle display his hunting skill,” said the Emperor. Liu Bei mounted his steed at once.
Just then a hare started from its form; Liu Bei shot and hit it with the first arrow. The Emperor, much struck by this display, rode away over a slope.
Suddenly a deer broke out of the thicket.
He shot three arrows at it but all missed. “You try,” said the Emperor turning to Cao Cao.
“Lend me Your Majesty's bow,” Cao Cao replied; and taking the inlaid bow and the golden-tipped arrows, he pulled the bow and hit the deer in the shoulder at the first shot. It fell in the grass and could not run.
Now the crowd of officers seeing the golden-barbed arrow sticking in the wound concluded at once that the shot was the Emperor's, so they rushed up and shouted “O King, live forever!” Cao Cao rode out pushing past the Emperor and acknowledged the congratulations.
They all turned pale. Guan Yu, who was behind Liu Bei, was especially angry.
The silkworm eyebrows stood up fiercely, and the red phoenix eyes glared as, sword in hand, he rode hastily forth to cut down the audacious Prime Minister for his impertinence.
However, Liu Bei hastily waved him back and shot at him a meaning glance so that Guan Yu stopped and made no further move. Liu Bei bowing toward Cao Cao said, “Most sincere felicitations!
A truly supernatural shot, such as few have achieved!” “It is only the enormous good fortune of the Son of Heaven!” said Cao Cao with a smile.
Then he turned his steed and felicitated the Emperor. But he did not return the bow; he hung it over his own shoulder instead.
The hunt finished with banqueting; and when the entertainments were over, they returned to the capital, all glad of some repose after the expedition. Guan Yu was still angry of the Prime Minister's breach of decorum.
One day Guan Yu said to Liu Bei, “Brother, why did you prevent me from killing that rebel and so ridding the world of a scoundrel?
He insults the Emperor and ignores everybody else.” “When you throw stones at a rat, beware of the vase,” quoted Liu Bei.
“Cao Cao was only a horse's head away from Our Lord, and in the midst of a crowd of his partisans.
In that momentary burst of anger, if you had struck and failed, and harm had come to the Emperor, what an awful crime would have been laid to us!” “If we do not rid the world of him today, a worse evil will come of it,” said Guan Yu. “But be discreet, my brother.
Such matters cannot be lightly discussed.” The Emperor sadly returned to his palace. With tears in his eyes, he related what had occurred in the hunt to his consort, Empress Fu. “Alas for me!” said he. “From the first days of my accession, one vicious minister has succeeded another. I was the victim of Dong Zhuo's evil machinations; then followed the rebellion of Li Jue and Guo Si.
You and I had to bear sorrows such as no others have borne.
Then came this Cao Cao as one who would maintain the imperial dignity, but he has seized upon all real authority and does as he wishes.
He works continually for his own glorification, and I never see him but my back pricks.
These last few days in the hunting field, he went in front of me and acknowledged the cheers of the crowd. He is so extremely rude that I feel sure he has sinister designs against me.
Alas, my wife, we know not when our end may come!” “In a whole court full of nobles, who have eaten the bread of Han, is there not one who will save his country?” said she.
Thus spoke the Empress, and at the same moment there stepped in a man who said, “Grieve not, O Imperial Pair!
I can find a savior for the country.” It was none other than the father of the Empress, Fu Wan.
“Have you heard of Cao Cao's wanton and perverse behavior?” said the Emperor, drying his eyes.
“You mean the deer shooting? Who did not see that, indeed?
But the whole court is full of his clan or his creatures.
With the exception of the relatives of your Consort, there is not one loyal enough to deal with a rebel.
I have no authority and can do nothing, but there is General Dong Cheng, the State Uncle, who could do it.” “Could Uncle Dong Cheng come in to consult about this?
I know he has had much experience of state troubles.” Fu Wan replied, “Every one of your attendants is a partisan of Cao Cao, and this sort of thing must be kept most profoundly secret or the consequence will be most serious.” “Then what can be done?” said the Emperor.
“The only plan I can think of is to send gifts of a robe and a jade girdle to Dong Cheng, and in the lining of the girdle hide a secret edict authorizing him to take certain steps.
When he gets home and has read the edict, he can elaborate plans as quickly as possible, and neither the spirits above nor the demons below will know anything about them.” The Emperor approved, and Fu Wan went out.
The Emperor then with his own hand drew up a decree, writing it with blood drawn by biting his finger. He gave the document to Empress Fu to sew into the purple lining of the girdle. When all was done he put on the robe and girded it with the girdle. Next he bade one of the attendants summon State Uncle Dong Cheng to the Palace.
Dong Cheng came; and after the ceremonies were finished, the Emperor said, “A few nights ago I was talking with the Empress of the terrible days of the rebellion, and we thought of your good services then, therefore we have called you in to reward you.” The minister bowed his head in thanks.
Then the Emperor led Dong Cheng out of the Reception Hall to the Temple of Ancestors, and they went to the gallery of Worthy Ministers, where the Emperor burned incense and performed the usual ceremonies.
After this they went to see the portraits, and among them was one of the founder of the dynasty, Liu Bang the Supreme Ancestor.
“Whence sprang our great ancestor and how did he begin his great achievement?” said the Emperor.
“Your Majesty is pleased to joke with thy servant,” said Dong Cheng, rather startled at the question.
“Who does not know the deeds of the Sacred Ancestor? He began life as a minor official in Sishang. There gripping his sword, he slew a white serpent, the beginning of his struggle for the right.
Speedily he mastered the empire; in three years had destroyed Qin and, in five, also Chu.
Thus he set up a dynasty that shall endure forever!” “Such heroic forefathers! Such weakling descendants! How sad it is!” said the Emperor.
Pointing to the portraits right and left, he continued, “Are not these two Zhang Liang, Lord of Liu, and Xiao He, Lord of Cuo?” “Certainly.
The Supreme Ancestor was greatly assisted by these two.” The Emperor glanced right and left.
His attendants were rather far away. Then he whispered to Dong Cheng, “You, like these two, must stand by me.” “My poor services are of no worth; I do not compare with those men,” said the Uncle.
“I remember that you saved me at the western capital, Changan.
I have never forgotten, and I could never reward you properly.” Then pointing to his own robe, the Emperor continued, “You must wear this robe of mine, girded with my own girdle, and it will be as though you are always near your Emperor.” Dong Cheng bowed his gratitude while the Emperor, taking off the robe, presented it to his faithful minister.
At the same time he whispered, “Examine it closely when you get home, and help your Emperor carry out his intention.” Dong Cheng understood. He put on the robe and the girdle, took leave and left the chamber.
The news of the audience for Dong Cheng had been taken to the Prime Minister, who at once went to the Palace and arrived as Dong Cheng was passing out at the Donghua Gate. They met face to face, and Dong Cheng could in nowise avoid him.
Dong Cheng went to the side of the road and made his obeisance.
“Where are you from, State Uncle?” asked Cao Cao.
“His Majesty summoned me into the Palace and has given me this robe and beautiful girdle.” “Why did he give you these?” “He had not forgotten that I saved his life in the old days.” “Take it off and let me see it.” Dong Cheng who knew that a secret decree was hidden away somewhere in the garments was afraid Cao Cao would notice a breach somewhere in the material, so he hesitated and did not obey.
But Cao Cao called his guards, and they took off the girdle. Then Cao Cao looked it over carefully. “It certainly is a very handsome girdle,” said he.
“Now take off the robe and let me look at that.” Dong Cheng's heart was melting with fear, but he dared not disobey. So he handed over the robe.
Cao Cao took it and held it up against the sun with his own hand and minutely examined every part of it.
When he had done this, he put it on, girded it with the girdle and turning to his attendants said, “How is it for length?” “Beautiful!” they chorused.
Turning to Dong Cheng, he said, “Will you give these to me?” “My Prince's presents to me I dare not give to another.
Let me give you another robe in its stead,” said Dong Cheng.
“Is there not some intrigue connected with these presents? I am sure there is,” said Cao Cao. “How could I dare?” said Dong Cheng, trembling.
“If you are so set upon it, then I must give it up.” “How could I take away what your Prince has given you?
It was all a joke,” said the Prime Minister.
Cao Cao returned both robe and girdle, and their owner made the best of his way home.
When night came and he was alone in his library, he took out the robe and looked over every inch of it most carefully. He found nothing.
“He gave me a robe and a girdle and bade me look at them carefully.
That means there is something to be looked for but I can find no trace of it. What does it mean?” he soliloquized.
Then he lifted the girdle and examined that. The jade plates were carved into the semblance of small dragons interlaced among flowers. The lining was of purple silk. All was sewn together most carefully and neatly, and he could find nothing out of the common. He was puzzled. He laid the belt on the table. Presently he picked it up and looked at it again.
He spent long hours over it but in vain.
He leaned over on the small table, his head resting on his hands and was almost asleep, when a candle snuff fell down upon the girdle and burned a hole in the lining.
He hastily shook it off, but the mischief was done: a small hole had been burned in the silken lining, and through this there appeared something white with blood red marks.
He hastily ripped it open and drew out the decree written by the hand of the Emperor himself in characters of blood. It read:
“Of human relationships, that between parents and children stands first; of the various social ties that between prince and minister stands highest.
Today Cao Cao, the wicked, is a real tyrant, treating even his Prince with indignity.
With the support of his faction and his army, he has destroyed the principles of government.
By conferring rewards and inflicting punishments, he has reduced the Emperor to a nonentity.
I have grieved over this day and night. I have feared the empire would be ruined.
“You are a high minister of state and my own relative. You must recall the difficulties of the great Founder's early days and draw together the loyal and right-minded to destroy this evil faction and restore the prerogatives of the Throne. Such a deed would be indeed an extreme joy to the spirits of my ancestors.
“This decree, written in blood drawn from my own veins, is confided to a noble who is to be most careful not to fail in executing his Emperor's design.
“Given in the era of Rebuilt Tranquillity, fourth year and the third month of spring.”  So ran the decree, and Dong Cheng read it with streaming eyes. There was no sleep for him that night.
Early in the morning he returned to his library and reread it. No plan suggested itself.
He laid the decree down on the table and sought in the depths of his mind for some scheme to destroy Cao Cao, but could not decide upon any.
And he fell asleep leaning over his table.
It happened that Minister Wang Zifu, with whom Dong Cheng was on terms of great intimacy, came to visit him and, as usual, walked into the house unannounced and went straight to the library.
His host did not wake, and Wang Zifu noticed, hardly hidden by his sleeve, the Emperor's writing.
Wondering what this might be, Wang Zifu drew it out, read it, and put it in his own sleeve. Then he called out loud, “Uncle Dong Cheng, are you not well?
Why are you asleep at this time of day?” Dong Cheng started up and at once missed the decree. He was aghast; he almost fell to the ground.
“So you want to make away with Cao Cao? I shall have to tell him,” said Wang Zifu.
“Then, Brother, that is the end of the Hans,” said his host, with tears.
“I was joking,” said Wang Zifu.
“My forefathers also served the Hans and ate of their bounty. Am I devoid of loyalty?
I would help you, Brother, as far as lies in my power.” “It is well for the country that you think like this,” said Dong Cheng.
“But we ought to have a more private place than this to talk over such plans and pledge ourselves to sacrifice all in the cause of Han.” Dong Cheng began to feel very satisfied.
He produced a roll of white silk and wrote his own name at the top and signed it, and Wang Zifu followed suit.
Then the visitor said, “General Wu Zilan is one of my best friends; he ought to be allowed to come in.” Dong Cheng replied, “Of all the officials of the court, Commander Chong Ji and Court Counselor Wu Shi are my best friends. Certainly they would back me up.” So the discussion proceeded.
Presently a servant announced no other than these very two men Dong Cheng just mentioned.
“This is providential,” said Dong Cheng, and he told Wang Zifu to hide behind a screen.
The two guests were led into the library, and after the exchange of the ordinary civilities and a cup of tea, Chong Ji referred to the incident at the hunt and the shooting of the stag.
“Were you not angry at that?” said Chong Ji.
Dong Cheng answered, “Though we be angry, what can we do?” Wu Shi struck in, saying, “I would slay this fellow, I swear, but I cannot get any one to back me up.” “One should perish for one's country; one should not mind,” said Chong Ji.
At this moment Wang Zifu appeared from behind the screen, saying, “You two want to kill Cao Cao! I shall have to let him know this.
And Uncle Dong Cheng is my witness.” “A loyal minister does not mind death.
If we are killed, we will be Han ghosts, which is better than being sycophants of a traitor,” said Chong Ji, angrily.
Dong Cheng said, “We were just saying we wanted to see you two on this matter.
Wang Zifu is only joking.” Then he drew forth the decree and showed it to the two newcomers, who also wept as they read it.
They were asked to add their names to the silk roll.
Wang Zifu said, “Wait here a few moments till I get Wu Zilan to come.” He left the room and very soon returned with his friend, who also wrote his name in the presence of all the others.
After this they went into one of the inner chambers to drink success to the new plot.
While there, a new visitor, Ma Teng, Governor of Xiliang, was announced.
“Say I am indisposed,” said the host, “and cannot receive visitors.” The doorkeeper took the message, whereat Ma Teng angrily said, “Last night at the Donghua Gate, I saw him come out in robe and girdle. How can he pretend illness today?
I am not come from mere idleness, why does he refuse to see me?” The doorkeeper went in again and told his master what the visitor had said and that he was very angry.
Then Dong Cheng rose, excused himself saying he would soon return, and went to receive Ma Teng.
After the visitor had saluted and they were both seated, Ma Teng said, “I have just come from a farewell audience and wished to bid you adieu.
Why did you want to put me off?” “My poor body was taken suddenly ill; that is why I was not waiting to welcome you,” said Dong Cheng.
“You do not look as if you were ill; your face wears the very bloom of health,” said Ma Teng bluntly. His host could say no more and was silent. The visitor shook out his sleeves and rose to depart.
He sighed deeply as he walked down the steps, saying to himself, “Not one of them is any good; there is no one to save the country.” This speech sank deeply into Dong Cheng's heart.
He stopped his guest, saying, “Who is no good to save the country? Whom do you mean?” “That incident at the hunt the other day, the shooting of the stag, filled my breast with anger.
But if you, a near relative of the Emperor, can pass your time in wine and idle dalliance without a thought of doing away with rebellion, where can any one be found who will save the dynasty?” However, Dong Cheng doubts were not set at rest.
Pretending great surprise, he replied, “The Prime Minister is of high rank and has the confidence of the court; why then do you utter such things?” “So you find that wretch Cao Cao a good man, eh?” “Pray speak lower; there are eyes and ears very near us.” “The sort of people who covet life and fear death are not those to discuss any great undertaking.” So saying, Ma Teng rose to go sway. By this time his host's doubts were set at rest; he felt that Ma Teng was loyal and patriotic.
So Dong Cheng said, “Do not be angry any more.
I will show you something.” Whereupon he invited Ma Teng to go into the room where the others were seated and then showed him the decree.
As Ma Teng read it, his hair stood on end; he ground his teeth and bit his lips till the blood came. “When you move, remember the whole force of my army is ready to help,” said Ma Teng.
Dong Cheng introduced him to the other conspirators, and then the pledge was produced, and Ma Teng was told to sign his name.
He did so, at the same time smearing the blood as a sign of the oath and saying, “I swear to die rather than betray this pledge.” Pointing to the five he said, “We require ten for this business, and we can accomplish our design.” “We cannot get many true and loyal people.
One of the wrong sort will spoil all,” said Dong Cheng.
Ma Teng told them to bring in the list of officials.
He read on till he came to the name Liu, of the imperial clan, when clapping his hands he cried, “Why not consult him?” “Whom?” cried they altogether.
Ma Teng very slowly and deliberately spoke his name.
To a very trusty servant comes an Emperor's decree, And a scion of the ruling house can prove his loyalty.
If the readers turns to the next chapter, they will see whom Ma Teng talked about. CHAPTER 21.
In A Plum Garden, Cao Cao Discusses Heroes; Using The Host's Forces, Guan Yu Takes Xuzhou. “Who is it?” was the question on the lips of the conspirators.
Ma Teng's reply was, “The Imperial Protector of Yuzhou, Liu Bei.
He is here and we will ask him to help.” “Though he is an uncle of the Emperor, he is at present a partisan of our enemy, and he will not join,” said Dong Cheng. “But I saw something at the hunt,” said Ma Teng. “When Cao Cao advanced to acknowledge the congratulations due to the Emperor, Liu Bei's sworn brother Guan Yu was behind him, and grasped his sword as if to cut down Cao Cao. However, Liu Bei signed to him to hold his hand and he did.
Liu Bei would willingly destroy Cao Cao, only he thinks Cao Cao's teeth and claws are too many.
You must ask Liu Bei, and he will surely consent.” Here Wu Shi urged caution, saying, “Do not go too fast. Let us consider the thing most carefully.” They dispersed.
Next day after dark Dong Cheng went to Liu Bei's lodging taking with him the decree.
As soon as Dong Cheng was announced, Liu Bei came to greet him and led him into a private room where they could talk freely. The two younger brothers were there as well.
“It must be something unusually important that has brought Uncle Dong Cheng here tonight,” said Liu Bei.
“If I had ridden forth by daylight, Cao Cao might have suspected something, so I came by night.” Wine was brought in, and while they were drinking Dong Cheng said, “Why did you check your brother the other day at the hunt, when he was going to attack Cao Cao?” Liu Bei was startled and said, “How did you know?” “Nobody noticed but I saw.” Liu Bei could not prevaricate and said, “It was the presumption of the man that made my brother so angry; Guan Yu could not help it.” The visitor covered his face and wept.
“Ah,” said he, “if all the court ministers were like Guan Yu, there would be no sighs for lack of tranquillity.” Now Liu Bei felt that possibly Cao Cao had sent his visitor to try him, so he cautiously replied, “Where are the sighs for lack of tranquillity while Cao Cao is at the head of affairs?” Dong Cheng changed color and rose from his seat.
“You, Sir, are a relative of His Majesty, and so I showed you my inmost feelings.
Why did you mislead me?” But Liu Bei said, “Because I feared you might be misleading me, and I wanted to find out.” At this Dong Cheng drew out the decree he had received and showed it. His host was deeply moved.
Then Dong Cheng produced the pledge.
There were only six names to it, and these were Dong Cheng, Wang Zifu, Chong Ji, Wu Shi, Wu Zilan, and Ma Teng.
“Since you have a decree like this, I cannot but do my share,” said Liu Bei, and at Dong Cheng's request he added his name and signature to the others and handed it back.
“Now let us but get three more, which will make ten, and we shall be ready to act.” “But you must move with great caution and not let this get abroad,” said Liu Bei.
The two remained talking till an early hour in the morning when the visitor left.
Now in order to put Cao Cao quite off the scent that any plot against him was in progress, Liu Bei began to devote himself to gardening, planting vegetables, and watering them with his own hands. Guan Yu and Zhang Fei ventured to remonstrate with him for taking to such an occupation when great matters needed attention.
“The reason for this you may not know,” replied he.
And they said no more. One day when the two brothers were absent, and Liu Bei was busy in his garden, two generals of Cao Cao, Xu Chu and Zhang Liao, with an escort came from Cao Cao, saying, “The command of the Prime Minister is that you come at once.” “What important affair is afoot?” asked Liu Bei nervously. “We know nothing; we were ordered to come and request your presence.” All he could do was to follow.
When he arrived, Cao Cao met him and laughingly said, “That is a big business you have in hand at home.” This remark made Liu Bei turn the color of clay.
Cao Cao took him by the hand and led him straight to the private garden, saying, “The growth of vegetables that you are trying to learn is very difficult.” Liu Bei breathed again.
He said, “That is hardly a business; it is only a solace.” Cao Cao said, “I happened to notice the green plums on the trees today, and suddenly my thoughts went back to a year ago when we were thrashing Zhang Xiu. We were marching through a parched county, and every one was suffering from thirst.
Suddenly I lifted my whip, and pointing at something in the distance I said, 'Look at those fruitful plum trees in the forest ahead.' The soldiers heard it, and it made their mouths water.
Seeing the plums kindles my appreciation. I owe something to the plums, and we will repay it today.
I ordered the servants to heat some wine very hot and sent to invite you to share it.” Liu Bei was quite composed by this time and no longer suspected any sinister design.
He went with his host to a small spring pavilion in a plum garden, where the wine cups were already laid out and green plums filled the dishes.
They sat down to a confidential talk and free enjoyment of their wine.
As they drank, the weather gradually changed, clouds gathering and threatening rain.
The servants pointed out a mass of cloud that looked like a dragon hung in the sky. Both host and guest leaned over the balcony looking at it.
“Do you understand the evolution of dragons?” asked Cao Cao of the guest.
“Not in detail.” “A dragon can assume any size, can rise in glory or hide from sight.
Bulky, it generates clouds and evolves mist; attenuated, it can scarcely hide a mustard stalk or conceal a shadow.
Mounting, it can soar to the empyrean; subsiding, it lurks in the uttermost depths of the ocean.
This is the midspring season, and the dragon chooses this moment for its transformations like a person realizing own desires and overrunning the world.
The dragon among animals compares with the hero among humans. You, General, have traveled all lakes and rivers; you must know who are the heroes of the present day, and I wish you would say who they are.” “I am just a common dullard; how can I know such things?” “Do not be so modest.” “Thanks to your kindly protection I have a post at court.
But as to heroes I really do not know who they are.” “You may not have looked upon their faces, but you have heard their names.” “Yuan Shu of the South of River Huai, with his strong army and abundant resources; is he one?” His host laughed, “A rotting skeleton in a graveyard. I shall put him out of the way shortly.” “Well, Yuan Shao then.
The highest offices of state have been held in his family for four generations, and his clients are many in the empire.
He is firmly posted in Jizhou, and he commands the services of many able people. Surely he is one.” “A bully, but a coward; he is fond of grandiose schemes, but is devoid of decision; he makes for great things but grudges the necessary sacrifice.
He loses sight of everything else in view of a little present advantage.
He is not one.” “There is Liu Biao of Jingzhou. He is renowned as a man of perfection, whose fame has spread on all sides.
Surely he is a hero.” “He is a mere semblance, a man of vain reputation. No; not he.” “Sun Ce is a sturdy sort, the chief of all in the South Land.
Is he a hero?” “He has profited by the reputation of his father, Sun Jian; he is not a real hero.” “What of Liu Zhang of Yiazhou?” “Though he is of the reigning family, he is nothing more than a watch dog.
How could you make a hero of him?” “What about Zhang Xiu, Zhang Lu, Han Sui, and all those leaders?” Cao Cao clapped his hands and laughed very loudly, saying, “Paltry people like them are not worth mentioning.” “With these exceptions I really know none.” “Now heroes are the ones who cherish lofty designs in their bosoms and have plans to achieve them; they have all-embracing schemes, and the whole world is at their mercy.” “Who is such a person?” said Liu Bei.
Cao Cao pointed his finger first at his guest and then at himself, saying, “The only heroes in the world are you and I.” Liu Bei gasped, and the spoon and chopsticks rattled to the floor.
Now just at that moment the storm burst with a tremendous peal of thunder and rush of rain. Liu Bei stooped down to recover the fallen articles, saying, “What a shock! And it was quite close.” “What!
Are you afraid of thunder?” said Cao Cao.
Liu Bei replied, “The Sage One paled at a sudden peal of thunder or fierce gust of wind.
Why should one not fear?” Thus he glossed over the real fact, that it was the words he had heard that had so startled him.
Constrained to lodge in a tiger's lair, He played a waiting part, But when Cao Cao talked of breaking humans, Then terror gripped his heart.
But he cleverly used the thunder peal As excuse for turning pale; O quick to seize occasions thus! He surely must prevail.
The shower had passed, and there appeared two men rushing through the garden, both armed.
In spite of the attendants, they forced their way to the pavilion where sat the two friends. They were Guan Yu and Zhang Fei.
The two brothers had been outside the city at archery practice when Cao Cao's invitation had come so peremptorily. On their return they heard that two officers had arrived and led away Liu Bei to the Prime Minister.
They hastened to his palace and were told their brother was with his host in the grounds, and they feared something had happened. So they rushed in.
Now when they saw their brother quietly talking with Cao Cao and enjoying a cup of wine, they took up their usual places and meekly stood waiting.
“Why did you come?” said Cao Cao.
“We heard that you, Sir, had invited our brother to a wine party, and we came to amuse you with a little sword play,” said they.
“This is not a Hongmen Banquet,” replied Cao Cao. “What use have we for Xiang Chang and Xiang Ba of old?
1” Liu Bei smiled.
The host ordered wine to be served to the two “Fan Kuais” to allay their anxiety and, soon after, the three took their leave and returned homeward. “We were nearly frightened to death,” said Guan Yu.
The story of the dropped chopsticks was told.
The two asked what their brother intended by his actions. “My learning gardening was to convince Cao Cao of my perfect simplicity and the absence of any ambition.
But when he suddenly pointed to me as one of the heroes, I was startled, for I thought he had some suspicions.
Happily the thunder at that moment supplied the excuse I wanted.” “Really you are very clever,” said they.
Next day Cao Cao again invited Liu Bei and while the two were drinking, Man Chong, who had been dispatched to find out what Yuan Shao was doing, came to present his report.
He said, “Gongsun Zan has been completely defeated by Yuan Shao.” “Do you know the details?
I should like to know how,” interrupted Liu Bei.
“They were at war, and Gongsun Zan got the worst of it, so he acted on the defensive, building a high wall about his army and on that erecting a high tower, which he called the Yijing Tower. Therein he placed all his grain, one hundred thousand carts total, and took up his own quarters.
His fighting troops passed in and out without ceasing, some going out to give battle, others returning to rest. One of them was surrounded and sent to ask Gongsun Zan to rescue him.
Gongsun Zan said, 'If I rescue him, hereafter every one will want to be helped and will not exert himself.' So Gongsun Zan did not go.
This disgusted his soldiers, and many deserted to the enemy so that his army diminished.
He sent letters to the capital to crave help, but the messenger was captured.
He sent to Zhang Yan to arrange with him for a two-pronged joint attack, and those letters with the plans also fell into Yuan Shao's hands; and the plans were adopted by Yuan Shao, who gave the signals agreed upon.
Thus Gongsun Zan fell into an ambush, lost heavily, and retreated into the city.
There he was besieged, and a subterranean passage was pierced into the tower where he lodged. The tower was set on fire, and Gongsun Zan could not escape. So he slew his wife and little ones and hanged himself.
The flames destroyed the bodies of the whole family.
“Yuan Shao has added the remnants of the vanquished army to his own and so become yet stronger.
His brother Yuan Shu in the South of River Huai, however, has become so arrogant and cruel that the people have turned against him.
Then Yuan Shu had sent to say he would yield the title of Emperor, which he had assumed, in favor of Yuan Shao.
Yuan Shao demanded the Imperial Hereditary Seal also, and Yuan Shu promised to bring it in person. Now Yuan Shu has abandoned River Huai and is about to move to the North of Yellow River.
If he succeeded, the two brothers will control adjoining regions and be dangerous.” It was a sad story, and Liu Bei remembered with sorrow that, in the days of success and prosperity, the dead chieftain, Gongsun Zan, had pushed his interest and shown him much kindness.
Moreover he was anxious to know the fate of Zhao Yun.
In his heart he thought, “What better chance am I likely to get of setting myself free?” So Liu Bei rose and said to Cao Cao, “If Yuan Shu goes over to join his brother, he will surely pass through Xuzhou. I beg you to give me an army with which to smite him on the way.
That will finish Yuan Shu.” “Memorialize the Emperor tomorrow, and I will give you an army,” said Cao Cao.
So next day Liu Bei went to an audience, and Cao Cao gave him command of fifty thousand horse and foot, and sent Generals Zhu Ling and Lu Zhao with him.
At parting with Liu Bei, the Emperor shed tears.
As soon as Liu Bei reached his lodging, he set about preparations for immediate departure, taking his seal as General and preparing his weapons.
Dong Cheng went three miles away from the city to bid him farewell.
“You must not mind my going; this journey will assuredly help on the scheme,” said Liu Bei.
“Keep your mind fixed on that,” said Dong Cheng, “and never forget what His Majesty requires of us.” They parted.
Presently his brothers asked him why he was in such a hurry to get away. Liu Bei replied, “I have been a bird in a cage, a fish in a net.
This is like the fish regaining the open sea and the bird soaring into the blue sky.
I suffered much from the confinement.” Then he ordered Zhu Ling and Lu Zhao to march the troops faster. Now Guo Jia and Cheng Yu had been absent inspecting stores and supplies when Liu Bei left. As soon as they heard of his expedition, they went in to see their master, asking him why he had let Liu Bei go in command of an army.
“He is going to cut off Yuan Shu,” replied Cao Cao.
“Formerly, when he was Imperial Protector of Yuzhou, we recommended that he should be put to death, but you would not hear of it.
Now you have given him an army. You have allowed the dragon to reach the sea, the tiger to return to the mountains.
What control will you have in future?” So spoke Cheng Yu; and Guo Jia followed in the same strain, saying, “Even if you would not put him to death, you need not have let him go.
As the proverb says, 'Relax opposition for one day and age-long harm ensues.' You must admit the truth of this.” Cao Cao recognized that these were prudent counsels, so he sent Xu Chu with five hundred horsemen and imperative orders to bring Liu Bei back again.
Liu Bei was marching as rapidly as possible when he noticed a cloud of dust in the rear and remarked to his brothers, “Surely they are pursuing us.” He halted and made a stockade, and ordered his brothers to be in readiness, one on each flank.
Presently the messenger arrived and found himself in the midst of an army ready for battle. Xu Chu dismounted and entered the camp to speak with Liu Bei.
“Sir, on what business have you come?” asked Liu Bei.
“The Prime Minister has sent me to request you to return as he has further matters to discuss with you.” “When a general has once taken the field, even the royal command is of no effect.
I bade farewell to the Emperor, I received the Prime Minister's commands, and there can be nothing further to talk about.
You may return forthwith and take that as my reply.” Xu Chu was undecided what action to take.
He thought, “The Prime Minister cherishes a friendship with Liu Bei, and I have no orders to kill.
I can only return with this reply and ask further instructions.” So Xu Chu left.
When he related what had occurred, Cao Cao still hesitated to take any action.
“This refusal to return means enmity,” said Cheng Yu and Guo Jia.
“Still, two of my people are with him,” said Cao Cao.
“He will not dare do anything unfriendly, I think. Beside, I sent him and I cannot go back on my own orders.” So Liu Bei was not pursued.
He took his arms, he fed his steed, And fared forth willingly, Intent to accomplish his King's behest Deep graven on his memory.
At least he had broken out of his cage, He heard not the tiger's roar, He had shaken the shackles from his feet, As a dragon on high could soar.
As soon as Ma Teng heard that Liu Bei had set forth, he reported that pressing business called him and marched back to his own region, Xiliang.
When Liu Bei reached Xuzhou, the Imperial Protector Deputy, Che Zhou, came to meet him.
When the official banquet was over, Sun Qian and Mi Zhu paid their visit to Che Zhou. Then Liu Bei proceeded to his residence to greet his family.
Scouts were sent out to see what Yuan Shu was doing. They came back with the intelligence:
“Yuan Shu's arrogance had driven away his generals, Lei Bo and Chen Lan, who had returned to their mountain fastness in Mount Song.
His forces thus reduced, he wrote resigning the imperial style he had assumed in favor of his brother Yuan Shao, who at once commanded his presence.
Thereupon he packed up the palace fittings he had made, got the remnants of his army in order, and marched west.” When Yuan Shu neared Xuzhou, Liu Bei led out his force of fifty thousand soldiers and four generals—Guan Yu, Zhang Fei, Zhu Ling, and Lu Zhao. Yuan Shu sent out Ji Ling to force a way through.
But Zhang Fei opposed him and attacked without a parley. In the tenth bout Zhang Fei cut down Ji Ling.
The defeated troops fled in all directions.
Then Yuan Shu came up with his own army.
Liu Bei placed Zhu Ling and Lu Zhao in command of the left wing, Guan Yu and Zhang Fei the right wing, and himself in the center, and so met Yuan Shu. As soon as the enemy came near, Liu Bei began to abuse him, crying, “O rebellious one, and wicked, I have a command to destroy you.
Yield, then, with good grace and so escape your punishment!” “Base weaver of mats and mean maker of straw sandals!
How dare you make light of me?” replied Yuan Shu, and he gave the signal for an attack. Liu Bei retired, and his generals from the flanks closed in.
They smote the army of Yuan Shu till corpses littered the plain and blood flowed in streams. At the same time Yuan Shu's former generals, Lei Bo and Chen Lan from Mount Song, attacked the baggage train and completed the destruction.
Yuan Shu tried to retreat to Shouchun, but Lei Bo and Chen Lan barred the road.
Yuan Shu sought refuge in Jiangling, with one thousand troops left of all his army. And these were the weakly ones able neither to fight nor flee.
It was then the height of summer, and their food was nearly exhausted. The whole provision consisted of thirty carts of wheat.
This was made over to the soldiers, and the members of his household went hungry. Many died of actual starvation.
Yuan Shu could not swallow the coarse food that the soldiers lived on. One day he bade his cook bring him some honeyed water to quench his thirst.
“There is no water, save that tainted with blood,” replied the cook. “Where can I get honeyed water?” This was the last straw.
Yuan Shu sat up on his couch and rolled out on the floor with a loud cry. Blood gushed from his mouth and thus he died.
It was the sixth month of the fourth year of Rebuilt Tranquillity .
The last days of Han approached and weapons clashed in every quarter, The misguided Yuan Shu, lost to all sense of honor, Forgetful of his forefathers, who had filled the state's highest offices, Madly aspired to become himself Emperor, Resting his outrageous claim on the possession of the Seal, And arrogantly boasting that thus he fulfilled the design of Heaven.
Sick unto death he vainly begged for a little honeyed water; He died, alone.
Yuan Shu being dead, his nephew, Yuan Yin, taking his coffin and his wife and children, sought shelter in Lujiang. There the Magistrate, Xu Liu, slew all the survivors.
Among the possessions Xu Liu found the Imperial Hereditary Seal, which he at once took to the capital and presented to Cao Cao, for which service he was made Governor of Gaoling.
Since then the Imperial Hereditary Seal belonged to Cao Cao.
When Liu Bei heard that Yuan Shu was dead, he prepared a report to the Throne, and sent it to Cao Cao. He sent the two generals deputed by Cao Cao, Zhu Ling and Lu Zhao, back to the capital, keeping the army to defend Xuzhou.
He also personally went through the countryside commanding the people to resume their ordinary avocations.
Cao Cao was angry when his two officers returned without their man and was going to put them to death. Xun Yu reasoned with him.
“The power was in Liu Bei's hands, and so these two had no alternative,” said Xun Yu.
So they were pardoned.
“You should instruct Che Zhou, the Imperial Protector Deputy, to try to destroy him,” said Xun Yu.
Accordingly he sent secret orders to Che Zhou, who took Chen Deng into his confidence and asked his advice.
Chen Deng said, “That is easy.
Liu Bei is outside the city, and an ambush in the city gate to attack him on his return from the country will be final; I will attack the escort with arrows from the city walls.” Che Zhou agreed to try this.
Then Chen Deng went to his father to tell him. Chen Gui bade him go and warn the intended victim.
Chen Deng at once rode away to do so.
Before long he met Guan Yu and Zhang Fei, to whom he told his story. Now Liu Bei was following some distance behind.
As soon as Zhang Fei heard of the plot, he wanted to attack the ambush, but Guan Yu proposed another plan.
Said he, “Attacking the ambush will be a failure, since we are without the walls. And I think we can compass the death of Che Zhou.
In the night we will pretend to be some of Cao Cao's soldiers and entice him out to meet us. We will slay him.” Zhang Fei approved of the plan.
Now the soldiers still had some of Cao Cao's army banners and wore similar armor.
About the third watch they came to the city wall and hailed the gate.
Those on guard asked who they were. The men replied that they were Zhang Liao's troops sent from the capital.
This was told Che Zhou who sent hastily for Chen Deng to ask his advice. “If I do not receive them, they will suspect my loyalty,” said Che Zhou.
“Yet if I go out, I may be victim of a ruse.” So he went up on the wall and said, “It is too dark to distinguish friends from foes.
You must wait till daylight.” “If Liu Bei know our presence, he will attack,” shouted back the soldiers. And they begged him to let them in. Still Che Zhou hesitated.
They shouted louder than ever to open the gate.
Presently Che Zhou girded on his armor, placed himself at the head of one thousand cavalry and went out.
He galloped over the bridge, shouting, “Where is Zhang Liao?” Then lights blazed around, and he recognized Guan Yu with his sword drawn. “Wretch!” cried Guan Yu. “You would plot to slay my brother, would you?” Che Zhou was too frightened to make good defense, and he turned to reenter the gate.
But as he reached the drawbridge, Chen Deng shot out flights of arrows, wherefore Che Zhou turned aside and galloped along under the wall. But Guan Yu came quickly in pursuit.
His sword was raised aloft, and as it came down, Che Zhou fell to the earth.
Guan Yu cut off his head and returned, shouting, “I have slain the traitor. You others need not fear if you only surrender.” They threw aside their spears and gave in. As soon as the excitement had calmed, Guan Yu took the head to show Liu Bei and told him the story of the plot. “But what will Cao Cao think of this?” said Liu Bei.
“And he may come.” “If he does, we can meet him,” said Guan Yu. But Liu Bei was grieved beyond measure.
When he entered the city, the elders of the people knelt in the road to welcome him.
When he reached his residence, he found that Zhang Fei had already exterminated the family of Che Zhou.
Liu Bei said, “We have slain one of Cao Cao's best officers, and how will he stand that?” “Never mind!” cried Chen Deng.
“I have a plan.” Just from grave danger extricated, A looming war must be placated.
The plan proposed by Chen Deng will be disclosed next. CHAPTER 22.
Yuan Shao And Cao Cao Both Take The Field; Guan Yu And Zhang Fei Captures Two Generals. This was the plan proposed to Liu Bei, “Yuan Shao is Cao Cao's terror.
He is strongly posted in an extensive territory of four regions—Jizhou, Qingzhou, Youzhou, and Bingzhou—with one million fighting soldiers and numerous able officers.
Write letters and pray him rescue you.” Liu Bei replied, “But we have never had any dealings with each other, and he is unlikely to do such a thing for one who has just destroyed his brother.” “There is some one here whose family have been on intimate terms with the Yuans for a hundred years.
Yuan Shao would surely come if he wrote.” “And who is this?” “A man you know well and respect greatly; can you not guess?” “You surely mean Zheng Xuan,” said Liu Bei suddenly.
“That is he,” said Chen Deng smiling.
Now Zheng Xuan was a student and a man of great talent, who had long studied under the famed teacher Ma Rong, whose knowledge of the Book of Odes was universally recognized.
Whenever Ma Rong lectured, he let fall a curtain behind which were a circle of singing girls. The students were assembled in front of this curtain.
Zheng Xuan attended these lectures for three years and never once let his eyes wander to the curtain. Naturally the master admired his pupil.
After Zheng Xuan had finished his studies and gone home, Ma Rong praised him to the others, saying, “Only one man has penetrated the inner meaning of my instructions, and that one is Zheng Xuan.” In Zheng Xuan's household, the waiting maids were familiar with the Book of Odes.
Once one of the maids opposed Zheng Xuan's wishes, so as punishment she was made to kneel in front of the steps. Another girl made fun of her, quoting from an ode:
“What are you doing there in the mire?” The kneeling girl capped the verse from another ode, quoted she:
“That was but a simple word I said, Yet brought it wrath upon my head.” Such was the family in which Zheng Xuan had been born.
In the reign of the Emperor Huan, he rose to the rank of Chair of the Secretariat.
But when the Ten Eunuchs began to control the government, he gave up office and retired into the country to Xuzhou.
Liu Bei had known him before, had consulted him on many occasions, and greatly respected him.
Liu Bei was glad that he had remembered this man, and without loss of time, in company with Chen Deng, he went to Zheng Xuan's house to ask him to draft this letter, which Zheng Xuan generously consented to do.
Sun Qian was entrusted with the task of delivery and set out at once. Yuan Shao read it and considered the matter long before speaking.
“Liu Bei destroyed my brother, and I ought not to help him, but out of consideration for the writer of this letter I must.” Thereupon Yuan Shao assembled his officers to consider an attack upon Cao Cao.
Adviser Tian Feng said, “Do not raise an army. The people are worn out, and the granaries are empty with these constant wars. Let us rather report the recent victory of Gongsun Zan to the Throne.
If that does not reach the Emperor, then memorialize that Cao Cao is hindering the government. Then raise an army:
occupy Liyang, assemble a Yellow River fleet in Henan, prepare weapons, send out your various divisions, and within three years you will win all round.” Adviser Shen Pei replied, “I do not agree.
The military genius of our illustrious lord having overcome the hordes of the north, to dispose of Cao Cao is as simple as turning one's hand; it is not a matter of months.” Adviser Ju Shou said, “Victory is not always to the many.
Cao Cao's discipline is excellent; his soldiers are brave and well drilled. He will not sit down quietly waiting to be surrounded as Gongsun Zan did.
Now you abandon the intention to inform the Throne of our success, which I find a good plan, but you intend to send out an army without any valid excuse.
Our lord should not do that.” Then followed adviser Guo Tu, saying, “You are wrong.
No expedition against Cao Cao can lack excuse.
But if our master would take the chance now offering itself of coming into his own, he will accede to the request in the letter of Zheng Xuan and ally himself with Liu Bei for the destruction of Cao Cao.
This would win the approval of Heaven and the affections of the people, a double blessing.” Thus the four advisers differed and wrangled, and Yuan Shao could not decide which to follow.
Then there came two others, Xu You and Xun Shen, and, seeing them, Yuan Shao said, “You two have wide experience, how would you decide?” The two made their obeisance, and Yuan Shao said, “A letter from Zheng Xuan the Chair has arrived, counseling me to support Liu Bei in an attack on Cao Cao.
Now am I to send an army or not send an army?” They both cried with one voice, “Send!
Your armies are numerous enough and strong enough; you will destroy a traitor and help the dynasty.” “Your words just express my desire,” said Yuan Shao and thenceforward the discussion turned on the expedition.
First, Liu Bei's legate, Sun Qian, was sent back with Yuan Shao's consent and instructions for Liu Bei to make ready to cooperate.
Second, Yuan Shao assigned Shen Pei and Peng Ji as Commanding Generals; Tian Feng, Xun Shen, and Xu You as Military Advisers; Yan Liang and Wen Chou as Generals. The army was to be composed of three hundred thousand, horse and foot in equal numbers. They were to march on Liyang.
When the arrangements were complete, Guo Tu went to his chief, saying, “In order to manifest the righteousness of your attack on Cao Cao, it would be well to issue a manifesto with a summary of his various crimes.” Yuan Shao approved of this, and Chen Lin, well known as a scholar, was entrusted to compose such a document.
Chen Lin had been the Court Secretary in the reign of the late Emperor Ling.
When Dong Zhuo unseated Regent Marshal He Jin, Chen Lin sought safety in Jizhou. This is the manifesto:
“A perspicacious ruler wisely provides against political vicissitudes; a loyal minister carefully foresees the difficulties in the assertion of authority.
Wherefore a person of unusual parts precedes an extraordinary situation, and of such a person the achievements will be extraordinary.
For indeed the ordinary person is quite unequal to an extraordinary situation.
“In former days, after having gained ascendancy over a weakling emperor of the powerful Qin Dynasty, Prime Minister Zhao Gao wielded the whole authority of the Throne, overruling the government.
All dignity and fortune came through him, and his contemporaries were restrained so that none dared to speak openly.
Slowly but surely evolved the tragedy of the Wangyi Palace, when the Emperor was slain and the Imperial Tablets perished in the flames. Zhao Gao, the author of these crimes, has ever since been held up to obloquy as the arch example of an evil doer. “In the later days of Empress Lu of the Hans, after the death of the Supreme Ancestor, the world saw Lu Chan and Lu Lu, brothers of the Empress and fellows in wickedness, monopolizing the powers of government.
Within the capital, they commanded two armies, and without they ruled the feudal states of Liang and Zhao.
They arbitrarily controlled all state affairs and decided all questions in the council chamber and the court.
This dominance of the base and declension of the noble continued till the hearts of the people grew cold within them.
“Thereupon Zhou Bo, Lord of Jiang, and Liu Zhang, Lord of Zhuxu, asserted their dignity and let loose their wrath. They destroyed the contumacious ministers and restored their ruler to his royal state. Thus they enabled the kingly way to be reestablished and the glory to be manifested. Here are two instances where ministers asserted their authority.
“This Cao Cao, now Minister of Works, forsooth, had for ancestor a certain eunuch named Cao Teng, fitting companion of Xu Huang and Zuo Guan. All three were prodigies of wickedness and insatiably avaricious and, let loose on the world, they hindered ethical progress and preyed upon the populace.
This Cao Teng begged for and adopted Cao Cao's father who, by wholesale bribery, wagons of gold and cartloads of jewels presented at the gates of the influential, contrived to sneak his way into considerable office where he could subvert authority.
Thus Cao Cao is the depraved bantling of a monstrous excrescence, devoid of all virtue in himself, ferocious and cunning, delighting in disorder and reveling in public calamity.
“Now I, Yuan Shao, a man of war, have mustered my armies and displayed my might that I may sweep away and destroy the evil opponents of government.
I have already had to deal with Dong Zhuo, the ruffian who invaded the official circle and wrested the government.
At that time I grasped my sword and beat the drums to restore order in the east. I assembled warriors, selected the best, and took them into my service.
In this matter I came into relations with this Cao Cao and conferred with him to further my scheme. I gave him command of a subordinate force and looked to him to render such petty service as he was equal to.
I suffered his stupidities and condoned his shortcomings, his rash attacks and facile retreats, his losses and shameful defeats, his repeated destruction of whole armies. Again and again I sent him more troops and filled the gaps in his depleted ranks. I even addressed a memorial to the Throne for him to be appointed Imperial Protector of Yanzhou. I made him feel as he were a tiger. I added to his honors and increased his authority, hoping that eventually he would justify himself by a victory against Dong Zhuo such as Qin used Meng Ming against Jin.
“But Cao Cao availed himself of the opportunity to overstep all bounds, to give free rein to violence and evil. He stripped the common people, outraged the good, and injured the virtuous.
Bian Rang, Governor of Jiujiang, was a man of conspicuous talent and of world-wide reputation.
He was honest in speech and correct in demeanor. He spoke without flattery.
Cao Cao put him to death and his head was exposed, and his family utterly destroyed.
From that day to this scholars have deeply mourned, and popular resentment has steadily grown.
One person raised his arm in anger and the whole countryside followed him.
Whereupon Cao Cao was smitten at Xuzhou, and his territory was snatched by Lu Bu.
He fled eastward without shelter or refuge.
“My policy is a strong trunk and weak branches, a commanding central government and obedient feudal lords. Also I am no partisan. Therefore I again raised my banners, donned my armor, and moved forward to attack. My drums rolled for an assault on Lu Bu, and his multitudes incontinently fled.
I saved Cao Cao from destruction and restored him to a position of authority.
Wherein I must confess to showing no kindness to the people of Yanzhou, although it was a great matter for Cao Cao. “Later it happened that the imperial cortege moved west, and a horde of rebels of Dong Zhuo's faction rose and attacked. The course of government was hindered. At that moment my territory was threatened from the north, and I could not leave it.
Wherefore I sent one of my officers, Xu Xun, to Cao Cao to see to the repair of the dynastic temples and the protection of the youthful sovereign. Thereupon Cao Cao gave the rein to his inclinations.
He arbitrarily ordered the removal of the court.
He brought shame upon the Ruling House and subverted the laws.
He engrossed the chairmanship of the three highest offices and monopolized the control of the administration.
Offices and rewards were conferred according to his will; punishment was at his word.
He glorified whole families of those he loved; he exterminated whole clans of those he hated.
Open critics were executed; secret opponents were assassinated.
Officials locked their lips; wayfarers only exchanged glances.
Chairs of boards recorded levies, and every government official held a sinecure.
“The late Yang Biao, a man who had filled two of the highest offices of state as Chairs of two boards, because of some petty grudge was, though guiltless, charged with a crime. He was beaten and suffered every form of cruelty.
This arbitrary and impulsive act was a flagrant disregard of constitutional rules.
“Another victim was the Counselor Zhao Yan. He was faithful in remonstrance, honest in speech, endowed with the highest principles of rectitude. He was listened to at court. His words carried enough weight with the Emperor to cause him to modify his intention and confer reward for outspokenness.
Desirous of diverting all power into his own hands and stifle all criticism, Cao Cao presumed to arrest and put to death this censor, in defiance of all legal procedures.
“Another evil deed was the destruction of the tomb of Prince Xiao of Liang, the brother of the late Emperor.
His tomb should certainly have been respected, even its mulberries and sweetgum trees, its cypresses and its pines.
Cao Cao led soldiers to the cemetery and stood by while it was desecrated, the coffin destroyed and the poor corpse exposed. They stole the gold and jewels of the dead.
This deed brought tears to the eyes of the Emperor and rent the hearts of all people.
Cao Cao also appointed new offices—Commander Who Opens Grave Mounds and General Who Seeks for Gold—whose tracks were marked by desecrated graves and exhumed bodies.
Indeed, while assuming the position of the highest officer of state, he indulged the inclination of a bandit, polluting the empire, oppressing the people, a bane to gods and humans.
“He added to this by setting up minute and vexatious prohibitions so that there were nets and snares spread in every pathway, traps and pitfalls laid in every road.
A hand raised was caught in a net, a foot advanced was taken in an entanglement. Wherefore the people of his regions, Yanzhou and Yuzhou, waxed desperate and the inhabitants of the metropolis groaned and murmured in anger.
“Read down the names through all the years Of ministers that all humans curse For greed and cruelty and lust; Than Cao Cao you will not find a worse.
“I have investigated the cases of evil deeds in the regions, but I have been unable to reform him.
I have given him repeated opportunities hoping that he would repent.
But he has the heart of a wolf, the nature of a wild beast. He nourishes evil in his bosom and desires to pull down the pillars of the state, to weaken the House of Han, to destroy the loyal and true, and to stand himself conspicuous as the chiefest of criminals.
“Formerly, when I attacked the north, Gongsun Zan, that obstinate bandit and perverse brave, resisted my might for a year.
Before Gongsun Zan could be destroyed, this Cao Cao wrote to him that, under the pretense of assisting my loyal armies, he would covertly lead them to destruction. The plot was discovered through his messengers, and Gongsun Zan also perished.
This blunted Cao Cao's ardor, and his plans failed.
“Now he is camped at the Ao Granaries, with the Yellow River to strengthen his position. Like the mantis in the story, who threatened the chariot with its forelegs, he thinks himself terrible.
But with the dignity and prestige of Han to support me, I confront the whole world.
I have spearmen by millions, horsemen by hundreds of thousands, fierce and vigorous warriors strong as Chong Huang and Wu Huo, those heroes of antiquity.
I have enlisted expert archers and strong bowmen.
In Bingzhou my armies have crossed the Taihang Range, and in Qingzhou they have forded River Ji and River Ta.
They have coasted down the Yellow River to attack his van, and from Jingzhou the armies of Liu Biao have descended to Wancheng and Wangye to smite his rearguard. Thunder-like in the weight of their march, tiger-like in the alertness of their advance, they are as flames let loose among light grass, as the blue ocean poured on glowing embers. Is there any hope that he escape destruction?
“Of the hordes of Cao Cao, those who can fight are from the north or from other camps, and they all desire to return home. They weep whenever they look to the north.
The others belong to Yanzhou or Yuzhou, being remnants of the armies of Lu Bu and Zhang Yang. Beaten, stern necessity forced them to accept service, but they take it only as a temporary expedient.
They who have been wounded hate each other.
If I give the signal to return and send my drums to the mountain tops, and wave the white flag to show them they may surrender, they will melt away like dew before the sun, and no blood will be shed. The victory will be mine.
“Now the Hans are failing and the bonds of empire are relaxed.
The sacred dynasty has no supporter, the ministers are not strong enough to cope with the difficulties.
Within the capital the responsible ministers are crestfallen and helpless. There is no one to rely upon.
Such loyal and high principled people as are left are browbeaten by a tyrannical minister. How can they manifest their virtue?
“Cao Cao has surrounded the Palace with seven hundred veterans, the ostensible object being to guard the Emperor, but the covert design being to hold him prisoner.
I fear this is but the first step in usurpation, and so I take my part.
Now is the time for loyal ministers to sacrifice their lives, the opportunity for officers to perform meritorious deeds.
Can I fail to urge you? “Cao Cao has forged commands to himself to undertake the control of government affairs and, in the name of the state, sends out calls for military assistance.
I fear lest distant regions may obey his behest and send troops to help him, to the detriment of the multitude and their everlasting shame. No wise person will do so.
“The forces of four regions—Bingzhou, Jizhou, Qingzhou, and Youzhou— are moving out simultaneously.
When this call reaches Jingzhou, you will see their forces cooperate with those of Liu Biao.
All regions and counties ought to organize volunteers and set them along their borders to demonstrate their force and prove their loyal support of the dynasty.
Will not this be rendering extraordinary service? “The rank of lordship, with feudal rights over five thousand households and a money reward of five millions, will be the reward of the one who brings the head of Cao Cao.
No questions will be asked of those who surrender.
I publish abroad this notice of my bounty and the rewards offered that you may realize that the dynasty is in real danger.” Yuan Shao read this effusion with great joy.
He at once ordered copies to be posted everywhere, in towns and cities, at gates, tax stations, ferries, and passes.
Copies found their way to the capital, and one got into Cao Cao's palace. That day he happened to be in bed with a bad headache.
The servants took the paper to the sick man's room. He read it and was frightened from the tips of his hair to the marrow of his very bones. He broke out into a cold perspiration, and his headache vanished. He bounded out of bed and said to Cao Hong, “Who wrote this?” “They say it is Chen Lin's brush,” replied he.
Cao Cao laughed, “They have the literary gift; they would rather have the military too to back it up.
This fellow may be a very elegant writer, but what if Yuan Shao's fighting capacity falls short?” Cao Cao called his advisers together to consider the next move.
Kong Rong heard of the summons and went to Cao Cao, saying, “You should not fight with Yuan Shao; he is too strong.
Make peace.” Xun Yu said, “He is despicable; do not make peace.” Kong Rong replied, “His land is wide and his people strong.
He has many skillful strategists like Guo Tu, Xu You, Peng Ji, and Shen Pei; loyal leaders like Tian Feng and Ju Shou; and formidable generals like Yan Liang and Wen Chou; able commanders like Gao Lan, Zhang He, Han Meng, and Chunyu Qiong.
You cannot say he is despicable.” Xun Yu laughed, saying, “His army is a rabble.
One general, Tian Feng, is bold but treacherous; another, Xu You, is greedy and ignorant; Shen Pei is devoted but stupid; Peng Ji is steady but useless. And these four of such different temperaments, mutually incompatible, will make for confusion rather than efficiency. The brave Yan Liang and Wen Chou are worthless and can be disposed of in the first battle; and the others such as Gao Lan, Zhang He, Han Meng, and Chunyu Qiong are poor, rough stuff.
What is the use even of their hundred thousands?” Kong Rong was silent, and Cao Cao smiled. “They are even as Xun Yu describes,” said Cao Cao.
Then Cao Cao issued orders. Generals Liu Dai and Wang Zhong were to lead an army of fifty thousand troops, displaying the Prime Minister's banners, and march against Xuzhou to attack Liu Bei.
This Liu Dai had been Imperial Protector of Yanzhou but had surrendered to Cao Cao and entered Cao Cao's service after the fall of the region. Cao Cao had given him a rank as Supernumerary Leader and now was disposed to make use of him.
Cao Cao himself took command of a large army of two hundred thousand troops for a simultaneous attack on Yuan Shao at Liyang.
Adviser Cheng Yu said, “The two Liu Dai and Wang Zhong sent against Liu Bei are unequal to their task.” “I know,” said Cao Cao.
“They are not meant to fight Liu Bei; it is merely a feint.
They have orders not to make any real attack till I have overcome Yuan Shao.
Then Liu Bei will be next.” Liu Dai and Wang Zhong went their way, and Cao Cao marched out his grand army, which came into touch with the enemy, then thirty miles distant, at Liyang. Both sides made fortified camps and waited watching each other.
This went on for two months of the autumn.
There was dissension in Yuan Shao's camp. Xu You was at enmity with his colleague, Shen Pei, who was in commanding position; and the strategist Ju Shou resented the rejection of his plan. So they would not attack. Yuan Shao also could not make up his mind. Tired of this state of inaction, Cao Cao then gave orders to his commanders:
Zang Ba was to continue the pressure on Qingzhou and Xuzhou; Yu Jin and Li Dian to deploy troops along the Yellow River; Cao Ren to quarter the main force at Guandu.
Then Cao Cao with an army marched back to Capital Xuchang.
The five legions sent against Liu Bei went into camp thirty-five miles from Xuzhou. The camp made an imposing display of the banners of the Prime Minister, but no attacks followed. Their spies were very busy north of the river to get news of Cao Cao's movement. On the defensive side, Liu Bei, as he was uncertain of the strength of the force against him, dared not move.
Suddenly orders came for the Cao Cao's army to attack, and then discord showed itself.
Liu Dai said, “The Prime Minister orders an attack; you advance.” Wang Zhong replied, “You were named first.” “I am the Commander-in-Chief; it is not my place to go first.” “I will go with you in joint command,” said Wang Zhong.
“Let us cast lots, and he upon whom the lot falls must go,” said Liu Dai.
They drew lots, and it fell to Wang Zhong, who advanced toward Xuzhou with half the force.
When Liu Bei heard of the threatened attack, he called Chen Deng to consult. Liu Bei said, “There is dissension in Yuan Shao's camp at Liyang, so they do not advance.
We do not know where Cao Cao is, but his own banner is not displayed in his Liyang's camp. Why then is it shown here?” Chen Deng replied, “His tricks take a hundred forms. It must be that he regards the north as more important and has gone there to look after its defense.
He dares not show his flag there, and I feel sure it is only meant to mislead us.
He is not here.” Liu Bei then asked whether one of his brothers would find out the truth, and Zhang Fei volunteered to go. “I fear you are unsuited for this,” said Liu Bei.
“You are too impetuous.” “If Cao Cao is there, I will haul him over here,” said Zhang Fei.
“Let me go first and find out,” said Guan Yu.
“If you go, I shall feel more at ease,” said Liu Bei.
So Guan Yu set out with three thousand soldiers to reconnoiter.
It was then early winter, and snow was falling from a gloomy sky. They marched regardless of the snow and came near Wang Zhong's camp with arms all ready to attack.
Guan Yu summoned Wang Zhong to a parley.
“The Prime Minister is here; why do you not surrender?” said Wang Zhong.
“Beg him to come to the front, for I would speak with him,” replied Guan Yu.
“Is he likely to come out to see such as you,” said Wang Zhong.
Guan Yu angrily dashed forward, and Wang Zhong set his spear to meet him.
Guan Yu rode till he came close to his antagonist, then suddenly wheeled away.
Wang Zhong went after him and followed up a slope.
Just as they passed the crest, Guan Yu suddenly wheeled again, shouted, and came on flourishing the mighty sword.
Wang Zhong could not withstand that and fled. But Guan Yu, changing the huge sword to his left hand, with his right laid hold of his victim by the straps of his breastplate, lifted him out of the saddle, and rode away to his own lines with the captive laid across the pommel of his saddle.
Wang Zhong's army scattered.
The captive was sent to Xuzhou, where he was summoned into the presence of Liu Bei.
“Who are you?
What office do you hold?
How dare you falsely display the ensigns of the Prime Minister?” said Liu Bei.
“What do you mean by falsely when I simply obeyed my orders?” said Wang Zhong.
“My master wanted to produce the impression that he was present.
Really he was not there.” Liu Bei treated him kindly, giving him food and clothing; but put him in prison till his colleague could be captured.
Guan Yu said to Liu Bei, “I knew you had peaceful intentions in your mind; therefore, I captured Wang Zhong instead of slaying him.” “I was afraid of Zhang Fei's hasty and impulsive temper,” said Liu Bei. “He would have slain this man. So I could not send him.
There is no advantage in killing persons of this sort, and while alive they are often useful in amicable settlements.” Here Zhang Fei said, “You have got this Wang Zhong; now I will go and get the other man.” “Be careful,” said Liu Bei.
“Liu Dai was once Imperial Protector of Yanzhou, and he was one of the nobles who met at Tiger Trap Pass to destroy Dong Zhuo. He is not to be despised.” “I do not think him worth talking about so much.
I will bring him in alive just as Second Brother did this other.” “I fear that if his life be lost, it may upset our designs,” said Liu Bei.
“If I kill him, I will forfeit my own life,” said Zhang Fei.
So he was given three thousand soldiers and went off quickly.
The capture of his colleague made Liu Dai careful. He strengthened his defenses and kept behind them.
He took no notice of the daily challenges and continual insults which began with Zhang Fei's arrival.
After some days Zhang Fei evolved a ruse.
He issued orders to prepare to rush the enemy's camp at night, but he himself spent the day drinking. Pretending to be very intoxicated, he held a court-martial, and one soldier was severely flogged for a breach of discipline. The man was left bound in the midst of the camp, Zhang Fei saying, “Wait till I am ready to start tonight; you shall be sacrificed to the flag.” At the same time he gave secret orders to the custodians to let the man escape.
The man found his opportunity, crept out of camp, and went over to the enemy, to whom he betrayed the plan of a night attack.
As the man bore signs of savage punishment, Liu Dai was the more disposed to credit his desertion and tale; and Liu Dai made his arrangements, putting the greater part of his troops in ambush outside his camp so that it was empty.
That night, having divided his army into three parties, Zhang Fei went to attack the camp. A few men were ordered to advance directly, dash in and set fire going.
Two larger bodies of troops were to go round to the rear of the camp and attack when they saw the fire well started.
At the third watch, Zhang Fei, with his veterans, went to cut off Liu Dai's road to the rear.
The thirty men told off to start a conflagration made their way into the camp and were successful.
When the flames arose, the ambushing troops rushed out but only to find themselves attacked on both sides.
This confused them, and as they knew nothing of the number of their assailants, they were panic stricken and scattered.
Liu Dai, with a company of footmen got clear of the fight and fled, but he went straight toward Zhang Fei. Escape was impossible, and the two men rode up each to attack the other. Zhang Fei captured his opponent, and the men surrendered. Zhang Fei sent news of this success to his brothers.
Liu Bei said, “Hitherto Zhang Fei has been rather violent, but this time he has acted wisely, and I am very pleased.” They rode out to welcome Zhang Fei.
“You said I was too rough; how now?” said Zhang Fei to his brothers. “If I had not put you on your mettle, you would not have evolved this stratagem,” said Liu Bei.
Zhang Fei laughed.
Then appeared the captive Liu Dai, in bonds. Liu Bei at once dismounted and loosed the cords, saying, “My young brother was rather hasty, but you must pardon him.” So Liu Dai was freed.
He was taken into the city, his colleague was released, and both were cared for. Liu Bei said to them, “I could not help putting Imperial Protector Deputy Che Zhou to death when he tried to kill me, but Cao Cao took it as disaffection and sent you two generals to punish me.
I have received much kindness from him and certainly would not show ingratitude by killing you.
I wish you to speak for me and explain when you get back.” “We are deeply grateful that you spare our lives, and we will certainly do so in gratitude for what our wives and children owe you.” Next day the two leaders and their army were allowed to depart unscathed. But before they had got three miles from the boundary, they heard a mighty shouting and there appeared Zhang Fei barring the road. “My brother made a mistake in letting you go; he did not understand.
How could he give freedom to two rebels?” This made the two men quake with fear, but as the fierce eyed warrior with uplifted sword was bearing down upon them, they heard another man galloping up and shouting, “Do not behave so disgracefully!” The newcomer was Guan Yu, and his appearance relieved the unhappy men of all fear.
“Why do you stop them since our brother set them free?” cried Guan Yu.
“If they are let go today, they will surely come back,” cried Zhang Fei.
“Wait till they do, then you may kill them,” replied Guan Yu.
The two leaders with one voice cried, “Even if the Prime Minister slay our whole clans, we will never come again.
We pray you pardon us.” Said Zhang Fei, “If Cao Cao himself had come, I would have slain him. Not a breastplate should have gone back.
But for this time I leave you your heads.” Clapping their hands to their heads the two men scuttled off while the two brothers returned to the city.
“Cao Cao will certainly come,” said Guan Yu and Zhang Fei.
Sun Qian said, “This is not a city that can hold out for long.
We should send part of our forces to Xiaopei and guard Xiapi as a corner stone of our position.” Liu Bei agreed and told off Guan Yu to guard Xiapi whither he also sent his two wives, Lady Gan and Lady Mi.
The former was a native of Xiapi; the latter was Mi Zhu's younger sister.
Sun Qian, Jian Yong, Mi Zhu, and Mi Fang were left to defend Xuzhou, and Liu Bei with Zhang Fei went to Xiaopei.
The two released leaders, Liu Dai and Wang Zhong, hastened home to Cao Cao and explained to him that Liu Bei was not disaffected.
But their master was exceeding angry with them, crying, “You shameful traitors, what use are you?” He roared to the guards to take them away to instant execution.
How can a hare or a deer expect To conquer in tiger strife? Minnows and shrimps that with dragons contend Already have done with life.
The fate of the two leaders will be told in the next chapter. CHAPTER 23. Mi Heng Slips His Garment And Rails At Traitors; Ji Ping Pledges To Kill The Prime Minister.
At the close of the last chapter the two unsuccessful leaders, Liu Dai and Wang Zhong, were in danger of death.
However, Kong Rong remonstrated with Cao Cao, saying, “You knew these two were no match for Liu Bei, and if you put them to death because they failed, you will lose the hearts of your people.” Wherefore the death sentence was not executed, but they were deprived of rank and status. Cao Cao next proposed to lead an army himself to attack Liu Bei, but Kong Rong advised, “The weather is too inclement. We must wait the return of spring.
In the interval, we better use the time to arrange peace with Zhang Xiu and Liu Biao, before launching an expedition against Xuzhou.” Wherefore Liu Ye was sent to Zhang Xiu and in due time reached Xiangyang.
He first had an interview with Jia Xu, Zhang Xiu's adviser, whereat he dwelt upon Cao Cao's virtues so that Jia Xu was impressed, kept him as a guest and undertook to smooth his way.
Soon after Liu Ye saw Zhang Xiu and spoke of the advantages of coming to terms with Cao Cao.
While the discussion was in progress, a messenger from Yuan Shao was announced, and he was called in.
He presented letters and, when they also proposed terms of peace, Jia Xu asked what their success had been lately against Cao Cao.
“The war had ceased for the moment on account of the winter,” replied the messenger.
“As you, General, and Liu Biao are both well reputed officers of the state, I have been sent to request your help.” Jia Xu laughed, “You can return to your master and say that as he could not brook rivalry of his brother, he certainly would be sorely put to it with that of all the officers of the state.” The letter was torn into fragments before the messenger's face, and he was angrily bidden be gone. “But his master, Yuan Shao, is stronger than Cao Cao,” protested Zhang Xiu.
“You have torn up his letter and are dismissing his man.
What shall we say about such an insult should Yuan Shao come?” “Better join hands with Cao Cao,” said Jia Xu.
“But there is still between us an unavenged enmity; we could not suffer each other.” Jia Xu said, “There are three advantages in joining hands with Cao Cao. First, he has a command from the Emperor to restore peace.
Second, as Yuan Shao is so strong, our little help to him will be despised, while we shall loom large and be well treated by Cao Cao.
Third, Cao Cao is going to be Chief of the Feudal Lords, and he will ignore all private feuds in order to show his magnanimity to all the world.
I hope, General, you will see these things clearly and hesitate no longer.” Zhang Xiu, now convinced, became more reasonable and recalled Liu Ye, who, at the interview, extolled the many virtues of his master.
“If the Prime Minister had any thought of the old quarrel, he would hardly have sent me to make friendly engagements, would he?” said Liu Ye at the last.
So Zhang Xiu and his adviser proceeded to the capital where formal submission was made.
At the interview Zhang Xiu bowed low at the steps, but Cao Cao, hastening forward, took him by the hand and raised him, saying, “Forget that little fault of mine, I pray you, General!” Zhang Xiu received the title of General Who Possesses Prowess, and Jia Xu was appointed Counselor.
Cao Cao then directed his secretaries to draft letters inviting the support of Liu Biao.
Jia Xu said, “Liu Biao loves to have to do with famous people.
If some famous scholar should be sent to him, he would submit forthwith.” So Cao Cao inquired of Xun You who was the best person to go as a messenger, and he recommended Kong Rong. Cao Cao agreed and sent Xun You to speak with this officer.
So he went to Kong Rong, saying, “A scholar of reputation is required to aid as a messenger of state; can you undertake this task?” Kong Rong replied, “I have a certain friend, Mi Heng, whose talents are ten times mine.
He ought to be constantly at the court of the Emperor and not merely be sent as a state messenger.
I will recommend him to the Emperor.” So Kong Rong wrote the following memorial:
“In ancient days, when the great waters were abroad, the emperor pondered over their regulation and he sought out people of talent from all directions.
In old time, when Emperor Wu of the Hans desired to enlarge his borders, crowds of scholars responded to his call.
“Intelligent and holy, Your Majesty ascended the throne.
You have fallen upon evil days, but have been diligent, modest, and untiring in your efforts.
Now the great mountains have sent forth spirits, and people of genius appear.
“I, your humble servant, know of a certain simple scholar, Mi Heng by name, of Pingyuan, a young man of twenty-four. His moral character is excellent, his talents eminent. As a youth he took a high place in study and penetrated the most secret arcane of learning.
What he glanced at he could repeat, what he heard once he never forgot.
He is naturally high principled, and his thoughts are divine.
Sang Hongyang's mental calculations and Zhang Anshi's memorial feats compared with Mi Heng's powers are no longer wonderful.
Loyal, sincere, correct, and straight-forward, his ambition is unsullied.
He regards the good with trembling respect; he detests the evil with uncompromising hatred.
Ren Zuo in unflinching candor, Shi Yu in severe rectitude, never surpassed him.
“Hundreds of hawks are not worth one osprey.
If Mi Heng be given a court appointment, notable results must follow.
Ready in debate, rapid in utterance, his overwhelming intelligence wells up in profusion; in the solution of doubts and the unraveling of difficulties he has no peer.
“In former days of Han, Jia Yi begged to be sent on trial to a vassal state for the control of the Xiongnu tribespeople; Zhong Jun offered to bring back the Prince of Nanyue to do homage to the emperor.
The generous conduct of these youths has been much admired.
“In our day Lu Cui and Yan Xiang, remarkable for their talents, have been appointed among the secretaries.
And Mi Heng is no less capable.
Should he be got, then all possibilities may be realized; the dragon may curvet through the celestial streets and soar along the Milky Way; fame will extend to the poles of the universe and hang in the firmament with rainbow glory.
He would be the glory of all the present Ministers and enhance the majesty of the Palace itself.
The Music will acquire new beauties, and the Palace will contain an excellent treasure.
People like Mi Heng are but few.
As in the recitation of 'Ji Chu Songs' and the singing of 'Yang E Poems,' the most skillful performers are sought; and such fleet horses as 'Fei Tu Broncos' and 'Yao Miao Mustangs' were looked for by the famous judges of horses, Wang Liang and Bo Le; so I, the humble one, dare not conceal this man.
Your Majesty is careful in the selection of servants and should try him.
Let him be summoned as he is, simply clad in his serge dress; and should he not appear worthy, then may I be punished for the fault of deception.” The Emperor read the memorial and passed it to his Prime Minister, who duly summoned Mi Heng.
He came, but after his formal salutations were over, he was left standing and not invited to sit down.
Looking up to heaven, he sighed deeply, saying, “Wide as is the universe, it cannot produce the person.” “Under my orders are scores of people whom the world call heroes. What do you mean by saying there is not the person,” said Cao Cao.
“I should be glad to hear who they are,” said Mi Heng.
“Xun Yu, Xun You, Guo Jia, and Cheng Yu are all people of profound skill and long views, superior to Xiao He and Chen Ping.
Zhang Liao, Xu Chu, Li Dian, and Yue Jin are bravest of the brave, better than Cen Peng and Ma Wu.
Lu Qian and Man Chong are my secretaries; Yu Jin and Xu Huang are my van leaders; Xiahou Dun is one of the world's marvels, Cao Ren is the most successful leader of the age.
Now say you there are not the people?” “Sir, you are quite mistaken,” said Mi Heng with a smile. “I know all these things you call people.
Xun Yu is qualified to pose at a funeral or ask after a sick man; Xun You is fit to be a tomb guardian; Cheng Yu might be sent to shut doors and bolt windows; and Guo Jia is a reciter of poems; Zhang Liao might beat drums and clang gongs; Xu Chu might lead cattle to pasture; Yue Jin would make a fair reader of elegy; Li Dian could carry dispatches and notices; Lu Qian would be a fair armorer; Man Chong could be sent to drink wine and eat brewers' grains; Yu Jin might be of use to carry planks and build walls; Xu Huang might be employed to kill pigs and slay dogs; Xiahou Dun should be styled 'Whole Body General,' and Cao Ren should be called 'Money-grubbing Governor.' As for the remainder, they are mere clothes shelves, rice sacks, wine vases, flesh bags.” “And what special gifts have you?” said Cao Cao angrily. “I know everything in heaven above and the earth beneath.
I am conversant with the Three Religions and the Nine Systems of Philosophy. I could make my prince the rival of Kings Yao and Shun .
Can I discuss on even terms with common people?” Now Zhang Liao was present, and he raised his sword to strike down the impudent visitor who spoke thus to his master, but Cao Cao said, “I want another drummer boy to play on occasions of congratulation in the court.
I will confer this office upon him.” Instead of indignantly declining this, Mi Heng accepted the position and went out.
“He spoke very impertinently;” said Zhang Liao, “why did you not put him to death?” “He has something of a reputation; empty, but people have heard of him and so, if I put him to death, they would say I was intolerant.
As he thinks he has ability, I have made him a drummer to mortify him.” Soon after Cao Cao instituted a banquet in the capital at which the guests were many.
The drums were to be played, and the old drummers were ordered to wear new clothes.
But the new drummer Mi Heng took his place with the other musicians clad in old and worn garments.
The piece chosen was the “Tolling of Yuyang,” and from the earliest taps on the drum the effect was exquisite, profound as the notes from metal and stone.
The performance stirred deeply the emotions of every guest; some even shed tears.
Seeing all eyes turned on the shabby performer, the attendants said, “Why did you not put on your new uniform?” Mi Heng turned to them, slipped off his frayed and torn robe and stood there in full view, naked as he was born.
The assembled guests covered their faces. Then the drummer composedly drew on his nether garments.
“Why do you behave so rudely at court?” said Cao Cao.
“To flout one's prince and insult one's superiors is the real rudeness,” cried Mi Heng.
“I bare my natural body as an emblem of my purity.” “So you are pure!
And who is foul?” “You do not distinguish between the wise and the foolish, which is to have foul vision.
You have never read the Odes or the Histories, which is to have foul speech.
You are deaf to honest words, which is to have foul ears.
You are unable to reconcile antiquity with today, which is to be foul without.
You cannot tolerate the nobles, which is to be foul within.
You harbor thoughts of rebellion, which is to have a foul heart.
I am one of the most famous scholars in the empire, and you make me a drummer boy, that is as Yang Huo belittling Confucius or Zang Cang vilifying Mencius.
You desire to be chief and arbitrator of the great nobles, yet you treat me thus!” Now Kong Rong who had recommended Mi Heng for employment was among the guests, and he feared for the life of his friend. Wherefore he tried to calm the storm.
“Mi Heng is only guilty of a misdemeanor like Fu Yue',” cried Kong Rong.
“He is not a man likely to disturb your dreams, Illustrious Sir.” Pointing to Mi Heng, the Prime Minister said, “I will send you to Jingzhou as my messenger; and if Liu Biao surrender to me, I will give you a post at court.” But Mi Heng was unwilling to go.
So Cao Cao bade two of his men prepare three horses, and they set Mi Heng on the middle one and dragged him along the road between them.
It is also related that a great number of officers of all ranks assembled at the East Fritillary Gate to see the messenger start.
Xun Yu said, “When Mi Heng comes, we will not rise to salute him.” So when Mi Heng came, dismounted, and entered the waiting room, they all sat stiff and silent.
Mi Heng uttered a loud cry.
“What is that for?” said Xun Yu.
“Should not one cry out when one enters a coffin?” said Mi Heng.
“We may be corpses,” shouted they altogether, “but you are a wandering headless ghost.” “I am a minister of Han and not a partisan of Cao Cao's,” cried Mi Heng.
“You cannot say I have no head.” They were angry enough to kill him, but Xun Yu checked them, saying, “He is a paltry fellow; it is not worth soiling your blades with his blood.” “I am paltry, and yet I have the soul of a man, and you are mere worms,” said Mi Heng.
They went their ways, all very angry.
Mi Heng went on his journey and presently reached Jingzhou, where he saw Liu Biao.
After that, under pretense of extolling Liu Biao's virtue, he lampooned Liu Biao who was annoyed and sent him to Jiangxia to see Huang Zu.
“Why did you not put the fellow to death for lampooning you?” said one to Liu Biao.
“You see he shamed Cao Cao, but Cao Cao did not kill him as Cao Cao feared to lose popular favor.
So Cao Cao sent him to me, thinking to borrow my hand to slay him and so suffer the loss of my good name.
I have sent him on to Huang Zu to let Cao Cao see that I understood.” Liu Biao's clever caution met with general praise. At that time a messenger from Yuan Shao was also there with certain proposals for an alliance, and it was necessary to decide which aide to espouse.
All the advisers came together to consider the question. Then Commander Han Song said, “As you have now two offers, you can please yourself and choose your own way to destroy your enemies; for if one refuses, you can follow the other. Now Cao Cao is an able general and has many capable officers in his train.
It looks as though he may destroy Yuan Shao and then move his armies across the river. I fear, my lord, you would be unable then to withstand him.
That being so it would be wise to support Cao Cao, who will treat you with respect.” Liu Biao replied, “You go to the capital and see how things tend.
That will help me to decide.” Han Song said, “The positions of master and servant are clearly defined.
Now I am your man prepared to go all lengths for you and obey you to the last, whether in serving the Emperor or in following Cao Cao.
But lest there should be any doubt you must remember that if the Emperor gives me any office, then I shall become his servant and shall not be ready to face death for you.” “You go and find out what you can.
I have ideas in my mind.” So Han Song took his leave and went to the capital, where he saw Cao Cao.
Cao Cao gave him rank and made him Governor of Lingling.
Adviser Xun Yu remonstrated, saying, “This man came to spy out how things were moving. He has done nothing to deserve reward, and yet you give him an office like this. There were no such suspicious rumors connected with poor Mi Heng, and yet you sent him off and would never test his power.” “Mi Heng shamed me too deeply before all the world. I am going to borrow Liu Biao's hand to remove him. And you need say no more,” said Cao Cao.
Then Cao Cao sent Han Song back to his former master to tell him what had happened.
Han Song came and was full of praise for the virtues of the court and was keen on persuading Liu Biao to espouse that side. Then Liu Biao suddenly turned angry, charged him with treachery, put him in prison, and threatened him with death. “You turn your back on me,” cried Han Song.
“I did not betray you.” Kuai Liang remarked, “Han Song had foretold this possibility before he left; it is only what he expected.” Liu Biao, who was just and reasonable, went no further.
Presently came the news that Mi Heng had been put to death by Huang Zu on account of a quarrel begun over the wine cups. Both being worse for liquor they had begun to discuss the worth of people.
“You were in Xuchang,” said Huang Zu.
“Who was there of worth?” “The big boy was Kong Rong and the little one Yang Xiu.
There was no one else to count.” “What am I like?” said Huang Zu.
“You are like a god in a temple; you sit still and receive sacrifice, but the lack of intelligence is pitiful.” “Do you regard me as a mere image?” cried Huang Zu, angrily. So Huang Zu put the impudent speaker to death.
Even at the very point of death, Mi Heng never ceased his railing and abuse. “Alas!” sighed Liu Biao when he heard Mi Heng's fate. Then Liu Biao had the victim honorably interred near Yingwu, on Parrot Island. And a later poet wrote of Mi Heng: Huang Zu could brook no rival; at his word Mi Heng met death, beneath the cruel sword.
His grave on Parrot Isle may yet be seen, The river flowing past it, coldly green.
Cao Cao heard of the young man's death with pleasure. “The putrid bookworm has just cut himself up with his own sharp tongue,” said he.
As there was no sign of Liu Biao coming to join him, Cao Cao began to think of coercion. Xun Yu dissuaded him from this course.
Said he, “Yuan Shao is not subjugated; Liu Bei is not destroyed. To attack Liu Biao would be to neglect the vital to care for the immaterial.
Destroy the two chief enemies first, and the Han River is yours at one blow.” And Cao Cao took the advice.
After the departure of Liu Bei, Dong Cheng and his fellow conspirators did nothing else day or night but try to evolve plans for the destruction of Cao Cao. But they could see no chance to attack.
At the new year audience Cao Cao was odiously arrogant and overweening, and the chief conspirator's disgust was so intense that he fell ill.
Hearing of the State Uncle's indisposition, the Emperor sent the Court Physician to see him.
The Court Physician at this time was a native of Luoyang, named Ji Ping. A very famous physician, Ji Ping devoted himself wholly to the treatment of his court patient.
Living in Dong Cheng's palace and seeing Dong Cheng at all times, Ji Ping soon found that some secret grief was sorely troubling him. But Ji Ping dared not ask questions.
One evening of the full moon festival, when the physician was just taking his leave, Dong Cheng kept him, and the two men had supper together.
They eat talking for some time, and Dong Cheng by and by dropped off to sleep dressed as he was. Presently Wang Zifu and the others were announced.
As they were coming in, Wang Zifu cried, “Our business is settled!” “I should be glad to hear how,” said Dong Cheng.
“Liu Biao has joined Yuan Shao, and five hundred thousand troops in fifty legions are on their way here by different routes.
More than this, Ma Teng and Han Sui are coming from the northwest with seven hundred thousand Xiliang troops.
Cao Cao has moved every soldier outside Xuchang to meet the combined armies.
There is a great banquet in the Palace tonight; and if we get together our young men and servants, we can muster more than a thousand, and we can surround the Palace, while Cao Cao is at the banquet, and finish him off. We must not miss this.” Dong Cheng was more than delighted.
He called his servants and armed them, put on his own armor and mounted his horse. The conspirators met, as they had arranged, just at the inner gate of the Prime Minister's palace. It was the first watch. The small army marched straight in, Dong Cheng leading with his treasured sword drawn. His intended victim was at table in one of the private rooms.
Dong Cheng rushed in, crying, “Cao Cao, you rebel, stay!” and dashed at Cao Cao who fell at the first blow.
And just then he woke up and found it was all a dream, but his mouth was still full of curses.
“Do you really wish to destroy Cao Cao?” said Ji Ping, going forward to his half awakened patient. This brought Dong Cheng to his senses.
He stopped, terror stricken, and made no reply.
“Do not be frightened, O Uncle,” said the doctor.
“Although I am a physician, I am also a man, and I never forget my emperor.
You have seemed sad for many days, but I have never ventured to ask the reason.
Now you have shown it in your dream, and I know your real feelings.
If I can be of any use, I will help.
Nothing can daunt me.” Dong Cheng covered his face and wept. “I fear you may not be true to me,” cried he.
Ji Ping at once bit off a finger as a pledge of his faith.
And then his host and patient brought forth the decree he had received in the girdle. “I am afraid our schemes will come to nought,” said Dong Cheng.
“Liu Bei and Ma Teng are gone, and there is nothing we can do.
That was the real reason I fell ill.” “It is not worth troubling you gentlemen with; for Cao Cao's life lies in these hands of mine,” said Ji Ping.
“How can that be?” “Because he is often ill with deep-seated pain in his head. When this comes on, he sends for me.
When next he calls me, I only have to give him one dose and he will certainly die. We do not want any weapons.” “If only you could do it!
You would be the savior of the dynasty; it depends upon you.” Then Ji Ping went away leaving his late patient a happy man.
Dong Cheng strolled into the garden and there he saw one of his servants, Quin Quington, whispering with one of the concubines, Yun Ying, in a dark corner.
This annoyed him, and he called his attendants to seize them.
He would have put them to death but for the intervention of his wife. At her request he spared their lives, but both were beaten forty canes, and the lad was thrown into a dungeon.
Sulky at this treatment, Quin Quington broke out of the cell in the night, climbed over the wall, and went straight to Cao Cao's palace, where he betrayed the conspiracy.
Cao Cao at once had him taken into a secret chamber and questioned him.
Quin Quington gave the names of the conspirators, saying, “Wang Zifu, Wu Zilan, Chong Ji, Wu Shi, Ma Teng, and my master have been meeting secretly.
My master has a roll of white silk, with writing on it, but I do not know what it means.
Yesterday, Ji Ping bit off one of his fingers as a pledge of fidelity.
I saw that.” Quin Quington was kept in a secret part of the palace, while his late master, Dong Cheng, only knowing that he had run away, took no special means to find him.
Soon after this Cao Cao feigned a headache and sent for Ji Ping as usual.
“The rebel is done for,” thought Ji Ping, and he made a secret package of poison which he took with him to the palace of the Prime Minister.
He found Cao Cao in bed. The patient bade the doctor prepare a potion for him.
“One draught will cure this disease,” said Ji Ping.
He bade them bring him a pot, and he prepared the potion in the room.
When it had simmered for some time and was half finished, the poison was added, and soon after the physician presented the draught.
Cao Cao, knowing it was poisoned, made excuses and would not swallow it.
“You should take it hot,” said the doctor. “Then there will be a gentle perspiration, and you will be better.” “You are a scholar,” said Cao Cao, sitting up, “and know what is the correct thing to do.
When the master is ill and takes drugs, the attendant first tastes them; when a man is ill, his son first tastes the medicine.
You are my confidant and should drink first.
Then I will swallow the remainder.” “Medicine is to treat disease; what is the use of any one's tasting it?” said Ji Ping.
But he guessed now the conspiracy had been discovered, so he dashed forward, seized Cao Cao by the ear, and tried to pour the potion down his throat. Cao Cao pushed it away, and it spilt.
The bricks upon which it fell were split asunder.
Before Cao Cao could speak, his servants had already seized the assailant.
Said Cao Cao, “I am not ill; I only wanted to test you.
So you really thought to poison me!” He sent for a score of sturdy gaolers who carried off the prisoner to the inner apartments to be interrogated.
Cao Cao took his seat in a pavilion, and the hapless physician, tightly bound, was thrown to the ground before him. The prisoner maintained a bold front.
Cao Cao said, “I thought you were a physician; how dared you try to poison me? Some one incited you to this crime; and if you tell me, I will pardon you.” “You are a rebel; you flout your Prince and injure your betters.
The whole empire wishes to kill you. Do you think I am the only one?” Cao Cao again and again pressed the prisoner to tell what he knew, but he only replied that no one had sent him; it was his own desire.
“I have failed, and I can but die,” added Ji Ping.
Cao Cao angrily bade the gaolers give him a severe beating, and they dogged him for two watches.
His skin hung in tatters, the flesh was battered, and the blood from his wounds ran down the steps.
Then fearing he might die and his evidence be lost, Cao Cao bade them cease and remove him. They took him off to a quiet place where he might recover somewhat.
Having issued orders to prepare a banquet for next day, Cao Cao invited all the courtiers thereto.
Dong Cheng was the only one who excused himself, saying he was unwell.
The other conspirators dared not stay away as they felt they would be suspected. Tables were laid in the private apartments, and after several courses the host said, “There is not much to amuse us today, but I have a man to show you that will sober you.” “Bring him in!” Cao Cao said, turning to the gaolers, and the hapless Ji Ping appeared, securely fastened in a wooden collar.
He was placed where all could see him.
“You officials do not know that this man is connected with a gang of evil doers who desire to overturn the government and even injure me.
However, Heaven has defeated their plans, but I desire that you should hear his evidence.” Then Cao Cao ordered the gaolers to beat their prisoner.
They did so till Ji Ping lay unconscious, when they revived him by spraying water over his face.
As soon as he came to, he glared at his oppressor and ground his teeth. “Cao Cao, you rebel! What are you waiting for?
Why not kill me?” cried Ji Ping.
Cao Cao replied, “The conspirators were only six at first; you made the seventh.
Is that true?” Here the prisoner broke in with more abuse, while Wang Zifu and the other three conspirators exchanged glances, looking as though they were sitting on a rug full of needles.
Cao Cao continued his torture of the prisoner, beating him into unconsciousness and reviving him with cold water, the victim disdaining to ask mercy.
Finally Cao Cao realized he would incriminate none of his accomplices, and so he told the gaolers to remove Ji Ping.
At the close of the banquet, when the guests were dispersing, four of them, the four conspirators, were invited to remain behind to supper.
They were terrified so that their souls seemed no longer to inhabit their bodies, but there was no saying nay to the invitation.
Presently Cao Cao said, “Still there is something I want to speak about, so I have asked you to stay for a time longer.
I do not know what you four have been arranging with Dong Cheng.” “Nothing at all,” said Wang Zifu.
“And what is written on the white silk?” asked Cao Cao. They all said they knew nothing about it.
Then Cao Cao ordered the runaway servant to be brought in.
As soon as Quin Quington came, Wang Zifu said, “Well, what have you seen and where?” Quin Quington replied, “You five very carefully chose retired places to talk in, and you secretly signed a white roll.
You cannot deny that.” Wang Zifu replied, “This miserable creature was punished for misbehavior with one of Uncle Dong Cheng's maids, and now because of that he slanders his master. You must not listen to him.” “Ji Ping tried to pour poison down my throat.
Who told him to do that if it was not Dong Cheng?” said Cao Cao.
They all said they knew nothing about who it was.
“So far,” said Cao Cao, “matters are only beginning, and there is a chance of forgiveness. But if the thing grows, it will be difficult not to take notice of it.” The whole four vigorously denied that any plot existed.
However Cao Cao called up his henchmen, and the four men were put into confinement.
Next day Cao Cao with a large following went to the State Uncle's palace to ask after his health.
Dong Cheng came out to receive his visitor, who at once said, “Why did you not come last night?” “I am not quite well yet and have to be very careful about going out,” replied Dong Cheng.
“One might say you were suffering from national sorrow, eh?” said Cao Cao.
Dong Cheng started.
Cao Cao continued, “Have you heard of the Ji Ping affair?” “No; what is it?” Cao Cao smiled coldly, saying, “How can it be you do not know?” He turned to his attendants and told them to bring in the prisoner, while he went on talking to his host about national illness. Dong Cheng was much put about and knew not what to do.
Soon the gaolers led in the physician to the steps of the hall.
At once the bound man began to rail at Cao Cao as rebel and traitor.
“This man,” said Cao Cao, pointing to Ji Ping, “has implicated Wang Zifu and three others, all of whom are now under arrest.
There is one more whom I have not caught yet.” “Who sent you to poison me?” continued Cao Cao, turning toward the physician.
“Quick, tell me!” “Heaven sent me to slay a traitor!” Cao Cao angrily ordered them to beat Ji Ping again, but there was no part of his body that could be beaten.
Dong Cheng sat looking at him, his heart feeling as if transfixed with a dagger.
“You were born with ten fingers; how is it you have now only nine?” Ji Ping replied, “I bit off one as a pledge when I swore to slay a traitor.” Cao Cao told them to bring a knife, and they lopped off his other nine fingers.
“Now they are all off; that will teach you to make pledges.” “Still I have a mouth that can swallow a traitor and a tongue that can curse him,” said Ji Ping.
Cao Cao told them to cut out his tongue.
Ji Ping said, “Do not.
I cannot endure any more punishment, I shall have to speak out.
Loosen my bonds.” “Loose them. There is no reason why not,” said Cao Cao.
They loosed him.
As soon as he was free, Ji Ping stood up, turned his face toward the Emperor's palace and bowed, saying, “It is Heaven's will that thy servant has been unable to remove the evil.” Then he turned and smashed his head into the steps and died.
His body was quartered and exposed.
This happened in the first month of the fifth year of Rebuilt Tranquillity , and a certain historian wrote a poem: There lived in Han a simple physician. No warrior, yet brave Enough to risk his very life His Emperor to save.
He failed; but lasting fame Is his; he feared not death; He cursed the traitorous Prime Minister Unto his latest breath.
Seeing his victim had passed beyond the realm of punishment, Cao Cao had Quin Quington led in.
“Do you know this man, Uncle?” “Yes,” cried Dong Cheng.
“So the runaway servant is here; he ought to be put to death.” “He just told me of your treachery; he is my witness,” said Cao Cao.
“Who would dare kill him?” “How can you, the First Minister of State, heed the unsupported tale of an absconding servant?” “But I have Wang Zifu and the others in prison,” said Cao Cao.
“And how can you rebut their evidence?” He then called in the remainder of his followers and ordered them to search Dong Cheng's bedroom. They did so and found the decree that had been given him in the girdle and the pledge signed by the conspirators. “You mean rat!” cried Cao Cao. “You dared do this?” He gave orders to arrest the whole household without exception.
Then he returned to his palace with the incriminating documents and called all his advisers together to discuss the dethronement of the Emperor and the setting up of a successor.
Many decrees, blood written, have issued, accomplishing nothing, One inscribed pledge was fraught with mountains of sorrow.
The reader who wishes to how the fate of the Emperor must read the next chapter. CHAPTER 24.
Cao Cao Murdered The Consort Dong; Liu Bei Flees To Yuan Shao. The last chapter closed with the discovery of the “girdle” decree and the assembly of Cao Cao's advisers to consider the deposition of Emperor Xian. Cheng Yu spoke strongly against this, saying, “Illustrious Sir, the means by which you impress the world and direct the government is the command of the House of Han. In these times of turmoil and rivalry among the nobles, such a step as the deposition of the ruler will certainly bring about civil war and is much to be deprecated.” After reflection Cao Cao abandoned the project. But Dong Cheng's plot was not to go unpunished.
All five of the conspirators with every member of their households, seven hundred at least, were taken and put to death at one or another of the gates of the city.
The people wept at such merciless and wholesale slaughter.
A secret decree in a girdle sewn, In red blood written, the Emperor's own, To the staunch and faithful Dong Cheng addressed, Who had saved him once when enemies pressed.
And who, sore grieved at his Sovereign's fate, Expressed in dreams his ceaseless hate, Carried misfortune and death in its train, But glory to him who died in vain. Another poet wrote of the sad fate of Wang Zifu and his friends:
Greatheartedly these signed the silken roll, And pledged themselves to save their king from shame.
Black death of them took heavy toll, To write their names upon the roll of fame.
But the slaughter of the conspirators and their whole households did not appease the wrath of the Prime Minister. The Emperor's consort was a sister of Dong Cheng; and, sword in hand, Cao Cao went into the Palace determined to slay her also.
The Emperor cherished her tenderly, the more so as she was then in the fifth month of pregnancy.
That day, as they often did, the Emperor, Consort Dong, and Empress Fu were sitting in their private apartment secretly talking of the decree entrusted to Dong Cheng and asking each other why nothing seemed to have been done.
The sudden appearance of the angry Prime Minister, armed as he was, frightened them greatly.
“Does Your Majesty know that Dong Cheng conspired against me?” said he.
“Dong Zhuo died long ago,” replied the Emperor.
“Not Dong Zhuo—Dong Cheng!” roared Cao Cao.
The Emperor's heart trembled but he gasped out, “Really I did not know!” “So the cut finger and the blood written decree are all forgotten, eh?” The Emperor was silent.
Cao Cao bade his lictors seize Consort Dong.
The Emperor interposed asking pity for her condition.
“If Heaven had not interposed and defeated the plot, I should be a dead man.
How could I leave this woman to work evil to me by and by?” Said the Emperor, “Immure her in one of the palaces till her confinement.
Do not harm her now!” “Do you wish me to spare her offspring to avenge the mother?” said Cao Cao. “I pray that my body may be spared mutilation and not put to shame,” said Consort Dong.
Cao Cao bade his men show her the white silk cord.
The Emperor wept bitterly. “Do not hate me in the below realms of the Nine Golden Springs,” said the Emperor to her.
His tears fell like rain.
Empress Fu also joined in the lament, but Cao Cao said, “You are behaving like a lot of children.” And he told the lictors to take Consort Dong away and strangle her in the courtyard. In vain had the fair girl found favor in the sight of her lord. She died, and the fruit of her womb perished.
Stern and calm her lord sat, powerless to save. Hiding his face while tears gushed forth.
When leaving the Palace, Cao Cao gave strict orders to the keepers, saying “Any one of the imperial relatives by marriage who enter the Palace will be put to death, and the guards will share the same punishment for lack of zeal.” To make more sure he appointed three thousand Imperial Guards from his own troops and appointed Cao Hong to the command.
Then said Cao Cao to his counselor Cheng Yu, “The conspirators in the capital have been removed, it is true, but there are yet two others, Ma Teng and Liu Bei.
These must not be left.” Cheng Yu replied, “Ma Teng is strong in the west and would not be easily captured.
He might be enticed to the capital by suave words and kindly praises, when he would be at your mercy.
Liu Bei is at Xuzhou, strongly posted in an ox-horn formation, and not to be lightly attacked.
More than this, Yuan Shao is at Guandu, and his one desire is to attack you.
Any attempt on the east will send Liu Bei to Yuan Shao for help, and Yuan Shao will come here at once.
Then what will you do?” “You are at fault,” replied Cao Cao.
“Liu Bei is a bold warrior; and if we wait till he is fully fledged and winged, he will be more difficult to deal with.
Yuan Shao may be strong, but he is not to be feared.
He is too undeciding to act.” As they were discussing these things, Guo Jia came in, and Cao Cao suddenly referred the matter to him.
“If I attack Liu Bei, then Yuan Shao is to be feared; what do you think of it?” Guo Jia said, “Yuan Shao by nature is dilatory and hesitating, and his various advisers are jealous of each other. He is not to be feared.
Liu Bei is getting together a new army and has not yet won their hearts. You could settle the east in one battle.” “This advice is in harmony with my thinking,” said Cao Cao.
And he prepared an army of two hundred thousand troops, to move in five divisions against Xuzhou.
Scouts took the news of these preparations to Xuzhou. Sun Qian first went to Xiapi to tell Guan Yu and then went to Xiaopei to tell Liu Bei. The two discussed the position and decided that help must be sought.
So letters were written to Yuan Shao and given to Sun Qian, who went north, sought Tian Feng, and asked him to arrange an interview with Yuan Shao.
Sun Qian was introduced and presented his letters.
But Yuan Shao was of melancholy countenance, and his dress was all awry.
Tian Feng said, “Why this disarray, my lord?” “I am about to die,” replied Yuan Shao.
“But why do you utter such words?” “I have three sons, but only the youngest is clever enough to understand my ideas.
Now he is suffering from scabies which places his life in jeopardy. Think you that I have any heart to talk over any other affairs?” “But,” said Tian Feng, “the present combination of circumstances is unparalleled. Cao Cao is going to attack the east, and Xuchang will be empty.
You can enter it with a few volunteers and so perform good service to the Emperor and save the people from sorrow.
You have only to make up your mind to act.” “I know the chance is excellent, but I am worried and distressed and fear failure.” “What are you distressed about?” said Tian Feng.
“Among my sons only this special one is remarkable; and if anything happens, I am done.” Thus it became evident that no army would be dispatched.
In confirmation of this, Yuan Shao said to Sun Qian, “Go home and tell Liu Bei the real reason, and say that if anything untoward happen, he can come over to me, and I will find some means of helping him.” Tian Feng struck the ground with his staff.
“It is such a pity!” cried he.
“Just as a unique opportunity presents itself, everything is spoiled by the illness of a child.” He went out.
Sun Qian saw that no help could be hoped for and set out to return. When he had arrived and related what he had seen, Liu Bei was quite alarmed and asked what could be done.
“Do not be troubled, Brother,” said Zhang Fei.
“We can destroy Cao Cao merely by a sudden attack before his army shall have time to camp.” “That would be according to the rules of war,” said Liu Bei.
“You have always been a bold warrior, and that move against Liu Dai shows that you are becoming a strategist too.” So Liu Bei gave Zhang Fei command of enough soldiers to carry out this plan.
Now while Cao Cao was in the midst of his march toward Xiaopei, a tornado sprang up and the howling gale tore down one of the banners and broke the staff.
Cao Cao called together his advisers and leaders to ask them what this portended.
Xun Yu said, “From what direction was the wind at the time, and what was the color of the flag?” “The wind was from the southeast, and the flag was blue and red.” “There is only one interpretation:
A raid on the camp will occur tonight.” Cao Cao nodded.
At that moment Mao Jie entered and reported a similar incident. Cao Cao asked him the portent.
“My thinking tells me it means a night raid,” replied he. Alas for the weakness of this descendant of kings! He placed his faith on a night raid.
But the broken staff of a banner warned his enemy. Why should the ancient of days favor the wicked?
“This is evidently providence,” said Cao Cao.
And he began to make preparations. He told off nine bodies of troops to take stations, leaving only one of them as if camped while he placed the others in ambush at eight points. There was but little moonlight as Liu Bei and Zhang Fei marched their respective armies toward Cao Cao's camp.
They had left Sun Qian to guard Xiaopei.
Zhang Fei, since he was the originator of the stratagem, led the way with some light horse. As they drew near, everything seemed very quiet and no one seemed moving. Then suddenly lights flashed out all about them, and Zhang Fei saw he had fallen into a trap.
At once from all the eight directions came out the ambushing troops. From east, west, north, south were Zhang Liao, Xu Chu, Li Dian, and Yu Jin. From northeast, northwest, southeast, southwest were Xiahou Dun, Xiahou Yuan, Xu Huang, and Yue Jin. Zhang Fei, dashing this way and rushing that, guarding his van and protecting his rear, vainly tried to clear himself.
The soldiers he had, being originally Cao Cao's troops, soon gave in and returned to their old leader. The position became very desperate.
Zhang Fei met Xu Huang and engaged him, but his rear was also attacked by Yue Jin. At length he cut an arterial alley out and with a half score of his troops started to return to Xiaopei. The retreat was cut off.
He thought to make for Xuzhou but felt certain that way was also barred.
No other way seemed open, and so he made for the Mangdang Hills. As Liu Bei drew near the camp, he intended to attack when he heard the din of battle. Then he was attacked in the rear and very soon had lost half his force.
Next Xiahou Dun came to attack. Thereupon Liu Bei bolted.
He was pursued by Xiahou Yuan.
Presently Liu Bei looked about him and found he had less than half a hundred soldiers following him. He set his face in the direction of Xiaopei. But before long Liu Bei saw that place was in flames. So he changed his plan and went toward Xiapi. However he found the whole countryside full of the enemy, and he could not get through.
So he bethought himself of the promise of Yuan Shao, that he would find refuge if things went unfavorable, and determined to go to Yuan Shao till he could form some other plan.
Wherefore he took the Qingzhou road.
But it also was blocked, and he went into the open country and made his way north, not without being pursued and losing the remainder of his few followers.
He hastened toward Qingzhou City, traveling one hundred miles a day.
When he reached the city and summoned the gate, the guards asked who he was and they told the Governor, who was Yuan Shao's eldest son, Yuan Tan.
Yuan Tan was greatly surprised, but he opened the gates and went to meet Liu Bei, whom he treated with due consideration.
Liu Bei told the story of his defeat and said he wished for harbor.
He was given suitable quarters and hospitably entertained, while the young man wrote to inform his father.
Then Yuan Tan provided an escort and sent Liu Bei on his journey as far as the boundary of Pingyuan. At the city of Yejun, Liu Bei was met by Yuan Shao in person ten miles outside the city, with a great escort.
Liu Bei made a humble obeisance which Yuan Shao hastened to return and said, “I have been very distressed that, on account of my son's illness, I did not come to your aid.
It is a great joy to see you; the one desire of my life is satisfied.” Liu Bei replied, “The poor Liu Bei you see here has long desired to take refuge with you, but fate has hitherto denied him that privilege.
Now attacked by Cao Cao, my family lost, I remembered that you, General, would receive good people from all sides.
Wherefore I put my pride in my pocket. I trust that I may be found worthy and one day I will prove my gratitude.” Yuan Shao received him with much pleasure and treated him exceedingly well.
And they both lived in Yuan Shao's home region Jizhou.
After the capture of Xiaopei, Cao Cao pressed on toward Xuzhou City, which, after a short defense and the flight of Mi Zhu and Jian Yong, was surrendered by Chen Deng.
Cao Cao led his army into the city, restored order, and pacified the people. Next he wanted to press on to Xiapi, where Guan Yu was holding out and keeping guard of Liu Bei's family.
Xun Yu said, “Guan Yu is there, in charge of his brother's family, and he will defend the city to the last.
If you do not take it quickly, Yuan Shao will get it.” Cao Cao said, “I have always loved Guan Yu, both for his warlike abilities and his principles. I would engage him to enter my service.
I would rather send some one to talk him into surrender.” “He will not do that;” said Guo Jia, “his sense of right is too solid.
I fear any one who went to speak with him would suffer.” Then suddenly a man stepped out, saying, “I know him slightly and I will go.” The speaker was Zhang Liao.
Cheng Yu looked at him and said, “Though you are an old acquaintance, I do not think you are equal to talking over Guan Yu.
But I have a scheme that will so entangle him that he will have no alternative; he will have to enter the service of the Prime Minister.” They set the fatal spring beside the lordly tiger's trail, They hide the hook with fragrant bait to catch the mighty whale.
How Guan Yu was to be entrapped will be told in the next chapter.
CHAPTER 25. Besieged In Tushan Mountains, Guan Yu Makes Three Conditions; The Rescue At Baima, Cao Cao Is Released. The plan to seduce Guan Yu from allegiance to his brothers was now announced by Cheng Yu, “Since Guan Yu is far braver than ordinary warriors, he can only be overreached by superior cunning.
Now send some of the captured soldiers who have lately been of Liu Bei's army into Xiapi, where they shall say they have come back. They shall thus be our allies on the inside. Then an attack and a feigned defeat will entice Guan Yu to a distance from the city.
And his return road shall be cut.” Cao Cao accepted the scheme, and a few score of the troops who had lately been in Xuzhou were sent to the city. Guan Yu believed the story they told and trusted them. So they were suffered to remain.
After this part of the game had been played, Xiahou Dun led forward five thousand troops against the city.
At first, Guan Yu would not accept the challenge; but provoked by men sent to hurl insults at him from the foot of the wall, his wrath got the better of him, and he moved out with three thousand troops.
After the leaders had exchanged some ten bouts, Xiahou Dun made to run away. Guan Yu pursued.
Xiahou Dun stopped and made a stand; then he fled again. Thus alternately fighting and retiring, he enticed Guan Yu seven miles from Xiapi.
Then Guan Yu suddenly remembering the risk to the city drew off his army to return homeward.
Soon, at the sound of a signal bomb, from the left and right out moved two bodies of troops led by Xu Huang and Xu Chu who barred his way. Guan Yu hastened along a road that seemed to offer retreat, but from both sides his ambushing enemies shot their crossbows, and the arrows flew like locusts on the wing. No way past was found, and he turned back. Then both bodies joined in attacking him.
He drove them off and got into the road to his own city, but soon Xiahou Dun came up again and attacked fiercely as before.
Evening came and still Guan Yu was hemmed in, so he went up on a low hill of Tushan Mountains upon which he encamped for a rest.
Guan Yu was surrounded on all sides by enemies. By and by, looking toward his city, he saw the glow of fire. It meant that the traitors, who had come in to surrender, had opened the gate, and the enemy had gone in force.
They had made the fires in order to perplex and distress Guan Yu, and indeed the sight saddened him. In the night he made efforts to escape from the hill, but every attempt was checked by flights of arrows.
At daybreak he prepared for one more effort, but before moving he saw a horseman riding up at full speed and presently discerned Zhang Liao.
When within speaking distance, Guan Yu said, “Are you come to fight me, Zhang Liao?” “No,” replied Zhang Liao.
“I am come to see you because of our old friendship.” Wherefore Zhang Liao threw aside his sword, dismounted, and came forward saluting. And the two sat down.
“Then naturally you have come to talk me over,” said Guan Yu.
“Not so.” said Zhang Liao.
“Sometime ago you saved me; can I help saving you?” “Then you desire to help me.” “Not exactly that,” replied Zhang Liao.
“Then what are you doing here if you have not come to help me?” “Nothing is known of the fate of your elder brother, nor whether your younger brother is alive or dead.
Last night your city fell into the hands of Cao Cao, but neither soldiers nor people were harmed, and a special guard was set over the family of Liu Bei lest they should be alarmed.
I came to tell you how well they had been treated.” “This is certainly talking me over,” said Guan Yu. “Though escape is impossible yet I am not perturbed.
I look upon death as going home.
You would better depart quickly and let me go down and begin the struggle again.” “Surely you must know everybody will ridicule you when they hear of this,” said Zhang Liao.
“I shall die for loyalty and righteousness. Who will laugh?” said Guan Yu.
“You would be guilty of three faults if you died.” “Tell me them,” said Guan Yu. “First of all, you and your elder brother pledged yourselves in the Peach Garden to die or to live together.
Now your brother has been defeated, and you want to fight to the death. Therefore, if your brother appear again by and by and wants your help, he will seek it in vain. Is this anything else than betraying the Peach Garden Oath?
Secondly, you are in charge of your brother's family and, if you fought and died, the two women would be left forlorn and without a protector. That would be a betrayal of trust. Thirdly, your military skill stands out conspicuous and will go down in history.
If you do not aid your brother in his noble attempt to maintain the dynasty, then all your labors and sufferings will have been spent to win a worthless reputation as a valiant fool. Where is the sense in that?
I feel it my duty to point out these three faults to you.” Guan Yu remained silent and thought for some time.
Then he said, “You have spoken of my three faults. What do you desire?” “You are surrounded with the certainty of death if you do not yield.
There is no advantage in a useless death.
Wherefore your best course is to yield to Cao Cao till you hear news of Liu Bei and can rejoin him.
Thus you will ensure the safety of the two ladies and also keep inviolate the Peach Garden compact. You will preserve a useful life.
Brother, you must reflect on these things.” “Brother, you have spoken of three advantages; now I have three conditions.
If the Prime Minister concede these, then will I doff my armor.
If he refuses, then I prefer to be guilty of the three faults and die.” “Why should the Prime Minister not concede them? He is most liberal and large minded.
I pray you let me hear your conditions.” “The first is that as I and the Imperial Uncle have sworn to support the Hans, I now submit to the Emperor and not to His Prime Minister Cao Cao.
The second condition is that suitable provision be made for the two ladies under my care and that no one shall be allowed to approach them.
The third is that I shall be allowed to set off to rejoin Uncle Liu Bei so soon as I shall hear where he is, whether it be far or near. I require all these to be satisfied; failing a single one, I will not submit.
Wherefore, Zhang Liao, I pray you hasten back and announce them.” Zhang Liao lost no time but rode back to Cao Cao.
When he spoke of Guan Yu's intention to submit to the Hans but not to Cao Cao, the latter laughed, saying, “As I am the Minister of Han, so am I Han.
I grant that.” Zhang Liao then spoke of provision due to their rank and security from molestation for the ladies, to which Cao Cao replied, “I will give them twice the regular amount for an Uncle of the Emperor; as for securing them from molestation, that is simple.
The ordinary domestic law is enough.
Why should there be any doubt?” Then said Zhang Liao, “Whenever he shall get news of the whereabouts of Liu Bei, he must go to him.” At this Cao Cao shook his head, saying, “Then I am merely to feed Guan Yu; what is the use of this?
I cannot consent.” Zhang Liao replied, “You must know of Yu Rang's saying: the difference in behavior brought about by difference of treatment?
Liu Bei treats Guan Yu just kindly and liberally; you can surely engage Guan Yu's heart and support by being kinder and more liberal.” “What you say is much to the point.
I will grant the three conditions,” said Cao Cao.
Whereupon Zhang Liao left to carry the news to Guan Yu, still on the summit of the Tushan Mountains.
“Now I expect the army to withdraw so that I may enter the city to tell the two ladies what has been arranged.
After that I submit at once.” Zhang Liao rode back once more with this request, and the order was given for the army to retire three miles.
“Do not do this,” said Xun Yu. “I fear treachery.” “He will certainly not break faith,” said Cao Cao.
“He is too high principled.” The army retired and Guan Yu with his force reentered the city of Xiapi, where he saw that the people were following their ordinary avocations in tranquillity.
He came to the palace and went in to see the two ladies, who hastened to meet him.
He bowed to them below the steps and said, “I apologize for having caused you to feel alarmed.” “Where is the Uncle?” asked they.
“I know not whither he has gone.” “What do you intend to do, Brother-in-Law?” “I went out of the city to try a last battle.
I was surrounded on a hill top, and Zhang Liao has urged me to yield. I proposed three conditions, all of which were conceded, and the enemy drew off to allow me to return to the city.
Unless I have your decision, Sisters-in-Law, I scarcely dare to take any final step.” They asked what were the conditions and were told.
Lady Gan said, “When Cao Cao's army came in, we took it to mean certain death.
But it is scarcely credible that not a hair of our heads has been disturbed; not a soldier has dared enter our doors.
You have accepted the conditions, Brotherin-Law, and there is no need to ask our consent.
Our only fear is that he will not let you go by and by to search for the Uncle.” “Sisters-in-Law, you need not be anxious.
I will see to that.” “You must decide everything and need not ask us.” Guan Yu withdrew and then, with a small escort, went to his interview with Cao Cao.
Cao Cao came to the outermost gate to welcome him, and Guan Yu dismounted and made obeisance.
Cao Cao returned his salute with the greatest cordiality.
“The leader of a defeated army is grateful for the graciousness that has preserved his life,” said Guan Yu.
“I have so long admired your loyalty and high principles that this happy meeting gratifies the desire of my whole life,” replied Cao Cao.
“As the Prime Minister has granted the three requests which my friend petitioned for on my behalf, there is now but little to discuss,” said Guan Yu.
“As I have spoken, so be it; I could not break faith,” replied Cao Cao.
“Whenever I hear where Uncle Liu Bei is, I must certainly go to him, even if through fire and water. It may be that there will be no time nor opportunity of saying farewell.
I trust you will understand the reason.” “If Liu Bei should prove to be alive, you must certainly be allowed to go to him.
But I fear that in the confusion he may have lost his life.
You may set your mind at rest and let me make inquiries.” Guan Yu thanked him. Then a banquet was prepared in Guan Yu's honor.
Next day the army started on its homeward march.
For the journey to the capital, a carriage was prepared for the two ladies, and Guan Yu was its guard.
On the road they rested at a certain post station, and Cao Cao, anxious to compromise Guan Yu by beguiling him into forgetfulness of his duty, assigned Guan Yu to the same apartment as his sisters-in-law.
Guan Yu stood the whole night before the door with a lighted candle in his hand. Not once did he yield to fatigue.
Cao Cao's respect for him could not but increase.
At the capital the Prime Minister assigned a dignified residence to Guan Yu, which he immediately divided into two enclosures, the inner one for the two ladies and the other for himself. He placed a guard of eighteen of his veterans over the women's quarters.
Guan Yu was presented to Emperor Xian who conferred upon him the rank of General Who Serves the Hans.
Guan Yu expressed his thanks to the Emperor.
Next day Cao Cao made a great banquet, inviting all his advisers and officers, solely in honor of Guan Yu, who sat in the seat of honor.
Beside this Guan Yu received presents of silks and gold and silver vessels, all of which Guan Yu sent into the ladies' quarters for their use and keeping.
In fact from the day of arrival in the capital, Guan Yu was treated with marked respect and distinction, small banquets following each other in each three days, and large banquets held in each five days.
Cao Cao also presented him with ten most lovely serving girls; Guan Yu sent these also within to wait upon his two sisters-in-law.
Every third day Guan Yu went to the door of the women's quarters to inquire after their welfare, and then they asked if any news of the wanderer had come. This ceremony closed with the words:
“Brother-in-Law, you may retire when you wish.” Cao Cao heard of this extremely correct behavior and thought all the more of the man for it.
One day Cao Cao noticed that the robe Guan Yu was wearing was old and frayed. Taking his measurements, Cao Cao had a new one made of fine brocade and presented it to him.
Guan Yu took it and put it on under the old robe, so that the latter covered it.
“Why so very thrifty?” laughed Cao Cao.
“It is not thrift,” was his reply.
“The old robe was a gift from my brother, and I wear it because it reminds me of him.
I could not allow the new gift to eclipse his old one.” “How very high principled!” said Cao Cao, sighing.
One day when Guan Yu was at home, there came a messenger to say that the two women had thrown themselves on the ground and were weeping. They would not say why.
Guan Yu set his dress in order, went over, and knelt by the door, saying, “Why this grief, Sisters-in-Law?” Lady Gan replied, “In the night I dreamed that the Uncle had fallen into a pit. I woke up and told Lady Mi, and we think he must be dead.
So we weep.” “Dreams are not to be credited,” he replied.
“You dreamed of him because you were thinking of him.
Pray do not grieve.” Just then Guan Yu was invited to another banquet, so he took leave of the ladies and went.
Seeing Guan Yu looked sad and tearful, his host asked the reason.
“My sisters-in-law have been weeping for my brother, and I cannot help being sad in sympathy.” Cao Cao smiled and tried to cheer up his guest.
Cao Cao plied Guan Yu with wine so that Guan Yu became quite intoxicated and sat stroking his beard and saying, “What a useless thing am I!
I could do no service for my country, and I have parted from my elder brother.” “How many hairs in your beard?” suddenly asked his host.
“Some hundreds, perhaps.
In the autumn a few fall out, but in the winter it is fullest. Then I use a black silk bag to keep the hairs from being broken,” replied Guan Yu.
Cao Cao had a bag made for him to protect his beard.
